Skip to main content
 
Texts
 
Video
 
Audio
 
Software
 
Images
My uploads
My loans
My favorites
My lists
My collections
My web archives
Account settings
Get help
Log out
 Search metadata
 Search text contents
 Search TV news captions
 Search radio transcripts
 Search archived web sites
Advanced Search
About Blog Projects Help Donate  Contact Jobs Volunteer People
Full text of "All 62 Goosebumps novels"
See other formats
: | \ | Its a monster blood drivel | | | 
s ' 
» e 
) TRIN 
à 
Q cee at : 


= ~ a i m 


MONSTER BLOOD 


MS oO HMI Om TLS 


MONSTER BLOOD 


Goosebumps - 03 
R.L. Stine 
(An Undead Scan v1.5) 


“T don’t want to stay here. Please don’t leave me here.” 

Evan Ross tugged his mother’s hand, trying to pull her away from 
the front stoop of the small, gray-shingled house. Mrs. Ross turned to 
him, an impatient frown on her face. 

“Evan—you’re twelve years old. Don’t act like an infant,” she 
said, freeing her hand from his grasp. 

“I hate when you say that!” Evan exclaimed angrily, crossing his 
arms in front of his chest. 

Softening her expression, she reached out and ran her hand 
tenderly through Evan’s curly, carrot-colored hair. “And I hate when 
you do that!” he cried, backing away from her, nearly stumbling over 
a broken flagstone in the walk. “Don’t touch my hair. I hate it!” 

“Okay, so you hate me,” his mother said with a shrug. She 
climbed up the two steps and knocked on the front door. “You still 
have to stay here till I get back.” 

“Why can’t I come with you?” Evan demanded, keeping his arms 
crossed. “Just give me one good reason.” 

“Your sneaker is untied,” his mother replied. 

“So?” Evan replied unhappily. “I like ’em untied.” 

“You'll trip,” she warned. 

“Mom,” Evan said, rolling his eyes in exasperation, “have you 
ever seen anyone trip over his sneakers because they were untied?” 

“Well, no,” his mother admitted, a smile slowly forming on her 
pretty face. 

“You just want to change the subject,” Evan said, not smiling 
back. “You’re going to leave me here for weeks with a horrible old 
woman and—” 

“Evan—that’s enough!” Mrs. Ross snapped, tossing back her 
straight blonde hair. “Kathryn is not a horrible old woman. She’s your 
father’s aunt. Your great-aunt. And she’s—” 

“She’s a total stranger,” Evan cried. He knew he was losing 
control, but he didn’t care. How could his mother do this to him? How 
could she leave him with some old lady he hadn’t seen since he was 
two? What was he supposed to do here all by himself until his mother 
got back? 

“Evan, we’ve discussed this a thousand times,” his mother said 
impatiently, pounding on his aunt’s front door again. “This is a family 
emergency. I really expect you to cooperate a little better.” 


Her next words were drowned out by Trigger, Evan’s cocker 
spaniel, who stuck his tan head out of the back window of the rented 
car and began barking and howling. 

“Now he’s giving me a hard time, too!” Mrs. Ross exclaimed. 

“Can I let him out?” Evan asked eagerly. 

“I guess you’d better,” his mother replied. “Trigger’s so old, we 
don’t want him to have a heart attack in there. I just hope he doesn’t 
terrify Kathryn.” 

“I’m coming, Trigger!” Evan called. 

He jogged to the gravel driveway and pulled open the car door. 
With an excited yip, Trigger leapt out and began running in wide 
circles around Kathryn’s small, rectangular front yard. 

“He doesn’t look like he’s twelve,” Evan said, watching the dog 
run, and smiling for the first time that day. 

“See. You'll have Trigger for company,” Mrs. Ross said, turning 
back to the front door. “Pll be back from Atlanta in no time. A couple 
of weeks at the most. I’m sure your dad and I can find a house in that 
time. And then we’ll be back before you even notice we’re gone.” 

“Yeah. Sure,” Evan said sarcastically. 

The sun dipped behind a large cloud. A shadow fell over the small 
front yard. 

Trigger wore himself out quickly and came panting up the walk, 
his tongue hanging nearly to the ground. Evan bent down and petted 
the dog’s back. 

He looked up at the gray house as his mother knocked on the 
front door again. It looked dark and uninviting. There were curtains 
drawn over the upstairs windows. One of the shutters had come loose 
and was resting at an odd angle. 

“Mom—why are you knocking?” he asked, shoving his hands into 
his jeans pockets. “You said Aunt Kathryn was totally deaf.” 

“Oh.” His mother’s face reddened. “You got me so upset, Evan, 
with all your complaining, I completely forgot. Of course she can’t 
hear us.” 

How am I going to spend two weeks with a strange old lady who 
can’t even hear me? Evan wondered glumly. 

He remembered eavesdropping on his parents two weeks earlier 
when they had made the plan. They were seated across from each 
other at the kitchen table. They thought Evan was out in the backyard. 
But he was in the hallway, his back pressed against the wall, listening. 

His father, he learned, was reluctant to leave Evan with Kathryn. 
“She’s a very stubborn old woman,” Mr. Ross had said. “Look at her. 
Deaf for twenty years, and she’s refused to learn sign language or to 
lip-read. How’s she going to take care of Evan?” 


“She took good care of you when you were a boy,” Mrs. Ross had 
argued. 

“That was thirty years ago,” Mr. Ross protested. 

“Well, we have no choice,” Evan heard his mother say. “There’s 
no one else to leave him with. Everyone else is away on vacation. You 
know, August is just the worst month for you to be transferred to 
Atlanta.” 

“Well, excuuuuse me!” Mr. Ross said sarcastically. “Okay, okay. 
Discussion closed. You’re absolutely right, dear. We have no choice. 
Kathryn it is. You’ll drive Evan there and then fly down to Atlanta.” 

“It'll be a good experience for him,” Evan heard his mother say. 
“He needs to learn how to get along under difficult circumstances. You 
know, moving to Atlanta, leaving all his friends behind—that isn’t 
going to be easy on Evan either.” 

“Okay. I said okay,” Mr. Ross said impatiently. “It’s settled. Evan 
will be fine. Kathryn is a bit weird, but she’s perfectly harmless.” 

Evan heard the kitchen chairs scraping across the linoleum, 
indicating that his parents were getting up, their discussion ended. 

His fate was sealed. Silently, he had made his way out the front 
door and around to the backyard to think about what he had just 
overheard. 

He leaned against the trunk of the big maple tree, which hid him 
from the house. It was his favorite place to think. 

Why didn’t his parents ever include him in their discussions? he 
wondered. If they were going to discuss leaving him with some old 
aunt he’d never seen before, shouldn’t he at least have a say? He 
learned all the big family news by eavesdropping from the hallway. It 
just wasn’t right. 

Evan pulled a small twig off the ground and tapped it against the 
broad tree trunk. 

Aunt Kathryn was weird. That’s what his dad had said. She was so 
weird, his father didn’t want to leave Evan with her. 

But they had no choice. No choice. 

Maybe they'll change their minds and take me to Atlanta with 
them, Evan thought. Maybe they’ll realize they can’t do this to me. 

But now, two weeks later, he was standing in front of Aunt 
Kathryn’s gray house, feeling very nervous, staring at the brown 
suitcase filled with his belongings, which stood beside his mother on 
the stoop. 

There’s nothing to be scared of, he assured himself. 

It’s only for two weeks. Maybe less. 

But then the words popped out before he’d even had a chance to 
think about them: “Mom—what if Aunt Kathryn is mean?” 


“Huh?” The question caught his mother by surprise. “Mean? Why 
would she be mean, Evan?” 

And as she said this, facing Evan with her back to the house, the 
front door was pulled open, and Aunt Kathryn, a large woman with 
startling black hair, filled the doorway. 

Staring past his mother, Evan saw the knife in Kathryn’s hand. 
And he saw that the blade of the knife was dripping with blood. 


Trigger raised his head and began to bark, hopping backward on his 
hind legs with each bark. 

Startled, Evan’s mother spun around, nearly stumbling off the 
small stoop. 

Evan gaped in silent horror at the knife. 

A smile formed on Kathryn’s face, and she pushed open the screen 
door with her free hand. 

She wasn’t anything like Evan had pictured. He had pictured a 
small, frail-looking, white-haired old lady. But Kathryn was a large 
woman, very robust, broad-shouldered, and tall. 

She wore a peach-colored housedress and had straight black hair, 
pulled back and tied behind her head in a long ponytail that flowed 
down the back of the dress. She wore no makeup, and her pale face 
seemed to disappear under the striking black hair, except for her eyes, 
which were large and round, and steely blue. 

“I was slicing beef,” she said in a surprisingly deep voice, waving 
the blood-stained kitchen knife. She stared at Evan. “You like beef?” 

“Uh... yeah,” he managed to reply, his chest still fluttery from the 
shock of seeing her appear with the raised knife. 

Kathryn held open the screen door, but neither Evan nor his 
mother made any move to go inside. “He’s big,” Kathryn said to Mrs. 
Ross. “A big boy. Not like his father. I used to call his father Chicken. 
Because he was no bigger than a chicken.” She laughed as if she had 
cracked a funny joke. 

Mrs. Ross, picking up Evan’s suitcase, glanced uncomfortably 
back at him. “Yeah... he’s big,” she said. 

Actually, Evan was one of the shortest kids in his class. And no 
matter how much he ate, he remained “as skinny as a spaghetti 
noodle,” as his dad liked to say. 

“You don’t have to answer me,” Kathryn said, stepping aside so 
that Mrs. Ross could get inside the house with the suitcase. “I can’t 
hear you.” Her voice was deep, as deep as a man’s, and she spoke 
clearly, without the indistinct pronunciation that some deaf people 
have. 

Evan followed his mother into the front hallway, Trigger yapping 
at his heels. “Can’t you get that dog quiet?” his mother snapped. 

“It doesn’t matter. She can’t hear it,” Evan replied, gesturing 
toward his aunt, who was heading to the kitchen to put down the 
knife. 


Kathryn returned a few seconds later, her blue eyes locked on 
Evan, her lips pursed, as if she were studying him. “So, you like beef?” 
she repeated. 

He nodded. 

“Good,” she said, her expression still serious. “I always fixed beef 
for your father. But he only wanted pie.” 

“What kind of pie?” Evan asked, and then blushed when he 
remembered Kathryn couldn’t hear him. 

“So he’s a good boy? Not a troublemaker?” Kathryn asked Evan’s 
mother. 

Mrs. Ross nodded, looking at Evan. “Where shall we put his 
suitcase?” she asked. 

“I can tell by looking he’s a good boy,” Kathryn said. She reached 
out and grabbed Evan’s face, her big hand holding him under the chin, 
her eyes examining him closely. “Good-looking boy,” she said, giving 
his chin a hard squeeze. “He likes the girls?” 

Still holding his chin, she lowered her face to his. “You’ve got a 
girlfriend?” she asked, her pale face right above his, so close he could 
smell her breath, which was sour. 

Evan took a step back, an embarrassed grin crossing his face. “No. 
Not really.” 

“Yes?” Kathryn cried, bellowing in his ear. “Yes? I knew it!” She 
laughed heartily, turning her gaze to Evan’s mother. 

“The suitcase?” Mrs. Ross asked, picking up the bag. 

“He likes the girls, huh?” Kathryn repeated, still chuckling. “I 
could tell. Just like his father. His father always liked the girls.” 

Evan turned desperately to his mother. “Mom, I can’t stay here,” 
he said, whispering even though he knew Kathryn couldn’t hear. 
“Please—don’t make me.” 

“Hush,” his mother replied, also whispering. “She’ll leave you 
alone. I promise. She’s just trying to be friendly.” 

“He likes the girls,” Kathryn repeated, leering at him with her 
cold blue eyes, again lowering her face close to Evan’s. 

“Mom—her breath smells like Trigger’s!” Evan exclaimed 
miserably. 

“Evan!” Mrs. Ross shouted angrily. “Stop it! I expect you to 
cooperate.” 

‘Tm going to bake you a pie,” Kathryn said, tugging at her black 
ponytail with one of her huge hands. “Would you like to roll out the 
dough? I’ll bet you would. What did your father tell you about me, 
Evan?” She winked at Mrs. Ross. “Did he tell you I was a scary old 
witch?” 

“No,” Evan protested, looking at his mother. 


“Well, I am!” Kathryn declared, and once again burst into her 
deep-throated laugh. 

Trigger took this moment to begin barking ferociously and 
jumping on Evan’s great-aunt. She glared down at the dog, her eyes 
narrowing, her expression becoming stern. “Look out or we’ll put you 
in the pie, doggie!” she exclaimed. 

Trigger barked even harder, darting boldly toward the tall, 
hovering woman, then quickly retreating, his stub of a tail whipping 
back and forth in a frenzy. 

“We'll put him in the pie, won’t we, Evan?” Kathryn repeated, 
putting a big hand on Evan’s shoulder and squeezing it till Evan 
flinched in pain. 

“Mom—” he pleaded when his aunt finally let go and, smiling, 
made her way to the kitchen. “Mom—please.” 

“It’s just her sense of humor, Evan,” Mrs. Ross said uncertainly. 
“She means well. Really. She’s going to bake you a pie.” 

“But I don’t want pie!” Evan wailed. “I don’t like it here, Mom! 
She hurt me. She squeezed my shoulder so hard—” 

“Evan, lm sure she didn’t mean to. She’s just trying to joke with 
you. She wants you to like her. Give her a chance—okay?” 

Evan started to protest, but thought better of it. 

‘Tm counting on you,” his mother continued, turning her eyes to 
the kitchen. They could both see Kathryn at the counter, her broad 
back to them, hacking away at something with the big kitchen knife. 

“But she’s... weird!” Evan protested. 

“Listen, Evan, I understand how you're feeling,” his mother said. 
“But you won’t have to spend all your time with her. There are a lot of 
kids in this neighborhood. Take Trigger for a walk. Pll bet you’ll make 
some friends your age. She’s an old woman, Evan. She won’t want you 
hanging around all the time.” 

“T guess,” Evan muttered. 

His mother bent down suddenly and gave him a hug, pressing her 
cheek against his. The hug, he knew, was supposed to cheer him up. 
But it only made him feel worse. 

“Tm counting on you,” his mother repeated in his ear. 

Evan decided to try and be braver about this. “I’ll help you carry 
the suitcase up to my room,” he said. 

They carried it up the narrow staircase. His room was actually a 
study. The walls were lined with bookshelves filled with old hardcover 
books. A large mahogany desk stood in the center of the room. A 
narrow cot had been made up under the single, curtained window. 

The window faced out onto the backyard, a long green rectangle 
with the gray-shingled garage to the left, a tall picket fence to the 


right. A small, fenced-in area stretched across the back of the yard. It 
looked like some sort of dog run. 

The room smelled musty. The sharp aroma of mothballs invaded 
Evan’s nose. 

Trigger sneezed. He rolled onto his back, his legs racing in the air. 

Trigger can’t stand this place either, Evan thought. But he kept 
his thought to himself, smiling bravely at his mother, who quickly 
unpacked his suitcase, nervously checking her watch. 

‘Tm late. Don’t want to miss my plane,” she said. She gave him 
another hug, longer this time. Then she took a ten-dollar bill from her 
pocket-book and stuffed it into his shirt pocket. “Buy yourself a treat. 
Be good. IIl hurry back as fast as I can.” 

“Okay. Bye,” he said, his chest feeling fluttery, his throat as dry as 
cotton. The smell of her perfume momentarily drowned out the 
mothballs. 

He didn’t want her to leave. He had such a bad feeling. 

You’re just scared, he scolded himself. 

“PIL call you from Atlanta,” she shouted as she disappeared down 
the stairs to say good-bye to Kathryn. 

Her perfume disappeared. 

The mothballs returned. 

Trigger uttered a low, sad howl, as if he knew what was 
happening, as if he knew they were being abandoned here in this 
strange house with the strange old woman. 

Evan picked Trigger up and nose-kissed his cold, black nose. 
Putting the dog back down on the worn carpet, he made his way to 
the window. 

He stood there for a long while, one hand holding the curtains 
aside, staring down at the small, green yard, trying to calm the 
fluttering in his chest. After a few minutes, he heard his mother’s car 
back down the gravel drive. Then he heard it roll away. 

When he could no longer hear it, he sighed and plopped down on 
the cot. “It’s just you and me now, Trigger,” he said glumly. 

Trigger was busily sniffing behind the door. 

Evan stared up at the walls of old books. 

What am I going to do here all day? he asked himself, propping 
his head in his hands. No Nintendo. No computer. He hadn’t even seen 
a TV in his great-aunt’s small living room. What am I going to do? 

Sighing again, he picked himself up and walked along the 
bookshelves, his eyes scanning the titles. There were lots of science 
books and textbooks, he saw. Books on biology and astronomy, 
ancient Egypt, chemistry texts, and medical books. Several shelves 
were filled with dusty, yellowed books. Maybe Kathryn’s husband, 


Evan’s great-uncle, had been some sort of scientist. 
Nothing here for me to read, he thought glumly. 
He pulled open the closet door. 
“Oh!” 
He cried out as something leapt out at him. 
“Help! Please—help!” 
Everything went black. 
“Help! I can’t see!” Evan screamed. 


Evan staggered back in fear as the warm blackness crept over him. 

It took him a few seconds to realize what it was. His heart still 
thudding in his chest, he reached up and pulled the screeching black 
cat off his face. 

The cat dropped silently to the ground and padded to the 
doorway. Evan turned and saw Kathryn standing there, an amused 
grin on her face. 

How long had she been standing there? he wondered. 

“Sarabeth, how did you get in there?” she asked in a playfully 
scolding tone, bending down to speak to the cat. “You must have 
given the boy a fright.” 

The cat mewed and rubbed against Kathryn’s bare leg. 

“Did Sarabeth scare you?” Kathryn asked Evan, still smiling. 
“That cat has a strange sense of humor. She’s evil. Pure evil.” She 
chuckled as if she’d said something funny. 

“Tm okay,” Evan said uncertainly. 

“Watch out for Sarabeth. She’s evil,” Kathryn repeated, bending 
down and picking the cat up by the scruff of the neck, holding her up 
in the air in front of her. “Evil, evil, evil.” 

Seeing the cat suspended in the air, Trigger uttered an unhappy 
howl. His stubby tail went into motion, and he leapt up at the cat, 
barking and yipping, missed, and leapt again, snapping at Sarabeth’s 
tail. 

“Down, Trigger! Get down!” Evan cried. 

Struggling to get out of Kathryn’s arms, the cat swiped a clawed 
black paw at her, screeching in anger and fear. Trigger barked and 
howled as Evan struggled to pull the excited cocker spaniel away. 

Evan grabbed hold of Trigger as the cat swung to the floor and 
disappeared out the door. “Bad dog. Bad dog,” Evan whispered. But he 
didn’t really mean it. He was glad Trigger had scared the cat away. 

He looked up to see Kathryn still filling the doorway, staring 
down at him sternly. “Bring the dog,” she said in a low voice, her eyes 
narrowed, her pale lips pursed tightly. 

“Huh?” Evan gripped Trigger in a tight hug. 

“Bring the dog,” Kathryn repeated coldly. “We can’t have animals 
fighting in this house.” 

“But Aunt Kathryn—” Evan started to plead, then remembered 
she couldn’t hear him. 


“Sarabeth is a bad one,” Kathryn said, not softening her 
expression. “We can’t get her riled, can we?” She turned and started 
down the stairs. “Bring the dog, Evan.” 

Holding Trigger tightly by the shoulders with both hands, Evan 
hesitated. 

“I have to take care of the dog,” Kathryn said sternly. “Come.” 

Evan was suddenly filled with dread. What did she mean, take 
care of the dog? 

A picture flashed into his mind of Kathryn standing at the 
doorway with the bloody kitchen knife in her hand. 

“Bring the dog,” Kathryn insisted. 

Evan gasped. What was she going to do to Trigger? 


2) 


“I will take care of you, doggie, 
Trigger. The dog whimpered in reply. 

“Come, Evan. Follow me,” she said impatiently. 

Seeing that he had no choice, Evan obediently carried Trigger 
down the stairs and followed his aunt to the backyard. “I’m prepared,” 
she said, turning to make sure he was following. 

Despite her age—she was at least eighty—she walked with long, 
steady strides. “I knew you were bringing a dog, so I made sure I was 
prepared.” 

Trigger licked Evan’s hand as they walked across the yard to the 
long, fenced-in area at the back. “It’s a special place for your dog,” 
Kathryn said, reaching up to grab one end of the rope that stretched 
across the run. “Attach this to the collar, Evan. Your dog will have fun 
here.” She frowned disapprovingly at Trigger. “And there will be no 
problems with Sarabeth.” 

Evan felt very relieved that this was all Kathryn wanted to do to 
Trigger. But he didn’t want to leave Trigger tied up in this prison in 
the back of the yard. Trigger was a house dog. He wouldn’t be happy 
by himself out here. 

But Evan knew he had no way of arguing with his aunt. Kathryn 
is smart in a way, he thought bitterly as he hooked Trigger’s collar to 
the rope. Since she won’t learn sign language and won’t lip-read, it 
means she gets to do whatever she wants, and no one can tell her no. 

He bent down and gave Trigger’s warm head a pat and looked up 
at the old woman. She had her arms crossed in front of her chest, her 
blue eyes glowing brightly in the sunlight, a cold smile of triumph on 
her face. 

“That’s a good boy,” she said, waiting for Evan to get up before 
starting back to the house. “I knew when I looked at you. Come to the 
house, Evan. I have cookies and milk. You'll enjoy them.” Her words 
were kind, but her voice was hard and cold. 

Trigger sent up an unhappy howl as Evan followed Kathryn to the 
house. Evan turned, intending to go back and comfort the dog. But 
Kathryn grabbed his hand in an iron grip, and, staring straight ahead, 
led him to the kitchen door. 

The kitchen was small and cluttered and very warm. Kathryn 
motioned for him to sit at a small table against the wall. The table was 
covered with a plastic, checkered tablecloth. She frowned, her eyes 
studying him, as she brought over his snack. 


Kathryn repeated, frowning at 


He downed the oatmeal raisin cookies and milk, listening to 
Trigger howl in the backyard. Oatmeal raisin wasn’t his favorite, but 
he was surprised to find that he was hungry. As he gobbled them 
down, Kathryn stood at the doorway, staring intently at him, a stern 
expression on her face. 

‘Tm going to take Trigger for a walk,” he announced, wiping the 
milk mustache off his upper lip with the paper napkin she had given 
him. 

Kathryn shrugged and wrinkled up her face. 

Oh. Right. She can’t hear me, Evan thought. Standing at the 
kitchen window, he pointed to Trigger, then made a walking motion 
with two fingers. Kathryn nodded. 

Whew, he thought. This is going to be hard. 

He waved good-bye and hurried to free Trigger from his backyard 
prison. 

A few minutes later, Trigger was tugging at the leash, sniffing the 
flowers along the curb as Evan made his way up the block. The other 
houses on the street were about the same size as Kathryn’s, he saw. 
And they all had small, neatly trimmed, square front yards. 

He saw some little kids chasing each other around a birch tree. 
And he saw a middle-aged man in bright orange bathing trunks 
washing his car with a garden hose in his driveway. But he didn’t see 
any kids his age. 

Trigger barked at a squirrel and tugged the leash out of Evan’s 
hand. “Hey—come back!” Evan called. Trigger, disobedient as always, 
took off after the squirrel. 

The squirrel wisely climbed a tree. But Trigger, his eyesight not 
what it once was, continued the chase. 

Running at full speed, calling the dog’s name, Evan followed him 
around a corner and halfway down the block before Trigger finally 
realized he had lost the race. 

Breathing hard, Evan grabbed the leash handle. “Gotcha,” he said. 
He gave the leash a tug, trying to lead the panting dog back to 
Kathryn’s street. 

Trigger, sniffing around a dark tree trunk, pulled the other way. 
Evan was about to pick up the stubborn dog when he was startled by a 
hand grabbing his shoulder. 

“Hey—who are you?” a voice demanded. 


Evan spun around to find a girl standing behind him, staring at him 
with dark brown eyes. “Why’d you grab my shoulder like that?” he 
asked, his heart still pounding. 

“To scare you,” she said simply. 

“Yeah. Well...” Evan shrugged. Trigger gave a hard tug at the 
leash and nearly pulled him over. 

The girl laughed. 

She was pretty, he thought. She had short, wavy brown hair, 
almost black, and flashing brown eyes, and a playful, teasing smile. 
She was wearing an oversized yellow T-shirt over black spandex 
leggings, and bright yellow Nikes. 

“So who are you?” she demanded again. 

She wasn’t the shy type, he decided. “I’m me,” he said, letting 
Trigger lead him around the tree. 

“Did you move into the Winterhalter house?” she asked, following 
him. 

He shook his head. “No. I’m just visiting.” 

She frowned in disappointment. 

“For a couple of weeks,” Evan added. “I’m staying with my aunt. 
Actually, she’s my great-aunt.” 

“What’s so great about her?” the girl cracked. 

“Nothing,” Evan replied without laughing. “For sure.” 

Trigger sniffed at a bug on a fat brown leaf. 

“Is that your bike?” Evan asked, pointing to the red BMX bike 
lying on the grass behind her. 

“Yeah,” she replied. 

“It’s cool,” he said. “I have one like it.” 

“I like your dog,” she said, eyeing Trigger. “He looks real stupid. I 
like stupid dogs.” 

“Me, too. I guess.” Evan laughed. 

“What’s his name? Does he have a stupid name?” She bent down 
and tried to pet Trigger’s back, but he moved away. 

“His name’s Trigger,” Evan said, and waited for her reaction. 

“Yeah. That’s pretty stupid,” she said thoughtfully. “Especially for 
a cocker spaniel.” 

“Thanks,” Evan said uncertainly. 

Trigger turned to sniff the girl’s hands, his tail wagging furiously, 
his tongue hanging down to the ground. 


“I have a stupid name, too,” the girl admitted. She waited for 
Evan to ask. 

“What is it?” he said finally. 

“Andrea,” she said. 

“That’s not a stupid name.” 

“I hate it,” she said, pulling a blade of grass off her leggings. 
“Annndreeea.” She stretched the name out in a deep, cultured voice. 
“It sounds so stuck up, like I should be wearing a corduroy jumper 
with a prim, white blouse, walking a toy poodle. So I make everyone 
call me Andy.” 

“Hi, Andy,” Evan said, petting Trigger. “My name is—” 

“Don’t tell me!” she interrupted, clamping a hot hand over his 
mouth. 

She certainly isn’t shy, he thought. 

“Let me guess,” she said. “Is it a stupid name, too?” 

“Yeah,” he nodded. “It’s Evan. Evan Stupid.” 

She laughed. “That’s really a stupid name.” 

He felt glad that he made her laugh. She was cheering him up, he 
realized. A lot of the girls back home didn’t appreciate his sense of 
humor. They thought he was silly. 

“What are you doing?” she asked. 

“Walking Trigger. You know. Exploring the neighborhood.” 

“It’s pretty boring,” she said. “Just a lot of houses. Want to go 
into town? It’s only a few blocks away.” She pointed down the street. 

Evan hesitated. He hadn’t told his aunt he was going into town. 
But, what the heck, he thought. She wouldn’t care. 

Besides, what could possibly happen? 


“Okay,” Evan said. “Let’s check out the town.” 

“I have to go to a toy store and look for a present for my cousin,” 
Andy said, hoisting her bike up by the handlebars. 

“How old are you?” Evan asked, tugging Trigger toward the 
street. 

“Twelve.” 

“Me, too,” he said. “Can I try your bike?” 

She shook her head as she climbed onto the narrow seat. “No, but 
I'll let you run alongside.” She laughed. 

“Youre a riot,” he said sarcastically, hurrying to keep up as she 
began to pedal. 

“And you’re stupid,” she called back playfully. 

“Hey, Annnndreeeea—wait up!” he called, stretching the name out 
to annoy her. 

A few blocks later, the houses ended and they entered town, a 
three-block stretch of low two-story shops and offices. Evan saw a 
small brick post office, a barbershop with an old-fashioned barber pole 
out front, a grocery, a drive-through bank, and a hardware store with 
a large sign in the window proclaiming a sale on birdseed. 

“The toy store is in the next block,” Andy said, walking her bike 
along the sidewalk. Evan tugged Trigger’s leash, encouraging him to 
keep up the pace. “Actually there are two toy stores, an old one and a 
new one. I like the old one best.” 

“Let’s check it out,” Evan said, examining the cluttered window 
display of the video store on the corner. 

I wonder if Aunt Kathryn has a VCR, he thought. He quickly 
dismissed the idea. No way.... 

The toy store was in an old clapboard building that hadn’t been 
painted in many years. A small, hand-painted sign in the dust-smeared 
window proclaimed: Wagner’s Novelties & Sundries. There were no 
toys on display. 

Andy leaned her bike against the front of the building. 
“Sometimes the owner can be a little mean. I don’t know if he’ll let 
you bring your dog in.” 

“Well, let’s give it a try,” Evan said, pulling open the door. 
Tugging hard on his leash, Trigger led the way into the store. 

Evan found himself in a dark, low-ceilinged, narrow room. It took 
awhile for his eyes to adjust to the dim light. 


Wagner’s looked more like a warehouse than a store. There were 
floor-to-ceiling shelves against both walls, jammed with boxes of toys, 
and a long display counter that ran through the center of the store, 
leaving narrow aisles that even someone as skinny as Evan had to 
squeeze through. 

At the front of the store, slumped on a tall stool behind an old- 
fashioned wooden cash register, sat a grumpy-looking man with a 
single tuft of white hair in the center of a red, bald head. He had a 
drooping white mustache that seemed to frown at Evan and Andy as 
they entered. 

“Hi,” Andy said timidly, giving the man a wave. 

He grunted in reply and turned back to the newspaper he was 
reading. 

Trigger sniffed the low shelves excitedly. Evan looked around at 
the stacks of toys. It appeared from the thick layer of dust that they’d 
been sitting there for a hundred years. Everything seemed tossed 
together, dolls next to building sets, art supplies mixed in with old 
action figures Evan didn’t even recognize, a toy drum set underneath a 
pile of footballs. 

He and Andy were the only customers in the store. 

“Do they have Nintendo games?” Evan asked her, whispering, 
afraid to break the still silence. 

“I don’t think so,” Andy whispered back. “T’ll ask.” She shouted 
up to the front, “Do you have Nintendo games?” 

It took awhile for the man to answer. He scratched his ear. “Don’t 
carry them,” he grunted finally, sounding annoyed by the 
interruption. 

Andy and Evan wandered toward the back of the store. “Why do 
you like this place?” Evan whispered, picking up an old cap pistol 
with a cowboy holster. 

“I just think it’s neat,” Andy replied. “You can find some real 
treasures here. It’s not like other toy stores.” 

“That’s for sure,” Evan said sarcastically. “Hey—look!” He picked 
up a lunchbox with a cowboy dressed in black emblazoned on its side. 
“Hopalong Cassidy,” he read. “Who’s Hopalong Cassidy?” 

“A cowboy with a stupid name,” Andy said, taking the old 
lunchbox from him and examining it. “Look—it’s made of metal, not 
plastic. Wonder if my cousin would like it. He likes stupid names, 
too.” 

“It’s a pretty weird present,” Evan said. 

“He’s a pretty weird cousin,” Andy cracked. “Hey, look at this.” 
She set down the old lunchbox and picked up an enormous box. “It’s a 
magic set. ‘Astound your friends. Perform one hundred amazing 


999 


tricks,” she read. 

“That’s a lot of amazing tricks,” Evan said. 

He wandered farther back into the dimly lit store, Trigger leading 
the way, sniffing furiously. “Hey—” To Evan’s surprise, a narrow 
doorway led into a small back room. 

This room, Evan saw, was even darker and dustier. Stepping 
inside, he saw worn-looking stuffed animals tossed into cartons, games 
in faded, yellowed boxes, baseball gloves with the leather worn thin 
and cracked. 

Who would want this junk? he thought. 

He was about to leave when something caught his eye. It was a 
blue can, about the size of a can of soup. He picked it up, surprised by 
how heavy it was. 

Bringing it close to his face to examine it in the dim light, he read 
the faded label: Monster Blood. Below that, in smaller type, it read: 
Surprising Miracle Substance. 

Hey, this looks cool, he thought, turning the can around in his 
hand. 

He suddenly remembered the ten dollars his mother had stuffed 
into his shirt pocket. 

He turned to see the store owner standing in the doorway, his 
dark eyes wide with anger. “What are you doing back here?” he 
bellowed. 


Trigger yipped loudly, startled by the man’s booming voice. 

Evan gripped the leash, pulled Trigger close. “Uh... how much is 
this?” he asked, holding up the can of Monster Blood. 

“Not for sale,” the owner said, lowering his voice, his mustache 
seeming to frown unpleasantly with the rest of his face. 

“Huh? It was on the shelf here,” Evan said, pointing. 

“It’s too old,” the man insisted. “Probably no good anymore.” 

“Well, Pll take it, anyway,” Evan said. “Can I have it for less since 
it’s so old?” 

“What is it?” Andy asked, appearing in the doorway. 

“I don’t know,” Evan told her. “It looks cool. It’s called Monster 
Blood.” 

“It’s not for sale,” the man insisted. 

Andy pushed past him and took the can from Evan’s hand. “Ooh, I 
want one, too,” she said, turning the can around in her hand. 

“There’s only one,” Evan told her. 

“You sure?” She began searching the shelves. 

“Its no good, I’m telling you,” the owner insisted, sounding 
exasperated. 

“T need one, too,” Andy said to Evan. 

“Sorry,” Evan replied, taking the can back. “I saw it first.” 

“PIL buy it from you,” Andy said. 

“Why don’t you two share it?” the owner suggested. 

“You mean you'll sell it to us?” Evan asked eagerly. 

The man shrugged and scratched his ear. 

“How much?” Evan asked. 

“You sure you don’t have another one?” Andy demanded, going 
back to the shelf, pushing a pile of stuffed pandas out of her way. “Or 
maybe two? I could keep one and give one to my cousin.” 

“Two dollars, I guess,” the man told Evan. “But I’m telling you, 
it’s no good. It’s too old.” 

“I don’t care,” Evan said, reaching into his shirt pocket for the 
ten-dollar bill. 

“Well, don’t bring it back to me complaining,” the man said 
grumpily, and headed toward the cash register at the front of the 
store. 

A few minutes later, Evan walked out into the bright daylight 
carrying the blue can. Trigger panted excitedly, wagging his stubby 


? 


tail, pleased to be out of the dark, dusty store. Andy followed them 
out, an unhappy expression on her face. 

“You didn’t buy the lunchbox?” Evan asked. 

“Don’t change the subject,” she snapped. “I'll pay you five dollars 
for it.” She reached for the can of Monster Blood. 

“No way,” Evan replied. He laughed. “You really like to get your 
way, don’t you!” 

“Tm an only child,” she said. “What can I tell you? I’m spoiled.” 

“Me, too,” Evan said. 

“I have an idea,” Andy said, pulling her bike off the storefront 
wall. “Let’s share it.” 

“Share it?” Evan said, shaking his head. “For sure. Pll share it the 
way you shared your bike.” 

“You want to ride the bike home? Here.” She shoved it at him. 

“No way,” he said, pushing it back toward her. “I wouldn’t ride 
your stupid bike now. It’s a girl’s bike, anyway.” 

“It is not,” she insisted. “How is it a girl’s bike?” 

Evan ignored the question and, pulling at Trigger’s leash to keep 
the old dog moving, started walking back toward his aunt’s. 

“How is it a girl’s bike?” Andy repeated, walking the bike beside 
him. 

“Tell you what,” Evan said. “Let’s go back to my aunt’s house and 
open up the can. I’ll let you mess with it for a while.” 

“Gee, swell,” Andy said sarcastically. “You’re a great guy, Evan.” 

“I know,” he said, grinning. 

Kathryn was seated in the big armchair in the living room when 
Evan and Andy arrived. Who is she talking to? he wondered, hearing 
her voice. She seemed to be arguing excitedly with someone. 

Leading Andy into the room, Evan saw that it was just Sarabeth, 
the black cat. As Evan entered, the cat turned and haughtily walked 
out of the room. 

Kathryn stared at Evan and Andy, a look of surprise on her face. 
“This is Andy,” Evan said, gesturing to his new friend. 

“What have you got there?” Kathryn asked, ignoring Andy and 
reaching a large hand out for the blue can of Monster Blood. 

Evan reluctantly handed it to her. Frowning, she rolled it around 
in her hand, stopping to read the label, moving her lips as she read. 
She held the can for the longest time, seeming to study it carefully, 
then finally handed it back to Evan. 

As Evan took it back and started to his room with Andy, he heard 
Kathryn say something to him in a low whisper. He couldn’t quite 
hear what she had said. It sounded like, “Be careful.” But he wasn’t 
sure. 


He turned to see Sarabeth staring at him from the doorway, her 
yellow eyes glowing in the dim light. 

“My aunt is completely deaf,” Evan explained to Andy as they 
climbed the stairs. 

“Does that mean you can play your stereo as loud as you want?” 
Andy asked. 

“I don’t think Aunt Kathryn has a stereo,” Evan said. 

“That’s too bad,” Andy said, walking around Evan’s room, pulling 
back the window curtains and looking down on Trigger, huddled 
unhappily in his pen. 

“Is she really your great-aunt?” Andy asked. “She doesn’t look 
very old.” 

“Its the black hair,” Evan replied, setting the can of Monster 
Blood on the desk in the center of the room. “It makes her look 
young.” 

“Hey—look at all these old books on magic stuff!” Andy 
exclaimed. “I wonder why your aunt has all these.” 

She pulled one of the heavy, old volumes from the shelf and blew 
away a layer of dust from the top. “Maybe your aunt plans to come up 
here and cast a spell on you while you’re sleeping, and turn you into a 
newt.” 

“Maybe,” Evan replied, grinning. “What is a newt, anyway?” 

Andy shrugged. “Some kind of lizard, I think.” She flipped 
through the yellowed pages of the old book. “I thought you said there 
was nothing to do here,” she told Evan. “You could read all these cool 
books.” 

“Thrills and chills,” Evan said sarcastically. 

Replacing the book on the shelf, Andy came over to the desk and 
stood next to Evan, her eyes on the can of Monster Blood. “Open it up. 
It’s so old. It’s probably all disgusting and rotten.” 

“I hope so,” Evan said. He picked up the can and studied it. “No 
instructions.” 

“Just pull the top off,” she said impatiently. 

He tugged at it. It wouldn’t budge. 

“Maybe you need a can opener or something,” she said. 

“Very helpful,” he muttered, studying the label again. “Look at 
this. No instructions. No ingredients. Nothing.” 

“Of course not. It’s Monster Blood!” she exclaimed, imitating 
Count Dracula. She grabbed Evan’s neck and pretended to strangle 
him. 

He laughed. “Stop! You’re not helping.” 

He slammed the can down on the desktop—and the lid popped 
off. 


“Hey—look!” he cried. 
She let go of his neck, and they both peered inside the can. 


The substance inside the can was bright green. It shimmered like Jell- 
O in the light from the ceiling fixture. 

“Touch it,” Andy said. 

But before Evan had a chance, she reached a finger in and poked 
it. “It’s cold,” she said. “Touch it. It’s really cold.” 

Evan poked it with his finger. It was cold, thicker than Jell-O, 
heavier. 

He pushed his finger beneath the surface. When he pulled his 
finger out, it made a loud sucking noise. 

“Gross,” Andy said. 

Evan shrugged. “I’ve seen worse.” 

“PIL bet it glows in the dark,” Andy said, hurrying over to the 
light switch by the door. “It looks like the green that glows in the 
dark.” 

She turned off the ceiling light, but late afternoon sunlight still 
poured in through the window curtains. “Try the closet,” she 
instructed excitedly. 

Evan carried the can into the closet. Andy followed and closed the 
door. “Yuck. Mothballs,” she cried. “I can’t breathe.” 

The Monster Blood definitely glowed in the dark. A circular ray of 
green light seemed to shine from the can. 

“Wow. That’s way cool,” Andy said, holding her nose to keep out 
the pungent aroma of the mothballs. 

“Pve had other stuff that did this,” Evan said, more than a little 
disappointed. “It was called Alien Stuff or Yucky Glop, something like 
that.” 

“Well, if you don’t want it, Pll take it,” Andy replied. 

“I didn’t say I didn’t want it,” Evan said quickly. 

“Let’s get out of here,” Andy begged. 

Evan pushed open the door and they rushed out of the closet, 
slamming the door shut behind them. Both of them sucked in fresh air 
for a few seconds. 

“Whew, I hate that smell!” Evan declared. He looked around to 
see that Andy had taken a handful of Monster Blood from the can. 

She squeezed it in her palm. “It feels even colder outside the can,” 
she said, grinning at him. “Look. When you squeeze it flat, it pops 
right back.” 

“Yeah. It probably bounces, too,” Evan said, unimpressed. “Try 


bouncing it against the floor. All those things bounce like rubber.” 

Andy rolled the glob of Monster Blood into a ball and dropped it 
to the floor. It bounced back up into her hand. She bounced it a little 
harder. This time it rebounded against the wall and went flying out 
the bedroom door. 

“It bounces really well,” she said, chasing it out into the hall. 
“Let’s see if it stretches.” She grabbed it with both hands and pulled, 
stretching it into a long string. “Yep. It stretches, too.” 

“Big deal,” Evan said. “The stuff I had before bounced and 
stretched really well, too. I thought this stuff was going to be 
different.” 

“It stays cold, even after it’s been in your hand,” Andy said, 
returning to the room. 

Evan glanced at the wall and noticed a dark, round stain by the 
floorboard. “Uh-oh. Look, Andy. That stuff stains.” 

“Let’s take it outside and toss it around,” she suggested. 

“Okay,” he agreed. “We’ll go out back. That way, Trigger won’t 
be so lonely.” 

Evan held out the can, and Andy replaced the ball of Monster 
Blood. Then they headed downstairs and out to the backyard, where 
they were greeted by Trigger, who acted as if they’d been away for at 
least twenty years. 

The dog finally calmed down, and sat down in the shade of a tree, 
panting noisily. “Good boy,” Evan said softly. “Take it easy. Take it 
easy, old fella.” 

Andy reached into the can and pulled out a green glob. Then 
Evan did the same. They rolled the stuff in their hands until they had 
two ball-shaped globs. Then they began to play catch with them. 

“It’s amazing how they don’t lose their shape,” Andy said, tossing 
a green ball high in the air. 

Evan shielded his eyes from the late afternoon sun and caught the 
ball with one hand. “All this stuff is the same,” he said. “It isn’t so 
special.” 

“Well, I think it’s cool,” Andy said defensively. 

Evan’s next toss was too high. The green ball of gunk sailed over 
Andy’s outstretched hands. 

“Whoa!” Andy cried. 

“Sorry,” Evan called. 

They both stared as the ball bounced once, twice, then landed 
right in front of Trigger. 

Startled, the dog jumped to his feet and lowered his nose to sniff 
it. 

“No, boy!” Evan called. “Leave it alone. Leave it alone, boy!” 


As disobedient as ever, Trigger lowered his head and licked the 
glowing green ball. 

“No, boy! Drop! Drop!” Evan called, alarmed. 

He and Andy both lunged toward the dog. 

But they were too slow. 

Trigger picked up the ball of Monster Blood in his teeth and 
began chewing it. 

“No, Trigger!” Evan shouted. “Don’t swallow it. Don’t swallow!” 

Trigger swallowed it. 

“Oh, no!” Andy cried, balling her hands into fists at her sides. 
“Now there isn’t enough left for us to share!” 

But that wasn’t what was troubling Evan. He bent down and pried 
apart the dog’s jaws. The green blob was gone. Swallowed. 

“Stupid dog,” Evan said softly, releasing the dog’s mouth. 

He shook his head as troubling thoughts poured into his mind. 

What if the stuff makes Trigger sick? Evan wondered. 

What if the stuff is poison? 


“Are we going to bake that pie today?” Evan asked his aunt, writing 
the question on a pad of lined yellow paper he had found on the desk 
in his room. 

Kathryn read the question while adjusting her black ponytail. Her 
face was as white as cake flour in the morning sunlight filtering 
through the kitchen window. 

“Pie? What pie?” she replied coldly. 

Evan’s mouth dropped open. He decided not to remind her. 

“Go play with your friends,” Kathryn said, still coldly, petting 
Sarabeth’s head as the black cat walked by the breakfast table. “Why 
do you want to stay inside with an old witch?” 

It was three days later. Evan had tried to be friendly with his 
aunt. But the more he tried, the colder she had become. 

She’s mean. She’s really mean, he thought, as he ate the last 
spoonful of cereal from his bowl of shredded wheat. That was the only 
cereal she had. Evan struggled to choke it down every morning. Even 
with milk, the cereal was so dry and she wouldn’t even let him put 
sugar on it. 

“Looks like it might rain,” Kathryn said, and took a long sip of the 
strong tea she had brewed. Her teeth clicked noisily as she drank. 

Evan turned his eyes to the bright sunlight outside the window. 
What made her think it was going to rain? 

He glanced back at her, seated across from him at the small 
kitchen table. For the first time, he noticed the pendant around her 
neck. It was cream-colored and sort of bone-shaped. 

It is a bone, Evan decided. 

He stared hard at it, trying to decide if it was a real bone, from 
some animal maybe, or a bone carved out of ivory. Catching his stare, 
Kathryn reached up with a large hand and tucked the pendant inside 
her blouse. 

“Go see your girlfriend. She’s a pretty one,” Kathryn said. She 
took another long sip of tea, again clicking her teeth as she swallowed. 

Yes. I’ve got to get out of here, Evan thought. He pushed his chair 
back, stood up, and carried his bowl to the sink. 

I can’t take much more of this, Evan thought miserably. She hates 
me. She really does. 

He hurried up the stairs to his room, where he brushed his curly 
red hair. Staring into the mirror, he thought of the call he had 
received from his mother the night before. 


She had called right after dinner, and he could tell immediately 
from her voice that things weren’t going well down in Atlanta. 

“How’s it going, Mom?” he had asked, so happy to hear her voice, 
even though she was nearly a thousand miles away. 

“Slowly,” his mother had replied hesitantly. 

“What do you mean? How’s Dad? Did you find a house?” The 
questions seemed to pour out of him like air escaping a balloon. 

“Whoa. Slow down,” Mrs. Ross had replied. She sounded tired. 
“We’re both fine, but it’s taking a little longer to find a house than we 
thought. We just haven’t found anything we like.” 

“Does that mean—” Evan started. 

“We found one really nice house, very big, very pretty,” his 
mother interrupted. “But the school you’d go to wasn’t very good.” 

“Oh, that’s okay. I don’t have to go to school,” Evan joked. 

He could hear his father saying something in the background. His 
mother covered the receiver to reply. 

“When are you coming to pick me up?” Evan asked eagerly. 

It took his mother awhile to answer. “Well... that’s the problem,” 
she said finally. “We may need a few more days down here than we 
thought. How’s it going up there, Evan? Are you okay?” 

Hearing the bad news that he’d have to stay even longer with 
Kathryn had made Evan feel like screaming and kicking the wall. But 
he didn’t want to upset his mother. He told her he was fine and that 
he’d made a new friend. 

His father had taken the phone and offered a few encouraging 
words. “Hang in there,” he had said just before ending the 
conversation. 

I’m hanging in, Evan had thought glumly. 

But hearing his parents’ voices had made him even more 
homesick. 

Now it was the next morning. Putting down his hairbrush, he 
examined himself quickly in his dresser mirror. He was wearing denim 
cutoffs and a red Gap T-shirt. 

Downstairs, he hurried through the kitchen, where Kathryn 
appeared to be arguing with Sarabeth, ran out the back door, then 
jogged to the backyard to get Trigger. “Hey, Trigger!” 

But the dog was asleep, lying on his side in the center of his run, 
gently snoring. 

“Don’t you want to go to Andy’s house?” Evan asked quietly. 

Trigger stirred, but didn’t open his eyes. 

“Okay. See you later,” Evan said. He made sure Trigger’s water 
bowl was filled, then headed to the front of the house. 

He was halfway down the next block, walking slowly, thinking 


about his parents so far away in Atlanta, when a boy’s voice called, 
“Hey—you!” And two boys stepped onto the sidewalk in front of him, 
blocking his way. 

Startled, Evan stared from one boy to the other. They were twins. 
Identical twins. Both were big, beefy guys, with short, white-blond 
hair and round, red faces. They were both wearing dark T-shirts with 
the names of heavy-metal bands on the front, baggy shorts, and high- 
top sneakers, untied, without socks. Evan guessed they were about 
fourteen or fifteen. 

“Who are you?” one of them asked menacingly, narrowing his 
pale gray eyes, trying to act tough. Both twins moved closer, forcing 
Evan to take a big step back. 

These guys are twice my size, Evan realized, feeling a wave of 
fear sweep over him. 

Are they just acting tough? Or do they really mean to give me 
trouble? 

“I’m staying with my aunt,” he stammered, shoving his hands 
into his pockets and taking another step back. 

The twins flashed each other quick grins. “You can’t walk on this 
block,” one of them said, hovering over Evan. 

“Yeah. You’re not a resident,” the other added. 

“That’s a big word,” Evan cracked, then immediately wished he 
hadn’t said it. 

Why can’t I ever keep my big mouth shut? he asked himself. His 
eyes surveyed the neighborhood, searching for someone who might 
come to his aid in case the twins decided to get rough. 

But there was no one in sight. Front doors were closed. Yards 
were empty. Way down the block, he could see a mailman, heading 
the other way, too far away to shout to. 

No one around. No one to help him. 

And the two boys, their faces set, their eyes still menacing, began 
to move in on him. 


10 


“Where do you think you’re going?” one of the twins asked. His hands 
were balled into fists at his sides. He stepped closer until he was just 
an inch or two from Evan, forcing Evan to take a few steps back. 

“To see a friend,” Evan replied uncertainly. Maybe these guys 
were just bluffing. 

“Not allowed,” the twin said quickly, grinning at his brother. 

They both snickered and moved toward Evan, forcing him to back 
off the curb onto the street. 

“You're not a resident,” the other one repeated. He narrowed his 
eyes, trying to look tough. 

“Hey, give me a break, guys,” Evan said. He tried moving to the 
side, walking on the street, to get around them. But they both moved 
quickly to keep him from getting away. 

“Maybe you could pay a toll,” one of them said. 

“Yeah,” the other one quickly chimed in. “You could pay the 
nonresident toll. You know, to get temporary permission for walking 
on this block.” 

“I don’t have any money,” Evan said, feeling his fear grow. 

He suddenly remembered he had eight dollars in his pocket. Were 
they going to rob him? Would they beat him up and then rob him? 

“You have to pay the toll,” one of them said, leering at him. “Let’s 
just see what you’ve got.” 

They both moved quickly forward, making a grab for him. 

He backed away. His legs suddenly felt heavy from fear. 

Suddenly a voice cried out from down the sidewalk. “Hey—what’s 
going on?” 

Evan raised his eyes past the two hulking boys to see Andy 
speeding toward them on her bike along the curb. “Evan—hi!” she 
called. 

The twins turned away from Evan to greet the new arrival. “Hi, 
Andy,” one of them said in a mocking tone. 

“How’s it going, Andy?” the other one asked, imitating his 
brother. 

Andy braked her bike and dropped both feet to the ground. She 
was wearing bright pink shorts and a yellow sleeveless undershirt top. 
Her face was red, her forehead beaded with perspiration from 
pedaling so hard. 

“You two,” she said, and made an unpleasant face. “Rick and 


Tony.” She turned to Evan. “Were they getting on your case?” 

“Well...” Evan started hesitantly. 

“We were welcoming him to the neighborhood,” the one named 
Rick said, grinning at his brother. 

Tony started to add something, but Andy interrupted. “Well, leave 
him alone.” 

“Are you his mother?” Tony asked, snickering. He turned to Evan 
and made goo-goo baby noises. 

“We'll leave him alone,” Rick said, stepping toward Andy. “We’ll 
borrow your bike and leave him alone.” 

“No way,” Andy said heatedly. 

But before Andy could move, Rick grabbed the handlebars. “Let 
go!” Andy cried, trying to pull the bike from his grasp. 

Rick held tight. Tony shoved Andy hard. 

She lost her balance and fell, and the bike toppled over on top of 
her. 

“Ohhh.” 

Andy uttered a low cry as she hit her head on the concrete curb. 
She lay sprawled on the curb, her hands flailing, the bike on top of 
her. 

Before she could get up, Tony reached down and grabbed the bike 
away. He swung his legs over the seat and began to pedal furiously. 
“Wait up!” his brother called, laughing as he ran alongside. 

In seconds, the twins had disappeared around the corner with 
Andy’s bike. 

“Andy—are you okay?” Evan cried, hurrying to the curb. “Are 
you okay?” 

He grabbed Andy’s hand and pulled her to her feet. She stood up 
groggily, rubbing the back of her head. “I hate those creeps,” she said. 
She brushed the dirt and grass off her shorts and legs. “Ow. That 
hurt.” 

“Who are they?” Evan asked. 

“The Beymer twins,” she answered, making a disgusted face. 
“Real heavy-duty dudes,” she added sarcastically. She checked her leg 
to see if it was cut. It was just scraped. “They think they’re so cool, but 
they’re total creeps.” 

“What about your bike? Should we call the police or something?” 
Evan asked. 

“No need,” she said quietly, brushing back her dark hair. “Pll get 
it back. They’ve done this before. They’ll leave it somewhere when 
they’re finished.” 

“But shouldn’t we—” Evan started. 

“They just run wild,” Andy interrupted. “There’s no one home to 


check up on them. They live with their grandmother, but she’s never 
around. Did they give you a hard time?” 

Evan nodded. “I was afraid I was going to have to pound them,” 
he joked. 

Andy didn’t laugh. “Pd like to pound them,” she said angrily. 
“Just once. ld like to pay them back. They pick on all the kids in the 
neighborhood. They think they can do whatever they want because 
they’re so big, and because there are two of them.” 

“Your knee is cut,” Evan said, pointing. 

“Td better go home and clean it up,” she replied, rolling her eyes 
disgustedly. “See you later, okay? I have to go somewhere this 
afternoon, but maybe we can do something tomorrow.” 

She headed back to her house, rubbing the back of her head. 

Evan returned to Kathryn’s, walking slowly, thinking about the 
Beymer twins, daydreaming about fighting them, imagining himself 
beating them to a pulp in a fight as Andy watched, cheering him on. 

Kathryn was dusting the front room as Evan entered. She didn’t 
look up. He headed quickly up the stairs to his room. 

Now what am I going to do? he wondered, pacing back and forth. 
The blue container of Monster Blood caught his eye. He walked over 
to the bookshelf and picked up the can from the middle shelf. 

He pulled off the lid. The can was nearly full. 

I guess Trigger didn’t eat that much, he thought, feeling a little 
relieved. 

Trigger! 

He’d forgotten all about him. The poor dog must be hungry. 

Putting down the Monster Blood, Evan bombed down the stairs, 
leaning against the banister and taking the stairs three at a time. 
Then, running full-out, he practically flew to the dog run at the back 
of the yard. 

“Trigger! Hey—Trigger!” he called. 

Halfway across the backyard, Evan could see that something was 
wrong. 

Trigger’s eyes were bulging. His mouth was wide open, his tongue 
flailing rapidly from side to side, white spittle running down his chin 
hair onto the ground. 

“Trigger!” 

The dog was gasping hoarsely, each breath a desperate, difficult 
struggle. 

He’s choking! Evan realized. 

As Evan reached the dog run, Trigger’s eyes rolled back, and the 
dog’s legs collapsed under him, his stomach still heaving, the air filled 
with his loud, hideous gasps. 


11 


“Trigger—no!” 

Evan dived to his knees beside the dog and began to tug at 
Trigger’s collar. The collar, Evan saw, had become way too tight. 

The dog’s chest heaved. Thick white spittle flowed from his open 
mouth. 

“Hold on, boy. Hold on!” Evan cried. 

The dog’s eyes rolled wildly in his head. He didn’t seem to see or 
hear Evan. 

“Hold on, fella! Just hold on!” 

The collar wouldn’t budge. It was buried tightly under the dog’s 
fur. 

His hands shaking, Evan struggled to pull the collar over Trigger’s 
head. 

Come loose, come loose, come loose, he begged. 

Yes! 

Trigger uttered a pained whimper as Evan finally managed to pull 
the collar away. 

“Trigger—it’s off! Are you okay?” 

Still panting hard, the dog jumped immediately to his feet. He 
licked Evan’s face appreciatively, covering Evan’s cheek with his thick 
saliva, whimpering as if he understood that Evan had just saved his 
life. 

“Easy, boy! Easy, fella!” Evan repeated, but the dog continued to 
lick him gratefully. 

Evan hugged the excited dog. This had been a close call, he knew. 
If he hadn’t come along just then... 

Well, he didn’t want to think about it. 

When Trigger finally calmed down, Evan examined the collar. 
“What made this collar shrink like that, boy?” he asked Trigger. 

The dog had walked over to the fence and was frantically slurping 
water from his bowl. 

This is plain weird, Evan thought. The collar couldn’t have 
shrunk. It’s made of leather. There was no reason for it to shrink. 

Then why did it suddenly start choking Trigger? 

Evan turned to Trigger, studying him as the dog lapped greedily 
at the water, breathing hard. He turned and glanced back at Evan for 
a second, then returned to his frantic water slurping. 

He’s bigger, Evan decided. 


He’s definitely bigger. 

But Trigger was twelve years old, eighty-four in human years. 
Older than Aunt Kathryn. 

Trigger was too old for a late growth spurt. 

It must be my eyes, Evan decided, tossing the collar to the 
ground. This place must be making me see things. 

Kathryn was at the kitchen door, calling Evan to lunch. He poured 
out a bowl of dry food, shouted good-bye to Trigger, who didn’t look 
up from the water dish, and hurried to the house. 


The next morning, an overcast morning with an autumn chill in the 
air, Evan made his way to Andy’s house. He found her huddled under 
a big maple tree in the neighbor’s front yard. “What’s going on?” he 
called. 

Then he saw that she was leaning over something, her hands 
working quickly. “Come help me!” she cried, not looking up. 

Evan came jogging over. “Whoa!” he cried out when he saw that 
Andy was struggling to free a calico cat that had been tied to the tree 
trunk. 

The cat screeched and swiped its paw at Andy. Andy dodged the 
claws and continued to pull at the big knots in the rope. 

“The Beymer twins did this. I know it,” she said loudly, over the 
shrilly protesting cat. “This poor cat was probably tied up here all 
night.” 

The cat, in a panic, shrieked with amazingly human-sounding 
cries. 

“Stand still, cat,” Evan said as the terrified cat swiped its claws at 
Andy again. “Can I help?” 

“No. I’ve almost got it,” she replied, tugging at the knot. “I’d like 
to tie Rick and Tony to this tree.” 

“Poor, frightened cat,” Evan said quietly. 

“There,” Andy said triumphantly, pulling the rope loose. 

The cat gave one last cry of protest, its tail standing straight up. 
Then it darted away, running at full speed, and disappeared under a 
tall hedge without looking back. 

“Not very polite,” Evan muttered. 

Andy stood up and sighed. She was wearing faded denim jeans 
and a pale green, oversized T-shirt that came down nearly to her 
knees. She lifted the bottom of the shirt to examine a hole the cat had 
managed to snag in it. 

“T can’t believe those two creeps,” she said, shaking her head. 

“Maybe we should call the police or the ASPCA or something,” 
Evan suggested. 


“The twins would just deny it,” Andy said glumly, shaking her 
head. Then she added, “And the cat’s not a very good witness.” 

They both laughed. 

Evan led the way back to his aunt’s house. All the way back, they 
talked about how they’d like to teach the Beymer twins a lesson. But 
neither of them had any good ideas. 

They found Kathryn concentrating on a jigsaw puzzle at the 
dining room table. 

She looked up when they entered, squinting at them. “You like 
jigsaw puzzles? I like to keep my mind active, you know. That’s why I 
like puzzles. Your mind can get flabby when you get to be my age. A 
hundred and twelve.” 

She slapped the table gleefully at her own wit. Evan and Andy 
both flashed her agreeable smiles. Then she returned to her puzzle 
without waiting for a reply. 

“She’s going to drive me bananas!” Evan exclaimed. 

“Evan—she’ll hear you!” Andy protested, cupping a hand over his 
mouth. 

“I told you, she’s completely deaf. She can’t hear me. She doesn’t 
want to hear anyone. She hates everyone.” 

“I think she’s sweet,” Andy said. “Why does she wear a bone 
around her neck?” 

“Probably thinks it’s cool,” Evan cracked. 

“Let’s go upstairs,” Andy urged, pushing him toward the stairs. “I 
still feel weird talking about your aunt right in front of her.” 

“You’re a crazy old coot,” Evan called to Kathryn, a big smile on 
his face. 

Kathryn looked up from her puzzle pieces to cast a cold stare his 
way. 

“She heard you!” Andy cried, horrified. 

“Don’t be dumb,” Evan said, and started up the stairs, nearly 
tripping over Sarabeth. 

Up in Evan’s room, Andy paced uncomfortably. “What do you 
want to do?” 

“Well... we could read some of these great books,” Evan said 
sarcastically, pointing to the dusty old books that lined the walls. 
“Maybe find a spell to cast on the Beymer twins. You know. Turn 
them into newts.” 

“Forget about newts,” Andy said dryly. “Hey—where’s the 
Monster Blood?” Before Evan could answer, she spotted it on one of 
the shelves. 

They raced across the room for it. Andy got there first and 
grabbed the can. “Evan—look,” she said, her eyes growing wide with 


surprise. “What’s going on?” 
She held up the can. The green gunk had pushed up the lid and 
was flowing up out of the can. 


12 


“Huh? Did the top break or something?” Evan asked. 

He took the can from her and examined it. Sure enough, the lid 
had popped off. The gooey green substance was pushing up out of the 
can. 

Evan pulled out a handful of the green gunk. “Weird,” he 
exclaimed. “It’s expanding,” he said, squeezing it in his hand. “It’s 
definitely growing.” 

“I guess so!” Andy exclaimed. “It grew right out of the can!” 

“Hey—it’s not cold anymore,” Evan said. He balled it up and 
tossed it to Andy. 

“It’s really warm,” she agreed. “Weird!” 

She tried to toss it back to him, but it stuck to her palm. “It’s 
getting sticky,” she reported. “Are you sure this is the same stuff?” 

“Of course,” Evan replied. 

“But it wasn’t sticky before, remember?” she said. 

He pulled another warm hunk of it from the can. “I guess it just 
changes after the can has been opened.” 

He squeezed the stuff into a ball shape and tossed it to the floor. 
“Look—it stuck to the floor. It didn’t bounce.” 

“Weird!” Andy repeated. 

“Maybe I should throw it in the trash,” Evan said, prying the 
sticky glob from the floor. “I mean, what good is it if it doesn’t 
bounce?” 

“Hey—no way,” Andy said. “We’ve got to see what it does next.” 

A soft mewing sound made them both turn toward the door. 

Evan was surprised to see Sarabeth standing there, her head 
cocked, her yellow eyes staring at him. 

Or was she staring at the glob of Monster Blood in his hand? 

“That cat looks so intelligent,” Andy said. 

“It’s as stupid as every other cat,” Evan muttered. “Look. She 
wants to play ball with the Monster Blood.” 

“Sorry, cat,” Andy said. “It doesn’t bounce.” 

As if she understood, Sarabeth mewed unhappily, turned, and 
padded silently from the room. 

“Now where am I going to keep this stuff?” Evan asked. “It’s too 
big for its can.” 

“Here. How about this?” Andy asked. She reached down to a low 
shelf and came up with an empty coffee can. 


“Yeah. Okay.” Evan tossed his hunk into the coffee can. 

Andy squeezed hers into a flat pancake. “Look. It isn’t glowing the 
way it used to, either,” she said, holding the pancake up for Evan to 
see. “But it sure is warm. Almost hot.” 

“It’s alive!” Evan screamed playfully. “Run for your life! It’s alive!” 

Andy laughed and began to chase Evan, menacing him with the 
flat, green pancake. “Come get your Monster Blood! Come and get it!” 

He dodged away, then grabbed it from her hand. He squeezed it 
together, balling it up in one hand, then tossed it into the coffee can. 

They both peered into the can. The green substance filled it up a 
little more than halfway. 

“Go ahead. Taste it,” Andy urged, poking the can in his face. “I 
dare you.” 

“Huh? No way. I double-dare you,” Evan said, pushing the coffee 
can back to her. 

“Double-darers have to go first,” Andy insisted, grinning. “Go 
ahead. Taste it.” 

Evan made a disgusted face and shook his head. Then he grabbed 
a big hunk of it and heaved it at Andy. Laughing, she picked it up off 
the carpet and tossed it at his face. She threw high, and the green glob 
stuck to the wall. 

Evan reached for another hunk. 

They had a messy, hilarious Monster Blood battle till dinnertime. 
Then, as they tried to clean up, they both heard Trigger through the 
open window. He was barking loudly out in his pen. 

Evan reached the window first. The sky was still gray and 
overcast. Trigger was leaning on the wooden fence, standing on his 
hind legs, barking his head off. 

“Whoa, Trigger,” Evan called, “chill out!” 

“Hey—what’s with Trigger?” Andy asked. “Is your dog still 
growing? He looks so big!” 

Evan’s mouth dropped open and he uttered a silent gasp, realizing 
that Andy was right. 

Trigger had nearly doubled in size. 


13 


“Trigger—come back! Come back!” 

The big dog continued to run, its giant paws thundering against 
the concrete. 

“Come back!” Evan screamed, running with long, desperate 
strides, his heart thudding, his legs aching with each step as he tried 
to catch up with the galloping dog. 

The night was dark and starless. The street glistened as if it had 
recently rained. 

Trigger’s paws hit the pavement, each step a loud thunderclap 
that seemed to echo forever. His giant ears flapped like wings, twin 
pennants caught on the wind. His big head bobbed up and down, but 
he didn’t look back. 

“Trigger! Trigger!” 

Evan’s voice seemed muffled by the gusting wind, pushed back in 
his face. He tried shouting louder, but no sound came out at all. 

He knew he had to stop the dog from running away. He had to 
catch the dog and then get help. 

Trigger was growing so fast, completely out of control. He was 
already the size of a pony, and getting larger by the minute. 

“Trigger! Trigger! Stop, boy!” 

Trigger didn’t seem to hear him. Evan’s voice didn’t seem to carry 
beyond the gusting, swirling wind. 

And still Evan ran, his chest pounding, every muscle aching. And 
as he ran, he suddenly realized there were others running, too. 

Two large figures in front of the stampeding dog. 

Two large figures Evan recognized as they fled at full speed, 
trying to get away from the onrushing animal. 

The Beymer twins. Rick and Tony. 

Trigger was chasing them, Evan suddenly realized. 

The boys turned a corner, onto an even darker street. Trigger 
followed, bounding after them. Evan continued to run, bringing up the 
rear of this dark, mysterious parade. 

All was silent now, except for the steady, rhythmic thunder of 
Trigger’s enormous padded paws. 

Except for the clapclapclap of the Beymer twins’ sneakers as they 
darted along the glistening pavement. 

Except for the gasp of Evan’s breathing as he struggled to keep 
up. 


Suddenly, as Evan watched in horror, the dog raised up on his 
hind legs. He tilted his head to the sky and let out an ear-piercing 
howl. Not the howl of a dog. A creature howl. 

And then Trigger’s features began to transform. His forehead 
burst forward and enlarged. His eyes grew wide and round before 
sinking under the protruding forehead. Fangs slid from his gaping 
mouth, and he uttered another howl to the sky, louder and more 
chilling than the first. 

“He’s a monster! A monster!” Evan cried. 

And woke up. 

Woke up from his frightening dream. 

And realized he was in bed, in the study upstairs in Kathryn’s 
house. 

It had all been a dream, a frightening, wild chase of a dream. 

A harmless dream. Except that something still wasn’t right. 

The bed. It felt so uncomfortable. So cramped. 

Evan sat up, alert, wide awake now. 

And stared down at his giant feet. His giant hands. And realized 
how tiny the bed seemed beneath him. 

Because he was a giant now. 

Because he had grown so huge, so monstrously huge. 

And when he saw how big he had become, he opened his mouth 
wide and began to scream. 


14 


His screams woke him up. 

This time he really woke up. 

And realized that, the first time, he had only dreamed that he was 
awake. Had only dreamed that he had become a giant. 

Dreams upon dreams. 

Was he really awake now? 

He sat up, blinked, rubbed his eyes, struggled to focus. 

Dripping with sweat. 

His blankets tossed to the floor. 

His pajamas damp, clinging to his prickly skin. 

Nothing seemed familiar. It took awhile to shake off the dream, to 
remember where he was. That he was in his room at Kathryn’s. Awake 
now. His normal size. 

Tossed by the wind, the curtains brushed over him, then were 
noisily sucked out the window. 

Evan sat up and, still feeling shaky, peered out the window. 

Wisps of gray clouds floated over a pale half-moon. Trees tossed 
and whispered in the cool night wind. 

Only a dream. 

A frightening dream. A dream on top of a dream. 

He could see Trigger sound asleep, curled up on himself, pressed 
against the fence wall. 

Trigger wasn’t a monster. But he was definitely bigger, Evan saw. 

Maybe there’s something wrong with him. The troubling thought 
pushed its way into Evan’s mind as he stared down at the sleeping 
dog. 

Maybe it’s glands or something. 

Maybe he’s eating too much. Or maybe... 

Evan yawned. He realized he was too sleepy to think clearly. 
Maybe the next morning he’d see if there was a vet in town. 

Yawning again, he started to settle back into bed. But something 
caught his eye. 

The coffee can on the bookshelf. The can where he had stored the 
Monster Blood. 

“Hey—” he cried aloud. 

The green gunk was bubbling, quivering up over the top of the 
coffee can. 


15 


“Your dog seems to be quite healthy for his age.” Dr. Forrest scratched 
Trigger gently under the chin. “Look at all the white hairs,” he said, 
bringing his face down close to the dog’s. “You’re a good old dog, 
aren’t you?” 

Trigger licked the doctor’s hand appreciatively. 

Dr. Forrest grinned, pushing his black eyeglasses up on his narrow 
nose, the ceiling light reflecting off his shiny forehead. He wiped his 
hand on the front of his white lab coat. 

Evan and Andy stood across from Trigger in the small, brightly lit 
office. They had both been tense during the long examination the vet 
had given the dog. But now, hearing the doctor’s verdict, they had 
relaxed expressions on their faces. 

“So you think it’s just a late growth spurt?” Evan repeated. 

Dr. Forrest nodded, returning to his desk in the corner. “Highly 
unusual,” he said softly, leaning over the desk to write a note on a 
pad. “Highly unusual. We’ll get a lab report in three or four days. It 
may tell us more. But the dog seems very healthy to me. I really 
wouldn’t be alarmed.” 

“But do cocker spaniels usually get this big?” Evan asked, leaning 
down to scratch Trigger under the chin, the leash looped loosely in his 
hand. 

Trigger wanted to leave. He pulled toward the door. Evan stood 
up and tugged hard at the leash to keep the dog in place. It took all of 
his strength. Trigger was not only bigger; he was much stronger than 
he had been a few days before. 

“No. Not usually,” the vet replied. “That’s why I took the 
hormone tests and the blood and glandular samples. Maybe the lab 
will have an answer for us.” 

He finished writing and tore the sheet off the pad. “Here,” he 
said, handing the paper to Evan. “I wrote down the name of a good 
dog food. Put Trigger on this, and see that he cuts down on his 
between-meal snacks.” He chuckled at his own joke. 

Evan thanked the doctor and allowed Trigger to pull him out of 
the office. Andy jogged after them. In the waiting room outside, a tiny 
Chihuahua cowered behind the couch, whimpering at the sight of the 
big cocker spaniel. 

“Tm glad to be out of there,” Evan exclaimed as they stepped out 
to the sidewalk. 

“Trigger got a very good report,” Andy said reassuringly, petting 


Trigger’s head. “Hey, look—his head is wider than my hand!” 

“He’s nearly as big as a sheepdog!” Evan said miserably. “And Dr. 
Forrest says he’s perfectly okay.” 

“Don’t exaggerate,” Andy scolded. She glanced at her watch. “Oh, 
no! I don’t believe it. Late for my piano lesson. Again! Mom’ll kill me!” 

She waved good-bye, turned, and ran full speed down the 
sidewalk, nearly colliding with an elderly couple coming slowly out of 
the small grocery store on the corner. 

“Let’s go, boy,” Evan said, thinking about what Dr. Forrest had 
said. Tugging the leash, he headed out of the small, three-block town. 
Despite the vet’s assurances, Evan was still plenty worried about 
Trigger. 

He stopped outside the grocery. “Maybe an ice cream pop will 
help cheer me up.” He tied Trigger’s leash to the red fire hydrant 
across from the grocery’s door. “Stay,” he instructed. 

Trigger, ignoring Evan, struggled to pull free. 

“Pll only be a second,” Evan said, and hurried into the store. 

There were three or four people in the store, and it took a bit 
longer than Evan had expected. When he returned to the sidewalk ten 
minutes later, he discovered the Beymer twins busily untying Trigger. 

“Hey—let go!” he cried angrily. 

They both turned toward him, identical grins on their beefy faces. 
“Look what we found,” one of them teased. The other one successfully 
untied the leash from the hydrant. 

“Hand me that,” Evan insisted, holding his chocolate ice cream 
bar in one hand, reaching for the leash handle with the other. 

The Beymer twin held the leash handle out to Evan—then quickly 
snapped it back out of his reach. “Gotcha!” 

The brothers laughed gleefully and slapped each other a high five. 

“Stop fooling around,” Evan insisted. “Hand me the leash.” 

“Finders, keepers,” one of them said. “Isn’t that right, Tony?” 

“Yeah,” Tony replied, grinning. “It’s an ugly dog. But it’s our ugly 
dog now.” 

“Get your own dog, wimp,” Rick said nastily. He stepped forward 
and punched the ice cream bar out of Evan’s hand. It landed on the 
sidewalk with a plop. 

The brothers started to laugh, but their laughter was cut short as 
Trigger suddenly uttered a low, warning growl. Pulling back his lips, 
he bared his teeth, and his growl became a snarl. 

“Hey—” Rick cried, dropping the leash. 

With a loud, angry roar, Trigger reared up and pounced on Rick, 
forcing him to stagger backward to the curb. 

Tony had already started to run, his sneakers pounding the 


pavement noisily as he headed at full speed past the vet’s office, past 
the post office, and kept going. 

“Wait up! Hey, Tony—wait up!” Rick stumbled, stood up, and 
took off after his brother. 

Evan grabbed for Trigger’s leash—and missed. 

“Trigger—whoa! Stop!” 

The dog took off after the fleeing twins, barking angrily, his 
enormous paws thudding loudly on the pavement, picking up speed as 
he closed in on them. 

No, Evan thought, finding himself frozen there on the corner in 
front of the grocery. 

No. No. No. 

This can’t be happening! 

It’s my dream. 

Is it coming true? 

Evan shuddered, remembering the rest of his dream, 
remembering how he, too, grew until he was twice his size. 

Would that part of the dream also come true? 


16 


That afternoon, about an hour before dinnertime, Evan called Andy. 
“Can I come over?” he asked. “I have a small problem.” 

“Sounds like a big problem,” Andy said. 

“Yeah. Okay. A big problem,” Evan snapped impatiently. “I’m not 
in the mood to kid around, okay?” 

“Okay. Sorry,” Andy replied quickly. “Any sign of Rick and Tony? 
They’re not your problem, are they?” 

“Not at the moment,” he told her. “I told you, they were gone by 
the time I caught up with Trigger. Disappeared. Vanished. Trigger was 
still barking his head off. Somehow I dragged him home and got him 
in his pen.” 

“So what’s your problem?” she asked. 

“I can’t tell you. I have to show you,” he said. “I'll be right there. 

Bye.” 
He hung up the phone and hurried down the stairs, carrying the 
bucket. Kathryn was in the kitchen, her back to him, chopping away 
at something with her big butcher knife. Evan hurried past and darted 
out the door. 


Andy’s house was a modern, redwood ranch style, with a low hedge of 
evergreens running along the front. Her dad, she said, was a fanatic 
about the lawn. It was clipped a perfect inch and a half above the 
ground, smooth as a carpet. A flower garden stretched along the front 
of the house, tall orange and yellow tiger lilies bobbing in the gentle 
breeze. 

The front door was open. Evan knocked on the screen door. 

“What’s with the bucket?” was Andy’s greeting as she let him in. 

“Look,” he said, out of breath from running all the way to her 
house. He held up the aluminum bucket he had taken from Kathryn’s 
garage. 

“Oh, wow,” Andy exclaimed, raising her hands to her face as she 
stared into it wide-eyed. 

“Yeah. Wow,” he repeated sarcastically. “The Monster Blood. It’s 
grown again. Look. It’s almost filled this big bucket. What are we 
going to do?” 

“What do you mean we?” Andy teased, leading him into the den. 

“Not funny,” he muttered. 

“You didn’t want to share it,” she insisted. 


“PIL share it now,” he said eagerly. “In fact... do you want it? PI 
give it to you for a bargain price—free.” He held the bucket toward 
her. 

“Huh-uh.” Andy shook her head, crossing her arms in front of her 
chest. “Put it down, will you?” She pointed to the corner behind the 
red leather couch. “Put it over there. It’s giving me the creeps.” 

“Giving you the creeps!?” Evan cried. “What am I going to do? 
Every time I turn around, it grows some more. It’s growing faster than 
Trigger!” 

“Hey!” they both cried at once. 

Both had the same thought, the same frightening memory. Both 
suddenly remembered that Trigger had eaten a ball of the green gunk. 

“Do you think...” Evan started. 

“Maybe...” Andy replied, not waiting for him to finish his 
thought. “Maybe Trigger’s growing because he ate the Monster 
Blood.” 

“What am I going to do?” Evan wailed, pacing the room 
nervously, his hands shoved into his jeans pockets. “The stuff is 
getting bigger and bigger, and so is poor Trigger. I’m all alone here. 
There’s no one who can help me. No one.” 

“What about your aunt?” Andy suggested, staring at the bucket 
on the floor in the corner. “Maybe Kathryn can think of something—” 

“Are you kidding? She can’t hear me. She doesn’t want to hear 
me. She hates me. She just sits at her jigsaw puzzle and argues with 
that horrible black cat all day.” 

“Okay. Forget the aunt,” Andy said, making a dispirited face. 

“Perhaps if you told Dr. Forrest—” 

“Oh, yeah. For sure,” Evan snapped. “He’d really believe that 
Trigger is turning into a giant because I let him eat Monster Blood.” 

He threw himself down on the couch. “I’m all alone here, Andy. 
There’s no one to help me. No one I can even talk to about this.” 

“Except me?” 

“Yeah,” he said, locking his eyes on hers. “Except you.” 

She plopped down on the other end of the couch. “Well, what can 
I do?” she asked hesitantly. 

He jumped up and carried the bucket over. “Take some of this. 
Let’s split it up.” 

“Huh? Why don’t we just toss it in the trash?” she asked, staring 
down at it. The green gunk was pushing up near the top of the bucket. 

“Toss it? We can’t,” he said. 

“Sure, we can. Come on. Pll show you.” She reached for the 
bucket handle, but he shoved it out of her reach. 

“What if it outgrows the trash can?” he asked. “What if it just 


keeps growing?” 

Andy shrugged. “I don’t know.” 

“Also, I have to save it,” Evan continued excitedly. “If it’s really 
the thing that’s causing Trigger to grow, Pll need it as proof. You 
know. To show the doctors or whatever. So they can cure Trigger.” 

“Maybe we should call the police,” Andy said thoughtfully, 
tugging at a strand of hair. 

“Oh. Sure,” Evan replied, rolling his eyes. “They'll really believe 
us. For sure. ‘We bought this stuff in a toy store, officer, and now it’s 
growing bigger and bigger and it’s turning my dog into a giant 
monster.” 

“Okay, okay. Youw’re right,” Andy said. “We can’t call the police.” 

“So, are you going to help me?” Evan demanded. “Will you take 
some of this stuff?” 

“I guess,” she said reluctantly. “But just a little.” She climbed to 
her feet, carefully stepping around the bucket. “T’ll be right back.” 

She left the room, then quickly returned, carrying an empty coffee 
can. “Fill er up,” she said, smiling. 

Evan stared at the coffee can. “That’s all you’re going to take?” he 
complained. Then he immediately softened his tone. “Okay. Okay. It’s 
a help.” 

Andy crouched down and dipped the coffee can into the middle of 
the bucket. “Hey!” she cried out. Her hands flew up and she tumbled 
back onto the floor. 

“What’s wrong?” Evan hurried over to her. 

“It was pulling the coffee can in,” she said, her features tight with 
fear and surprise. “Sucking it. Look.” 

Evan peered into the bucket. The coffee can had disappeared 
under the surface. “Huh?” 

“T could feel it pulling,” Andy said shakily. She regained her perch 
over the bucket. 

“Let’s see,” Evan said, and plunged both hands into the middle of 
the Monster Blood. 

“Yuck,” Andy said. “This is really gross.” 

“It’s pulling. You’re right,” Evan agreed. “It feels like it’s pulling 
my hands down. Wow. It’s so warm. As if it’s alive.” 

“Don’t say that!” Andy cried with a shudder. “Just get the can out, 
okay?” 

Evan had to tug hard, but he managed to pull up the coffee can, 
filled to the top with the quivering green substance. “Yuck.” 

“You sure I have to take this?” Andy asked, not reaching for it 
even though he was holding it out to her. 

“Just for a little while,” he said. “Till we think of a better plan.” 


“Maybe we could feed it to the Beymer twins,” Andy suggested, 
finally taking the can. 

“Then we’d have giant Beymer twins,” Evan joked. “No, thank 
you.” 

“Seriously, you’d better watch out for them,” Andy warned. “If 
Trigger scared them away this morning, they’ll be looking to get back 
at you. They really think they’re tough dudes, Evan. They can be 
vicious. They could really hurt you.” 

“Thanks for trying to cheer me up,” Evan said glumly. He was still 
pulling tiny, clinging clumps of the Monster Blood off his hands and 
tossing them into the bucket. 

“I was watching a video before you came over. The first Indiana 
Jones movie. Want to watch it?” 

Evan shook his head. “No. I’d better go. Aunt Kathryn was busy 
making dinner when I left. Chopping up some kind of meat. Another 
great dinner, sitting there in silence, being stared at by Aunt Kathryn 
and her cat.” 

“Poor Evan,” Andy said, half teasing, half sympathetic. 

He picked up the bucket, now only two-thirds full, and let her 
walk him to the front door. “Call me later, okay?” she asked. 

He nodded and stepped outside. She closed the door behind him. 

He was halfway to the sidewalk when the Beymer twins slipped 
out from behind the evergreen hedge, their hands balled into red, 
beefy fists. 


17 


The brothers stepped out of the shadows of the hedge. Their short 
blond hair caught the late afternoon sunlight. They were both 
grinning gleefully. 

Evan stood frozen in place, staring from one to the other. 

No one said a word. 

One of the Beymers grabbed the bucket from Evan’s hand and 
tossed it to the ground. The bucket hit with a heavy thud, and its 
thick, green contents oozed onto the grass, making disgusting sucking 
sounds. 

“Hey—” Evan cried, breaking the tense silence. 

He didn’t have a chance to say more. 

The other twin punched him hard in the stomach. 

Evan felt the pain radiate through his body. The punch took his 
breath away. He gasped for air. 

He didn’t see the next punch. It landed on his cheek just below 
his right eye. 

He howled in pain, and his hands flailed the air helplessly. 

Both brothers were hitting him now. And then one of them gave 
Evan’s shoulders a hard shove, and he went sprawling onto the cool, 
damp grass. 

The pain swept over him, blanketing him, followed by a wave of 
nausea. He closed his eyes, gasping noisily, waiting for the sharp ache 
in his stomach to fade. 

The ground seemed to tilt. He reached out and grabbed it, and 
held on tightly so he wouldn’t fall off. 

When he finally managed to raise his head, Andy was standing 
over him, her eyes wide with alarm. “Evan—” 

He groaned and, pushing with both hands, tried to sit up. The 
dizziness, the spinning, tilting grass, forced him to lie back down. 

“Are they gone?” he asked, closing his eyes, willing the dizziness 
away. 

“Rick and Tony? I saw them run away,” Andy said, kneeling 
beside him. “Are you okay? Should I call my mom?” 

He opened his eyes. “Yeah. No. I don’t know.” 

“What happened?” she demanded. 

He raised a hand to his cheek. “Ow!” It was already swollen, too 
painful to touch. 

“They beat you up?” 


“Either that or I was hit by a truck,” he groaned. 

A few minutes later—it seemed like hours—he was back on his 
feet, breathing normally, rubbing his swollen cheek. “I’ve never been 
in a fight before,” he told Andy, shaking his head. “Never.” 

“It doesn’t look like it was much of a fight,” she said, her 
expression still tight with concern. 

He started to laugh, but it made his stomach hurt. 

“We'll pay them back,” Andy said bitterly. “We’ll find a way to 
pay them back. The creeps.” 

“Oh. Look. The Monster Blood.” Evan hurried over to it. 

The bucket lay on its side. The green gunk had oozed onto the 
grass, forming a wide, thick puddle. 

“PIL help you get it back in the bucket,” Andy said, leaning over 
to stand the bucket up. “Hope it doesn’t kill the grass. My dad’ll have 
a cow if his precious lawn is hurt!” 

“It’s so heavy,” Evan said, groaning as he tried to push the glob 
into the bucket. “It doesn’t want to move.” 

“Let’s try picking up handfuls,” Andy suggested. 

“Whoa. It doesn’t want to come apart,” Evan said in surprise. 
“Look. It sticks together.” 

“It’s like taffy,” Andy said. “Ever see them make taffy in those 
taffy machines? The stuff just sticks together in one big glob.” 

“This isn’t taffy,” Evan muttered. “It’s disgusting.” 

Working together, they managed to lift the entire green ball and 
drop it into the bucket. The stuff made a sickening sucking sound as it 
filled the bucket, and both Evan and Andy had trouble pulling their 
hands out of it. 

“It’s so sticky,” Andy said, making a disgusted face. 

“And warm,” Evan added. He finally managed to free his hands 
from it. “It’s like it’s trying to swallow my hands,” he said, wiping his 
hands on his T-shirt. “Sucking them in.” 

“Take it home,” Andy said. She looked up to the house to see her 
mother motioning to her from the front window. “Uh-oh. Dinnertime. 
I’ve got to go.” Her eyes stopped at his swollen cheek. “Wait till your 
aunt sees you.” 

“She probably won’t even notice,” Evan said glumly. He picked 
up the bucket by the handle. “What are we going to do with this 
stuff?” 

“We'll take it back to the toy store tomorrow,” Andy replied, 
taking long strides across the lawn to the house. 

“Huh?” 

“That’s what we’ll do. We’ll simply take it back.” 

Evan didn’t think it was such a hot idea. But he didn’t have the 


strength to argue about it now. He watched Andy disappear into the 
house. Then he headed slowly back to Kathryn’s, his head throbbing, 
his stomach aching. 

Creeping along the wall of the house, he slipped into the garage 
through the side door to hide the bucket of Monster Blood. Sliding it 
behind an overturned wheelbarrow, he realized that the bucket was 
full to the top. 

But I gave Andy a big hunk of it, he thought. The bucket had been 
only two-thirds full. 

rll have to find a bigger place to put it, he decided. Tonight. 
Maybe there’s a box or something in the basement. 

He crept into the house, determined to clean himself up before 
seeing Kathryn. She was still busy in the kitchen, he saw, leaning over 
the stove, putting the last touches on dinner. He tiptoed up the stairs 
and washed up. Unable to do much about his swollen, red cheek, he 
changed into a clean pair of baggy shorts and a fresh T-shirt, and 
carefully brushed his hair. 

As they sat down at the dining room table, Kathryn’s eyes fell on 
Evan’s swollen cheek. “You been in a fight?” she asked, squinting 
suspiciously at him. “You're a little roughneck, aren’t you? Just like 
your father. Chicken was always getting into scrapes, always picking 
on boys twice his size.” 

“I wasn’t exactly picking on them,” Evan muttered, spearing a 
chunk of beef from his stew with his fork. 

All through dinner, Kathryn stared at his swollen cheek. But she 
didn’t say another word. 

She doesn’t care if Pm hurt or not, Evan thought miserably. 

She really doesn’t care. 

She didn’t even ask if it hurts. 

In a way, he was grateful. He didn’t need her getting all upset, 
making a fuss because he was in a fight, maybe calling his parents in 
Atlanta and telling them. 

Well... she couldn’t call his parents. She couldn’t use the phone, 
since she couldn’t hear. 

Evan downed his big plate of beef stew. It was pretty good, except 
for the vegetables. 

The silence seemed so loud. He began thinking about his problem 
—the Monster Blood. 

Should he tell Kathryn about it? 

He could write down the whole problem on the yellow pad and 
hand it to her to read. It would feel so good to tell someone, to have 
an adult take over the problem and handle it. 

But not his Aunt Kathryn, he decided. 


She was too weird. 

She wouldn’t understand. 

She wouldn’t know what to do. 

And she wouldn’t care. 

Andy was right. They had to carry the stuff back to the toy store. 
Give it back. Just get rid of it. 

But in the meantime, he had to find something to keep it in. 

Evan waited in his room until he heard Kathryn go to bed, a little 
after ten o’clock. Then he crept down the stairs and headed out to the 
garage. 


18 


It was a cool, clear night. Crickets sent up a relentless curtain of noise. 
The black sky glittered with tiny specks of stars. 

The round beam of light from the flashlight in his hand darted 
across the driveway, leading Evan to the dark garage. As he entered, 
something scuttled across the floor near the back wall. 

Maybe it was just a dead leaf, blown by the wind when I opened 
the door, he thought hopefully. 

He moved the flashlight unsteadily, beaming it onto the 
overturned wheelbarrow. Then the light darted across the garage 
ceiling as he bent down, reached behind the wheelbarrow, and pulled 
out the bucket of Monster Blood. 

He moved the light to the center of the bucket, and gasped. 

The green substance was quivering up over the top. 

It’s growing much faster than before, he thought. 

I’ve got to find something bigger to hide it in—just for tonight. 

The bucket was too heavy to carry with one hand. Tucking the 
flashlight into his armpit, he gripped the bucket handle with both 
hands and hoisted the bucket off the floor. 

Struggling to keep from spilling it, he made his way into the dark 
house. He paused at the door to the basement steps, silently setting 
the heavy bucket down on the linoleum floor. 

He clicked the light switch on the wall. Somewhere downstairs a 
dim light flickered on, casting a wash of pale yellow light over the 
concrete floor. 

There’s got to be something to put this stuff in down there, Evan 
thought. Hoisting up the bucket, he made his way slowly, carefully 
down the steep, dark stairway, leaning his shoulder against the wall to 
steady himself. 

Waiting for his eyes to adjust to the pale light, he saw that the 
basement was one large room, low-ceilinged and damp. It was 
cluttered with cartons, stacks of old newspapers and magazines, and 
old furniture and appliances covered in stained, yellowed bed sheets. 

Something brushed his face as he stepped away from the stairs. 

He uttered a silent cry and, dropping the bucket, raised his hands 
to swipe at the thick cobwebs that seemed to reach out for him. They 
clung to his skin, dry and scratchy, as he frantically pulled at them. 

He suddenly realized it wasn’t the web that was moving against 
his cheek. 

It was a spider. 


With a sharp intake of breath, he brushed it away. But even after 
he saw the insect scuttle across the floor, he could still feel its prickly 
feet moving on his face. 

Moving quickly away from the wall, his heart pounding now, his 
eyes searching the open wooden shelves hidden in shadow against the 
far wall, he stumbled over something on the floor. 

“Oh!” He fell headfirst over it, throwing his hands forward to 
break his fall. 

A human body! 

Someone lying there under him! 

No. 

Calm down, Evan. Calm down, he instructed himself. 

He pulled himself shakily to his feet. 

It was a dressmaker’s dummy he had stumbled over. Probably a 
model of Kathryn when she was younger. 

He rolled it out of the way as his eyes searched the shadowy room 
for a container to store the Monster Blood. What was that long, low 
object in front of the worktable? 

Moving closer, he saw that it was an old bathtub, the insides 
stained and peeling. It’s big enough, he realized, and quickly decided 
to store the green gunk inside it. 

With a loud groan, he hoisted the bucket onto the side of the old 
tub. His stomach muscles were still sore from the punch he had taken, 
and the pain shot through his body. 

He waited for the aching to fade, then tilted the bucket. The thick 
green substance rolled out of the bucket and hit the tub bottom with a 
sickening soft plop. 

Evan set the bucket aside and stared down at the Monster Blood, 
watching it ooze, spreading thickly over the bottom of the bathtub. To 
his surprise, the tub appeared nearly half full. 

How fast was this stuff growing?! 

He was leaning over the tub, about to make his way back 
upstairs, when he heard the cat screech. 

Startled, he let go of the side of the tub just as Sarabeth leapt onto 
his back. Evan didn’t have time to cry out as he toppled forward, over 
the edge of the tub and into the thick, green gunk. 


19 


Evan landed hard on his elbows, but the thick Monster Blood softened 
the fall. He heard the cat screech again and pad away. 

He sank into the ooze, his arms and legs flailing, trying to lift 
himself away. But the sticky substance was sucking him down, pulling 
him with surprising force. 

His whole body seemed to be held by it, stuck as if in cement, and 
now it was quivering up, bubbling silently, rising up to his face. Pm 
going to suffocate, he realized. 

It’s trying to choke me. 

The warmth of it spread across his body, invaded his chest, his 
legs, his throat. 

I can’t move. 

I’m stuck. 

It’s trying to choke me. 

No! 

He pulled his head up just as the green gunk began to cover his 
face. 

Then he struggled to twist his body, to twist himself around in it. 
With great effort, panting loudly, hoarse cries escaping his open lips, 
he pulled himself up into a sitting position. 

The green substance rose up even higher, as if it were reaching up 
to him, reaching to drag him back down into it. 

Evan gripped the side of the tub with both hands, held on to it 
tightly, and began to force himself up. Up, up from the clinging, 
pulling ooze. Up from the strange force that seemed to be drawing 
him back with renewed power. 

Up. Up. 

“No!” he managed to scream as the warm, green ooze slid over 
his shoulders. 

“No!” 

It was gripping his shoulders now, sliding around his neck, 
sucking him down, pulling him back into its sticky depths. 

Down. Down. 

It’s got me, he realized. 

It’s got me now. 


20 


“No!” Evan screamed aloud as the green gunk bubbled up to his neck. 

Pulling him. Pulling him down. 

“No!” 

Try again. Up. 

Try again. 

Up. Up. 

Yes! 

Gripping the sides of the tub, he was moving upward, pulling 
himself, hoisting himself, straining with all of his strength. 

Yes! Yes! He was beating it. 

He was stronger than it was. One more tug and he would be free. 

With a relieved sigh, he dropped over the side of the tub onto the 
cool basement floor. 

And lay there, pressed against the damp concrete, waiting to 
catch his breath. 

When he looked up, Sarabeth stood a few feet away, her head 
cocked to one side, her yellow eyes peering into his, an expression of 
supreme satisfaction on her dark feline face. 


The next morning, after a fitful, restless sleep, Evan brought the pad of 
yellow lined paper and a marker to the breakfast table. 

“Well, well,” Kathryn greeted him, placing a bowl of shredded 
wheat in front of him, “you certainly look like something the cat 
dragged in!” She laughed, shaking her head. 

“Don’t mention cat to me,” Evan muttered. He shoved the bowl of 
cereal aside and pointed to the pad in his hand. 

“Don’t let your cereal get soggy,” Kathryn scolded, reaching to 
push the bowl back to him. “You get more of the vitamins that way. 
And it’s good roughage.” 

“I don’t care about your stupid roughage,” Evan said moodily, 
knowing she couldn’t hear him. He pointed to the pad again, and then 
began to write, scribbling quickly in big, black letters. 

His writing caught her interest. She moved around the table and 
stood behind him, her eyes on the pad as he wrote his desperate 
message. 

I HAVE A PROBLEM, he wrote. I NEED YOUR HELP. THE 
BATHTUB DOWNSTAIRS IS OVERFLOWING WITH GREEN MONSTER 
BLOOD AND I CAN’T STOP IT. 


He put down the marker and held the pad up close to her face. 

Looking up at her from the chair, seeing her pale face in the 
morning sunlight as she leaned over him in her gray flannel bathrobe, 
Kathryn suddenly looked very old to him. Only her eyes, those 
vibrant, blue eyes running quickly over his words, seemed youthful 
and alive. 

Her lips were pursed tightly in concentration as she read what he 
had written. Then, as Evan stared eagerly up at her, her mouth spread 
into a wide smile. She tossed back her head and laughed. 

Completely bewildered by her reaction, Evan slid his chair back 
and jumped up. She rested a hand on his shoulder and gave him a 
playful shove. 

“Don’t kid an old woman!” she exclaimed, shaking her head. She 
turned and headed back to her side of the table. “I thought you were 
serious. I guess you’re not like your father at all. He never played any 
dumb jokes or tricks. Chicken was always such a serious boy.” 

“I don’t care about Chicken!” Evan shouted, losing control, and 
tossed the pad angrily onto the breakfast table. 

His aunt burst out laughing. She didn’t seem to notice that Evan 
was glaring at her in frustration, his hands tightened into fists at his 
sides. 

“Monster Blood! What an imagination!” She wiped tears of 
laughter from her eyes with her fingers. Then suddenly, her expression 
turned serious. She grabbed his earlobe and squeezed it. 

“I warned you,” she whispered. “I warned you to be careful.” 

“Ow!” 

When he cried out in pain, she let go of his ear, her eyes glowing 
like blue jewels. 

I’ve got to get out of here, Evan thought, rubbing his tender 
earlobe. He turned and strode quickly from the kitchen and up to his 
room. 

I knew she wouldn’t be any help, he thought bitterly. 

She’s just a crazy old lady. 

I should pull her down to the basement and show her the 
disgusting stuff, he thought, angrily tossing the clothes he had worn 
yesterday onto the floor. 

But what’s the point? She’d probably laugh at that, too. 

She isn’t going to help me. 

He had only one person he could rely on, he knew. 

Andy. 

He called her, punching in her number with trembling fingers. 

“Hi. Youre right,” he said, not giving her a chance to say 
anything. “We have to take the stuff back to the store.” 


“If we can carry it,” Andy replied, sounding worried. “That hunk 
of Monster Blood you gave me—it outgrew the coffee can. I put it in 
my parents’ ice bucket, but it’s outgrowing that.” 

“How about a plastic garbage bag?” Evan suggested. “You know. 
One of the really big lawn bags? We can probably carry it in a couple 
of those.” 

“It’s worth a try,” Andy said. “This stuff is so disgusting. It’s 
making all these sick noises, and it’s really sticky.” 

“Tell me about it,” Evan replied gloomily, remembering the night 
before. “I took a swim in it.” 

“Huh? You can explain later,” she said impatiently. “The toy store 
opens at ten, I think. I can meet you on the corner in twenty minutes.” 

“Good deal.” Evan hung up the phone and headed to the garage 
to get a plastic lawn bag. 


Andy showed up with her plastic bag wrapped around the handlebars 
of her BMX bike. Once again, Evan had to go along beside her on foot. 
His plastic bag was bulging, and so heavy he had to drag it over the 
sidewalk. He couldn’t lift it. 

“The tub was nearly full to the top,” he told Andy, groaning as he 
struggled to pull the bag over the curb. “I’m afraid it’s going to burst 
out of this bag.” 

“Only two blocks to go,” she said, trying to sound reassuring. A 
car rolled by slowly. The driver, a teenager with long black hair, stuck 
his head out the window, grinning. “What’s in the bag? A dead body?” 

“Just garbage,” Evan told him. 

“That’s for sure,” Andy muttered as the car rolled away. 

Several people stopped to stare at them as they entered town. “Hi, 
Mrs. Winslow,” Andy called to a friend of her mother’s. 

Mrs. Winslow waved, then gave Andy a curious stare, and headed 
into the grocery. 

Andy climbed off her bike and walked it. Evan continued to drag 
his bulging bag behind him. 

They made their way to the next block, then started to cross the 
street to the toy store. 

But they both stopped short in the middle of the street. 

And gaped in shock. 

The door and window of the store were boarded up. A small, 
hand-printed sign tacked to the top of the door read: OUT OF 
BUSINESS. 


21 


Desperate to get rid of the disgusting contents of the garbage bags, 
Evan pounded on the door anyway. 

“Come on—somebody! Somebody, open up!” 

No reply. 

He pounded with both fists. 

Silence. 

Finally, Andy had to pull him away. 

“The store is closed,” a young woman called from across the 
street. “It closed a few days ago. See? It’s all boarded up and 
everything.” 

“Very helpful,” Evan muttered under his breath. He slammed his 
hand angrily against the door. 

“Evan—stop. You’ll hurt yourself,” Andy warned. 

“Now what?” Evan demanded. “Got any more fantastic ideas, 
Andy?” 

She shrugged. “It’s your turn to come up with something 
brilliant.” 

Evan sighed miserably. “Maybe I could give it to Kathryn and tell 
her it’s beef. Then she’d chop it up with that knife she’s always 
carrying around.” 

“I don’t think you’re thinking too clearly right now,” Andy said, 
putting a sympathetic hand on his shoulder. 

They both stared down at the garbage bags. They appeared to be 
moving—expanding and contracting, as if the green globs inside were 
breathing! 

“Let’s go back to Kathryn’s,” Evan said, his voice trembling. 
“Maybe we'll think of something on the way.” 

Somehow they managed to drag the Monster Blood back to 
Kathryn’s house. The sun had gotten high in the sky. As they headed 
to the backyard, Evan was drenched with sweat. His arms ached. His 
head throbbed. 

“Now what?” he asked weakly, letting go of the bulging lawn bag. 

Andy leaned her bike against the side of the garage. She pointed 
to the big aluminum trash can next to the garage door. “How about 
that? It looks pretty sturdy.” She walked over to it to investigate. “And 
look—the lid clamps down.” 

“Okay,” Evan agreed, wiping his forehead with the sleeve of his 
T-shirt. 


Andy pulled off the lid of the big can. Then she dumped in the 
contents of her bag. It hit the bottom with a sick, squishy sound. Then 
she hurried to help Evan. 

“It’s so heavy,” Evan groaned, struggling to pull the bag up. 

“We can do it,” Andy insisted. 

Working together, they managed to slide the Monster Blood from 
the plastic bag. It rolled out like a tidal wave, sloshing noisily against 
the sides of the can, raising up as if trying to escape. 

With a loud sigh of relief, Evan slammed the metal lid down on 
top of it and clamped the handles down. 

“Whoa!” Andy cried. 

They both stared at the can for a long moment, as if expecting it 
to explode or burst apart. “Now what?” Evan asked, his features tight 
with fear. 

Before Andy could reply, they saw Kathryn step out of the kitchen 
door. Her eyes searched the backyard until she spotted them. “Evan— 
good news!” she called. 

Glancing back at the trash can, Evan and Andy came hurrying 
over. Kathryn was holding a yellow piece of paper in her hand. A 
telegram. 

“Your mother is coming to pick you up this afternoon,” Kathryn 
said, a wide smile on her face. 

I think Kathryn is glad to get rid of me, was Evan’s first thought. 

And then, dismissing that thought, he leapt up and whooped for 
joy. It was the best news he’d ever received. 

‘Tm outta here!” he exclaimed after his aunt had returned to the 
house. “I’m outta here! I can’t wait!” 

Andy didn’t appear to share his joy. “You’re leaving your aunt a 
nice little surprise over there,” she said, pointing to the trash can. 

“I don’t care! I’m outta here!” Evan repeated, raising his hand for 
Andy to slap him a high five. 

She didn’t cooperate. “Don’t you think we have to tell someone 
about the Monster Blood? Or do something about it—before you 
leave?” 

But Evan was too excited to think about that now. “Hey, Trigger!” 
he called, running to the dog’s pen at the back of the yard. “Trigger— 
we're going home, boy!” 

Evan pulled open the gate—and gasped. 


22 


“Trigger!” 

The dog that came bounding toward him looked like Trigger. But 
the cocker spaniel was the size of a pony! He had doubled in size since 
the day before! 

“No!” Evan had to hit the dirt as Trigger excitedly tried to jump 
on him. “Hey—wait!” 

Before Evan could get up, Trigger began barking ferociously. The 
huge dog was already past the gate and thundering across the 
backyard toward the street. 

“I don’t believe it!” Andy cried, raising her hands to her face, 
staring in shock as the enormous creature bounded around the side of 
the house and out of sight. “He’s so—big!” 

“We’ve got to stop him! He might hurt someone!” Evan cried. 

“Trigger! Trigger—come back!” Still off balance, Evan started to 
run, calling frantically. But he stumbled over Andy’s bike and fell onto 
the trash can. 

“No!” Andy shrieked, looking on helplessly as the metal can 
toppled over, with Evan sprawled on top of it. The can hit the 
driveway with a loud clang. 

The lid popped off and rolled away. 

The green gunk poured out. 

It oozed away from the can, then stopped and appeared to stand 
up. Quivering, making loud sucking sounds, it righted itself, pulling 
itself up tall. 

As the two kids stared in silent horror, the quivering green mass 
appeared to come to life, like a newly born creature pulling itself up, 
stretching, looking around. 

Then, with a loud sucking sound, it arched toward Evan, who was 
still sprawled on the toppled can. 

“Get up, Evan!” Andy cried. “Get up! It’s going to roll right over 
you!” 


23 


“Noooooo!” 

Evan uttered an animal cry, a sound he had never made before— 
and rolled away as the quivering green ball bounced toward him. 

“Run, Evan!” Andy screamed. She grabbed his hand and pulled 
him to his feet. “It’s alive!” she cried. “Run!” 

The Monster Blood heaved itself against the garage wall. It 
seemed to stick there for a brief second. Then it peeled off, and came 
bouncing toward them with surprising speed. 

“Help! Help!” 

“Somebody—please—help!” 

Screaming at the top of their lungs, Evan and Andy took off. 
Scrambling as fast as he could, his legs weak and rubbery from fear, 
Evan followed Andy down the driveway toward the front yard. 

“Help! Oh, please! Help us!” 

Evan’s voice was hoarse from screaming. His heart thudded in his 
chest. His temples throbbed. 

He turned and saw that the Monster Blood was right behind them, 
picking up speed as it bounced across the yard, making disgusting 
squishing noises with each bounce. 

Plop. Plop. Plop. 

A robin, pulling at a worm in the grass, didn’t look up in time. 
The trembling green mass rolled over it. 

“Oh!” Evan moaned, turning back to see the bird sucked into the 
green ball. Its wings flapping frantically, the bird uttered a final cry, 
then disappeared inside. 

Plop. Plop. Plop. 

The Monster Blood changed direction, still bouncing and 
quivering, and leaving white stains on the grass like enormous, round 
footsteps. 

“Its alive!” Andy screamed, her hands pressed against her cheeks. 
“Oh, my God—it’s alive!” 

“What can we do? What can we do?” Evan didn’t recognize his 
own terrified voice. 

“It’s catching up!” Andy screamed, pulling him by the hand. 
“Run!” 

Gasping loudly, they made their way to the front of the house. 

“Hey—what’s happening?” a voice called. 

“Huh?” 


Startled by the voice, Evan stopped short. He looked to the 
sidewalk to see the Beymer twins, matching grins on their beefy faces. 

“My favorite punching bag,” one of them said to Evan. He raised 
his fist menacingly. 

They took a few steps toward Evan and Andy. Then their grins 
faded and their mouths dropped open in horror as the gigantic green 
mass appeared, heading down the drive, rolling as fast as a bicycle. 

“Look out!” Evan screamed. 

“Run!” Andy cried. 

But the two brothers were too startled to move. 

Their eyes bulging with fear, they threw their hands up as if 
trying to shield themselves. 

Plop. Plop. Plop. 

The enormous ball of Monster Blood picked up speed as it 
bounced forward. Evan shut his eyes as it hit the twins with a 
deafening smack. 

“Ow!” 

“No!” 

Both brothers cried out, flailing their arms, struggling to pull 
themselves free. 

“Help us! Please—help us!” 

Their bodies twisted and writhed as they struggled. 

But they were stuck tight. The green gunk oozed over them, 
covering them completely. 

Then it pulled them inside with a loud sucking pop. 

Andy shielded her eyes. “Sick,” she muttered. “Oooh. Sick.” 

Evan gasped in helpless horror as the Beymer brothers finally 
stopped struggling. 

Their arms went limp. Their faces disappeared into the quivering 
gunk. 

The sucking sounds grew louder as the two boys were pulled 
deeper and deeper inside. Then the Monster Blood bounced high, 
turned, and started back up the drive. 

Andy and Evan froze, unsure of which way to head. 

“Split up!” Evan cried. “It can’t go after us both!” 

Andy returned his frightened stare. She opened her mouth, but no 
sound came out. 

“Split up! Split up!” Evan repeated shrilly. 

“But—” Andy started. 

Before she could say anything, the front door of the house burst 
open, and Kathryn stepped out onto the stoop. 

“Hey—what are you kids doing? What’s that?” she cried, gripping 


the screen door, her eyes filling with horror. 

Picking up speed, the giant ball bounded toward the stoop. 

Kathryn tossed up her hands in fright. She stood frozen for a long 
moment, as if trying to make sense of what she was seeing. Then, 
leaving the front door wide open, she spun around and fled into the 
house. 

Plop. Plop. 

The Monster Blood hesitated at the front stoop. 

It bounced in place once, twice, three times, as if considering 
what to do next. 

Evan and Andy gaped in horror from across the lawn, trying to 
catch their breath. 

A wave of nausea swept over Evan as he saw the Beymer twins, 
still visible deep within the quivering glob, faceless prisoners 
bouncing inside it. 

Then suddenly, the Monster Blood bounced high and hurtled up 
the stairs of the stoop. 

“No!” Evan screamed as it squeezed through the open doorway 
and disappeared into the house. 

From the middle of the yard, Andy and Evan heard Kathryn’s 
bloodcurdling scream. 

“It’s got Aunt Kathryn,” Evan said weakly. 


24 


Evan reached the house first. He had run so fast, his lungs felt as if 
they were about to burst. 

“What are you going to do?” Andy called, following close behind. 

“I don’t know,” Evan replied. He grabbed on to the screen door 
and propelled himself into the house. 

“Aunt Kathryn!” Evan screamed, bursting into the living room. 

The enormous glob filled the center of the small room. The 
Beymer twins were outlined in its side as it bounced and quivered, 
oozing over the carpet, leaving its sticky footprints in its path. 

It took Evan a few seconds to see his aunt. The bouncing hunk of 
Monster Blood had backed her against the fireplace. 

“Aunt Kathryn—run!” Evan cried. 

But even he could see that she had nowhere to run. 

“Get out of here, kids!” Kathryn cried, her voice shrill and 
trembling, suddenly sounding very old. 

“But, Aunt Kathryn—” 

“Get out of here—now!” the old woman insisted, her black hair 
wild about her head, her eyes, those blue, penetrating eyes, staring 
hard at the green glob as if willing it away. 

Evan turned to Andy, uncertain of what to do. 

Andy’s hands tugged at the sides of her hair, her eyes wide with 
growing fear as the seething green glob made its way steadily closer to 
Evan’s aunt. 

“Get out!” Kathryn repeated shrilly. “Save your lives! I made this 
thing! Now I must die for it!” 

Evan gasped. 

Had he heard correctly? 

What had his aunt just said? 

The words repeated in his mind, clear now, so clear—and so 
frightening. 

“I made this thing. Now I must die for it.” 


25 


“No!” 

Gaping in horror, as the sickening glob of Monster Blood pushed 
toward his aunt, Evan felt the room tilt and begin to spin. He gripped 
the back of Kathryn’s armchair as pictures flooded his mind. 

He saw the strange bone pendant Kathryn always wore around 
her neck. 

The mysterious books that lined the walls of his bedroom. 

Sarabeth, the black cat with the glowing yellow eyes. 

The black shawl Kathryn always wrapped around her shoulders in 
the evening. 

“I made this thing. Now I must die for it.” 

Evan saw it all now, and it began to come clear to him. 

Evan pictured the day he and Andy brought home the can of 
Monster Blood from the toy store. Kathryn had insisted on seeing it. 

On studying it. 

On touching it. 

He remembered the way she rolled the can around in her hands, 
examining it so carefully. Moving her lips silently as she read the 
label. 

What had she been doing? What had she been saying? 

A thought flashed into Evan’s mind. 

Had she been casting a spell on the can? 

A spell to make the Monster Blood grow? A spell to terrify Evan? 

But why? She didn’t even know Evan. 

Why did she want to frighten him? To... kill him? 

“Be careful,” she had called to him after handing the blue can 
back. “Be careful.” 

It was a real warning. 

A warning against her spell. 

“You did this!” Evan shouted in a voice he didn’t recognize. The 
words burst out of him. He had no control over them. 

“You did this! You cast a spell!” he repeated, pointing an accusing 
finger at his aunt. 

He saw her blue eyes shimmer as they read his lips. Then her eyes 
filled with tears, tears that overflowed onto her pale cheeks. 

“No!” she cried. “No!” 

“You did something to the can! You did this, Aunt Kathryn!” 

“No!” she cried, shouting over the sickening grunts and plops of 


the mountainous ball that nearly hid her from view. 

“No!” Kathryn cried, her back pressed tightly against the 
mantelpiece. “I didn’t do it! She did!” 

And she pointed an accusing finger at Andy. 


26 


Andy? 

Was Aunt Kathryn accusing Andy? 

Evan spun around to confront Andy. 

But Andy turned, too. 

And Evan realized immediately that his aunt wasn’t pointing at 
Andy. She was pointing past Andy to Sarabeth. 

Standing in the doorway to the living room, the black cat hissed 
and arched her back, her yellow eyes flaring at Kathryn. 

“She did it! She’s the one!” Kathryn declared, pointing frantically. 

The enormous glob of green Monster Blood bounced back, 
retreated a step, as if stung by Kathryn’s words. Shadows shifted 
inside the glob as it quivered, catching the light filtering in through 
the living room window. 

Evan stared at the cat, then turned his eyes to Andy. She 
shrugged, her face frozen in horror and bewilderment. 

Aunt Kathryn is crazy, Evan thought sadly. 

She’s totally lost it. 

She isn’t making any sense. 

None of this makes sense. 

“She’s the one!” Kathryn repeated. 

The cat hissed in response. 

The glob bounced in place, carrying the unmoving Beymer 
brothers inside. 

“Oh—look!” Evan cried to Andy as the black cat suddenly raised 
up on its hind legs. 

Andy gasped and squeezed Evan’s arm. Her hand was as cold as 
ice. 

Still hissing, the cat grew like a shadow against the wall. It raised 
its claws, swiping the air. Its eyes closed, and it became consumed in 
darkness. 

No one moved. 

The only sounds Evan could hear were the bubbling of the green 
glob and the pounding of his own heart. 

All eyes were on the cat as it rose up, stretched, and grew. And as 
it grew, it changed its shape. 

Became human. 

With shadowy arms and legs in the eerie darkness. 

And then the shadow stepped away from the darkness. 


And Sarabeth was now a young woman with fiery red hair and 
pale skin and yellow eyes, the same yellow cat eyes that had haunted 
Evan since he’d arrived. The young woman was dressed in a swirling 
black gown down to her ankles. 

She stood blocking the doorway, staring accusingly at Kathryn. 

“You see? She’s the one,” Kathryn said, quietly now. And the next 
words were intended only for Sarabeth: “Your spell over me is broken. 
I will do no more work for you.” 

Sarabeth tossed her red hair behind a black-cloaked shoulder and 
laughed. “TIl decide what you will do, Kathryn.” 

“No,” Kathryn insisted. “For twenty years, you have used me, 
Sarabeth. For twenty years you have imprisoned me here, held me in 
your spell. But now I will use this Monster Blood to escape.” 

Sarabeth laughed again. “There is no escape, fool. All of you must 
die now. All of you.” 


27 


“All of you must die,” Sarabeth repeated. Her smile revealed that she 
enjoyed saying those words. 

Kathryn turned to Evan, her eyes reflecting her fear. “Twenty 
years ago, I thought she was my friend. I was all alone here. I thought 
I could trust her. But she cast a spell on me. And then another. Her 
dark magic made me deaf. She refused to let me lip-read or learn to 
sign. That was one way she kept me her prisoner.” 

“But, Aunt Kathryn—” Evan started. 

She raised a finger to her lips to silence him. 

“Sarabeth forced me to cast the spell on the can of Monster Blood. 
She had warned me that I was allowed no guests, you see. I was her 
slave. Her personal servant for all these years. She wanted me all to 
herself, to do her evil bidding. 

“When you arrived,” Kathryn continued, her back still pressed 
against the fireplace mantel, “she first decided to scare you away. But 
that was impossible. You had nowhere to go. Then she became 
desperate to get you out of the way. She was terrified that you would 
learn her secret, that you would somehow free me of her spell. So 
Sarabeth decided that you had to die.” 

Kathryn’s eyes fell. She sighed. “I’m so sorry, Evan. I had no 
choice, no will of my own.” She turned her eyes to Sarabeth. “But no 
more. No more. No more. As I plunge myself into this ghastly creation, 
Sarabeth, I will end your spell. I will end your hold over me.” 

“The children will still die,” Sarabeth said quietly, coldly. 

“What?” Kathryn’s eyes filled with fury. “I will be gone, Sarabeth. 
You can let the children go. You have no reason to do them harm.” 

“They know too much,” Sarabeth replied softly, crossing her 
slender arms in front of her, her yellow eyes aglow. 

“We’ve got to get out of here,” Evan whispered to Andy, staring at 
the seething green glob. 

“But how?” Andy whispered back. “Sarabeth is blocking the 
doorway.” 

Evan’s eyes darted around the small room, searching for an 
escape route. 

Nothing. 

Sarabeth raised one hand and drew it toward her slowly, as if 
summoning the green glob. 

It quivered once, twice, then moved obediently in the direction of 
her hand. 


“No! Sarabeth—stop!” Kathryn pleaded. 

Ignoring Kathryn, Sarabeth gestured with her hand again. 

The green gunk bubbled and rolled forward. 

“Kill the children,” Sarabeth commanded. 

The enormous glob picked up speed as it rolled across the carpet 
toward Evan and Andy. 

“Let’s rush the door,” Evan suggested to Andy, as they backed up 
away from the rolling Monster Blood. 

“She'll never let us past,” Andy cried. 

“Kill the children!” Sarabeth repeated, raising both hands high 
above her head. 

“Maybe one of us can get by her!” Evan cried. 

“Tt’s too late!” Andy shrieked. 

The bouncing, pulsating, green glob was just a few feet away. 

“We—we’re going to be sucked in!” Evan screamed. 

“Kill the children!” Sarabeth screamed triumphantly. 


28 


The glob rolled forward. 

Evan sighed, feeling all hope sink. Frozen in place, he felt as if he 
weighed a thousand pounds. 

Andy grabbed his hand. 

They both closed their eyes and held their breath, and waited for 
the impact. 

To their surprise, the Monster Blood emitted a deafening roar. 

“Huh?” 

Evan opened his eyes. Andy, he saw, was staring at the doorway, 
beyond Sarabeth. 

The Monster Blood hadn’t roared. 

“Trigger!” Evan cried. 

The huge dog bounded into the doorway, its deafening bark 
echoing off the low ceiling. 

Sarabeth tried to get out of the dog’s way. But she was too late. 

Thrilled to see Evan, Trigger enthusiastically leapt at Sarabeth— 
and pushed her from behind. 

Under the weight of the gigantic paws, Sarabeth staggered 
forward... forward... forward—raising her hands as she collided with 
the Monster Blood. 

There was a wet smack as Sarabeth hit the surface of the green 
glob. 

Then loud, disgusting sucking noises. 

Her hands hit first. They disappeared quickly. And then Sarabeth 
was in up to her elbows. 

And then the glob seemed to give a hard tug, and her body hit the 
surface. Then her face was pulled in, covered over. 

Sarabeth never uttered a sound as she was pulled inside. 

Whimpering with joy, completely unaware of what he had done, 
the dog loped into the room and headed for Evan. 

“Down, boy! Down!” Evan cried, as Trigger happily leapt at him. 

And as the dog jumped, he began to shrink. 

“Trigger!” Evan called in astonishment, reaching out to hold the 
dog. 

Trigger didn’t seem to notice that he was changing. He licked 
Evan’s face as Evan held on tightly. 

In seconds, Trigger was back to normal cocker spaniel size. 

“Look—the glob is shrinking, too!” Andy cried, squeezing Evan’s 


shoulder. 

Evan turned to see that the green glob was rapidly growing 
smaller. 

As it shrunk, the Beymer brothers fell to the floor. 

They didn’t move. They lay facedown in a crumpled heap. Their 
open eyes stared lifelessly. They didn’t appear to be breathing. 

Then one blinked. The other blinked. 

Their mouths opened and closed. 

“Ohhh.” One of them uttered a long, low groan. 

Then, pulling themselves up slowly, they both looked around the 
room, dazed. 

The trapped robin had also fallen to the floor. Chirping furiously, 
it flapped its wings wildly and fluttered about the room in a panic— 
until it found the open living room window and sailed out. 

Andy held on to Evan as they stared at the Monster Blood, 
expecting Sarabeth to reappear, too. 

But Sarabeth was gone. 

Vanished. 

The Monster Blood, shrunk to its original size, lay lifeless, inert, a 
dull green spot on the carpet, no bigger than a tennis ball. 

The Beymer brothers stood up uncertainly, their eyes still 
reflecting terror and confusion. They stretched as if testing their arms 
and legs, seeing if their muscles still worked. Then they scrambled out 
of the house, slamming the screen door behind them. 

“It’s over,” Kathryn said softly, moving forward to put an arm 
around Evan and Andy. 

“Sarabeth is gone,” Evan said, holding Trigger tightly in his arms, 
still staring at the tiny wedge of Monster Blood on the floor. 

“And I can hear!” Kathryn said jubilantly, hugging them both. 
“Sarabeth and her spells are gone for good.” 

But as she said this, the screen door swung open and a shadowy 
figure stepped into the living room doorway. 


29 


“Mom!” Evan cried. 

He set down Trigger and hurried to greet her, throwing his arms 
around her in a tight hug. 

“What on earth is going on here?” Mrs. Ross asked. “Why did 
those two boys come bursting out like that? They looked scared to 
death!” 

“It—it’s a little hard to explain,” Evan told her. “I’m so glad to see 
you!” 

Trigger was glad, too. When he finally had finished jumping up 
and down and whimpering, Kathryn led Evan’s mom to the kitchen. 
“TIl make some tea,” she said. “I have a rather long story to tell you.” 

“I hope it isn’t too long,” Mrs. Ross said, glancing back 
questioningly at Evan. “We have a four o’clock plane to catch.” 

“Mom, I think you'll find this story interesting,” Evan said, 
flashing Andy an amused look. 

The two women disappeared into the kitchen. 

Andy and Evan dropped down wearily onto the couch. 

“I guess you're going forever,” Andy said. “I mean, to Atlanta and 
everything—” 

“Pd like to... uh... write to you,” Evan said, suddenly feeling 
awkward. 

“Yeah. Good,” Andy replied, brightening. “And my dad has a 
phone credit card. Maybe I could get the number and... you know... 
call you.” 

“Yeah. Great,” Evan said. 

“Could I ask one small favor?” Andy asked. 

“Yeah. Sure,” Evan replied, curious. 

“Well, it’s going to sound strange,” Andy said reluctantly. “But 
can I... uh... can I have the little bit of Monster Blood that’s left? You 
know. Sort of as a memento or something?” 

“Sure. Okay with me,” Evan said. 

They both turned their eyes to where it had come to rest on the 
carpet. 

“Hey—” Andy cried in surprise. 

It was gone. 


Scanning, formatting and 


proofing by Undead. 


Skip to main content
 
Texts
 
Video
 
Audio
 
Software
 
Images
My uploads
My loans
My favorites
My lists
My collections
My web archives
Account settings
Get help
Log out
 Search metadata
 Search text contents
 Search TV news captions
 Search radio transcripts
 Search archived web sites
Advanced Search
About Blog Projects Help Donate  Contact Jobs Volunteer People
Full text of "All 62 Goosebumps novels"
See other formats
SAIS ORIGINAL GLUE |AWNY WS OND OP GWU. 
/ ~ | ; 


MSCHOLASTIC Ss 


SAY CHEESE 
AND DIE! 


Goosebumps - 04 
R.L. Stine 
(An Undead Scan v1.5) 


“There’s nothing to do in Pitts Landing,” Michael Warner said, his 
hands shoved into the pockets of his faded denim cutoffs. 

“Yeah. Pitts Landing is the pits,” Greg Banks said. 

Doug Arthur and Shari Walker muttered their agreement. 

Pitts Landing Is The Pits. That was the town slogan, according to 
Greg and his three friends. Actually, Pitts Landing wasn’t much 
different from a lot of small towns with quiet streets of shady lawns 
and comfortable old houses. 

But here it was, a balmy fall afternoon, and the four friends were 
hanging around Greg’s driveway, kicking at the gravel, wondering 
what to do for fun and excitement. 

“Let’s go to Grover’s and see if the new comic books have come 
in,” Doug suggested. 

“We don’t have any money, Bird,” Greg told him. 

Everyone called Doug “Bird”, because he looked a lot like a bird. 
A better nickname might have been “Stork”. He had long, skinny legs 
and took long, storklike steps. Under his thick tuft of brown hair, 
which he seldom brushed, he had small, birdlike brown eyes and a 
long nose that curved like a beak. Doug didn’t really like being called 
Bird, but he was used to it. 

“We can still look at the comics,” Bird insisted. 

“Until Grover starts yelling at you,” Shari said. She puffed out her 
cheeks and did a pretty good imitation of the gruff store owner: “Are 
you paying or staying?” 

“He thinks he’s cool,” Greg said, laughing at her imitation. “He’s 
such a jerk.” 

“I think the new X-Force is coming in this week,” Bird said. 

“You should join the X-Force,” Greg said, giving his pal a playful 
shove. “You could be Bird Man. You’d be great!” 

“We should all join the X-Force,” Michael said. “If we were 
superheroes, maybe we’d have something to do.” 

“No, we wouldn’t,” Shari quickly replied. “There’s no crime to 
fight in Pitts Landing.” 

“We could fight crabgrass,” Bird suggested. He was the joker in 
the group. 

The others laughed. The four of them had been friends for a long 
time. Greg and Shari lived next door to each other, and their parents 
were best friends. Bird and Michael lived on the next block. 


“How about a baseball game?” Michael suggested. “We could go 
down to the playground.” 

“No way,” Shari said. “You can’t play with only four people.” She 
pushed back a strand of her crimped black hair that had fallen over 
her face. She was wearing an oversized yellow sweatshirt over bright 
green leggings. 

“Maybe we'll find some other kids there,” Michael said, picking 
up a handful of gravel from the drive and letting it sift through his 
chubby fingers. Michael had short red hair, blue eyes, and a face full 
of freckles. He wasn’t exactly fat, but no one would ever call him 
skinny. 

“Come on, let’s play baseball,” Bird urged. “I need the practice. 
My Little League starts in a couple of days.” 

“Little League? In the fall?” Shari asked. 

“It’s a new fall league. The first game is Tuesday after school,” 
Bird explained. 

“Hey—we’ll come watch you,” Greg said. 

“We’ll come watch you strike out,” Shari added. Her hobby was 
teasing Bird. 

“What position are you playing?” Greg asked. 

“Backstop,” Michael cracked. 

No one laughed. Michael’s jokes always fell flat. 

Bird shrugged. “Probably the outfield. How come you’re not 
playing, Greg?” 

With his big shoulders and muscular arms and legs, Greg was the 
natural athlete of the group. He was blond and good-looking, with 
flashing gray-green eyes and a wide, friendly smile. 

“My brother, Terry, was supposed to go sign me up, but he 
forgot,” Greg said, making a disgusted face. 

“Where is Terry?” Shari asked. She had a tiny crush on Greg’s 
older brother. 

“He got a job Saturdays and after school. At the Dairy Freeze,” 
Greg told her. 

“Let’s go to the Dairy Freeze!” Michael exclaimed enthusiastically. 

“We don’t have any money—remember?” Bird said glumly. 

“Terry’ll give us free cones,” Michael said, turning a hopeful gaze 
on Greg. 

“Yeah. Free cones. But no ice cream in them,” Greg told him. 
“You know what a straight arrow my brother is.” 

“This is boring,” Shari complained, watching a robin hop across 
the sidewalk. “It’s boring standing around talking about how bored we 
are.” 

“We could sit down and talk about how bored we are,” Bird 


suggested, twisting his mouth into the goofy half smile he always 
wore when he was making a dumb joke. 

“Let’s take a walk or a jog or something,” Shari insisted. She 
made her way across the lawn and began walking, balancing her 
white high-tops on the edge of the curb, waving her arms like a high- 
wire performer. 

The boys followed, imitating her in an impromptu game of follow 
the leader, all of them balancing on the curb edge as they walked. 

A curious cocker spaniel came bursting out of the neighbors’ 
hedge, yapping excitedly. Shari stopped to pet him. The dog, its stub 
of a tail wagging furiously, licked her hand a few times. Then the dog 
lost interest and disappeared back into the hedge. 

The four friends continued down the block, playfully trying to 
knock each other off the curb as they walked. They crossed the street 
and continued on past the school. A couple of guys were shooting 
baskets, and some little kids played kick ball on the practice baseball 
diamond, but no one they knew. 

The road curved away from the school. They followed it past 
familiar houses. Then, just beyond a small wooded area, they stopped 
and looked up a sloping lawn, the grass uncut for weeks, tall weeds 
poking out everywhere, the shrubs ragged and overgrown. 

At the top of the lawn, nearly hidden in the shadows of enormous 
old oak trees, sprawled a large ramshackle house. The house, anyone 
could see, had once been grand. It was gray shingled, three stories tall, 
with a wraparound screened porch, a sloping red roof, and tall 
chimneys on either end. But the broken windows on the second floor, 
the cracked, weather-stained shingles, the bare spots on the roof, and 
the shutters hanging loosely beside the dust-smeared windows were 
evidence of the house’s neglect. 

Everyone in Pitts Landing knew it as the Coffman house. Coffman 
was the name painted on the mailbox that tilted on its broken pole 
over the front walk. 

But the house had been deserted for years—ever since Greg and 
his friends could remember. 

And people liked to tell weird stories about the house: ghost 
stories and wild tales about murders and ghastly things that happened 
there. Most likely, none of them were true. 

“Hey—I know what we can do for excitement,” Michael said, 
staring up at the house bathed in shadows. 

“Huh? What are you talking about?” Greg asked warily. 

“Let’s go into the Coffman house,” Michael said, starting to make 
his way across the weed-choked lawn. 

“Whoa. Are you crazy?” Greg called, hurrying to catch up to him. 


“Let’s go in,” Michael said, his blue eyes catching the light of the 
late afternoon sun filtering down through the tall oak trees. “We 
wanted an adventure. Something a little exciting, right? Come on— 
let’s check it out.” 

Greg hesitated and stared up at the house. A cold chill ran down 
his back. 

Before he could reply, a dark form leaped up from the shadows of 
the tall weeds and attacked him! 


Greg toppled backward onto the ground. “Aah!” he screamed. Then he 
realized the others were laughing. 

“It’s that dumb cocker spaniel!” Shari cried. “He followed us!” 

“Go home, dog. Go home!” Bird shooed the dog away. 

The dog trotted to the curb, turned around, and stared back at 
them, its stubby tail wagging furiously. 

Feeling embarrassed that he’d become so frightened, Greg slowly 
pulled himself to his feet, expecting his friends to give him grief. But 
they were staring up at the Coffman house thoughtfully. 

“Yeah, Michael’s right,” Bird said, slapping Michael hard on the 
back, so hard Michael winced and turned to slug Bird. “Let’s see what 
it’s like in there.” 

“No way,” Greg said, hanging back. “I mean, the place is kind of 
creepy, don’t you think?” 

“So?” Shari challenged him, joining Michael and Bird, who 
repeated her question: “So?” 

“So... I don’t know,” Greg replied. He didn’t like being the 
sensible one of the group. Everyone always made fun of the sensible 
one. He’d rather be the wild and crazy one. But somehow he always 
ended up sensible. 

“I don’t think we should go in there,” he said, staring up at the 
neglected old house. 

“Are you chicken?” Bird asked. 

“Chicken!” Michael joined in. 

Bird began to cluck loudly, tucking his hands into his armpits and 
flapping his arms. With his beady eyes and beaky nose, he looked just 
like a chicken. 

Greg didn’t want to laugh, but he couldn’t help it. 

Bird always made him laugh. 

The clucking and flapping seemed to end the discussion. They 
were standing at the foot of the broken concrete steps that led up to 
the screened porch. 

“Look. The window next to the front door is broken,” Shari said. 
“We can just reach in and open the door.” 

“This is cool,” Michael said enthusiastically. 

“Are we really doing this?” Greg, being the sensible one, had to 
ask. “I mean—what about Spidey?” 

Spidey was a weird-looking man of fifty or sixty they’d all seen 


lurking about town. He dressed entirely in black and crept along on 
long, slender legs. He looked just like a black spider, so the kids all 
called him Spidey. 

Most likely he was homeless or a drifter. No one really knew 
anything about him—where he’d come from, where he lived. But a lot 
of kids had seen him hanging around the Coffman house. 

“Maybe Spidey doesn’t like visitors,” Greg warned. 

But Shari was already reaching in through the broken 
windowpane to unlock the front door. And after little effort, she 
turned the brass knob and the heavy wooden door swung open. 

One by one, they stepped into the front entryway, Greg 
reluctantly bringing up the rear. It was dark inside the house. Only 
narrow beams of sunlight managed to trickle down through the heavy 
trees in front, creating pale circles of light on the worn brown carpet 
at their feet. 

The floorboards squeaked as Greg and his friends made their way 
past the living room, which was bare except for a couple of 
overturned grocery store cartons against one wall. 

Spidey’s furniture? Greg wondered. 

The living room carpet, as threadbare as the one in the entryway, 
had a dark oval stain in the center of it. Greg and Bird, stopping in the 
doorway, both noticed it at the same time. 

“Think it’s blood?” Bird asked, his tiny eyes lighting up with 
excitement. 

Greg felt a chill on the back of his neck. “Probably ketchup,” he 
replied. Bird laughed and slapped him hard on the back. 

Shari and Michael were exploring the kitchen. They were staring 
at the dust-covered counter as Greg and Bird stepped up behind them. 
They saw immediately what had captured their attention. Two fat 
gray mice were standing on the counter, staring back at Shari and 
Michael. 

“They’re cute,” Shari said. “They look just like cartoon mice.” 

The sound of her voice made the two rodents scamper along the 
counter, around the sink, and out of sight. 

“They’re gross,” Michael said, making a disgusted face. “I think 
they were rats—not mice.” 

“Rats have long tails. Mice don’t,” Greg told him. 

“They were definitely rats,” Bird muttered, pushing past them and 
into the hallway. He disappeared toward the front of the house. 

Shari reached up and pulled open a cabinet over the counter. 
Empty. “I guess Spidey never uses the kitchen,” she said. 

“Well, I didn’t think he was a gourmet chef,” Greg joked. 

He followed her into the long, narrow dining room, as bare and 


dusty as the other rooms. A low chandelier still hung from the ceiling, 
so brown with caked dust it was impossible to tell that it was glass. 

“Looks like a haunted house,” Greg said softly. 

“Boo,” Shari replied. 

“There’s not much to see in here,” Greg complained, following 
her back to the dark hallway. “Unless you get a thrill from dustballs.” 

Suddenly, a loud crack made him jump. 

Shari laughed and squeezed his shoulder. 

“What was that?” he cried, unable to stifle his fear. 

“Old houses do things like that,” she said. “They make noises for 
no reason at all.” 

“I think we should leave,” Greg insisted, embarrassed again that 
he’d acted so frightened. “I mean, it’s boring in here.” 

“It’s kind of exciting being somewhere we’re not supposed to be,” 
Shari said, peeking into a dark, empty room—probably a den or study 
at one time. 

“I guess,” Greg replied uncertainly. 

They bumped into Michael. “Where’s Bird?” Greg asked. 

“T think he went down to the basement,” Michael replied. 

“Huh? The basement?” 

Michael pointed to an open door at the right of the hallway. “The 
stairs are there.” 

The three of them made their way to the top of the stairs. They 
peered down into the darkness. “Bird?” 

From somewhere deep in the basement, his voice floated up to 
them in a horrified scream: “Help! It’s got me! Somebody—please 
help! It’s got me!” 


“It’s got me! It’s got me!” 

At the sound of Bird’s terrified cries, Greg pushed past Shari and 
Michael, who stood frozen in openmouthed horror. Practically flying 
down the steep stairway, Greg called out to his friend. “Pm coming, 
Bird! What is it?” 

His heart pounding, Greg stopped at the bottom of the stairs, 
every muscle tight with fear. His eyes searched frantically through the 
smoky light pouring in from the basement windows up near the 
ceiling. 

“Bird?” 

There he was, sitting comfortably, calmly, on an overturned metal 
trash can, his legs crossed, a broad smile on his birdlike face. 
“Gotcha,” he said softly, and burst out laughing. 

“What is it? What happened?” came the frightened voices of Shari 
and Michael. They clamored down the stairs, coming to a stop beside 
Greg. 

It took them only a few seconds to scope out the situation. 

“Another dumb joke?” Michael asked, his voice still trembling 
with fear. 

“Bird—were you goofing on us again?” Shari asked, shaking her 
head. 

Enjoying his moment, Bird nodded, with his peculiar half grin. 
“You guys are too easy,” he scoffed. 

“But, Doug—” Shari started. She only called him Doug when she 
was upset with him. “Haven’t you ever heard of the boy who cried 
wolf? What if something bad happens sometime, and you really need 
help, and we think you’re just goofing?” 

“What could happen?” Bird replied smugly. He stood up and 
gestured around the basement. “Look—it’s brighter down here than 
upstairs.” 

He was right. Sunlight from the backyard cascaded down through 
four long windows at ground level, near the ceiling of the basement. 

“I still think we should get out of here,” Greg insisted, his eyes 
moving quickly around the large, cluttered room. 

Behind Bird’s overturned trash can stood an improvised table 
made out of a sheet of plywood resting on four paint cans. A nearly 
flat mattress, dirty and stained, rested against the wall, a faded wool 
blanket folded at the foot. 

“Spidey must live down here!” Michael exclaimed. 


Bird kicked his way through a pile of empty food boxes that had 
been tossed all over the floor—TV dinners, mostly. “Hey, a Hungry 
Man dinner!” he exclaimed. “Where does Spidey heat these up?” 

“Maybe he eats them frozen,” Shari suggested. “You know. Like 
Popsicles.” 

She made her way toward a towering oak wardrobe and pulled 
open the doors. “Wow! This is excellent!” she declared. “Look!” She 
pulled out a ratty-looking fur coat and wrapped it around her 
shoulders. “Excellent!” she repeated, twirling in the old coat. 

From across the room, Greg could see that the wardrobe was 
stuffed with old clothing. Michael and Bird hurried to join Shari and 
began pulling out strange-looking pairs of bell-bottom pants, yellowed 
dress shirts with pleats down the front, tie-dyed neckties that were 
about a foot wide, and bright-colored scarves and bandannas. 

“Hey, guys—” Greg warned. “Don’t you think maybe those belong 
to somebody?” 

Bird spun around, a fuzzy red boa wrapped around his neck and 
shoulders. “Yeah. These are Spidey’s dress-up clothes,” he cracked. 

“Check out this baad hat,” Shari said, turning around to show off 
the bright purple wide-brimmed hat she had pulled on. 

“Neat,” Michael said, examining a long blue cape. “This stuff 
must be at least twenty-five years old. It’s awesome. How could 
someone just leave it here?” 

“Maybe they’re coming back for it,” Greg suggested. 

As his friends explored the contents of the wardrobe, Greg 
wandered to the other end of the large basement. A furnace occupied 
the far wall, its ducts covered in thick cobwebs. Partially hidden by 
the furnace ducts, Greg could see stairs, probably leading to an 
outside exit. 

Wooden shelves lined the adjoining wall, cluttered with old paint 
cans, rags, newspapers, and rusty tools. 

Whoever lived here must have been a real handyman, Greg thought, 
examining a wooden worktable in front of the shelves. A metal vise 
was clamped to the edge of the worktable. Greg turned the handle, 
expecting the jaws of the vise to open. 

But to his surprise, as he turned the vise handle, a door just above 
the worktable popped open. Greg pulled the door all the way open, 
revealing a hidden cabinet shelf. 

Resting on the shelf was a camera. 


For a long moment, Greg just stared at the camera. 

Something told him the camera was hidden away for a reason. 

Something told him he shouldn’t touch it. He should close the 
secret door and walk away. 

But he couldn’t resist it. 

He reached onto the hidden shelf and took the camera in his 
hands. 

It pulled out easily. Then, to Greg’s surprise, the door instantly 
snapped shut with a loud bang. 

Weird, he thought, turning the camera in his hands. 

What a strange place to leave a camera. Why would someone put it 
here? If it were valuable enough to hide in a secret cabinet, why didn’t he 
take it with him? 

Greg eagerly examined the camera. It was large and surprisingly 
heavy, with a long lens. Perhaps it’s a telephoto lens, he thought. 

Greg was very interested in cameras. He had an inexpensive 
automatic camera, which took okay snapshots. But he was saving his 
allowance in hopes of buying a really good camera with a lot of 
lenses. 

He loved looking at camera magazines, studying the different 
models, picking out the ones he wanted to buy. 

Sometimes he daydreamed about traveling around the world, 
going to amazing places, mountaintops and hidden jungle rivers. He’d 
take photos of everything he saw and become a famous photographer. 

His camera at home was just too crummy. That’s why all his 
pictures came out too dark or too light, and everyone in them had 
glowing red dots in their eyes. 

Greg wondered if this camera was any good. 

Raising the viewfinder to his eye, he sighted around the room. He 
came to a stop on Michael, who was wearing two bright yellow 
feather boas and a white Stetson hat and had climbed to the top of the 
steps to pose. 

“Wait! Hold it!” Greg cried, moving closer, raising the camera to 
his eye. “Let me take your picture, Michael.” 

“Where’d you find that?” Bird asked. 

“Does that thing have film in it?” Michael demanded. 

“T don’t know,” Greg said. “Let’s see.” 

Leaning against the railing, Michael struck what he considered a 


sophisticated pose. 

Greg pointed the camera up and focused carefully. It took a short 
while for his finger to locate the shutter button. “Okay, ready? Say 
cheese.” 

“Cheddar,” Michael said, grinning down at Greg as he held his 
pose against the railing. 

“Very funny. Michael’s a riot,” Bird said sarcastically. 

Greg centered Michael in the viewfinder frame, then pressed the 
shutter button. 

The camera clicked and flashed. 

Then it made an electronic whirring sound. A slot pulled open on 
the bottom, and a cardboard square slid out. 

“Hey—it’s one of those automatic-developing cameras,” Greg 
exclaimed. He pulled the square of cardboard out and examined it. 
“Look—the picture is starting to develop.” 

“Let me see,” Michael called down, leaning on the railing. 

But before he could start down the stairs, everyone heard a loud 
crunching sound. 

They all looked up to the source of the sound—and saw the 
railing break away and Michael go sailing over the edge. 

“Noooooo!” Michael screamed as he toppled to the floor, arms 
outstretched, the feather boas flying behind him like animal tails. 

He turned in the air, then hit the concrete hard on his back, his 
eyes frozen wide in astonishment and fright. 

He bounced once. 

Then cried out again: “My ankle! Owwww! My ankle!” He grabbed 
at the injured ankle, then quickly let go with a loud gasp. It hurt too 
much to touch it. 

“Ohhh—my ankle!” 

Still holding the camera and the photo, Greg rushed to Michael. 
Shari and Bird did the same. 

“We'll go get help,” Shari told Michael, who was still on his back, 
groaning in pain. 

But then they heard the ceiling creak. 

Footsteps. Above them. 

Someone was in the house. 

Someone was approaching the basement stairs. 

They were going to be caught. 


The footsteps overhead grew louder. 

The four friends exchanged frightened glances. “We’ve got to get 
out of here,” Shari whispered. 

The ceiling creaked. 

“You can’t leave me here!” Michael protested. He pulled himself 
to a sitting position. 

“Quick—stand up,” Bird instructed. 

Michael struggled to his feet. “I can’t stand on this foot.” His face 
revealed his panic. 

“We'll help you,” Shari said, turning her eyes to Bird. “I'll take 
one arm. You take the other.” 

Bird obediently moved forward and pulled Michael’s arm around 
his shoulder. 

“Okay, let’s move!” Shari whispered, supporting Michael from the 
other side. 

“But how do we get out?” Bird asked breathlessly. 

The footsteps grew louder. The ceiling creaked under their 
weight. 

“We can’t go up the stairs,” Michael whispered, leaning on Shari 
and Bird. 

“There’s another stairway behind the furnace,” Greg told them, 
pointing. 

“It leads out?” Michael asked, wincing from his ankle pain. 

“Probably.” 

Greg led the way. “Just pray the door isn’t padlocked or 
something.” 

“Were praying. We’re praying!” Bird declared. 

“We’re outta here!” Shari said, groaning under the weight of 
Michael’s arm. 

Leaning heavily against Shari and Bird, Michael hobbled after 
Greg, and they made their way to the stairs behind the furnace. The 
stairs, they saw, led to wooden double doors up on ground level. 

“I don’t see a padlock,” Greg said warily. “Please, doors—be 
open!” 

“Hey—who’s down there?” an angry man’s voice called from 
behind them. 

“It’s—it’s Spidey!” Michael stammered. 

“Hurry!” Shari urged, giving Greg a frightened push. “Come on!” 


Greg set the camera down on the top step. Then he reached up 
and grabbed the handles of the double doors. 

“Who’s down there?” 

Spidey sounded closer, angrier. 

“The doors could be locked from the outside,” Greg whispered, 
hesitating. 

“Just push them, man!” Bird pleaded. 

Greg took a deep breath and pushed with all his strength. 

The doors didn’t budge. 

“We’re trapped,” he told them. 


“Now what?” Michael whined. 

“Try again,” Bird urged Greg. “Maybe they’re just stuck.” He slid 
out from under Michael’s arm. “Here. Pll help you.” 

Greg moved over to give Bird room to step up beside him. 
“Ready?” he asked. “One, two, three—push!” 

Both boys pushed against the heavy wooden doors with all their 
might. 

And the doors swung open. 

“Okay! Now were outta here!” Shari declared happily. 

Picking up the camera, Greg led the way out. The backyard, he 
saw, was as weed-choked and overgrown as the front. An enormous 
limb had fallen off an old oak tree, probably during a storm, and was 
lying half in the tree, half on the ground. 

Somehow, Bird and Shari managed to drag Michael up the steps 
and onto the grass. “Can you walk? Try it,” Bird said. 

Still leaning against the two of them, Michael reluctantly pushed 
his foot down on the ground. He lifted it. Then pushed it again. “Hey, 
it feels a little better,” he said, surprised. 

“Then let’s go,” Bird said. 

They ran to the overgrown hedge that edged along the side of the 
yard, Michael on his own now, stepping gingerly on the bad ankle, 
doing his best to keep up. Then, staying in the shadow of the hedge, 
they made their way around the house to the front. 

“All right!” Bird cried happily as they reached the street. “We 
made it!” 

Gasping for breath, Greg stopped at the curb and turned back 
toward the house. “Look!” he cried, pointing up to the living room 
window. 

A dark figure stood in the window, hands pressed against the 
glass. 

“It’s Spidey,” Shari said. 

“He’s just—staring at us,” Michael cried. 

“Weird,” Greg said. “Let’s go.” 


They didn’t stop till they got to Michael’s house, a sprawling redwood 
ranch-style house behind a shady front lawn. 

“How’s the ankle?” Greg asked. 

“It’s loosened up a lot. It doesn’t even hurt that much,” Michael 


said. 

“Man, you could’ve been killed!” Bird declared, wiping sweat off 
his forehead with the sleeve of his T-shirt. 

“Thanks for reminding me,” Michael said drily. 

“Lucky thing you’ve got all that extra padding,” Bird teased. 

“Shut up,” Michael muttered. 

“Well, you guys wanted adventure,” Shari said, leaning back 
against the trunk of a tree. 

“That guy Spidey is definitely weird,” Bird said, shaking his head. 

“You see the way he was staring at us?” Michael asked. “All 
dressed in black and everything? He looked like some kind of zombie 
or something.” 

“He saw us,” Greg said softly, suddenly feeling a chill of dread. 
“He saw us very clearly. We’d better stay away from there.” 

“What for?” Michael demanded. “It isn’t his house. He’s just 
sleeping there. We could call the police on him.” 

“But if he’s really crazy or something, there’s no telling what he 
might do,” Greg replied thoughtfully. 

“Aw, he’s not going to do anything,” Shari said quietly. “Spidey 
doesn’t want trouble. He just wants to be left alone.” 

“Yeah,” Michael agreed quickly. “He didn’t want us messing with 
his stuff. That’s why he yelled like that and came after us.” 

Michael was leaning over, rubbing his ankle. “Hey, where’s my 
picture?” he demanded, straightening up and turning to Greg. 

“Huh?” 

“You know. The picture you snapped. With the camera.” 

“Oh. Right.” Greg suddenly realized he still had the camera 
gripped tightly in his hand. He set it down carefully on the grass and 
reached into his back pocket. “I put it in here when we started to 
run,” he explained. 

“Well? Did it come out?” Michael demanded. 

The three of them huddled around Greg to get a view of the 
snapshot. 

“Whoa—hold on a minute!” Greg cried, staring hard at the small, 
square photo. “Something’s wrong. What’s going on here?” 


The four friends gaped at the photograph in Greg’s hand, their mouths 
dropping open in surprise. 

The camera had caught Michael in midair as he fell through the 
broken railing to the floor. 

“That’s impossible!” Shari cried. 

“You snapped the picture before I fell!” Michael declared, 
grabbing the photo out of Greg’s hand so that he could study it close 
up. “I remember it.” 

“You remembered wrong,” Bird said, moving to get another look 
at it over Michael’s shoulder. “You were falling, man. What a great 
action shot.” He picked up the camera. “This is a good camera you 
stole, Greg.” 

“I didn’t steal it—” Greg started. “I mean, I didn’t realize—” 

“I wasn’t falling!” Michael insisted, tilting the picture in his hand, 
studying it from every angle. “I was posing, remember? I had a big, 
goofy smile on my face, and I was posing.” 

“I remember the goofy smile,” Bird said, handing the camera back 
to Greg. “Do you have any other expression?” 

“You’re not funny, Bird,” Michael muttered. He pocketed the 
picture. 

“Weird,” Greg said. He glanced at his watch. “Hey—I’ve got to get 
going.” 

He said good-bye to the others and headed for home. The 
afternoon sun was lowering behind a cluster of palm trees, casting 
long, shifting shadows over the sidewalk. 

He had promised his mother he’d straighten up his room and help 
with the vacuuming before dinner. And now he was late. 

What is that strange car in the driveway? he wondered, jogging 
across the neighbor’s lawn toward his house. 

It was a navy-blue Taurus station wagon. Brand-new. 

Dad picked up our new car! he realized. 

Wow! Greg stopped to admire it. It still had the sticker glued to 
the door window. He pulled open the driver’s door, leaned in, and 
smelled the vinyl upholstery. 

Mmmmmm. That new-car smell. 

He inhaled deeply again. It smelled so good. So fresh and new. 

He closed the door hard, appreciating the solid clunk it made as it 
closed. 


What a great new car, he thought excitedly. 

He raised the camera to his eye and took a few steps back off the 
driveway. 

I’ve got to take a picture of this, he thought. To remember what the 
car was like when it was totally new. 

He backed up until he had framed the entire profile of the station 
wagon in the viewfinder. Then he pressed the shutter button. 

As before, the camera clicked loudly, the flash flashed, and with 
an electronic whirr, a square undeveloped photo of gray and yellow 
slid out of the bottom. 

Carrying the camera and the snapshot, Greg ran into the house 
through the front door. “I’m home!” he called. “Down in a minute!” 
And hurried up the carpeted stairs to his room. 

“Greg? Is that you? Your father is home,” his mother called from 
downstairs. 

“I know. Be right down. Sorry I’m late!” Greg shouted back. 

Pd better hide the camera, he decided. If Mom or Dad see it, they'll 
want to know whose it is and where I got it. And I won't be able to answer 
those questions. 

“Greg—did you see the new car? Are you coming down?” his 
mother called impatiently from the foot of the stairs. 

“I’m coming!” he yelled. 

His eyes searched frantically for a good hiding place. 

Under his bed? 

No. His mom might vacuum under there and discover it. 

Then Greg remembered the secret compartment in his headboard. 
He had discovered the compartment years ago when his parents had 
bought him a new bedroom set. Quickly, he shoved the camera in. 

Peering into the mirror above his dresser, he gave his blond hair a 
quick brush, rubbed a black soot smudge off his cheek with one hand, 
then started for the door. 

He stopped at the doorway. 

The snapshot of the car. Where had he put it? 

It took a few seconds to remember that he had tossed it onto his 
bed. Curious about how it came out, he turned back to retrieve it. 

“Oh, no!” 

He uttered a low cry as he gazed at the snapshot. 


What’s going on here? Greg wondered. 

He brought the photo up close to his face. 

This isn’t right, he thought. How can this be? 

The blue Taurus station wagon in the photo was a mess. It looked 
as if it had been in a terrible accident. The windshield was shattered. 
Metal was twisted and bent. The door on the driver’s side was caved 
in. 

The car appeared totaled! 

“This is impossible!” Greg uttered aloud. 

“Greg, where are you?” his mother called. “We’re all hungry, and 
you're keeping us waiting.” 

“Sorry,” he answered, unable to take his eyes off the snapshot. 
“Coming.” 

He shoved the photo into his top dresser drawer and made his 
way downstairs. The image of the totaled car burned in his mind. 

Just to make sure, he crossed the living room and peeked out of 
the front window to the driveway. 

There stood the station wagon, sparkling in the glow of the 
setting sun. Shiny and perfect. 

He turned and walked into the dining room, where his brother 
and his parents were already seated. “The new wagon is awesome, 
Dad,” Greg said, trying to shake the snapshot’s image from his 
thoughts. 

But he kept seeing the twisted metal, the caved-in driver’s door, 
the shattered windshield. 

“After dinner,” Greg’s dad announced happily, “I’m taking you all 
for a drive in the new car!” 


“Mmmm. This is great chicken, Mom,” Greg’s brother, Terry, said, 
chewing as he talked. 

“Thanks for the compliment,” Mrs. Banks said drily, “but it’s veal 
—not chicken.” 

Greg and his dad burst out laughing. Terry’s face grew bright red. 
“Well,” he said, still chewing, “it’s such excellent veal, it tastes as 
good as chicken!” 

“I don’t know why I bother to cook,” Mrs. Banks sighed. 

Mr. Banks changed the subject. “How are things at the Dairy 
Freeze?” he asked. 

“We ran out of vanilla this afternoon,” Terry said, forking a small 
potato and shoving it whole into his mouth. He chewed it briefly, then 
gulped it down. “People were annoyed about that.” 

“I don’t think I can go for the ride,” Greg said, staring down at his 
dinner, which he’d hardly touched. “I mean—” 

“Why not?” his father asked. 

“Well...” Greg searched his mind for a good reason. He needed to 
make one up, but his mind was a blank. 

He couldn’t tell them the truth. 

That he had taken a snapshot of Michael, and it showed Michael 
falling. Then a few seconds later, Michael had fallen. 

And now he had taken a picture of the new car. And the car was 
wrecked in the photo. 

Greg didn’t really know what it meant. But he was suddenly filled 
with this powerful feeling of dread, of fear, of... he didn’t know what. 

A kind of troubled feeling he’d never had before. 

But he couldn’t tell them any of that. It was too weird. Too crazy. 

“I... made plans to go over to Michael’s,” he lied, staring down at 
his plate. 

“Well, call him and tell him you’ll see him tomorrow,” Mr. Banks 
said, slicing his veal. “That’s no problem.” 

“Well, I’m kind of not feeling very well, either,” Greg said. 

“What’s wrong?” Mrs. Banks asked with instant concern. “Do you 
have a temperature? I thought you looked a little flushed when you 
came in.” 

“No,” Greg replied uncomfortably. “No temperature. I just feel 
kind of tired, not very hungry.” 

“Can I have your chicken—I mean, veal?” 


Terry asked eagerly. He reached his fork across the table and 
nabbed the cutlet off Greg’s plate. 

“Well, a nice ride might make you feel better,” Greg’s dad said, 
eyeing Greg suspiciously. “You know, some fresh air. You can stretch 
out in the back if you want.” 

“But, Dad—” Greg stopped. He had used up all the excuses he 
could think of. They would never believe him if he said he needed to 
stay home and do homework on a Saturday night! 

“You’re coming with us, and that’s final,” Mr. Banks said, still 
studying Greg closely. “You’ve been dying for this new wagon to 
arrive. I really don’t understand your problem.” 

Neither do I, Greg admitted to himself. 

I don’t understand it at all. Why am I so afraid of riding in the new 
car? Just because there’s something wrong with that stupid camera? 

I’m being silly, Greg thought, trying to shake away the feeling of 
dread that had taken away his appetite. 

“Okay, Dad. Great,” he said, forcing a smile. “I’ll come.” 

“Are there any more potatoes?” Terry asked. 


10 


“Its so easy to drive,” Mr. Banks said, accelerating onto the entry 
ramp to the freeway. “It handles like a small car, not like a station 
wagon.” 

“Plenty of room back here, Dad,” Terry said, scooting low in the 
backseat beside Greg, raising his knees to the back of the front seat. 

“Hey, look—there’s a drink holder that pulls out from the dash!” 
Greg’s mother exclaimed. “That’s neat.” 

“Awesome, Mom,” Terry said sarcastically. 

“Well, we never had a drink holder before,” Mrs. Banks replied. 
She turned back to the two boys. “Are your seat belts buckled? Do 
they work properly?” 

“Yeah. They’re okay,” Terry replied. 

“They checked them at the showroom before I took the car,” Mr. 
Banks said, signaling to move into the left lane. 

A truck roared by, spitting a cloud of exhaust behind it. Greg 
stared out the front window. His door window was still covered by the 
new-car sticker. 

Mr. Banks pulled off the freeway onto a nearly empty four-lane 
highway that curved toward the west. The setting sun was a red ball 
low on the horizon in a charcoal-gray sky. 

“Put the pedal to the metal, Dad,” Terry urged, sitting up and 
leaning forward. “Let’s see what this car can do.” 

Mr. Banks obediently pressed his foot on the accelerator. “The 
cruising speed seems to be about sixty,” he said. 

“Slow down,” Mrs. Banks scolded. “You know the speed limit is 
fifty-five.” 

‘Tm just testing it,” Greg’s dad said defensively. “You know. 
Making sure the transmission doesn’t slip or anything.” 

Greg stared at the glowing speedometer. They were doing seventy 
now. 

“Slow down. I mean it,” Mrs. Banks insisted. “You’re acting like a 
crazy teenager.” 

“That’s me!” Mr. Banks replied, laughing. “This is awesome!” he 
said, imitating Terry, ignoring his wife’s pleas to slow down. 

They roared past a couple of small cars in the right lane. 
Headlights of cars moving toward them were a bright white blur in 
the darkening evening. 

“Hey, Greg, you’ve been awfully quiet,” his mother said. “You 


feeling okay?” 

“Yeah. I’m okay,” Greg said softly. 

He wished his dad would slow down. He was doing seventy-five 
now. 

“What do you think, Greg?” Mr. Banks asked, steering with his 
left hand as his right hand searched the dashboard. “Where’s the light 
switch? I should turn on my headlights.” 

“The car’s great,” Greg replied, trying to sound enthusiastic. But 
he couldn’t shake away the fear, couldn’t get the photo of the mangled 
car out of his mind. 

“Where’s that stupid light switch? It’s got to be here somewhere,” 
Mr. Banks said. 

As he glanced down at the unfamiliar dashboard, the station 
wagon swerved to the left. 

“Dad—look out for that truck!” Greg screamed. 


11 


Horns blared. 

A powerful blast of air swept over the station wagon, like a giant 
ocean wave pushing it to the side. 

Mr. Banks swerved the station wagon to the right. 

The truck rumbled past. 

“Sorry,” Greg’s dad said, eyes straight ahead, slowing the car to 
sixty, fifty-five, fifty... 

“I told you to slow down,” Mrs. Banks scolded, shaking her head. 
“We could’ve been killed!” 

“I was trying to find the lights,” he explained. “Oh. Here they are. 
On the steering wheel.” He clicked on the headlights. 

“You boys okay?” Mrs. Banks asked, turning to check them out. 

“Yeah. Fine,” Terry said, sounding a little shaken. The truck 
would have hit his side of the car. 

‘Tm okay,” Greg said. “Can we go back now?” 

“Don’t you want to keep going?” Mr. Banks asked, unable to hide 
his disappointment. “I thought we’d keep going to Santa Clara. Stop 
and get some ice cream or something.” 

“Greg’s right,” Mrs. Banks said softly to her husband. “Enough for 
tonight, dear. Let’s turn around.” 

“The truck didn’t come that close,” Mr. Banks argued. But he 
obediently turned off the highway and they headed for home. 

Later, safe and sound up in his room, Greg took the photograph 
out of his dresser and examined it. There was the new station wagon, 
the driver’s side caved in, the windshield shattered. 

“Weird,” he said aloud, and placed the photo in the secret 
compartment in his headboard, where he had stashed the camera. 
“Definitely weird.” 

He pulled the camera out of its hiding place and turned it around 
in his hands. 

Ill try it one more time, he decided. 

He walked to his dresser and aimed at the mirror above it. 

Ill take a picture of myself in the mirror, he thought. 

He raised the camera, then changed his mind. That won’t work, he 
realized. The flash will reflect back and spoil the photo. 

Gripping the camera in one hand, he made his way across the hall 
to Terry’s room. His brother was at his desk, typing away on his 
computer keyboard, his face bathed in the blue light of the monitor 


screen. 

“Terry, can I take your picture?” Greg asked meekly, holding up 
the camera. 

Terry typed some more, then looked up from the screen. “Hey— 
where’d you get the camera?” 

“Uh... Shari loaned it to me,” Greg told him, thinking quickly. 
Greg didn’t like to lie. But he didn’t feel like explaining to Terry how 
he and his friends had sneaked into the Coffman house and how he 
had made off with the camera. 

“So can I take your picture?” Greg asked. 

“TIl probably break your camera,” Terry joked. 

“I think it’s already broken,” Greg told him. “That’s why I want to 
test it on you.” 

“Go ahead,” Terry said. He stuck out his tongue and crossed his 
eyes. 

Greg snapped the shutter. An undeveloped photo slid out of the 
slot in front. 

“Thanks. See you.” Greg headed to the door. 

“Hey—don’t I get to see it?” Terry called after him. 

“If it comes out,” Greg said, and hurried across the hall to his 
room. 

He sat down on the edge of the bed. Holding the photo in his lap, 
he stared at it intently as it developed. The yellows filled in first. Then 
the reds appeared, followed by shades of blue. 

“Whoa,” Greg muttered, as his brother’s face came into view. 
“There’s something definitely wrong here.” 

In the photo, Terry’s eyes weren’t crossed, and his tongue wasn’t 
sticking out. His expression was grim, frightened. He looked very 
upset. 

As the background came into focus, Greg had another surprise. 
Terry wasn’t in his room. He was outdoors. There were trees in the 
background. And a house. 

Greg stared at the house. It looked so familiar. 

Was that the house across the street from the playground? 

He took one more look at Terry’s frightened expression. Then he 
tucked the photo and the camera into his secret headboard 
compartment and carefully closed it. 

The camera must be broken, he decided, getting changed for bed. 

It was the best explanation he could come up with. 

Lying in bed, staring up at the shifting shadows on the ceiling, he 
decided not to think about it anymore. 

A broken camera wasn’t worth worrying about. 


Tuesday afternoon after school, Greg hurried to meet Shari at the 
playground to watch Bird’s Little League game. 

It was a warm fall afternoon, the sun high in a cloudless sky. The 
outfield grass had been freshly mowed and filled the air with its sharp, 
sweet smell. 

Greg crossed the grass and squinted into the bright sunlight, 
searching for Shari. Both teams were warming up on the sides of the 
diamond, yelling and laughing, the sound of balls popping into gloves 
competing with their loud voices. 

A few parents and several kids had come to watch. Some were 
standing around, some sitting in the low bleachers along the first-base 
line. 

Greg spotted Shari behind the backstop and waved to her. “Did 
you bring the camera?” she asked eagerly, running over to greet him. 

He held it up. 

“Excellent,” she exclaimed, grinning. She reached for it. 

“I think it’s broken,” Greg said, holding on to the camera. “The 
photos just don’t come out right. It’s hard to explain.” 

“Maybe it’s not the photos. Maybe it’s the photographer,” Shari 
teased. 

“Maybe Ill take a photo of you getting a knuckle sandwich,” Greg 
threatened. He raised the camera to his eye and pointed it at her. 

“Snap that, and Pll take a picture of you eating the camera,” Shari 
threatened playfully. She reached up quickly and pulled the camera 
from his hand. 

“What do you want it for, anyway?” Greg asked, making a 
halfhearted attempt to grab it back. 

Shari held it away from his outstretched hand. “I want to take 
Bird’s picture when he comes up to bat. He looks just like an ostrich at 
the plate.” 

“I heard that.” Bird appeared beside them, pretending to be 
insulted. 

He looked ridiculous in his starched white uniform. The shirt was 
too big, and the pants were too short. The cap was the only thing that 
fit. It was blue, with a silver dolphin over the bill and the words PITTS 
LANDING DOLPHINS. 

“What kind of name is Dolphins for a baseball team?” Greg asked, 
grabbing the bill and turning the cap backward on Bird’s head. 

“All the other caps were taken,” Bird answered. “We had a choice 
between the Zephyrs and the Dolphins. None of us knew what zephyrs 
were, so we picked Dolphins.” 


Shari eyed him up and down. “Maybe you guys should play in 
your street clothes.” 

“Thanks for the encouragement,” Bird replied. He spotted the 
camera and took it from her. “Hey, you brought the camera. Does it 
have film?” 

“Yeah. I think so,” Greg told him. “Let me see.” He reached for 
the camera, but Bird swung it out of his grasp. 

“Hey—are you going to share this thing, Greg?” he asked. 

“Huh? What do you mean?” Greg reached again for the camera, 
and again Bird swung it away from him. 

“I mean, we all risked our lives down in that basement getting it, 
right?” Bird said. “We should all share it.” 

“Well...” Greg hadn’t thought about it. “I guess you’re right, Bird. 
But I’m the one who found it. So—” 

Shari grabbed the camera out of Bird’s hand. “I told Greg to bring 
it so we could take your picture when you’re up.” 

“As an example of good form?” Bird asked. 

“As a bad example,” Shari said. 

“You guys are just jealous,” Bird replied, frowning, “because I’m a 
natural athlete, and you can’t cross the street without falling on your 
face.” He turned the cap back around to face the front. 

“Hey, Bird—get back here!” one of the coaches called from the 
playing field. 

“Tve got to go,” Bird said, giving them a quick wave and starting 
to trot back to his teammates. 

“No. Wait. Let me take a fast picture now,” Greg said. 

Bird stopped, turned around, and struck a pose. 

“No. Pll take it,” Shari insisted. 

She started to raise the camera to her eye, pointing it toward 
Bird. And as she raised it, Greg grabbed for it. 

“Let me take it!” 

And the camera went off. Clicked and then flashed. 

An undeveloped photo slid out. 

“Hey, why’d you do that?” Shari asked angrily. 

“Sorry,” Greg said. “I didn’t mean to—” 

She pulled the photo out and held it in her hand. Greg and Bird 
came close to watch it develop. 

“What the heck is that?” Bird cried, staring hard at the small 
square as the colors brightened and took shape. 

“Oh, wow!” Greg cried. 

The photo showed Bird sprawled unconscious on his back on the 
ground, his mouth twisted open, his neck bent at a frightening angle, 


his eyes shut tight. 


12 


“Hey—what’s with this stupid camera?” Bird asked, grabbing the 
snapshot out of Shari’s hand. He tilted it from side to side, squinting at 
it. “It’s out of focus or something.” 

“Weird,” Greg said, shaking his head. 

“Hey, Bird—get over here!” the Dolphins’ coach called. 

“Coming!” Bird handed the picture back to Shari and jogged over 
to his teammates. 

Whistles blew. The two teams stopped their practicing and trotted 
to the benches along the third-base line. 

“How did this happen?” Shari asked Greg, shielding her eyes from 
the sun with one hand, holding the photo close to her face with the 
other. “It really looks like Bird is lying on the ground, knocked out or 
something. But he was standing right in front of us.” 

“I don’t get it. I really don’t,” Greg replied thoughtfully. “The 
camera keeps doing that.” 

Carrying the camera at his side, swinging it by its slender strap, 
he followed her to a shady spot beside the bleachers. 

“Look how his neck is bent,” Shari continued. “It’s so awful.” 

“There’s something definitely wrong with the camera,” Greg said. 
He started to tell her about the snapshot he took of the new station 
wagon, and the snapshot of his brother, Terry. But she interrupted 
him before he could get the words out. 

“And that picture of Michael. It showed him falling down the 
stairs before he even fell. It’s just so strange.” 

“I know,” Greg agreed. 

“Let me see that thing,” Shari said, and pulled the camera from 
his hand. “Is there any film left?” 

“I can’t tell,” Greg admitted. “I couldn’t find a film counter or 
anything.” 

Shari examined the camera closely, rolling it over in her hands. 
“It doesn’t say anywhere. How can you tell if it’s loaded or not?” 

Greg shrugged. 

The baseball game got under way. The Dolphins were the visiting 
team. The other team, the Cardinals, jogged out to take their positions 
on the field. 

A kid in the bleachers dropped his soda can. It hit the ground and 
spilled, and the kid started to cry. An old station wagon filled with 
teenagers cruised by, its radio blaring, its horn honking. 


“Where do you put the film in?” Shari asked impatiently. 

Greg stepped closer to help her examine it. “Here, I think,” he 
said, pointing. “Doesn’t the back come off?” 

Shari fiddled with it. “No, I don’t think so. Most of these 
automatic-developing cameras load in the front.” 

She pulled at the back, but the camera wouldn’t open. She tried 
pulling off the bottom. No better luck. Turning the camera, she tried 
pulling off the lens. It wouldn’t budge. 

Greg took the camera from her. “There’s no slot or opening in the 
front.” 

“Well, what kind of camera is it, anyway?” Shari demanded. 

“Uh... let’s see.” Greg studied the front, examined the top of the 
lens, then turned the camera over and studied the back. 

He stared up at her with a surprised look on his face. “There’s no 
brand name. Nothing.” 

“How can a camera not have a name?” Shari shouted in 
exasperation. She snatched the camera away from him and examined 
it closely, squinting against the bright afternoon sunshine. 

Finally, she handed the camera back to him, defeated. “You’re 
right, Greg. No name. No words of any kind. Nothing. What a stupid 
camera,” she added angrily. 

“Whoa. Hold on,” Greg told her. “It’s not my camera, remember? 
I didn’t buy it. I took it from the Coffman house.” 

“Well, let’s at least figure out how to open it up and look inside,” 
Shari said. 

The first Dolphin batter popped up to the second baseman. The 
second batter struck out on three straight swings. The dozen or so 
spectators shouted encouragement to their team. 

The little kid who had dropped his soda continued to cry. Three 
kids rode by on bikes, waving to friends on the teams but not stopping 
to watch. 

“Tve tried and tried, but I can’t figure out how to open it,” Greg 
admitted. 

“Give it to me,” Shari said, and grabbed the camera away from 
him. “There has to be a button or something. There has to be some 
way of opening it. This is ridiculous.” 

When she couldn’t find a button or lever of any kind, she tried 
pulling the back off once again, prying it with her fingernails. Then 
she tried turning the lens, but it wouldn’t turn. 

“Pm not going to stop trying,” she said, gritting her teeth. “This 
camera has to open. It has to!” 

“Give up. You’re going to wreck it,” Greg warned, reaching for it. 

“Wreck it? How could I wreck it?” Shari demanded. “It has no 


moving parts. Nothing!” 

“This is impossible,” Greg said. 

Making a disgusted face, she handed the camera to him. “Okay, I 
give up. Check it out yourself, Greg.” 

He took the camera, started to raise it to his face, then stopped. 

Uttering a low cry of surprise, his mouth dropped open and his 
eyes gaped straight ahead. Startled, Shari turned to follow his shocked 
gaze. 

“Oh, no!” 

There on the ground, a few yards outside the first-base line, lay 
Bird. He was sprawled on his back, his neck bent at an odd and 
unnatural angle, his eyes shut tight. 


13 


“Bird!” Shari cried. 

Greg’s breath caught in his throat. He felt as if he were choking. 
“Oh!” he finally managed to cry out in a shrill, raspy voice. 

Bird didn’t move. 

Shari and Greg, running side by side at full speed, reached him 
together. 

“Bird?” Shari knelt down beside him. “Bird?” 

Bird opened one eye. “Gotcha,” he said quietly. The weird half 
smile formed on his face, and he exploded in high-pitched laughter. 

It took Shari and Greg a while to react. They both stood 
openmouthed, gaping at their laughing friend. 

Then, his heart beginning to slow to normal, Greg reached down, 
grabbed Bird with both hands, and pulled him roughly to his feet. 

“Pll hold him while you hit him,” Greg offered, holding Bird from 
behind. 

“Hey, wait—” Bird protested, struggling to squirm out of Greg’s 
grasp. 

“Good plan,” Shari said, grinning. 

“Ow! Hey—let go! Come on! Let go!” Bird protested, trying 
unsuccessfully to wrestle free. “Come on! What’s your problem? It was 
a joke, guys.” 

“Very funny,” Shari said, giving Bird a playful punch on the 
shoulder. “Yow’re a riot, Bird.” 

Bird finally freed himself with a hard tug and danced away from 
both of them. “I just wanted to show you how bogus it is to get all 
worked up about that dumb camera.” 

“But, Bird—” Greg started. 

“It’s just broken, that’s all,” Bird said, brushing blades of recently 
cut grass off his uniform pants. “You think because it showed Michael 
falling down those stairs, there’s something strange with it. But that’s 
dumb. Real dumb.” 

“I know it,” Greg replied sharply. “But how do you explain it?” 

“I told you, man. It’s wrecked. Broken. That’s it.” 

“Bird—get over here!” a voice called, and Bird’s fielder’s glove 
came flying at his head. He caught it, waved with a grin to Shari and 
Greg, and jogged to the outfield along with the other members of the 
Dolphins. 

Carrying the camera tightly in one hand, Greg led the way to the 


bleachers. He and Shari sat down on the end of the bottom bench. 

Some of the spectators had lost interest in the game already and 
had left. A few kids had taken a baseball off the field and were having 
their own game of catch behind the bleachers. Across the playground, 
four or five kids were getting a game of kickball started. 

“Bird is such a dork,” Greg said, his eyes on the game. 

“He scared me to death,” Shari exclaimed. “I really thought he 
was hurt.” 

“What a clown,” Greg muttered. 

They watched the game in silence for a while. It wasn’t terribly 
interesting. The Dolphins were losing 12-3 going into the third inning. 
None of the players were very good. 

Greg laughed as a Cardinal batter slugged a ball that sailed out to 
the field and right over Bird’s head. 

“That’s the third ball that flew over his head!” Greg cried. 

“Guess he lost it in the sun!” Shari exclaimed, joining in the 
laughter. 

They both watched Bird’s long legs storking after the ball. By the 
time he managed to catch up with it and heave it toward the 
diamond, the Cardinal had already rounded the bases and scored. 

There were loud boos from the bleachers. 

The next Cardinal batter stepped to the plate. A few more kids 
climbed down from the bleachers, having seen enough. 

“It’s so hot here in the sun,” Shari said, shielding her eyes with 
one hand. “And I’ve got lots of homework. Want to leave?” 

“I just want to see the next inning,” Greg said, watching the 
batter swing and miss. “Bird is coming up next inning. I want to stay 
and boo him.” 

“What are friends for?” Shari said sarcastically. 

It took a long while for the Dolphins to get the third out. The 
Cardinals batted around their entire order. 

Greg’s T-shirt was drenched with sweat by the time Bird came up 
to the plate in the top of the fourth. 

Despite the loud booing from Shari and Greg, Bird managed to 
punch the ball past the shortstop for a single. 

“Lucky hit!” Greg yelled, cupping his hands into a megaphone. 

Bird pretended not to hear him. He tossed away his batter’s 
helmet, adjusted his cap, and took a short lead off first base. 

The next batter swung at the first pitch and fouled it off. 

“Let’s go,” Shari urged, pulling Greg’s arm. “It’s too hot. I’m dying 
of thirst.” 

“Let’s just see if Bird—” 


Greg didn’t finish his sentence. 

The batter hit the next ball hard. It made a loud thunk as it left 
the bat. 

A dozen people—players and spectators—cried out as the ball 
flew across the diamond, a sharp line drive, and slammed into the side 
of Bird’s head with another thunk. 

Greg watched in horror as the ball bounced off Bird and dribbled 
away onto the infield grass. Bird’s eyes went wide with disbelief, 
confusion. 

He stood frozen in place on the base path for a long moment. 

Then both of his hands shot up above his head, and he uttered a 
shrill cry, long and loud, like the high-pitched whinny of a horse. 

His eyes rolled up in his head. He sank to his knees and uttered 
another cry, softer this time. Then he collapsed, sprawling onto his 
back, his neck at an unnatural angle, his eyes closed. 

He didn’t move. 


14 


In seconds, the two coaches and both teams were running out to the 
fallen player, huddling over him, forming a tight, hushed circle 
around him. 

Crying “Bird! Bird!” Shari leaped off the bleachers and began 
running to the circle of horrified onlookers. 

Greg started to follow but stopped when he saw a familiar figure 
crossing the street at a full run, waving to him. 

“Terry!” Greg cried. 

Why was his brother coming to the playground? Why wasn’t he at 
his after-school job at the Dairy Freeze? 

“Terry? What’s happening?” Greg cried. 

Terry stopped, gasping for breath, sweat pouring down his bright 
red forehead. “I... ran... all... the... way,” he managed to utter. 

“Terry, what’s wrong?” A sick feeling crept up from Greg’s 
stomach. 

As Terry approached, his face held the same frightened expression 
as in the photograph Greg had snapped of him. 

The same frightened expression. With the same house behind him 
across the street. 

The snapshot had come true. Just as the snapshot of Bird lying on 
the ground had come true. 

Greg’s throat suddenly felt as dry as cotton. He realized that his 
knees were trembling. 

“Terry, what is it?” he managed to cry. 

“It’s Dad,” Terry said, putting a heavy hand on Greg’s shoulder. 

“Huh? Dad?” 

“You’ve got to come home, Greg. Dad—he’s been in a bad 
accident.” 

“An accident?” Greg’s head spun. Terry’s words weren’t making 
any sense to him. 

“In the new car,” Terry explained, again placing a heavy hand on 
Greg’s trembling shoulder. “The new car is totaled. Completely 
totaled.” 

“Oh,” Greg gasped, feeling weak. 

Terry squeezed his shoulder. “Come on. Hurry.” 

Holding the camera tightly in one hand, Greg began running after 
his brother. 

Reaching the street, he turned back to the playground to see what 


was happening with Bird. 

A large crowd was still huddled around Bird, blocking him from 
sight. 

But—what was that dark shadow behind the bleachers? Greg 
wondered. 

Someone—someone all in black—was hiding back there. 

Watching Greg? 

“Come on!” Terry urged. 

Greg stared hard at the bleachers. The dark figure pulled back out 
of sight. 

“Come on, Greg!” 

‘Tm coming!” Greg shouted, and followed his brother toward 
home. 


15 


The hospital walls were pale green. The uniforms worn by the nurses 
scurrying through the brightly lit corridors were white. The floor tiles 
beneath Greg’s feet, as he hurried with his brother toward their 
father’s room, were dark brown with orange specks. 

Colors. 

All Greg could see were blurs of colors, indistinct shapes. 

His sneakers thudded noisily against the hard tile floor. He could 
barely hear them over the pounding of his heart. 

Totaled. The car had been totaled. 

Just like in the snapshot. 

Greg and Terry turned a corner. The walls in this corridor were 
pale yellow. Terry’s cheeks were red. Two doctors passed by wearing 
lime-green surgical gowns. 

Colors. Only colors. 

Greg blinked, tried to see clearly. But it was all passing by too 
fast, all too unreal. Even the sharp hospital smell, that unique aroma 
of rubbing alcohol, stale food, and disinfectant, couldn’t make it real 
for him. 

Then the two brothers entered their father’s room, and it all 
became real. 

The colors faded. The images became sharp and clear. 

Their mother jumped up from the folding chair beside the bed. 
“Hi, boys.” She clenched a wadded-up tissue in her hand. It was 
obvious that she had been crying. She forced a tight smile on her face, 
but her eyes were red-rimmed, her cheeks pale and puffy. 

Stopping just inside the doorway of the small room, Greg 
returned his mother’s greeting in a soft, choked voice. Then his eyes, 
focusing clearly now, turned to his father. 

Mr. Banks had a mummylike bandage covering his hair. One arm 
was in a cast. The other lay at his side and had a tube attached just 
above the wrist, dripping a dark liquid into the arm. The bedsheet was 
pulled up to his chest. 

“Hey—how’s it going, guys?” their father asked. His voice 
sounded fogged in, as if coming from far away. 

“Dad—” Terry started. 

“He’s going to be okay,” Mrs. Banks interrupted, seeing the 
frightened looks on her sons’ faces. 

“I feel great,” Mr. Banks said groggily. 


“You don’t look so great,” Greg blurted out, stepping up 
cautiously to the bed. 

“Pm okay. Really,” their father insisted. “A few broken bones. 
That’s it.” He sighed, then winced from pain. “I guess I’m lucky.” 

“You’re very lucky,” Mrs. Banks agreed quickly. 

What’s the lucky part? Greg wondered silently to himself. He 
couldn’t take his eyes off the tube stuck into his father’s arm. 

Again, he thought of the snapshot of the car. It was up in his 
room at home, tucked into the secret compartment in his headboard. 

The snapshot showing the car totaled, the driver’s side caved in. 

Should he tell them about it? 

He couldn’t decide. 

Would they believe him if he did tell them? 

“What'd you break, Dad?” Terry asked, sitting down on the 
radiator in front of the windowsill, shoving his hands into his jeans 
pockets. 

“Your father broke his arm and a few ribs,” Mrs. Banks answered 
quickly. “And he had a slight concussion. The doctors are watching 
him for internal injuries. But so far, so good.” 

“I was lucky,” Mr. Banks repeated. He smiled at Greg. 

“Dad, I have to tell you about this photo I took,” Greg said 
suddenly, speaking rapidly, his voice trembling with nervousness. “I 
took a picture of the new car, and—” 

“The car is completely wrecked,” Mrs. Banks interrupted. Sitting 
on the edge of the folding chair, she rubbed her fingers, working her 
wedding ring around and around, something she always did when she 
was nervous. “I’m glad you boys didn’t see it.” Her voice caught in her 
throat. Then she added, “It’s a miracle he wasn’t hurt any worse.” 

“This photo—” Greg started again. 

“Later,” his mother said brusquely. “Okay?” She gave him a 
meaningful stare. 

Greg felt his face grow hot. 

This is important, he thought. 

Then he decided they probably wouldn’t believe him, anyway. 
Who would believe such a crazy story? 

“Will we be able to get another new car?” Terry asked. 

Mr. Banks nodded carefully. “I have to call the insurance 
company,” he said. 

“PIL call them when I get home,” Mrs. Banks said. “You don’t 
exactly have a hand free.” 

Everyone laughed at that, nervous laughter. 

“I feel kind of sleepy,” Mr. Banks said. His eyes were halfway 


closed, his voice muffled. 

“Its the painkillers the doctors gave you,” Mrs. Banks told him. 
She leaned forward and patted his hand. “Get some sleep. I’ll come 
back in a few hours.” 

She stood up, still fiddling with her wedding band, and motioned 
with her head toward the door. 

“Bye, Dad,” Greg and Terry said in unison. 

Their father muttered a reply. They followed their mother out the 
door. 

“What happened?” Terry asked, as they made their way past a 
nurses’ station, then down the long, pale yellow corridor. “I mean, the 
accident.” 

“Some guy ran right through a red light,” Mrs. Banks said, her 
red-rimmed eyes focused straight ahead. “He plowed right into your 
father’s side of the car. Said his brakes weren’t working.” She shook 
her head, tears forming in the corners of her eyes. “I don’t know,” she 
said, sighing. “I just don’t know what to say. Thank goodness he’s 
going to be okay.” 

They turned into the green corridor, walking side by side. Several 
people were waiting patiently for the elevator at the far end of the 
hall. 

Once again, Greg found himself thinking of the snapshots he had 
taken with the weird camera. 

First Michael. Then Terry. Then Bird. Then his father. 

All four photos had shown something terrible. Something terrible 
that hadn’t happened yet. 

And then all four photos had come true. 

Greg felt a chill as the elevator doors opened and the small crowd 
of people moved forward to squeeze inside. 

What’s the truth about the camera? he wondered. 

Does the camera show the future? 

Or does it actually cause bad things to happen? 


16 


“Yeah. I know Bird’s okay,” Greg said into the phone receiver. “I saw 
him yesterday, remember? He was lucky. Real lucky. He didn’t have a 
concussion or anything.” 

On the other end of the line—in the house next door—Shari 
agreed, then repeated her request. 

“No, Shari. I really don’t want to,” Greg replied vehemently. 

“Bring it,” Shari demanded. “It’s my birthday.” 

“I don’t want to bring the camera. It’s not a good idea. Really,” 
Greg told her. 

It was the next weekend. Saturday afternoon. Greg had been 
nearly out the door, on his way to Shari’s birthday party, when the 
phone rang. 

“Hi, Greg. Why aren’t you on your way to my party?” Shari had 
asked when he’d run to pick up the receiver. 

“Because I’m on the phone with you,” Greg had replied drily. 

“Well, bring the camera, okay?” 

Greg hadn’t looked at the camera, hadn’t removed it from its 
hiding place since his father’s accident. 

“I don’t want to bring it,” he insisted, despite Shari’s high-pitched 
demands. “Don’t you understand, Shari? I don’t want anyone else to 
get hurt.” 

“Oh, Greg,” she said, talking to him as if he were a three-year-old. 
“You don’t really believe that, do you? You don’t really believe that 
camera can hurt people.” 

Greg was silent for a moment. “I don’t know what I believe,” he 
said finally. “I only know that first, Michael, then, Bird—” 

Greg swallowed hard. “And I had a dream, Shari. Last night.” 

“Huh? What kind of dream?” Shari asked impatiently. 

“It was about the camera. I was taking everyone’s picture. My 
whole family—Mom, Dad, and Terry. They were barbecuing. In the 
backyard. I held up the camera. I kept saying, ‘Say cheese, say cheese,’ 
over and over. And when I looked through the viewfinder, they were 
smiling back at me—but... they were skeletons. All of them. Their skin 
was gone, and—and...” 

Greg’s voice trailed off. 

“What a dumb dream,” Shari said, laughing. 

“But that’s why I don’t want to bring the camera,” Greg insisted. 
“T think—” 


“Bring it, Greg,” she interrupted. “It’s not your camera, you know. 
All four of us were in the Coffman house. It belongs to all four of us. 
Bring it.” 

“But why, Shari?” Greg demanded. 

“Tt’ll be a goof, that’s all. It takes such weird pictures.” 

“That’s for sure,” Greg muttered. 

“We don’t have anything else to do for my party,” Shari told him. 
“T wanted to rent a video, but my mom says we have to go outdoors. 
She doesn’t want her precious house messed up. So I thought we could 
take everyone’s picture with the weird camera. You know. See what 
strange things come out.” 

“Shari, I really don’t—” 

“Bring it,” she ordered. And hung up. 

Greg stood for a long time staring at the phone receiver, thinking 
hard, trying to decide what to do. 

Then he replaced the receiver and headed reluctantly up to his 
room. 

With a loud sigh, he pulled the camera from its hiding place in his 
headboard. “It’s Shari’s birthday, after all,” he said aloud to himself. 

His hands were trembling as he picked it up. He realized he was 
afraid of it. 

I shouldn’t be doing this, he thought, feeling a heavy knot of dread 
in the pit of his stomach. 

I know I shouldn’t be doing this. 


17 


“How’s it going, Bird?” Greg called, making his way across the 
flagstone patio to Shari’s backyard. 

“Tm feeling okay,” Bird said, slapping his friend a high five. “The 
only problem is, ever since that ball hit me,” Bird continued, 
frowning, “from time to time I start—pluuccck cluuuck cluuuuck!— 
clucking like a chicken!” He flapped his arms and started strutting 
across the backyard, clucking at the top of his voice. 

“Hey, Bird—go lay an egg!” someone yelled, and everyone 
laughed. 

“Bird’s at it again,” Michael said, shaking his head. He gave Greg 
a friendly punch on the shoulder. Michael, his red hair unbrushed as 
usual, was wearing faded jeans and a flowered Hawaiian sports shirt 
about three sizes too big for him. 

“Where’d you get that shirt?” Greg asked, holding Michael at 
arm’s length by the shoulders to admire it. 

“In a cereal box,” Bird chimed in, still flapping his arms. 

“My grandmother gave it to me,” Michael said, frowning. 

“He made it in home ec,” Bird interrupted. One joke was never 
enough. 

“But why did you wear it?” Greg asked. 

Michael shrugged. “Everything else was dirty.” 

Bird bent down, picked up a small clump of dirt from the lawn, 
and rubbed it on the back of Michael’s shirt. “Now this one’s dirty, 
too,” he declared. 

“Hey, you—” Michael reacted with playful anger, grabbing Bird 
and shoving him into the hedge. 

“Did you bring it?” 

Hearing Shari’s voice, Greg turned toward the house and saw her 
jogging across the patio in his direction. Her black hair was pulled 
back in a single braid, and she had on an oversized silky yellow top 
that came down over black spandex leggings. 

“Did you bring it?” she repeated eagerly. A charm bracelet filled 
with tiny silver charms—a birthday present—jangled at her wrist. 

“Yeah.” Greg reluctantly held up the camera. 

“Excellent,” she declared. 

“I really don’t want—” Greg started. 

“You can take my picture first since it’s my birthday,” Shari 
interrupted. “Here. How’s this?” She struck a sophisticated pose, 


leaning against a tree with her hand behind her head. 

Greg obediently raised the camera. “Are you sure you want to do 
this, Shari?” 

“Yeah. Come on. I want to take everyone’s picture.” 

“But it'll probably come out weird,” Greg protested. 

“I know,” Shari replied impatiently, holding her pose. “That’s the 
fun of it.” 

“But, Shari—” 

“Michael puked on his shirt,” he heard Bird telling someone near 
the hedge. 

“T did not!” Michael was screaming. 

“You mean it looks like that naturally?” Bird, asked. 

Greg could hear a lot of raucous laughing, all of it at Michael’s 
expense. 

“Will you take the picture?” Shari cried, holding on to the slender 
trunk of the tree. 

Greg pointed the lens at her and pressed the button. The camera 
whirred, and the undeveloped white square rolled out. 

“Hey, are we the only boys invited?” Michael asked, stepping up 
to Shari. 

“Yeah. Just you three,” Shari said. “And nine girls.” 

“Oh, wow.” Michael made a face. 

“Take Michael’s picture next,” Shari told Greg. 

“No way!” Michael replied quickly, raising his hands as if to 
shield himself and backing away. “The last time you took my picture 
with that thing, I fell down the stairs.” 

Trying to get away, Michael backed right into Nina Blake, one of 
Shari’s friends. She reacted with a squeal of surprise, then gave him a 
playful shove, and he kept right on backing away. 

“Michael, come on. It’s my party,” Shari called. 

“What are we going to do? Is this it?” Nina demanded from 
halfway across the yard. 

“I thought we’d take everyone’s picture and then play a game or 
something,” Shari told her. 

“A game?” Bird chimed in. “You mean like Spin the Bottle?” 

A few kids laughed. 

“Truth or Dare!” Nina suggested. 

“Yeah. Truth or Dare!” a couple of other girls called in agreement. 

“Oh, no,” Greg groaned quietly to himself. Truth or Dare meant a 
lot of kissing and awkward, embarrassing stunts. 

Nine girls and only three boys. 

It was going to be really embarrassing. 


How could Shari do this to us? he wondered. 
“Well, did it come out?” Shari asked, grabbing his arm. “Let me 
see.” 

Greg was so upset about having to play Truth or Dare, he had 
forgotten about the snapshot developing in his hand. He held it up, 
and they both examined it. 

“Where am I?” Shari asked in surprise. “What were you aiming 
at? You missed me!” 

“Huh?” Greg stared at the snapshot. There was the tree. But no 
Shari. “Weird! I pointed it right at you. I lined it up carefully,” he 
protested. 

“Well, you missed me. I’m not in the shot,” Shari replied 
disgustedly. 

“But, Shari—” 

“I mean, come on—I’m not invisible, Greg. I’m not a vampire or 
something. I can see my reflection in mirrors. And I do usually show 
up in photos.” 

“But, look—” Greg stared hard at the photograph. “There’s the 
tree you were leaning against. You can see the tree trunk clearly. And 
there’s the spot where you were standing.” 

“But where am I?” Shari demanded, jangling her charm bracelet 
noisily. “Never mind.” She grabbed the snapshot from him and tossed 
it on the grass. “Take another one. Quick.” 

“Well, okay. But—” Greg was still puzzling over the photo. Why 
hadn’t Shari shown up in it? He bent down, picked it up, and shoved 
it into his pocket. 

“Stand closer this time,” she instructed. 

Greg moved a few steps closer, carefully centered Shari in the 
viewfinder, and snapped the picture. A square of film zipped out the 
front. 

Shari walked over and pulled the picture from the camera. “This 
one better turn out,” she said, staring hard at it as the colors began to 
darken and take form. 

“If you really want pictures of everyone, we should get another 
camera,” Greg said, his eyes also locked on the snapshot. 

“Hey—I don’t believe it!” Shari cried. 

Again, she was invisible. 

The tree photographed clearly, in perfect focus. But Shari was 
nowhere to be seen. 

“You were right. The dumb camera is broken,” she said 
disgustedly, handing the photo to Greg. “Forget it.” She turned away 
from him and called to the others. “Hey, guys—Truth or Dare!” 

There were some cheers and some groans. 


Shari headed them back to the woods behind her backyard to 
play. “More privacy,” she explained. There was a circular clearing just 
beyond the trees, a perfect, private place. 

The game was just as embarrassing as Greg had imagined. Among 
the boys, only Bird seemed to be enjoying it. Bird loves dumb stuff like 
this, Greg thought with some envy. 

Luckily, after little more than half an hour, he heard Mrs. Walker, 
Shari’s mom, calling from the house, summoning them back to cut the 
birthday cake. 

“Aw, too bad,” Greg said sarcastically. “Just when the game was 
getting good.” 

“We have to get out of the woods, anyway,” Bird said, grinning. 
“Michael’s shirt is scaring the squirrels.” 

Laughing and talking about the game, the kids made their way 
back to the patio, where the pink-and-white birthday cake, candles all 
lit, was waiting on the round umbrella table. 

“I must be a pretty bad mom,” Mrs. Walker joked, “allowing you 
all to go off into the woods by yourselves.” 

Some of the girls laughed. 

Cake knife in her hand, Mrs. Walker looked around. “Where’s 
Shari?” 

Everyone turned their eyes to search the backyard. “She was with 
us in the woods,” Nina told Mrs. Walker. “Just a minute ago.” 

“Hey, Shari!” Bird called, cupping his hands to his mouth as a 
megaphone. “Earth calling Shari! It’s cake time!” 

No reply. 

No sign of her. 

“Did she go in the house?” Greg asked. 

Mrs. Walker shook her head. “No. She didn’t come by the patio. Is 
she still in the woods?” 

“PIL go check,” Bird told her. Calling Shari’s name, he ran to the 
edge of the trees at the back of the yard. Then he disappeared into the 
trees, still calling. 

A few minutes later, Bird emerged, signaling to the others with a 
shrug. 

No sign of her. 

They searched the house. The front yard. The woods again. 

But Shari had vanished. 


18 


Greg sat in the shade with his back against the tree trunk, the camera 
on the ground at his side, and watched the blue-uniformed policemen. 

They covered the backyard and could be seen bending low as 
they searched around in the woods. He could hear their voices but 
couldn’t make out what they were saying. Their faces were intent, 
bewildered. 

More policemen arrived, grim-faced, businesslike. 

And then, even more blue-uniformed policemen. 

Mrs. Walker had called her husband home from a golf game. They 
sat huddled together on canvas chairs in a corner of the patio. They 
whispered to each other, their eyes darting across the yard. Holding 
hands, they looked pale and worried. 

Everyone else had left. 

On the patio, the table was still set. The birthday candles had 
burned all the way down, the blue-and-red wax melting in hard 
puddles on the pink-and-white icing, the cake untouched. 

“No sign of her,” a red-cheeked policeman with a white-blond 
mustache was telling the Walkers. He pulled off his cap and scratched 
his head, revealing short blond hair. 

“Did someone... take her away?” Mr. Walker asked, still holding 
his wife’s hand. 

“No sign of a struggle,” the policeman said. “No sign of anything, 
really.” 

Mrs. Walker sighed loudly and lowered her head. “I just don’t 
understand it.” 

There was a long, painful silence. 

“We’ll keep looking,” the policeman said. “I’m sure we’ll find... 
something.” 

He turned and headed toward the woods. 

“Oh. Hi.” He stopped in front of Greg, staring down at him as if 
seeing him for the first time. “You still here, son? All the other guests 
have gone home.” He pushed his hair back and replaced his cap. 

“Yeah, I know,” Greg replied solemnly, lifting the camera into his 
lap. 

“Pm Officer Riddick,” he said. 

“Yeah, I know,” Greg repeated softly. 

“How come you didn’t go home after we talked with you, like the 
others?” Officer Riddick asked. 


“I’m just upset, I guess,” Greg told him. “I mean, Shari’s a good 
friend, you know?” He cleared his throat, which felt dry and tight. 
“Besides, I live right over there.” He gestured with his head to his 
house next door. 

“Well, you might as well go home, son,” Officer Riddick said, 
turning his eyes to the woods with a frown. “This search could take a 
long time. We haven’t found a thing back there yet.” 

“I know,” Greg replied, rubbing his hand against the back of the 
camera. 

And I know that this camera is the reason Shari is missing, he 
thought, feeling miserable and frightened. 

“One minute she was there. The next minute she was gone,” the 
policeman said, studying Greg’s face as if looking for answers there. 

“Yeah,” Greg replied. “It’s so weird.” 

It’s weirder than anyone knows, Greg thought. 

The camera made her invisible. The camera did it. 

First, she vanished from the snapshot. 

Then she vanished in real life. 

The camera did it to her. I don’t know how. But it did. 

“Do you have something more to tell me?” Officer Riddick asked, 
hands resting on his hips, his right hand just above the worn brown 
holster that carried his pistol. “Did you see something? Something that 
might give us a clue, help us out? Something you didn’t remember to 
tell me before?” 

Should I tell him? Greg wondered. 

If I tell him about the camera, he’ll ask where I got it. And I'll have to 
tell him that I got it in the Coffman house. And we'll all get in trouble for 
breaking in there. 

But—big deal. Shari is missing. Gone. Vanished. That’s a lot more 
important. 

I should tell him, Greg decided. 

But then he hesitated. If I tell him, he won’t believe me. 

If I tell him, how will it help bring Shari back? 

“You look very troubled,” Officer Riddick said, squatting down 
next to Greg in the shade. “What’s your name again?” 

“Greg. Greg Banks.” 

“Well, you look very troubled, Greg,” the policeman repeated 
softly. “Why don’t you tell me what’s bothering you? Why don’t you 
tell me what’s on your mind? I think it’ll make you feel a lot better.” 

Greg took a deep breath and glanced up to the patio. Mrs. Walker 
had covered her face with her hands. Her husband was leaning over 
her, trying to comfort her. 

“Well...” Greg started. 


“Go ahead, son,” Officer Riddick urged softly. “Do you know 
where Shari is?” 

“It’s this camera,” Greg blurted out. He suddenly could feel the 
blood throbbing against his temples. 

He took a deep breath and then continued. “You see, this camera 
is weird.” 

“What do you mean?” Officer Riddick asked quietly. 

Greg took another deep breath. “I took Shari’s picture. Before. 
When I first arrived. I took two pictures. And she was invisible. In 
both of them. See?” 

Officer Riddick closed his eyes, then opened them. “No. I don’t 
understand.” 

“Shari was invisible in the picture. Everything else was there. But 
she wasn’t. She had vanished, see? And then later, she vanished for 
real. The camera—it predicts the future, I guess. Or it makes bad 
things happen.” Greg raised the camera, attempting to hand it to the 
policeman. 

Officer Riddick made no attempt to take it. He just stared hard at 
Greg, his eyes narrowing, his expression hardening. 

Greg felt a sudden stab of fear. 

Oh, no, he thought. Why is he looking at me like that? What is he 
going to do? 


19 


Greg continued to hold the camera out to the policeman. 

But Officer Riddick quickly climbed to his feet. “The camera 
makes bad things happen?” His eyes burned into Greg’s. 

“Yes,” Greg told him. “It isn’t my camera, see? And every time I 
take a picture—” 

“Son, that’s enough,” Officer Riddick said gently. He reached 
down and rested a hand on Greg’s trembling shoulder. “I think you’re 
very upset, Greg,” he said, his voice almost a whisper. “I don’t blame 
you. This is very upsetting for everyone.” 

“But it’s tue—” Greg started to insist. 

“I’m going to ask that policeman over there,” Officer Riddick said, 
pointing, “to take you home now. And I’m going to have him tell your 
parents that you’ve been through a very frightening experience.” 

I knew he wouldn’t believe me, Greg thought angrily. 

How could I have been so stupid? 

Now he thinks I’m some kind of a nutcase. 

Officer Riddick called to a policeman at the side of the house near 
the hedge. 

“No, that’s okay,” Greg said, quickly pulling himself up, cradling 
the camera in his hand. “I can make it home okay.” 

Officer Riddick eyed him suspiciously. “You sure?” 

“Yeah. I can walk by myself.” 

“If you have anything to tell me later,” Officer Riddick said, 
lowering his gaze to the camera, “just call the station, okay?” 

“Okay,” Greg replied, walking slowly toward the front of the 
house. 

“Don’t worry, Greg. We’ll do our best,” Officer Riddick called 
after him. “We’ll find her. Put the camera away and try to get some 
rest, okay?” 

“Okay,” Greg muttered. 

He hurried past the Walkers, who were still huddled together 
under the umbrella on the patio. 

Why was I so stupid? he asked himself as he walked home. Why 
did I expect that policeman to believe such a weird story? 

I’m not even sure I believe it myself. 

A few minutes later, he pulled open the back screen door and 
entered his kitchen. “Anybody home?” 

No reply. 


He headed through the back hall toward the living room. 
“Anyone home?” 

No one. 

Terry was at work. His mother must have been visiting his dad at 
the hospital. 

Greg felt bad. He really didn’t feel like being alone now. He really 
wanted to tell them about what had happened to Shari. He really 
wanted to talk to them. 

Still cradling the camera, he climbed the stairs to his room. 

He stopped in the doorway, blinked twice, then uttered a cry of 
horror. 

His books were scattered all over the floor. The covers had been 
pulled off his bed. His desk drawers were all open, their contents 
strewn around the room. The desk lamp was on its side on the floor. 
All of his clothes had been pulled from the dresser and his closet and 
tossed everywhere. 

Someone had been in Greg’s room—and had turned it upside 
down! 


20 


Who would do this? Greg asked himself, staring in horror at his 
ransacked room. 

Who would tear my room apart like this? 

He realized that he knew the answer. He knew who would do it, 
who had done it. 

Someone looking for the camera. 

Someone desperate to get the camera back. 

Spidey? 

The creepy guy who dressed all in black was living in the 
Coffman house. Was he the owner of the camera? 

Yes, Greg knew, Spidey had done it. 

Spidey had been watching Greg, spying on Greg from behind the 
bleachers at the Little League game. 

He knew that Greg had his camera. And he knew where Greg lived. 

That thought was the most chilling of all. 

He knew where Greg lived. 

Greg turned away from the chaos in his room, leaned against the 
wall of the hallway, and closed his eyes. 

He pictured Spidey, the dark figure creeping along so evilly on his 
spindly legs. He pictured him inside the house, Greg’s house. Inside 
Greg’s room. 

He was here, thought Greg. He pawed through all my things. He 
wrecked my room. 

Greg stepped back into his room. He felt all mixed up. He felt like 
shouting angrily and crying for help all at once. 

But he was all alone. No one to hear him. No one to help him. 

What now? he wondered. What now? 

Suddenly, leaning against the doorframe, staring at his ransacked 
room, he knew what he had to do. 


21 


“Hey, Bird, it’s me.” 

Greg held the receiver in one hand and wiped the sweat off his 
forehead with the other. He’d never worked so hard—or so fast—in all 
his life. 

“Did they find Shari?” Bird asked eagerly. 

“I haven’t heard. I don’t think so,” Greg said, his eyes surveying 
his room. Almost back to normal. 

He had put everything back, cleaned and straightened. His 
parents would never guess. 

“Listen, Bird, Pm not calling about that,” Greg said, speaking 
rapidly into the phone. “Call Michael for me, okay? Meet me at the 
playground. By the baseball diamond.” 

“When? Now?” Bird asked, sounding confused. 

“Yeah,” Greg told him. “We have to meet. It’s important.” 

“It’s almost dinnertime,” Bird protested. “I don’t know if my 
parents—” 

“Its important,” Greg repeated impatiently. “I’ve got to see you 
guys. Okay?” 

“Well... maybe I can sneak out for a few minutes,” Bird said, 
lowering his voice. And then Greg heard him shout to his mother: “It’s 
no one, Ma! I’m talking to no one!” 

Boy, that’s quick thinking! Greg thought sarcastically. He’s a worse 
liar than I am! 

And then he heard Bird call to his mom: “I know I’m on the 
phone. But I’m not talking to anyone. It’s only Greg.” 

Thanks a lot, pal, Greg thought. 

“I gotta go,” Bird said. 

“Get Michael, okay?” Greg urged. 

“Yeah. Okay. See you.” He hung up. 

Greg replaced the receiver, then listened for his mother. Silence 
downstairs. She still wasn’t home. She didn’t know about Shari, Greg 
realized. He knew she and his dad were going to be very upset. 

Very upset. 

Almost as upset as he was. 

Thinking about his missing friend, he went to his bedroom 
window and looked down on her yard next door. It was deserted now. 

The policemen had all left. Shari’s shaken parents must have gone 
inside. 


A squirrel sat under the wide shade of the big tree, gnawing 
furiously at an acorn, another acorn at his feet. 

In the corner of the window, Greg could see the birthday cake, 
still sitting forlornly on the deserted table, the places all set, the 
decorations still standing. 

A birthday party for ghosts. 

Greg shuddered. 

“Shari is alive,” he said aloud. “They’ll find her. She’s alive.” 

He knew what he had to do now. 

Forcing himself away from the window, he hurried to meet his 
two friends. 


22 


“No way,” Bird said heatedly, leaning against the bleacher bench. 
“Have you gone totally bananas?” 

Swinging the camera by its cord, Greg turned hopefully to 
Michael. But Michael avoided Greg’s stare. “I’m with Bird,” he said, 
his eyes on the camera. 

Since it was just about dinnertime, the playground was nearly 
deserted. A few little kids were on the swings at the other end. Two 
kids were riding their bikes around and around the soccer field. 

“I thought maybe you guys would come with me,” Greg said, 
disappointed. He kicked up a clump of grass with his sneaker. “I have 
to return this thing,” he continued, raising the camera. “I know it’s 
what I have to do. I have to put it back where I found it.” 

“No way,” Bird repeated, shaking his head. “I’m not going back to 
the Coffman house. Once was enough.” 

“Chicken?” Greg asked angrily. 

“Yeah,” Bird quickly admitted. 

“You don’t have to take it back,” Michael argued. He pulled 
himself up the side of the bleachers, climbed onto the third deck of 
seats, then lowered himself to the ground. 

“What do you mean?” Greg asked impatiently, kicking at the 
grass. 

“Just toss it, Greg,” Michael urged, making a throwing motion 
with one hand. “Heave it. Throw it in the trash somewhere.” 

“Yeah. Or leave it right here,” Bird suggested. He reached for the 
camera. “Give it to me. I’ll hide it under the seats.” 

“You don’t understand,” Greg said, swinging the camera out of 
Bird’s reach. “Throwing it away won’t do any good.” 

“Why not?” Bird asked, making another swipe for the camera. 

“Spidey’ll just come back for it,” Greg told him heatedly. “He’ll 
come back to my room looking for it. He’ll come after me. I know it.” 

“But what if we get caught taking it back?” Michael asked. 

“Yeah. What if Spidey’s there in the Coffman house, and he 
catches us?” Bird said. 

“You don’t understand,” Greg cried. “He knows where I live! He 
was in my house. He was in my room! He wants his camera back, and 

“Here. Give it to me,” Bird said. “We don’t have to go back to that 
house. He can find it. Right here.” 


He grabbed again for the camera. 

Greg held tightly to the strap and tried to tug it away. 

But Bird grabbed the side of the camera. 

“No!” Greg cried out as it flashed. And whirred. 

A square of film slid out. 

“No!” Greg cried to Bird, horrified, staring at the white square as 
it started to develop. “You took my picture!” 

His hand trembling, he pulled the snapshot from the camera. 

What would it show? 


23 


“Sorry,” Bird said. “I didn’t mean to—” 

Before he could finish his sentence, a voice interrupted from 
behind the bleachers. “Hey—what’ve you got there?” 

Greg looked up from the developing snapshot in surprise. Two 
tough-looking boys stepped out of the shadows, their expressions 
hard, their eyes on the camera. 

He recognized them immediately—Joey Ferris and Mickey Ward 
—two ninth-graders who hung out together, always swaggering 
around, acting tough, picking on kids younger than them. 

Their specialty was taking kids’ bikes, riding off on them, and 
dumping them somewhere. There was a rumor around school that 
Mickey had once beaten up a kid so badly that the kid was crippled 
for life. But Greg believed Mickey made up that rumor and spread it 
himself. 

Both boys were big for their age. Neither of them did very well in 
school. And even though they were always stealing bikes and 
skateboards, and terrorizing little kids, and getting into fights, neither 
of them ever seemed to get into serious trouble. 

Joey had short blond hair, slicked straight up, and wore a 
diamondlike stud in one ear. Mickey had a round, red face full of 
pimples, stringy black hair down to his shoulders, and was working a 
toothpick between his teeth. Both boys were wearing heavy-metal T- 
shirts and jeans. 

“Hey, lve gotta get home,” Bird said quickly, half stepping, half 
dancing away from the bleachers. 

“Me, too,” Michael said, unable to keep the fear from showing on 
his face. 

Greg tucked the snapshot into his jeans pocket. 

“Hey, you found my camera,” Joey said, grabbing it out of Greg’s 
hand. His small gray eyes burned into Greg’s as if searching for a 
reaction. “Thanks, man.” 

“Give it back, Joey,” Greg said with a sigh. 

“Yeah. Don’t take that camera,” Mickey told his friend, a smile 
spreading over his round face. “It’s mine!” He wrestled the camera 
away from Joey. 

“Give it back,” Greg insisted angrily, reaching out his hand. Then 
he softened his tone. “Come on, guys. It isn’t mine.” 

“I know it isn’t yours,” Mickey said, grinning. “Because it’s mine!” 

“I have to give it back to the owner,” Greg told him, trying not to 


whine but hearing his voice edge up. 

“No, you don’t. I’m the owner now,” Mickey insisted. 

“Haven’t you ever heard of finders keepers?” Joey asked, leaning 
over Greg menacingly. He was about six inches taller than Greg and a 
lot more muscular. 

“Hey, let him have the thing,” Michael whispered in Greg’s ear. 
“You wanted to get rid of it—right?” 

“No!” Greg protested. 

“What’s your problem, Freckle Face?” Joey asked Michael, eyeing 
him up and down. 

“No problem,” Michael said meekly. 

“Hey—say cheese!” Mickey aimed the camera at Joey. 

“Don’t do it,” Bird interrupted, waving his hands frantically. 

“Why not?” Joey demanded. 

“Because your face will break the camera,” Bird said, laughing. 

“You’re real funny,” Joey said sarcastically, narrowing his eyes 
threateningly, hardening his features. “You want that stupid smile to 
be permanent?” He raised a big fist. 

“I know this kid,” Mickey told Joey, pointing at Bird. “Thinks he’s 
hot stuff.” 

Both boys stared hard at Bird, trying to scare him. 

Bird swallowed hard. He took a step back, bumping into the 
bleachers. “No, I don’t,” he said softly. “I don’t think Pm hot stuff.” 

“He looks like something I stepped in yesterday,” Joey said. 

He and Mickey cracked up, laughing high-pitched hyena laughs 
and slapping each other high fives. 

“Listen, guys. I really need the camera back,” Greg said, reaching 
out a hand to take it. “It isn’t any good, anyway. It’s broken. And it 
doesn’t belong to me.” 

“Yeah, that’s right. It’s broken,” Michael added, nodding his head. 

“Yeah. Right,” Mickey said sarcastically. “Let’s just see.” He raised 
the camera again and pointed it at Joey. 

“Really, guys. I need it back,” Greg said desperately. 

If they took a picture with the camera, Greg realized, they might 
discover its secret. That its snapshots showed the future, showed only 
bad things happening to people. That the camera was evil. Maybe it 
even caused evil. 

“Say cheese,” Mickey instructed Joey. 

“Just snap the stupid thing!” Joey replied impatiently. 

No, Greg thought. I can’t let this happen. I’ve got to return the 
camera to the Coffman house, to Spidey. 

Impulsively, Greg leaped forward. With a cry, he snatched the 


camera away from Mickey’s face. 

“Hey—” Mickey reacted in surprise. 

“Let’s go!” Greg shouted to Bird and Michael. 

And without another word, the three friends turned and began 
running across the deserted playground toward their homes. 

His heart thudding in his chest, Greg gripped the camera tightly 
and ran as fast as he could, his sneakers pounding over the dry grass. 

They’re going to catch us, Greg thought, panting loudly now as he 
raced toward the street. They’re going to catch us and pound us. They’re 
going to take back the camera. We’re dead meat. Dead meat. 

Greg and his friends didn’t turn around until they were across the 
street. Breathing noisily, they looked back—and cried out in relieved 
surprise. 

Joey and Mickey hadn’t budged from beside the bleachers. They 
hadn’t chased after them. They were leaning against the bleachers, 
laughing. 

“Catch you later, guys!” Joey called after them. 

“Yeah. Later,” Mickey repeated. 

They both burst out laughing again, as if they had said something 
hilarious. 

“That was close,” Michael said, still breathing hard. 

“They mean it,” Bird said, looking very troubled. “They'll catch us 
later. We’re history.” 

“Tough talk. They’re just a lot of hot air,” Greg insisted. 

“Oh, yeah?” Michael cried. “Then why did we run like that?” 

“Because we’re late for dinner,” Bird joked. “See you guys. I’m 
gonna catch it if I don’t hurry.” 

“But the camera—” Greg protested, still gripping it tightly in one 
hand. 

“It’s too late, 
through his red hair. 

“Yeah. We’ll have to do it tomorrow or something,” Bird agreed. 

“Then you guys will come with me?” Greg asked eagerly. 

“Uh... ’ve gotta go,” Bird said without answering. 

“Me, too,” Michael said quickly, avoiding Greg’s stare. 

All three of them turned their eyes back to the playground. Joey 
and Mickey had disappeared. Probably off to terrorize some other 
kids. 

“Later,” Bird said, slapping Greg on the shoulder as he headed 
away. The three friends split up, running in different directions across 
lawns and driveways, heading home. 

Greg had run all the way to his front yard before he remembered 


2) 


Michael said, nervously raking a hand back 


the snapshot he had shoved into his jeans pocket. 

He stopped in the driveway and pulled it out. 

The sun was lowering behind the garage. He held the snapshot up 
close to his face to see it clearly. 

“Oh, no!” he cried. “I don’t believe it!” 


24 


“This is impossible!” Greg cried aloud, gaping at the snapshot in his 
trembling hand. 

How had Shari gotten into the photo? 

It had been taken a few minutes before, in front of the bleachers 
on the playground. 

But there was Shari, standing close beside Greg. 

His hand trembling, his mouth hanging open in disbelief, Greg 
goggled at the photo. 

It was very clear, very sharp. There they were on the playground. 
He could see the baseball diamond in the background. 

And there they were. Greg and Shari. 

Shari standing so clear, so sharp—right next to him. 

And they were both staring straight ahead, their eyes wide, their 
mouths open, their expressions frozen in horror as a large shadow 
covered them both. 

“Shari?” Greg cried, lowering the snapshot and darting his eyes 
over the front yard. “Are you here? Can you hear me?” 

He listened. 

Silence. 

He tried again. 

“Shari? Are you here?” 

“Greg!” a voice called. 

Uttering a startled cry, Greg spun around. “Huh?” 

“Greg!” the voice repeated. It took him a while to realize that it 
was his mother, calling to him from the front door. 

“Oh. Hi, Mom.” Feeling dazed, he slid the snapshot back into his 
jeans pocket. 

“Where’ve you been?” his mother asked as he made his way to 
the door. “I heard about Shari. ’ve been so upset. I didn’t know where 
you were.” 

“Sorry, Mom,” Greg said, kissing her on the cheek. “I—I should’ve 
left a note.” 

He stepped into the house, feeling strange and out of sorts, sad 
and confused and frightened, all at the same time. 


Two days later, on a day of high gray clouds, the air hot and smoggy, 
Greg paced back and forth in his room after school. 
The house was empty except for him. Terry had gone off a few 


hours before to his after-school job at the Dairy Freeze. Mrs. Banks 
had driven to the hospital to pick up Greg’s dad, who was finally 
coming home. 

Greg knew he should be happy about his dad’s return. But there 
were still too many things troubling him, tugging at his mind. 

Frightening him. 

For one thing, Shari still hadn’t been found. 

The police were completely baffled. Their new theory was that 
she’d been kidnapped. 

Her frantic, grieving parents waited home by the phone. But no 
kidnappers called to demand a ransom. 

There were no clues of any kind. 

Nothing to do but wait. And hope. 

As time passed, Greg felt more and more guilty. He was sure Shari 
hadn’t been kidnapped. He knew that somehow, the camera had made 
her disappear. 

But he couldn’t tell anyone else what he believed. 

No one would believe him. Anyone he tried to tell the story to 
would think he was crazy. 

Cameras can’t be evil, after all. 

Cameras can’t make people fall down stairs. Or crash their cars. 

Or vanish from sight. 

Cameras can only record what they see. 

Greg stared out of his window, pressing his forehead against the 
glass, looking down on Shari’s backyard. “Shari—where are you?” he 
asked aloud, staring at the tree where she had posed. 

The camera was still hidden in the secret compartment in his 
headboard. Neither Bird nor Michael would agree to help Greg return 
it to the Coffman house. 

Besides, Greg had decided to hold on to it a while longer, in case 
he needed it as proof. 

In case he decided to confide his fears about it to someone. 

In case... 

His other fear was that Spidey would come back, back to Greg’s 
room, back for the camera. 

So much to be frightened about. 

He pushed himself away from the window. He had spent so much 
time in the past couple of days staring down at Shari’s empty 
backyard. 

Thinking. Thinking. 

With a sigh, he reached into the headboard and pulled out two of 
the snapshots he had hidden in there along with the camera. 


The two snapshots were the ones taken the past Saturday at 
Shari’s birthday party. Holding one in each hand, Greg stared at them, 
hoping he could see something new, something he hadn’t noticed 
before. 

But the photos hadn’t changed. They still showed her tree, her 
backyard, green in the sunlight. And no Shari. No one where Shari 
had been standing. As if the lens had penetrated right through her. 

Staring at the photos, Greg let out a cry of anguish. 

If only he had never gone into the Coffman house. 

If only he had never stolen the camera. 

If only he had never taken any photos with it. 

If only... if only... if only... 

Before he realized what he was doing, he was ripping the two 
snapshots into tiny pieces. 

Panting loudly, his chest heaving, he tore up the snapshots and let 
the pieces fall to the floor. 

When he had ripped them both into tiny shards of paper, he flung 
himself facedown on his bed and closed his eyes, waiting for his heart 
to stop pounding, waiting for the heavy feeling of guilt and horror to 
lift. 

Two hours later, the phone by his bed rang. 

It was Shari. 


25 


“Shari—is it really you?” Greg shouted into the phone. 

“Yeah. It’s me!” She sounded as surprised as he did. 

“But how? I mean—” His mind was racing. He didn’t know what 
to say. 

“Your guess is as good as mine,” Shari told him. And then she 
said, “Hold on a minute.” And he heard her step away from the phone 
to talk to her mother. “Mom—stop crying already. Mom—it’s really 
me. I’m home.” 

A few seconds later, she came back on the line. “I’ve been home 
for two hours, and Mom’s still crying and carrying on.” 

“I feel like crying, too,” Greg admitted. “I—I just can’t believe it! 
Shari, where were you?” 

The line was silent for a long moment. “I don’t know,” she 
answered finally. 

“Huh?” 

“T really don’t. It was just so weird, Greg. One minute, there I was 
at my birthday party. The next minute, I was standing in front of my 
house. And it was two days later. But I don’t remember being away. 
Or being anywhere else. I don’t remember anything at all.” 

“You don’t remember going away? Or coming back?” Greg asked. 

“No. Nothing,” Shari said, her voice trembling. 

“Shari, those pictures I took of you—remember? With the weird 
camera? You were invisible in them—” 

“And then I disappeared,” she said, finishing his thought. 

“Shari, do you think—?” 

“I don’t know,” she replied quickly. “I—I have to get off now. The 
police are here. They want to question me. What am I going to tell 
them? They’re going to think I had amnesia or flipped out or 
something.” 

“J—I don’t know,” Greg said, completely bewildered. “We have to 
talk. The camera—” 

“T can’t now,” she told him. “Maybe tomorrow. Okay?” She called 
to her mother that she was coming. “Bye, Greg. See you.” And then 
she hung up. 

Greg replaced the receiver but sat on the edge of his bed staring 
at the phone for a long time. 

Shari was back. 

She’d been back about two hours. 


Two hours. Two hours. Two hours. 

He turned his eyes to the clock radio beside the phone. 

Just two hours before, he had ripped up the two snapshots of an 
invisible Shari. 

His mind whirred with wild ideas, insane ideas. 

Had he brought Shari back by ripping up the photos? 

Did this mean that the camera caused her to disappear? That the 
camera caused all of the terrible things that showed up in its 
snapshots? 

Greg stared at the phone for a long time, thinking hard. 

He knew what he had to do. He had to talk to Shari. And he had 
to return the camera. 


He met Shari on the playground the next afternoon. The sun floated 
high in a cloudless sky. Eight or nine kids were engaged in a noisy 
brawl of a soccer game, running one way, then the other across the 
outfield of the baseball diamond. 

“Hey—you look like you!” Greg exclaimed as Shari came jogging 
up to where he stood beside the bleachers. He pinched her arm. 
“Yeah. It’s you, okay.” 

She didn’t smile. “I feel fine,” she told him, rubbing her arm. 
“Just confused. And tired. The police asked me questions for hours. 
And when they finally went away, my parents started in.” 

“Sorry,” Greg said quietly, staring down at his sneakers. 

“I think Mom and Dad believe somehow it’s my fault that I 
disappeared,” Shari said, resting her back against the side of the 
bleachers, shaking her head. 

“It’s the camera’s fault,” Greg muttered. He raised his eyes to 
hers. “The camera is evil.” 

Shari shrugged. “Maybe. I don’t know what to think. I really 
don’t.” 

He showed her the snapshot, the one showing the two of them on 
the playground staring in horror as a shadow crept over them. 

“How weird,” Shari exclaimed, studying it hard. 

“I want to take the camera back to the Coffman house,” Greg said 
heatedly. “I can go home and get it now. Will you help me? Will you 
come with me?” 

Shari started to reply but stopped. 

They both saw the dark shadow move, sliding toward them 
quickly, silently, over the grass. 

And then they saw the man dressed all in black, his spindly legs 
pumping hard as he came at them. 

Spidey! 


Greg grabbed Shari’s hand, frozen in fear. 
He and Shari gaped in terror as Spidey’s slithering shadow crept 
over them. 


26 


Greg had a shudder of recognition. He knew the snapshot had just 
come true. 

As the dark figure of Spidey moved toward them like a black 
tarantula, Greg pulled Shari’s hand. “Run!” he cried in a shrill voice 
he didn’t recognize. 

He didn’t have to say it. They were both running now, gasping as 
they ran across the grass toward the street. Their sneakers thudded 
loudly on the ground as they reached the sidewalk and kept running. 

Greg turned to see Spidey closing the gap. “He’s catching up!” he 
managed to cry to Shari, who was a few steps ahead of him. 

Spidey, his face still hidden in the shadows of his black baseball 
cap, moved with startling speed, his long legs kicking high as he 
pursued them. 

“He’s going to catch us!” Greg cried, feeling as if his chest were 
about to burst. “He’s... too... fast!” 

Spidey moved even closer, his shadow scuttling over the grass. 

Closer. 

When the car horn honked, Greg screamed. 

He and Shari stopped short. 

The horn blasted out again. 

Greg turned to see a familiar young man inside a small 
hatchback. It was Jerry Norman, who lived across the street. Jerry 
lowered his car window. “Is this man chasing you?” he asked 
excitedly. Without waiting for an answer, he backed the car toward 
Spidey. “I’m calling the cops, mister!” 

Spidey didn’t reply. Instead, he turned and darted across the 
street. 

“I’m warning you—” Jerry called after him. 

But Spidey had disappeared behind a tall hedge. 

“Are you kids okay?” Greg’s neighbor demanded. 

“Yeah. Fine,” Greg managed to reply, still breathing hard, his 
chest heaving. 

“We’re okay. Thanks, Jerry,” Shari said. 

“Tve seen that guy around the neighborhood,” the young man 
said, staring through the windshield at the tall hedge. “Never thought 
he was dangerous. You kids want me to call the police?” 

“No. It’s okay,” Greg replied. 

As soon as I give him back his camera, he’ll stop chasing us, Greg 


thought. 

“Well, be careful—okay?” Jerry said. “You need a lift home or 
anything?” He studied their faces as if trying to determine how 
frightened and upset they were. 

Greg and Shari both shook their heads. “We’ll be okay,” Greg 
said. “Thanks.” 

Jerry warned them once again to be careful, then drove off, his 
tires squealing as he turned the corner. 

“That was close,” Shari said, her eyes on the hedge. “Why was 
Spidey chasing us?” 

“He thought I had the camera. He wants it back,” Greg told her. 
“Meet me tomorrow, okay? In front of the Coffman house. Help me 
put it back?” 

Shari stared at him without replying, her expression thoughtful, 
wary. 

“Were going to be in danger—all of us—until we put that camera 
back,” Greg insisted. 

“Okay,” Shari said quietly. “Tomorrow.” 


27 


Something scurried through the tall weeds of the unmowed front 
lawn. “What was that?” Shari cried, whispering even though no one 
else was in sight. “It was too big to be a squirrel.” 

She lingered behind Greg, who stopped to look up at the Coffman 
house. “Maybe it was a raccoon or something,” Greg told her. He 
gripped the camera tightly in both hands. 

It was a little after three o’clock the next afternoon, a hazy, 
overcast day. Mountains of dark clouds threatening rain were rolling 
across the sky, stretching behind the house, casting it in shadow. 

“It’s going to storm,” Shari said, staying close behind Greg. “Let’s 
get this over with and go home.” 

“Good idea,” he said, glancing up at the heavy sky. 

Thunder rumbled in the distance, a low roar. 

The old trees that dotted the front yard whispered and shook. 

“We can’t just run inside,” Greg told her, watching the sky 
darken. “First we have to make sure Spidey isn’t there.” 

Making their way quickly through the tall grass and weeds, they 
stopped at the living room window and peered in. Thunder rumbled, 
low and long, in the distance. Greg thought he saw another creature 
scuttle through the weeds around the corner of the house. 

“Its too dark in there. I can’t see a thing,” Shari complained. 

“Let’s check out the basement,” Greg suggested. “That’s where 
Spidey hangs out, remember?” 

The sky darkened to an eerie gray-green as they made their way 
to the back of the house and dropped to their knees to peer down 
through the basement windows at ground level. 

Squinting through the dust-covered window-panes, they could see 
the makeshift plywood table, the wardrobe against the wall, its doors 
still open, the colorful old clothing spilling out, the empty frozen food 
boxes scattered on the floor. 

“No sign of him,” Greg whispered, cradling the camera in his arm 
as if it might try to escape from him if he didn’t hold it tightly. “Let’s 
get moving.” 

“Are—are you sure?” Shari stammered. She wanted to be brave. 
But the thought that she had disappeared for two days—completely 
vanished, most likely because of the camera—that frightening thought 
lingered in her mind. 

Michael and Bird were chicken, she thought. But maybe they were 
the smart ones. 


She wished this were over. All over. 

A few seconds later, Greg and Shari pushed open the front door. 
They stepped into the darkness of the front hall. And stopped. 

And listened. 

And then they both jumped at the sound of the loud, sudden 
crash directly behind them. 


28 


Shari was the first to regain her voice. “It’s just the door!” she cried. 
“The wind—” 

A gust of wind had made the front door slam. 

“Let’s get this over with,” Greg whispered, badly shaken. 

“We never should’ve broken into this house in the first place,” 
Shari whispered as they made their way on tiptoe, step by creaking 
step, down the dark hallway toward the basement stairs. 

“Its a little late for that,” Greg replied sharply. 

Pulling open the door to the basement steps, he stopped again. 
“What’s that banging sound upstairs?” 

Shari’s features tightened in fear as she heard it, too, a repeated, 
almost rhythmic banging. 

“Shutters?” Greg suggested. 

“Yeah,” she quickly agreed, breathing a sigh of relief. “A lot of the 
shutters are loose, remember?” 

The entire house seemed to groan. 

Thunder rumbled outside, closer now. 

They stepped onto the landing, then waited for their eyes to 
adjust to the darkness. 

“Couldn’t we just leave the camera up here and run?” Shari 
asked, more of a plea than a question. 

“No. I want to put it back,” Greg insisted. 

“But, Greg—” She tugged at his arm as he started down the stairs. 

“No!” He pulled out of her grasp. “He was in my room, Shari! He 
tore everything apart, looking for it. I want him to find it where it 
belongs. If he doesn’t find it, he’ll come back to my house. I know he 
will!” 

“Okay, okay. Let’s just hurry.” 

It was brighter in the basement, gray light seeping down from the 
four ground-level windows. Outside, the wind swirled and pushed 
against the windowpanes. A pale flash of lightning made shadows 
flicker against the basement wall. The old house groaned as if 
unhappy about the storm. 

“What was that? Footsteps?” Shari stopped halfway across the 
basement and listened. 

“It’s just the house,” Greg insisted. But his quavering voice 
revealed that he was as frightened as his companion, and he stopped 
to listen, too. 


Bang. Bang. Bang. 

The shutter high above them continued its rhythmic pounding. 

“Where did you find the camera, anyway?” Shari whispered, 
following Greg to the far wall across from the enormous furnace with 
its cobwebbed ducts sprouting up like pale tree limbs. 

“Over here,” Greg told her. He stepped up to the worktable and 
reached for the vise clamped on the edge. “When I turned the vise, a 
door opened up. Some kind of hidden shelf. That’s where the camera 


He cranked the handle of the vise. 

Once again, the door to the secret shelf popped open. 

“Good,” he whispered excitedly. He flashed Shari a smile. 

He shoved the camera onto the shelf, tucking the carrying strap 
under it. Then he pushed the door closed. “We’re out of here.” 

He felt so much better. So relieved. So much lighter. 

The house groaned and creaked. Greg didn’t care. 

Another flash of lightning, brighter this time, like a camera flash, 
sent shadows flickering on the wall. 

“Come on,” he whispered. But Shari was already ahead of him, 
making her way carefully over the food cartons strewn everywhere, 
hurrying toward the steps. 

They were halfway up the stairs, Greg one step behind Shari, 
when, above them, Spidey stepped silently into view on the landing, 
blocking their escape. 


29 


Greg blinked and shook his head, as if he could shake away the image 
of the figure that stared darkly down at him. 

“No!” Shari cried out, and fell back against Greg. 

He grabbed for the railing, forgetting that it had fallen under 
Michael’s weight during their first unfortunate visit to the house. 
Luckily, Shari regained her balance before toppling them both down 
the stairs. 

Lightning flashed behind them, sending a flash of white light 
across the stairway. But the unmoving figure on the landing above 
them remained shrouded in darkness. 

“Let us go!” Greg finally managed to cry, finding his voice. 

“Yeah. We returned your camera!” Shari added, sounding shrill 
and frightened. 

Spidey didn’t reply. Instead, he took a step toward them, onto the 
first step. And then he descended another step. 

Nearly stumbling again, Greg and Shari backed down to the 
basement floor. 

The wooden stairs squeaked in protest as the dark figure stepped 
slowly, steadily, down. As he reached the basement floor, a crackling 
bolt of lightning cast a blue light over him, and Greg and Shari saw 
his face for the first time. 

In the brief flash of color, they saw that he was old, older than 
they had imagined. That his eyes were small and round like dark 
marbles. That his mouth was small, too, pursed in a tight, menacing 
grimace. 

“We returned the camera,” Shari said, staring in fear as Spidey 
crept closer. “Can’t we go now? Please?” 

“Let me see,” Spidey said. His voice was younger than his face, 
warmer than his eyes. “Come.” 

They hesitated. But he gave them no choice. 

Ushering them back across the cluttered floor to the worktable, he 
wrapped his large, spidery hand over the vise and turned the handle. 
The door opened. He pulled out the camera and held it close to his 
face to examine it. 

“You shouldn’t have taken it,” he told them, speaking softly, 
turning the camera in his hands. 

“We’re sorry,” Shari said quickly. 

“Can we go now?” Greg asked, edging toward the stairs. 


“Its not an ordinary camera,” Spidey said, raising his small eyes 
to them. 

“We know,” Greg blurted out. “The pictures it took. They—” 

Spidey’s eyes grew wide, his expression angry. “You took pictures 
with it?” 

“Just a few,” Greg told him, wishing he had kept his mouth shut. 
“They didn’t come out. Really.” 

“You know about the camera, then,” Spidey said, moving quickly 
to the center of the floor. 

Was he trying to block their escape? Greg wondered. 

“It’s broken or something,” Greg said uncertainly, shoving his 
hands into his jeans pockets. 

“Its not broken,” the tall, dark figure said softly. “It’s evil.” He 
motioned toward the low plywood table. “Sit there.” 

Shari and Greg exchanged glances. Then, reluctantly, they sat 
down on the edge of the board, sitting stiffly, nervously, their eyes 
darting toward the stairway, toward escape. 

“The camera is evil,” Spidey repeated, standing over them, 
holding the camera in both hands. “I should know. I helped to create 
it.” 

“Youre an inventor?” Greg asked, glancing at Shari, who was 
nervously tugging at a strand of her black hair. 

‘Tm a scientist,” Spidey replied. “Or, I should say, I was a 
scientist. My name is Fredericks. Dr. Fritz Fredericks.” He transferred 
the camera from one hand to the other. “My lab partner invented this 
camera. It was his pride and joy. More than that, it would have made 
him a fortune. Would have, I say.” He paused, a thoughtful expression 
sinking over his face. 

“What happened to him? Did he die?” Shari asked, still fiddling 
with the strand of hair. 

Dr. Fredericks snickered. “No. Worse. I stole the invention from 
him. I stole the plans and the camera. I was evil, you see. I was young 
and greedy. So very greedy. And I wasn’t above stealing to make my 
fortune.” 

He paused, eyeing them both as if waiting for them to say 
something, to offer their disapproval of him, perhaps. But when Greg 
and Shari remained silent, staring up at him from the low plywood 
table, he continued his story. 

“When I stole the camera, it caught my partner by surprise. 
Unfortunately, from then on, all of the surprises were mine.” A 
strange, sad smile twisted across his aged face. “My partner, you see, 
was much more evil than I was.” 

Dr. Fredericks coughed into his hand, then began to pace in front 


of Greg and Shari as he talked, speaking softly, slowly, as if 
remembering the story for the first time in a long while. 

“My partner was a true evil one. He dabbled in the dark arts. I 
should correct myself. He didn’t just dabble. He was quite a master of 
it all.” 

He held up the camera, waving it above his head, then lowering 
it. “My partner put a curse on the camera. If he couldn’t profit from it, 
he wanted to make sure that I never would, either. And so he put a 
curse on it.” 

He turned his gaze on Greg, leaning over him. “Do you know 
about how some primitive peoples fear the camera? They fear the 
camera because they believe that if it takes their picture, it will steal 
their soul.” He patted the camera. “Well, this camera really does steal 
souls.” 

Staring up at the camera, Greg shuddered. 

The camera had stolen Shari away. 

Would it have stolen all of their souls? 

“People have died because of this camera,” Dr. Fredericks said, 
uttering a slow, sad sigh. “People close to me. That is how I came to 
learn of the curse, to learn of the camera’s evil. And then I learned 
something just as frightening—the camera cannot be destroyed.” 

He coughed, cleared his throat noisily, and began to pace in front 
of them again. “And so I vowed to keep the camera a secret. To keep it 
away from people so it cannot do its evil. I lost my job. My family. I 
lost everything because of it. But Iam determined to keep the camera 
where it can do no harm.” 

He stopped pacing, with his back toward them. He stood silently, 
shoulders hunched, lost in thought. 

Greg quickly climbed to his feet and motioned for Shari to do the 
same. “Well... uh... I guess it’s good we returned it,” he said 
hesitantly. “Sorry we caused so much trouble.” 

“Yeah, we’re very sorry,” Shari repeated sincerely. “Guess it’s 
back in the right hands.” 

“Good-bye,” Greg said, starting toward the steps. “It’s getting late, 
and we—” 

“No!” Dr. Fredericks shouted, startling them both. He moved 
quickly to block the way. “I’m afraid you can’t go. You know too 
much.” 


30 


“T can never let you leave,” Dr. Fredericks said, his face flickering in 
the blue glow of a lightning flash. He crossed his bony arms in front of 
his black sweatshirt. 

“But we won’t tell anyone,” Greg said, his voice rising until the 
words became a plea. “Really.” 

“Your secret is good with us,” Shari insisted, her frightened eyes 
on Greg. 

Dr. Fredericks stared at them menacingly but didn’t reply. 

“You can trust us,” Greg said, his voice quavering. He cast a 
frightened glance at Shari. 

“Besides,” Shari said, “even if we did tell anyone, who would 
believe us?” 

“Enough talk,” Dr. Fredericks snapped. “It won’t do you any good. 
I’ve worked too long and too hard to keep the camera a secret.” 

A rush of wind pushed against the windows, sending up a low 
howl. The wind carried a drumroll of rain. The sky through the 
basement windows was as black as night. 

“You—can’t keep us here forever!” Shari cried, unable to keep the 
growing terror from her voice. 

The rain pounded against the windows now, a steady downpour. 

Dr. Fredericks drew himself up straight, seemed to grow taller. 
His tiny eyes burned into Shari’s. “I’m so sorry,” he said, his voice a 
whisper of regret. “So sorry. But I have no choice.” 

He took another step toward them. 

Greg and Shari exchanged frightened glances. From where they 
stood, in front of the low plywood table in the center of the basement, 
the steps seemed a hundred miles away. 

“Wh-what are you going to do?” Greg cried, shouting over a burst 
of thunder that rattled the basement windows. 

“Please!” Shari begged. “Don’t!” 

Dr. Fredericks moved forward with surprising speed. Holding the 
camera in one hand, he grabbed Greg’s shoulder with the other. 

“No!” Greg screamed. “Let go!” 

“Let go of him!” Shari screamed. 

She suddenly realized that both of Dr. Fredericks’ hands were 
occupied. 

This may be my only chance, she thought. 

She took a deep breath and lunged forward. 


Dr. Fredericks’ eyes bulged, and he cried out in surprise as Shari 
grabbed the camera with both hands and pulled it away from him. He 
made a frantic grab for the camera, and Greg burst free. 

Before the desperate man could take another step, Shari raised 
the camera to her eye and pointed the lens at him. 

“Please—no! Don’t push the button!” the old man cried. 

He lurched forward, his eyes wild, and grabbed the camera with 
both hands. 

Greg stared in horror as Shari and Dr. Fredericks grappled, both 
holding on to the camera, each trying desperately to wrestle it away 
from the other. 

FLASH! 

The bright burst of light startled them all. 

Shari grabbed the camera. “Run!” she screamed. 


31 


The basement became a whirring blur of grays and blacks as Greg 
hurtled himself toward the stairs. 

He and Shari ran side by side, slipping over the food cartons, 
jumping over tin cans and empty bottles. 

Rain thundered against the windows. The wind howled, pushing 
against the glass. They could hear Dr. Fredericks’ anguished screams 
behind them. 

“Did it take our picture or his?” Shari asked. 

“I don’t know. Just hurry!” Greg screamed. 

The old man was howling like a wounded animal, his cries 
competing with the rain and wind pushing at the windows. 

The stairs weren’t that far away. But it seemed to take forever to 
reach them. 

Forever. 

Forever, Greg thought. Dr. Fredericks wanted to keep Shari and me 
down there forever. 

Panting loudly, they both reached the dark stairway. A deafening 
clap of thunder made them stop and turn around. 

“Huh?” Greg cried aloud. 

To his shock, Dr. Fredericks hadn’t chased after them. 

And his anguished cries had stopped. 

The basement was silent. 

“What’s going on?” Shari cried breathlessly. 

Squinting back into the darkness, it took Greg a while to realize 
that the dark, rumpled form lying on the floor in front of the 
worktable was Dr. Fredericks. 

“What happened?” Shari cried, her chest heaving as she struggled 
to catch her breath. Still clinging to the camera strap, she gaped in 
surprise at the old man’s still body, sprawled on its back on the floor. 

“I don’t know,” Greg replied in a breathless whisper. 

Reluctantly, Greg started back toward Dr. Fredericks. Following 
close behind, Shari uttered a low cry of horror when she clearly saw 
the fallen man’s face. 

Eyes bulged out, the mouth open in a twisted O of terror, the face 
stared up at them. Frozen. Dead. 

Dr. Fredericks was dead. 

“What—happened?” Shari finally managed to say, swallowing 
hard, forcing herself to turn away from the ghastly, tortured face. 


“I think he died of fright,” Greg replied, squeezing her shoulder 
and not even realizing it. 

“Huh? Fright?” 

“He knew better than anyone what the camera could do,” Greg 
said. “When you snapped his picture, I think... I think it scared him to 
death!” 

“I only wanted to throw him off guard,” Shari cried. “I only 
wanted to give us a chance to escape. I didn’t think—” 

“The picture,” Greg interrupted. “Let’s see the picture.” 

Shari raised the camera. The photo was still half inside the 
camera. Greg pulled it out with a trembling hand. He held it up so 
they could both see it. 

“Wow,” he exclaimed quietly. “Wow.” 

The photo showed Dr. Fredericks lying on the floor, his eyes 
bulging, his mouth frozen open in horror. 

Dr. Fredericks’ fright, Greg realized—the fright that had killed 
him—was there, frozen on film, frozen on his face. 

The camera had claimed another victim. This time forever. 

“What do we do now?” Shari asked, staring down at the figure 
sprawled at their feet. 

“First, Pm putting this camera back,” Greg said, taking it from her 
and shoving it back on its shelf. He turned the vise handle, and the 
door to the secret compartment closed. 

Greg breathed a sigh of relief. Hiding the dreadful camera away 
made him feel so much better. 

“Now, let’s go home and call the police,” he said. 


Two days later, a cool, bright day with a gentle breeze rustling the 
trees, the four friends stopped at the curb, leaning on their bikes, and 
stared up at the Coffman house. Even in bright sunlight, the old trees 
that surrounded the house covered it in shade. 

“So you didn’t tell the police about the camera?” Bird asked, 
staring up at the dark, empty front window. 

“No. They wouldn’t believe it,” Greg told him. “Besides, the 
camera should stay locked up forever. Forever! I hope no one ever 
finds out about it.” 

“We told the police we ran into the house to get out of the rain,” 
Shari added. “And we said we started to explore while we waited for 
the storm to blow over. And we found the body in the basement.” 

“What did Spidey die of?” Michael asked, gazing up at the house. 

“The police said it was heart failure,” Greg told him. “But we 
know the truth.” 

“Wow. I can’t believe one old camera could do so much evil,” 


Bird said. 

“I believe it,” Greg said quietly. 

“Let’s get out of here,” Michael urged. He raised his sneakers to 
the pedals and started to roll away. “This place really creeps me out.” 

The other three followed, pedaling away in thoughtful silence. 

They had turned the corner and were heading up the next block 
when two figures emerged from the back door of the Coffman house. 
Joey Ferris and Mickey Ward stepped over the weed-choked lawn 
onto the driveway. 

“Those jerks aren’t too bright,” Joey told his companion. “They 
never even saw us the other day. Never saw us watching them 
through the basement window.” 

Mickey laughed. “Yeah. They’re jerks.” 

“They couldn’t hide this camera from us. No way, man,” Joey 
said. He raised the camera and examined it. 

“Take my picture,” Mickey demanded. “Come on. Let’s try it out.” 

“Yeah. Okay.” Joey raised the viewfinder to his eye. “Say cheese.” 

A click. A flash. A whirring sound. 

Joey pulled the snapshot from the camera, and both boys eagerly 
huddled around it, waiting to see what developed. 


Scanning, formatting and 
proofing by Undead. 

Skip to main content
 
Texts
 
Video
 
Audio
 
Software
 
Images
My uploads
My loans
My favorites
My lists
My collections
My web archives
Account settings
Get help
Log out
 Search metadata
 Search text contents
 Search TV news captions
 Search radio transcripts
 Search archived web sites
Advanced Search
About Blog Projects Help Donate  Contact Jobs Volunteer People
Full text of "All 62 Goosebumps novels"
See other formats
LIAN 
, -e 


Now you see him. NOL you don't. 


, 


s 


LET’S GET INVISIBLE! 


M SCHOLASTIC 


LET’S GET INVISIBLE! 


Goosebumps - 06 
R.L. Stine 
(An Undead Scan v1.5) 


I went invisible for the first time on my twelfth birthday. 

It was all Whitey’s fault, in a way. Whitey is my dog. He’s just a 
mutt, part terrier, part everything else. He’s all black, so of course we 
named him Whitey. 

If Whitey hadn’t been sniffing around in the attic... 

Well, maybe I’d better back up a bit and start at the beginning. 

My birthday was on a rainy Saturday. It was a few minutes before 
kids would start arriving for my birthday party, so I was getting ready. 

Getting ready means brushing my hair. 

My brother is always on my case about my hair. He gives me a 
hard time because I spend so much time in front of the mirror 
brushing it and checking it out. 

The thing is, I just happen to have great hair. It’s very thick and 
sort of a golden brown, and just a little bit wavy. My hair is my best 
feature, so I like to make sure it looks okay. 

Also, I have very big ears. They stick out a lot. So I have to keep 
making sure that my hair covers my ears. It’s important. 

“Max, it’s messed up in back,” my brother, Lefty, said, standing 
behind me as I studied my hair in the front hall mirror. 

His name is really Noah, but I call him Lefty because he’s the only 
left-handed person in our family. Lefty was tossing a softball up and 
catching it in his left hand. He knew he wasn’t supposed to toss that 
softball around in the house, but he always did it anyway. 

Lefty is two years younger than me. He’s not a bad guy, but he 
has too much energy. He always has to be tossing a ball around, 
drumming his hands on the table, hitting something, running around, 
falling down, leaping into things, wrestling with me. You get the idea. 
Dad says that Lefty has ants in his pants. It’s a dumb expression, but it 
sort of describes my brother. 

I turned and twisted my neck to see the back of my hair. “It is not 
messed up, liar,” I said. 

“Think fast!” Lefty shouted, and he tossed the softball at me. 

I made a grab for it and missed. It hit the wall just below the 
mirror with a loud thud. Lefty and I held our breath, waiting to see if 
Mom heard the sound. But she didn’t. I think she was in the kitchen 
doing something to the birthday cake. 

“That was dumb,” I whispered to Lefty. “You almost broke the 
mirror.” 


“You’re dumb,” he said. Typical. 

“Why don’t you learn to throw right-handed? Then maybe I could 
catch it sometimes,” I told him. I liked to tease him about being left- 
handed because he really hated it. 

“You stink,” he said, picking up the softball. 

I was used to it. He said it a hundred times a day. I guess he 
thought it was clever or something. 

He’s a good kid for a ten-year-old, but he doesn’t have much of a 
vocabulary. 

“Your ears are sticking out,” he said. 

I knew he was lying. I started to answer him, but the doorbell 
rang. 

He and I raced down the narrow hallway to the front door. “Hey, 
it’s my party!” I told him. 

But Lefty got to the door first and pulled it open. 

My best friend, Zack, pulled open the screen door and hurried 
into the house. It was starting to rain pretty hard, and he was already 
soaked. 

He handed me a present, wrapped in silver paper, raindrops 
dripping off it. “It’s a bunch of comic books,” he said. “I already read 
"em. The X-Force graphic novel is kind of cool.” 

“Thanks,” I said. “They don’t look too wet.” 

Lefty grabbed the present from my hand and ran into the living 
room with it. “Don’t open it!” I shouted. He said he was just starting a 
pile. 

Zack took off his Red Sox cap, and I got a look at his new haircut. 
“Wow! You look... different,” I said, studying his new look. His black 
hair was buzzed real short on the left side. The rest of it was long, 
brushed straight to the right. 

“Did you invite girls?” he asked me, “or is it just boys?” 

“Some girls are coming,” I told him. “Erin and April. Maybe my 
cousin Debra.” I knew he liked Debra. 

He nodded thoughtfully. Zack has a real serious face. He has these 
little blue eyes that always look far away, like he’s thinking hard 
about something. Like he’s real deep. 

He’s sort of an intense guy. Not nervous. Just keyed up. And very 
competitive. He has to win at everything. If he comes in second place, 
he gets really upset and kicks the furniture. You know the kind. 

“What are we going to do?” Zack asked, shaking the water off his 
Red Sox cap. 

I shrugged. “We were supposed to be in the back yard. Dad put 
the volleyball net up this morning. But that was before it started to 
rain. I rented some movies. Maybe we'll watch them.” 


The doorbell rang. Lefty appeared again from out of nowhere, 
pushed Zack and me out of the way, and made a dive for the door. 
“Oh, it’s you,” I heard him say. 

“Thanks for the welcome.” I recognized Erin’s squeaky voice. 
Some kids call Erin “Mouse” because of that voice, and because she’s 
tiny like a mouse. She has short, straight blonde hair, and I think she’s 
cute, but of course I’d never tell anyone that. 

“Can we come in?” I recognized April’s voice next. April is the 
other girl in our group. She has curly black hair and dark, sad eyes. I 
always thought she was really sad, but then I figured out that she’s 
just shy. 

“The party’s tomorrow,” I heard Lefty tell them. 

“Huh?” Both girls uttered cries of surprise. 

“No, it isn’t,” I shouted. I stepped into the doorway and shoved 
Lefty out of the way. I pushed open the screen door so Erin and April 
could come in. “You know Lefty’s little jokes,” I said, squeezing my 
brother against the wall. 

“Lefty is a little joke,” Erin said. 

“You’re stupid,” Lefty told her. I pressed him into the wall a little 
harder, leaning against him with all my weight. But he ducked down 
and scooted away. 

“Happy Birthday,” April said, shaking the rain from her curly 
hair. She handed me a present, wrapped in Christmas wrapping paper. 
“It’s the only paper we had,” she explained, seeing me staring at it. 

“Merry Christmas to you, too,” I joked. The present felt like a CD. 

“I forgot your present,” Erin said. 

“What is it?” I asked, following the girls into the living room. 

“I don’t know. I haven’t bought it yet.” 

Lefty grabbed April’s present out of my hand and ran to put it on 
top of Zack’s present in the corner behind the couch. 

Erin plopped down on the white leather ottoman in front of the 
armchair. April stood at the window, staring out at the rain. 

“We were going to barbecue hot dogs,” I said. 

“They’d be pretty soggy today,” April replied. 

Lefty stood behind the couch, tossing his softball up and catching 
it one-handed. 

“You’re going to break that lamp,” I warned him. 

He ignored me, of course. 

“Who else is coming?” Erin asked. 

Before I could answer, the doorbell rang again. Lefty and I raced 
to the door. He tripped over his own sneakers and went skidding 
down the hall on his stomach. So typical. 

By two-thirty everyone had arrived, fifteen kids in all, and the 


party got started. Well, it didn’t really get started because we couldn’t 
decide what to do. I wanted to watch the Terminator movie I’d rented. 
But the girls wanted to play Twister. 

“It’s my birthday!” I insisted. 

We compromised. We played Twister. Then we watched some of 
the Terminator video until it was time to eat. 

It was a pretty good party. I think everyone had an okay time. 
Even April seemed to be having fun. She was usually really quiet and 
nervous-looking at parties. 

Lefty spilled his Coke and ate his slice of chocolate birthday cake 
with his hands because he thought it was funny. But he was the only 
animal in the group. 

I told him the only reason he was invited was because he was in 
the family and there was nowhere else we could stash him. He replied 
by opening his mouth up real wide so everyone could see his chewed- 
up chocolate cake inside. 

After I opened presents, I put the Terminator movie back on. But 
everyone started to leave. I guess it was about five o’clock. It looked 
much later. It was dark as night out, still storming. 

My parents were in the kitchen cleaning up. Erin and April were 
the only ones left. Erin’s mother was supposed to pick them up. She 
called and said she’d be a little late. 

Whitey was standing at the living room window, barking his head 
off. I looked outside. I didn’t see anyone there. I grabbed him with 
both hands and wrestled him away from the window. 

“Let’s go up to my room,” I suggested when I finally got the dumb 
dog quiet. “I got a new Super Nintendo game I want to try.” 

Erin and April gladly followed me upstairs. They didn’t like the 
Terminator movie, for some reason. 

The upstairs hallway was pitch black. I clicked the light switch, 
but the overhead light didn’t come on. “The bulb must be burned 
out,” I said. 

My room was at the end of the hall. We made our way slowly 
through the darkness. 

“It’s kind of spooky up here,” April said quietly. 

And just as she said it, the linen closet door swung open and, with 
a deafening howl, a dark figure leapt out at us. 


As the girls cried out in horror, the howling creature grabbed me 
around the waist and wrestled me to the floor. 

“Lefty—let go!” I screamed angrily. “You’re not funny!” 

He was laughing like a lunatic. He thought he was a riot. 
“Gotcha!” he cried. “I gotcha good!” 

“We weren’t scared,” Erin insisted. “We knew it was you.” 

“Then why’d you scream?” Lefty asked. 

Erin didn’t have an answer. 

I shoved him off me and climbed to my feet. “That was dumb, 
Lefty.” 

“How long were you waiting in the linen closet?” April asked. 

“A long time,” Lefty told her. He started to get up, but Whitey ran 
up to him and began furiously licking his face. It tickled so much, 
Lefty fell onto his back, laughing. 

“You scared Whitey, too,” I said. 

“No, I didn’t. Whitey’s smarter than you guys.” Lefty pushed 
Whitey away. 

Whitey began sniffing at the door across the hall. 

“Where does that door lead, Max?” Erin asked. 

“To the attic,” I told her. 

“You have an attic?” Erin cried. Like it was some kind of big deal. 
“What’s up there? I love attics!” 

“Huh?” I squinted at her in the dark. Sometimes girls are really 
weird. I mean, how could anyone love attics? 

“Just a lot of old junk my grandparents left,” I told her. “This 
house used to be theirs. Mom and Dad stored a lot of their stuff in the 
attic. We hardly ever go up there.” 

“Can we go up and take a look?” Erin asked. 

“I guess,” I said. “I don’t think it’s too big a thrill or anything.” 

“T love old junk,” Erin said. 

“But it’s so dark....” April said softly. I think she was a little 
scared. 

I opened the door and reached for the light switch just inside. A 
ceiling light clicked on in the attic. It cast a pale yellow light down at 
us as we stared up the steep wooden stairs. 

“See? There’s light up there,” I told April. I started up the stairs. 
They creaked under my sneakers. My shadow was really long. “You 
coming?” 


“Erin’s mom will be here any minute,” April said. 

“We'll just go up for a second,” Erin said. She gave April a gentle 
push. “Come on.” 

Whitey trotted past us as we climbed the stairs, his tail wagging 
excitedly, his toenails clicking loudly on the wooden steps. About 
halfway up, the air grew hot and dry. 

I stopped on the top step and looked around. The attic stretched 
on both sides. It was one long room, filled with old furniture, 
cardboard cartons, old clothes, fishing rods, stacks of yellowed 
magazines—all kinds of junk. 

“Ooh, it smells so musty,” Erin said, moving past me and taking a 
few steps into the vast space. She took a deep breath. “I love that 
smell!” 

“Youre definitely weird,” I told her. 

Rain drummed loudly against the roof. The sound echoed through 
the low room, a steady roar. It sounded as if we were inside a 
waterfall. 

All four of us began walking around, exploring. Lefty kept tossing 
his softball up against the ceiling rafters, then catching it as it came 
down. I noticed that April stayed close to Erin. Whitey was sniffing 
furiously along the wall. 

“Think there are mice up here?” Lefty asked, a devilish grin 
crossing his face. I saw April’s eyes go wide. “Big fat mice who like to 
climb up girls’ legs?” Lefty teased. 

My kid brother has a great sense of humor. 

“Could we go now?” April asked impatiently. She started back 
toward the stairway. 

“Look at these old magazines,” Erin exclaimed, ignoring her. She 
picked one up and started flipping through it. “Check this out. The 
clothes these models are wearing are a riot!” 

“Hey—what’s Whitey doing?” Lefty asked suddenly. 

I followed his gaze to the far wall. Behind a tall stack of cartons, I 
could see Whitey’s tail wagging. And I could hear him scratching 
furiously at something. 

“Whitey—come!” I commanded. 

Of course he ignored me. He began scratching harder. 

“Whitey, what are you scratching at?” 

“Probably pulling a mouse apart,” Lefty suggested. 

“Tm outta here!” April exclaimed. 

“Whitey?” I called. Stepping around an old dining room table, I 
made my way across the cluttered attic. I quickly saw that he was 
scratching at the bottom of a door. 

“Hey, look,” I called to the others. “Whitey found a hidden door.” 


“Cool!” Erin cried, hurrying over. Lefty and April were right 
behind. 

“I didn’t know this was up here,” I said. 

“We’ve got to check it out,” Erin urged. “Let’s see what’s on the 
other side.” 

And that’s when the trouble all began. 

You can understand why I say it was all Whitey’s fault, right? If 
that dumb dog hadn’t started sniffing and scratching there, we might 
never have found the hidden attic room. 

And we never would have discovered the exciting—and 
frightening—secret behind that wooden door. 


“Whitey!” I knelt down and pulled the dog away from the door. 
“What’s your problem, doggie?” 

As soon as I moved him aside, Whitey lost all interest in the door. 
He trotted off and started sniffing another corner. Talk about your 
short attention span. But I guess that’s the difference between dogs 
and people. 

The rain continued to pound down, a steady roar just above our 
heads. I could hear the wind whistling around the corner of the house. 
It was a real spring storm. 

The door had a rusted latch about halfway up. It slid off easily, 
and the warped wooden door started to swing open before I even 
pulled at it. 

The door hinges squeaked as I pulled the door toward me, 
revealing solid darkness on the other side. 

Before I had gotten the door open halfway, Lefty scooted under 
me and darted into the dark room. 

“A dead body!” he shrieked. 

“Noooo!” April and Erin both cried out with squeals of terror. 

But I knew Lefty’s dumb sense of humor. “Nice try, Lefty,” I said, 
and followed him through the doorway. 

Of course he was just goofing. 

I found myself in a small, windowless room. The only light came 
from the pale yellow ceiling light behind us in the center of the attic. 

“Push the door all the way open so the light can get in,” I 
instructed Erin. “I can’t see a thing in here.” 

Erin pushed open the door and slid a carton over to hold it in 
place. Then she and April crept in to join Lefty and me. 

“Its too big to be a closet,” Erin said, her voice sounding even 
squeakier than usual. “So what is it?” 

“Just a room, I guess,” I said, still waiting for my eyes to adjust to 
the dim light. 

I took another step into the room. And as I did, a dark figure 
stepped toward me. 

I screamed and jumped back. 

The other person jumped back, too. 

“It’s a mirror, dork!” Lefty said, and started to laugh. 

Instantly, all four of us were laughing. Nervous, high-pitched 
laughter. 


It was a mirror in front of us. In the pale yellow light filtering into 
the small, square room, I could see it clearly now. 

It was a big, rectangular mirror, about two feet taller than me, 
with a dark wood frame. It rested on a wooden base. 

I moved closer to it and my reflection moved once again to greet 
me. To my surprise, the reflection was clear. No dust on the glass, 
despite the fact that no one had been in here in ages. 

I stepped in front of it and started to check out my hair. 

I mean, that’s what mirrors are for, right? 

“Who would put a mirror in a room all by itself?” Erin asked. I 
could see her dark reflection in the mirror, a few feet behind me. 

“Maybe it’s a valuable piece of furniture or something,” I said, 
reaching into my jeans pocket for my comb. “You know. An antique.” 

“Did your parents put it up here?” Erin asked. 

“I don’t know,” I replied. “Maybe it belonged to my grandparents. 
I just don’t know.” I ran the comb through my hair a few times. 

“Can we go now? This isn’t too thrilling,” April said. She was still 
lingering reluctantly in the doorway. 

“Maybe it was a carnival mirror,” Lefty said, pushing me out of 
the way and making faces into the mirror, bringing his face just inches 
from the glass. “You know. One of those fun house mirrors that makes 
your body look like it’s shaped like an egg.” 

“You’re already shaped like an egg,” I joked, pushing him aside. 
“At least, your head is.” 

“You’re a rotten egg,” he snapped back. “You stink.” 

I peered into the mirror. I looked perfectly normal, not distorted 
at all. “Hey, April, come in,” I urged. “You’re blocking most of the 
light.” 

“Can’t we just leave?” she asked, whining. Reluctantly, she moved 
from the doorway, taking a few small steps into the room. “Who cares 
about an old mirror, anyway?” 

“Hey, look,” I said, pointing. I had spotted a light attached to the 
top of the mirror. It was oval-shaped, made of brass or some other 
kind of metal. The bulb was long and narrow, almost like a fluorescent 
bulb, only shorter. 

I gazed up at it, trying to figure it out in the dim light. “How do 
you turn it on, I wonder.” 

“There’s a chain,” Erin said, coming up beside me. 

Sure enough, a slender chain descended from the right side of the 
lamp, hanging down about a foot from the top of the mirror. 

“Wonder if it works,” I said. 

“The bulb’s probably dead,” Lefty remarked. Good old Lefty. 
Always an optimist. 


“Only one way to find out,” I said. Standing on tiptoes, I stretched 
my hand up to the chain. 

“Be careful,” April warned. 

“Huh? It’s just a light,” I told her. 

Famous last words. 

I reached up. Missed. Tried again. I grabbed the chain on the 
second try and pulled. 

The light came on with a startlingly bright flash. Then it dimmed 
down to normal light. Very white light that reflected brightly in the 
mirror. 

“Hey—that’s better!” I exclaimed. “It lights up the whole room. 
Pretty bright, huh?” 

No one said anything. 

“I said, pretty bright, huh?” 

Still silence from my companions. 

I turned around and was surprised to find looks of horror on all 
three faces. 

“Max?” Lefty cried, staring hard at me, his eyes practically 
popping out of his head. 

“Max—where are you?” Erin cried. She turned to April. “Where’d 
he go?” 

“Tm right here,” I told them. “I haven’t moved.” 

“But we can’t see you!” April cried. 


All three of them were staring in my direction with their eyes bulging 
and looks of horror still on their faces. But I could tell they were 
goofing. 

“Give me a break, guys,” I said. “I’m not as stupid as I look. No 
way I’m falling for your dumb joke.” 

“But, Max—” Lefty insisted. “We’re serious!” 

“We can’t see you!” Erin repeated. 

Dumb, dumb, dumb. 

Suddenly, the light started to hurt my eyes. It seemed to grow 
brighter. It was shining right in my face. 

Shielding my eyes with one hand, I reached up with the other 
hand and pulled the chain. 

The light went out, but the white glare stayed with me. I tried to 
blink it away, but I still saw large bright spots before my eyes. 

“Hey—you’re back!” Lefty cried. He stepped up and grabbed my 
arm and squeezed it, as if he were testing it, making sure I was real or 
something. 

“What’s your problem?” I snapped. I was starting to get angry. “I 
didn’t fall for your dumb joke, Lefty. So why keep it up?” 

To my surprise, Lefty didn’t back away. He held onto my arm as if 
he were afraid to let go. 

“We weren’t joking, Max,” Erin insisted in a low voice. “We really 
couldn’t see you.” 

“It must have been the light in the mirror,” April said. She was 
pressed against the wall next to the doorway. “It was so bright. I think 
it was just an optical illusion or something.” 

“It wasn’t an optical illusion,” Erin told her. “I was standing right 
next to Max. And I couldn’t see him.” 

“He was invisible,” Lefty added solemnly. 

I laughed. “You guys are trying to scare me,” I said. “And you’re 
doing a pretty good job of it!” 

“You scared us!” Lefty exclaimed. He let go of my arm and 
stepped up to the mirror. 

I followed his gaze. “There I am,” I said, pointing to my 
reflection. A strand of hair was poking up in back of my head. I 
carefully slicked it down. 

“Let’s get out of here,” April pleaded. 

Lefty started to toss his softball up, studying himself in the mirror. 


Erin made her way around to the back of the mirror. “It’s too 
dark back here. I can’t see anything,” she said. 

She stepped around to the front and stared up at the oval-shaped 
lamp on top. “You disappeared as soon as you pulled the chain on that 
lamp.” 

“You're really serious!” I said. For the first time I began to believe 
they weren’t joking. 

“You were invisible, Max,” Erin said. “Poof. You were gone.” 

“She’s right,” Lefty agreed, tossing the softball up and catching it, 
admiring his form in the mirror. 

“It was just an optical illusion,” April insisted. “Why are you guys 
making such a big deal about it?” 

“It wasn’t!” Erin insisted. 

“He clicked on the light. Then he disappeared in a flash,” Lefty 
said. He dropped the softball. It bounced loudly on the hardwood 
floor, then rolled behind the mirror. 

He hesitated for a few seconds. Then he went after it, diving for 
the ball in the darkness. A few seconds later, he came running back. 

“You really were invisible, Max,” he said. 

“Really,” Erin added, staring hard at me. 

“Prove it,” I told them. 

“Let’s go!” April pleaded. She had moved to the doorway and was 
standing half in, half out of the room. 

“What do you mean prove it!” Erin asked, talking to my dark 
reflection in the mirror. 

“Show me,” I said. 

“You mean do what you did?” Erin asked, turning to talk to the 
real me. 

“Yeah,” I said. “You go invisible, too. Just like I did.” 

Erin and Lefty stared at me. Lefty’s mouth dropped open. 

“This is dumb,” April called from behind us. 

“PII do it,” Lefty said. He stepped up to the mirror. 

I pulled him back by the shoulders. “Not you,” I said. “You’re too 
young.” 

He tried to pull out of my grasp, but I held onto him. “How about 
you, Erin?” I urged, wrapping my arms around Lefty’s waist to keep 
him back from the mirror. 

She shrugged. “Okay. I'll try, I guess.” 

Lefty stopped struggling to get away. I loosened my grip a little. 

We watched Erin step up in front of the mirror. Her reflection 
stared back at her, dark and shadowy. 

She stood on tiptoes, reached up, and grabbed the lamp chain. 


She glanced over at me and smiled. “Here goes,” she said. 


The chain slipped from Erin’s hand. 

She reached up and grabbed it again. 

She was just about to tug at it when a woman’s voice interrupted 
from downstairs. “Erin! Are you up there? April?” 

I recognized the voice. Erin’s mom. 

“Yeah. We’re up here,” Erin shouted. She let go of the chain. 

“Hurry down. We're late!” her mom called. “What are you doing 
up in the attic, anyway?” 

“Nothing,” Erin called down. She turned to me and shrugged. 

“Good. I’m outta here!” April exclaimed, and hurried to the 
stairway. 

We all followed her down, clumping noisily down the creaking 
wooden stairs. 

“What were you doing up there?” my mom asked when we were 
all in the living room. “It’s so dusty in that attic. It’s a wonder you’re 
not filthy.” 

“We were just hanging out,” I told her. 

“We were playing with an old mirror,” Lefty said. “It was kind of 
neat.” 

“Playing with a mirror?” Erin’s mom flashed my mom a 
bewildered glance. 

“See you guys,” Erin said, pulling her mom to the door. “Great 
party, Max.” 

“Yeah. Thanks,” April added. 

They headed out the front door. The rain had finally stopped. I 
stood at the screen door and watched them step around the puddles 
on the walk as they made their way to the car. 

When I turned back into the living room, Lefty was tossing the 
softball up to the ceiling, trying to catch it behind his back. He missed. 
The ball bounced up from the floor onto an end table, where it 
knocked over a large vase of tulips. 

What a crash! 

The vase shattered. Tulips went flying. All the water poured down 
onto the carpet. 

Mom tossed up her hands and said something silently up to the 
sky, the way she always does when she’s very pushed out of shape 
about something. 

Then she really got on Lefty’s case. She started screaming: “How 


many times do I have to tell you not to throw that ball in the house?” 
Stuff like that. She kept it up for quite a while. 

Lefty shrank into a corner and tried to make himself tinier and 
tinier. He kept saying he was sorry, but Mom was yelling so loud, I 
don’t think she heard him. 

I bet Lefty wanted to be invisible right at that moment. 

But he had to stand and take his punishment. 

Then he and I helped clean up the mess. 

A few minutes later, I saw him tossing the softball up in the living 
room again. 

That’s the thing about Lefty. He never learns. 


I didn’t think about the mirror again for a couple of days. I got busy 
with school and other stuff. Rehearsing for the spring concert. I’m 
only in the chorus, but I still have to go to every rehearsal. 

I saw Erin and April in school a lot. But neither of them 
mentioned the mirror. I guess maybe it slipped their minds, too. Or 
maybe we all just shut it out of our minds. 

It was kind of scary, if you stopped to think about it. 

I mean, if you believed what they said happened. 

Then that Wednesday night I couldn’t get to sleep. I was lying 
there, staring up at the ceiling, watching the shadows sway back and 
forth. 

I tried counting sheep. I tried shutting my eyes real tight and 
counting backwards from one thousand. 

But I was really keyed up, for some reason. Not at all sleepy. 

Suddenly I found myself thinking about the mirror up in the attic. 

What was it doing up there? I asked myself. Why was it closed up 
in that hidden room with the door carefully latched? 

Who did it belong to? My grandparents? If so, why would they 
hide it in that tiny room? 

I wondered if Mom and Dad even knew it was up there. 

I started thinking about what had happened on Saturday after my 
birthday party. I pictured myself standing in front of the mirror. 
Combing my hair. Then reaching for the chain. Pulling it. The flash of 
bright light as the lamp went on. And then... 

Did I see my reflection in the mirror after the light went on? 

I couldn’t remember. 

Did I see myself at all? My hands? My feet? 

I couldn’t remember. 

“It was a joke,” I said aloud, lying in my bed, kicking the covers 
off me. 


It had to be a joke. 

Lefty was always playing dumb jokes on me, trying to make me 
look bad. My brother was a joker. He’d always been a joker. He was 
never serious. Never. 

So what made me think he was serious now? 

Because Erin and April had agreed with him? 

Before I realized it, I had climbed out of bed. 

Only one way to find out if they were serious or not, I told 
myself. I searched in the darkness for my bedroom slippers. I buttoned 
my pajama shirt which had come undone from all my tossing and 
turning. 

Then, as silent as I could be, I crept out into the hallway. 

The house was dark except for the tiny night-light down by the 
floor just outside Lefty’s bedroom. Lefty was the only one in the family 
who ever got up in the middle of the night. He insisted on having a 
night-light in his room and one in the hall, even though I made fun of 
him about it as often as I could. 

Now I was grateful for the light as I made my way on tiptoe to the 
attic stairs. Even though I was being so careful, the floorboards 
squeaked under my feet. It’s just impossible not to make noise in an 
old house like this. 

I stopped and held my breath, listening hard, listening for any 
sign that I had been heard. 

Silence. 

Taking a deep breath, I opened the attic door, fumbled around till 
I found the light switch, and clicked on the attic light. Then I made 
my way slowly up the steep stairs, leaning all my weight on the 
banister, trying my hardest not to make the stairs creak. 

It seemed to take forever to get all the way up. Finally, I stopped 
at the top step and gazed around, letting my eyes adjust to the yellow 
glare of the ceiling light. 

The attic was hot and stuffy. The air was so dry, it made my nose 
burn. I had a sudden urge to turn around and go back. 

But then my eyes stopped at the doorway to the small, hidden 
room. In our hurry to leave, we had left the door wide open. 

Staring at the darkness beyond the open doorway, I stepped onto 
the landing and made my way quickly across the cluttered floor. The 
floorboards creaked and groaned beneath me, but I barely heard them. 

I was drawn to the open doorway, drawn to the mysterious room 
as if being pulled by a powerful magnet. 

I had to see the tall mirror again. I had to examine it, study it 
closely. 

I had to know the truth about it. 


I stepped into the small room without hesitating and walked up to 
the mirror. 

I paused for a moment and studied my shadowy reflection in the 
glass. My hair was totally messed up, but I didn’t care. 

I stared at myself, stared into my eyes. Then I took a step back to 
get a different view. 

The mirror reflected my entire body from head to foot. There 
wasn’t anything special about the reflection. It wasn’t distorted or 
weird in any way. 

The fact that it was such a normal reflection helped to calm me. I 
hadn’t realized it, but my heart was fluttering like a nervous butterfly. 
My hands and feet were cold as ice. 

“Chill out, Max,” I whispered to myself, watching myself whisper 
in the dark mirror. 

I did a funny little dance for my own benefit, waving my hands 
above my head and shaking my whole body. 

“Nothing special about this mirror,” I said aloud. 

I reached out and touched it. The glass felt cool despite the 
warmth of the room. I ran my hand along the glass until I reached the 
frame. Then I let my hand wander up and down the wood frame. It 
also felt smooth and cool. 

It’s just a mirror, I thought, finally feeling more relaxed. Just an 
old mirror that someone stored up here long ago and forgot about. 

Still holding onto the frame, I walked around to the back. It was 
too dark to see clearly, but it didn’t seem too interesting back here. 

Well, I might as well turn on the light at the top, I thought. 

I returned to the front of the mirror. Standing just inches back 
from it, I began to reach up for the lamp chain when something 
caught my eye. 

“Oh!” 

I cried out as I saw two eyes, down low in the mirror. Two eyes 
staring out at me. 


My breath caught in my throat. I peered down into the dark reflection. 

The two eyes peered up at me. Dark and evil eyes. 

Uttering a cry of panic, I turned away from the mirror. 

“Lefty!” I cried. My voice came out shrill and tight, as if someone 
were squeezing my throat. 

He grinned at me from just inside the doorway. 

I realized that it had been Lefty’s eyes reflected in the mirror. 

I ran over to him and grabbed him by the shoulders. “You scared 
me to death!” I half-screamed, half-whispered. 

His grin grew wider. “You’re stupid,” he said. 

I wanted to strangle him. He thought it was a riot. 

“Why’d you sneak up behind me?” I demanded, giving him a 
shove back against the wall. 

He shrugged. 

“Well, what are you doing up here, anyway?” I sputtered. 

I could still see those dark eyes staring out at me in the mirror. So 
creepy! 

“I heard you,” he explained, leaning back against the wall, still 
grinning. “I was awake. I heard you walk past my room. So I followed 
you.” 

“Well, you shouldn’t be up here,” I snapped. 

“Neither should you,” he snapped back. 

“Go back downstairs and go to bed,” I said. My voice was finally 
returning to normal. I tried to sound as if I meant business. 

But Lefty didn’t move. “Make me,” he said. Another classic 
argument-winner. 

“T mean it,” I insisted. “Go back to bed.” 

“Make me,” he repeated nastily. “Pll tell Mom and Dad you’re up 
here,” he added. 

I hate being threatened. And he knows it. That’s why he threatens 
me every hour of the day. 

Sometimes I just wish I could pound him. 

But we live in a nonviolent family. 

That’s what Mom and Dad say every time Lefty and I get in a 
fight. “Break it up, you two. We live in a nonviolent family.” 

Sometimes nonviolence can be real frustrating. Know what I 
mean? 

This was one of those times. But I could see that I wasn’t going to 


get rid of Lefty so easily. He was determined to stay up in the attic 
with me and see what I was doing with the mirror. 

My heart had finally slowed down to normal. I was starting to feel 
calmer. So I decided to stop fighting with him and let him stay. I 
turned back to the mirror. 

Luckily, there wasn’t another pair of eyes in there staring out at 
me! 

“What are you doing?” Lefty demanded, stepping up behind me, 
his arms still crossed over his chest. 

“Just checking out the mirror,” I told him. 

“You going to go invisible again?” he asked. He was standing 
right behind me, and his breath smelled sour, like lemons. 

I turned and shoved him back a few steps. “Get out of my face,” I 
said. “Your breath stinks.” 

That started another stupid argument, of course. 

I was sorry I'd ever come up here. I should have stayed in bed, I 
realized. 

Finally, I persuaded him to stand a foot away from me. A major 
victory. 

Yawning, I turned back to the mirror. I was starting to feel sleepy. 
Maybe it was because of the heat of the attic. Maybe it was because I 
was tired of arguing with my dopey brother. Or maybe it was because 
it was really late at night, and I was tired. 

‘Tm going to turn on the light,” I told him, reaching for the 
chain. “Tell me if I go invisible again.” 

“No.” He shoved his way right next to me again. “I want to try it, 
too.” 

“No way,” I insisted, shoving back. 

“Yes way.” He pushed me hard. 

I pushed back. Then I had a better idea. “How about if we both 
stand in front of the mirror, and I pull the light chain?” 

“Okay. Go ahead.” Standing an inch in front of it, practically nose 
to nose with his reflection, Lefty stiffened until he was standing at 
attention. 

He looked ridiculous, especially in those awful green pajamas. 

I stepped up beside him. “Here goes nothing,” I said. 

I stretched my hand up, grabbed the light chain, and pulled. 


The light on top of the mirror flashed. 

“Ow!” I cried out. The light was so bright, it hurt my eyes. 

Then it quickly dimmed, and my eyes started to adjust. 

I turned to Lefty and started to say something. I don’t remember 
what it was. It completely flew out of my mind when I realized that 
Lefty was gone. 

“L-Lefty?” I stammered. 

‘Tm right here,” he replied. His voice sounded nearby, but I 
couldn’t see him. “Max—where are you?” 

“You can’t see me?” I cried. 

“No,” Lefty said. “No, I can’t.” 

I could smell his sour breath, so I knew he was there. But he was 
invisible. Gone. Out of sight. 

So they weren’t putting me on! Erin, April, and Lefty had been 
telling the truth on Saturday after my birthday party. I really had gone 
invisible. 

And now I was invisible again, along with my brother. 

“Hey, Max,” his voice sounded tiny, shaky. “This is weird.” 

“Yeah. It’s weird, okay,” I agreed. “You really can’t see me, 
Lefty?” 

“No. And I can’t see myself,” he said. 

The mirror. I had forgotten to check out the mirror. 

Did I have a reflection? 

I turned and stared into the mirror. The light was pouring down 
from the top of the frame, casting a bright glare over the glass. 

Squinting into the glare, I saw... nothing. 

No me. 

No Lefty. 

Just the reflection of the wall behind us and the open doorway 
leading to the rest of the attic. 

“We—we don’t have reflections,” I said. 

“It’s kinda cool,” Lefty remarked. He grabbed my arm. I jumped 
in surprise. 

“Hey!” I cried. 

It felt creepy to be grabbed by an invisible person. 

I grabbed him back. I tickled his ribs. He started to laugh. 

“We still have our bodies,” I said. “We just can’t see them.” 

He tried to tickle me, but I danced away from him. 


“Hey, Max, where’d you go?” he called, sounding frightened 
again. 

“Try and find me,” I teased, backing toward the wall. 

“I— can’t,” he said shakily. “Come back over here, okay?” 

“No way,” I said. “I don’t want to be tickled.” 

“I won't,” Lefty swore. “I promise.” 

I stepped back in front of the mirror. 

“Are you here?” Lefty asked timidly. 

“Yeah. I’m right beside you. I can smell your bad breath,” I told 
him. 

And he started to tickle me again. The little liar. 

We wrestled around for a bit. It was just so strange wrestling with 
someone you couldn’t see. 

Finally, I pushed him away. “I wonder if we could go downstairs 
and still be invisible,” I said. “I wonder if we could leave the house 
like this.” 

“And go spy on people?” Lefty suggested. 

“Yeah,” I said. I yawned. I was starting to feel a little strange. 
“We could go spy on girls and stuff.” 

“Cool,” Lefty replied. 

“Remember that old movie Mom and Dad were watching on TV?” 
I asked him. “About the ghosts who kept appearing and disappearing 
all the time? They had a lot of fun scaring people. You know, playing 
jokes on them, driving them crazy.” 

“But we’re not ghosts,” Lefty replied in a trembling voice. I think 
the idea kind of frightened him. 

It frightened me, too! 

“Could we go back to normal now?” Lefty asked. “I don’t feel 
right.” 

“Me, either,” I told him. I was feeling very light. Kind of fluttery. 
Just... weird. 

“How can we get back right again?” he asked. 

“Well, the last time, I just pulled the chain. I clicked the light off, 
and I was back. That’s all it took.” 

“Well, do it,” Lefty urged impatiently. “Right now. Okay?” 

“Yeah. Okay.” I started to feel kind of dizzy. Kind of light. As if I 
could float away or something. 

“Hurry,” Lefty said. I could hear him breathing hard. 

I reached up and grabbed the light chain. “No problem,” I told 
him. “We’ll be back in a second.” 

I pulled the chain. 

The light went out. 


But Lefty and I didn’t return. 


“Max—lI can’t see you!” Lefty whined. 

“I know,” I replied quietly. I felt so frightened. I had chills 
running down my back, chills that wouldn’t stop. “I can’t see you, 
either.” 

“What happened?” Lefty cried. I could feel him tug at my 
invisible arm. 

“I—II don’t know,” I stammered. “It worked before. I clicked off 
the light and I was back.” 

I gazed into the mirror. No reflection. Nothing. 

No me. No Lefty. 

I stood there, staring at the spot where our reflections should be, 
frozen with fear. I was glad Lefty couldn’t see me because I wouldn’t 
want him to see how frightened I looked. 

“Try it again, Max,” he whined. “Please. Hurry!” 

“Okay,” I said. “Just try to stay calm, okay?” 

“Stay calm? How?” Lefty wailed. “What if we never get back? 
What if no one can ever see us again?” 

I suddenly felt so sick. My stomach just sort of heaved. 

Get a grip, I told myself. You’ve got to keep it together, Max. For 
Lefty’s sake. 

I stretched up for the light chain, but it seemed to be out of my 
reach. 

I tried again. Missed. 

And then suddenly, I was back. And so was Lefty. 

We could see each other. And we could see our reflections in the 
mirror. 

“Were back!” We both shouted it in unison. 

And then we both fell on the floor, laughing. We were so relieved. 
So happy. 

“Ssshh!” I grabbed Lefty and shoved my hand over his mouth. I 
just remembered it was the middle of the night. “If Mom and Dad 
catch us up here, they’ll kill us,” I warned, whispering. 

“Why did it take so long for us to come back?” Lefty asked, 
turning serious, gazing at his reflection. 

I shrugged. “Beats me.” I thought about it. “Maybe if you stay 
invisible longer, it takes longer for you to get back,” I suggested. 

“Huh? What do you mean?” 

“The first time I went invisible,” I told him, “it was only for a few 


seconds. And I came back instantly, as soon as I clicked off the light. 
But tonight—” 

“We stayed invisible a lot longer. So it took longer to come back. I 
get it,” Lefty said. 

“Youre not as dumb as you look,” I said, yawning. 

“You are!” he snapped back. 

Feeling totally exhausted, I started to lead the way out of the tiny 
room, motioning for Lefty to follow me. But he hesitated, glancing 
back at his reflection in the mirror. 

“We have to tell Mom and Dad about the mirror,” he whispered 
thoughtfully. 

“No way!” I told him. “No way we’re telling them. If we tell them 
about it, they’ll take it away. They won’t let us use it.” 

He stared at me thoughtfully. “I’m not sure I want to use it,” he 
said softly. 

“Well, I do,” I said, turning at the doorway to look back at it. “I 
want to use it just one more time.” 

“What for?” Lefty asked, yawning. 

“To scare Zack,” I said, grinning. 


Zack couldn’t come over until Saturday. As soon as he arrived, I 
wanted to take him up to the attic and give him a demonstration of 
the mirror’s powers. 

Mainly, I wanted to scare the life out of him! 

But Mom insisted that we sit down for lunch first. Canned chicken 
noodle soup and peanut butter-and-jelly sandwiches. 

I gulped my soup as fast as I could, not bothering to chew the 
noodles. Lefty kept giving me meaningful glances across the table. I 
could see that he was as eager as I was to scare Zack. 

“Where’d you get that haircut?” my mom asked Zack. She walked 
around the table, staring at Zack’s head, frowning. I could tell she 
hated it. 

“At Quick Cuts,” Zack told her after swallowing a mouthful of 
peanut butter and jelly. “You know. At the mall.” 

We all studied Zack’s haircut. I thought it was kind of cool. The 
way it was buzzed so short on the left, then hung down long on the 
right. 

“It’s different, all right,” my mom said. 

We all could tell she hated it. But I guess she thought she was 
covering up by calling it different. If I ever came home with a haircut 
like that, she’d murder me! 

“What did your mom say about it?” she asked Zack. 

Zack laughed. “Not much.” 


We all laughed. I kept glancing up at the clock. I was so eager to 
get upstairs. 

“How about some chocolate cupcakes?” Mom asked when we’d 
finished our sandwiches. 

Zack started to say yes, but I interrupted him. “Can we have 
dessert later? I’m kinda full.” 

I pushed back my chair and got up quickly, motioning for Zack to 
follow me. Lefty was already running to the stairs. 

“Hey—where are you going so fast?” Mom called after us, 
following us into the hall. 

“Uh... upstairs... to the attic,” I told her. 

“The attic?” She wrinkled her face, puzzled. “What’s so 
interesting up there?” 

“Uh... just a bunch of old magazines,” I lied. “They’re kind of 
funny. I want to show them to Zack.” That was pretty fast thinking, 
for me. I’m usually not very quick at making up stories. 

Mom stared at me. I don’t think she believed me. But she turned 
back to the kitchen. “Have fun, guys. Don’t get too dirty up there.” 

“We won't,” I told her. I led Zack up the steep stairs. Lefty was 
already waiting for us in the attic. 

It was about a hundred degrees hotter up there. I started to sweat 
the second I stepped into the room. 

Zack stopped a few feet behind me and looked around. “It’s just a 
lot of old junk. What’s so interesting up here?” he asked. 

“You'll see,” I said mysteriously. 

“This way,” Lefty called eagerly, running to the little room 
against the far wall. He was so excited, he dropped his softball. It 
rolled in front of him, and he tripped over it and fell facedown on the 
floor with a thud. 

“I meant to do that!” Lefty joked, climbing up quickly and leaping 
after the ball, which had rolled across the floor. 

“Your brother is made of rubber or something,” Zack laughed. 

“Falling down is his hobby,” I said. “He falls down about a 
hundred times a day.” I wasn’t exaggerating. 

A few seconds later, the three of us were in the hidden room 
standing in front of the mirror. Even though it was a sunny afternoon, 
the room was as dark and shadowy as ever. 

Zack turned from the mirror to me, a bewildered look on his face. 
“This is what you wanted to show me?” 

“Yeah.” I nodded. 

“Since when are you into furniture?” he asked. 

“It’s an interesting mirror, don’t you think?” I asked. 

“No,” he said. “Not too interesting.” 


Lefty laughed. He bounced his softball off the wall and caught it. 

I was deliberately taking my time. Zack was in for the surprise of 
his life, but I wanted to confuse him a little bit first. He was always 
doing stuff like that to me. He always acted as if he knew everything 
there was to know, and if I were good, he’d share a little bit of his 
knowledge with me. 

Well, now I knew something he didn’t know. I wanted to stretch 
this moment out, make it last. 

But at the same time, I couldn’t wait to watch the look on Zack’s 
face when I disappeared right in front of his eyes. 

“Let’s go outside,” Zack said impatiently. “It’s too hot up here. I 
brought my bike. Why don’t we ride to the playground behind school, 
see who’s there?” 

“Maybe later,” I replied, grinning at Lefty. I turned to my brother. 
“Should I show Zack our secret or not?” 

Lefty grinned back at me. He shrugged. 

“What secret?” Zack demanded. I knew he couldn’t stand to be 
left out of anything. He couldn’t bear it if anyone had a secret he 
didn’t know about. 

“What secret?” he repeated when I didn’t answer. 

“Show him,” Lefty said, tossing up the softball. 

I rubbed my chin, pretended to be thinking about it. “Well... 
okay.” I motioned for Zack to stand behind me. 

“You’re going to make funny faces in the mirror?” Zack guessed. 
He shook his head. “Big deal!” 

“No. That’s not the secret,” I told him. I stepped in front of the 
mirror, admiring my reflection, which stared back at me in the glass. 

“Watch!” Lefty urged, stepping up beside Zack. 

“Tm watching. I’m watching,” Zack said impatiently. 

“T’ll bet you I can disappear into thin air,” I told Zack. 

“Yeah. Sure,” he muttered. 

Lefty laughed. 

“How much do you want to bet?” I asked. 

“Two cents,” Zack said. “Is this some kind of trick mirror or 
something?” 

“Something like that,” I told him. “How about ten dollars? Bet me 
ten dollars?” 

“Huh?” 

“Forget the bet. Just show him,” Lefty said, bouncing up and 
down impatiently. 

“I have a magic kit at home,” Zack said. “I can do over a 
thousand tricks. But it’s kid stuff,” he sneered. 


“You don’t have any tricks like this,” I said confidently. 

“Just get it over with so we can go outside,” he grumbled. 

I stepped into the center of the mirror. “Ta-daa!” I sang myself a 
short fanfare. Then I reached up and grabbed the light chain. 

I pulled it. The lamp above the mirror flashed on, blindingly 
bright at first, then dimming as before. 

And I was gone. 

“Hey!” Zack cried. He stumbled backwards. 

He actually stumbled out of shock! 

Invisible, I turned away from the mirror to enjoy his stunned 
reaction. 

“Max?” he cried out. His eyes searched the room. 

Lefty was laughing his head off. 

“Max?” Zack sounded really worried. “Max? How’d you do that? 
Where are you?” 

“Tm right here,” I said. 

He jumped at the sound of my voice. Lefty laughed even harder. 

I reached out and took the softball from Lefty’s hand. I glanced at 
the reflection in the mirror. The ball seemed to float in midair. 

“Here. Catch, Zack.” I tossed it at him. 

He was so stunned, he didn’t move. The ball bounced off his 
chest. “Max? How do you do this trick?” he demanded. 

“It isn’t a trick. It’s real,” I said. 

“Hey, wait...” He got a suspicious look on his face. He ran around 
to the back of the mirror. I guess he expected me to be hiding back 
there. 

He looked very disappointed when he didn’t see me. “Is there a 
trapdoor or something?” he asked. He walked back in front of the 
mirror, got down on his hands and knees, and started searching the 
floorboards for a trapdoor. 

I leaned over and pulled his T-shirt up over his head. 

“Hey—stop it!” he yelled, climbing angrily to his feet. 

I tickled his stomach. 

“Stop, Max.” He squirmed away, thrashing his arms, trying to hit 
me. He looked really frightened now. He was breathing hard, and his 
face was bright red. 

I pulled his T-shirt up again. 

He jerked it down. “You’re really invisible?” His voice rose up so 
high, only dogs could hear it. “Really?” 

“Good trick, huh?” I said right in his ear. 

He jumped and spun away. “What does it feel like? Does it feel 
weird?” 


I didn’t answer him. I crept out of the room and picked up a 
cardboard carton just outside the door. I carried it up to the mirror. It 
looked great. A carton floating all by itself. 

“Put it down,” Zack urged. He sounded really scared. “This is 
really freaking me out, Max. Stop it, okay? Come back so I can see 
you.” 

I wanted to torture him some more, but I could see he was about 
to lose it. Besides, I was starting to feel weird again. Sort of dizzy and 
lightheaded. And the bright light was hurting my eyes, starting to 
blind me. 

“Okay, I’m coming back,” I announced. “Watch.” 

I leaned against the mirror and reached up for the chain. I 
suddenly felt very tired, very weak. It took all my strength to wrap my 
hand around the chain. 

I had the strangest sensation that the mirror was pulling me, 
tugging me toward it, holding me down. 

With a determined burst of strength, I pulled the chain. 

The lamp went out. The room darkened. 

“Where are you? I still can’t see you!” Zack cried, his voice 
revealing panic. 

“Just chill,” I told him. “It takes a few seconds. The longer I stay 
invisible, the longer it takes to come back.” And then I added, “I 
think.” 

Staring into the blank mirror, waiting for my reflection to return, 
I suddenly realized that I didn’t know anything at all about this 
mirror, about turning invisible. About coming back. 

My mind suddenly whirred with all sorts of terrifying questions: 

What made me think that reappearing was automatic? 

What if you could only come back twice? And after the third time 
you went invisible, you stayed invisible? 

What if the mirror was broken? What if it was locked away in this 
hidden room because it didn’t work properly and it made people stay 
invisible forever? 

What if I never came back? 

No, that can’t be, I told myself. 

But the seconds were ticking by. And my body was still not 
visible. 

I touched the mirror, rubbing my invisible hand over the smooth, 
cool glass. 

“Max, what’s taking so long?” Zack asked, his voice trembling. 

“T don’t know,” I told him, sounding as frightened and upset as he 
did. 

And then suddenly, I was back. 


I was staring at my reflection in the mirror, watching intently, 
gratefully, as a wide smile crossed my face. 

“Ta-daaa!” I sang my triumphant fanfare, turning to my still 
shaken friend. “Here I am!” 

“Wow!” Zack exclaimed, and his mouth remained in a tight O of 
surprise and wonder. “Wow.” 

“I know,” I said, grinning. “Pretty cool, huh?” 

I felt very shaky, kind of trembly all over. My knees felt all weak 
and sweaty. You know the feeling. 

But I ignored it. I wanted to enjoy my moment of glory. It wasn’t 
often that I got to do something that Zack hadn’t already done ten 
times. 

“Amazing,” Zack said, staring hard at the mirror. “I’ve got to try 
it!” 

“Well...” I wasn’t so sure I wanted Zack to do it. It was such a big 
responsibility. I mean, what if something went wrong? 

“You’ve got to let me do it!” Zack insisted. 

“Hey—where’s Lefty?” I asked, glancing quickly around the small 
room. 

“Huh? Lefty?” Zack’s eyes searched, too. 

“I was so busy being invisible, I forgot he was here,” I said. And 
then I called, “Hey, Lefty?” 

No reply. 

“Lefty?” 

Silence. 

I walked quickly around to the back of the mirror. He wasn’t 
there. Calling his name, I made my way to the door and peered out 
into the attic. 

No sign of him. 

“He was standing right here. In front of the mirror,” Zack said, 
suddenly pale. 

“Lefty?” I called. “Are you here? Can you hear me?” 

Silence. 

“Weird,” Zack said. 

I swallowed hard. My stomach suddenly felt as if Pd swallowed a 
rock. 

“He was right here. Standing right here,” Zack said in a shrill, 
frightened voice. 

“Well, he’s gone now,” I said, staring at the dark, shadowy 
reflection of the mirror. “Lefty’s gone.” 


“Maybe Lefty went invisible, too,” Zack suggested. 

“Then why doesn’t he answer us?” I cried. I tried calling my 
brother again. “Lefty—are you here? Can you hear me?” 

No reply. 

I walked up to the mirror and angrily slapped the frame. “Stupid 
mirror.” 

“Lefty? Lefty?” Zack had his hands cupped around his mouth like 
a megaphone. He stood at the door to the little room, calling out into 
the attic. 

“I don’t believe this,” I said weakly. My legs were shaking so 
much, I dropped down onto the floor. 

And then I heard giggling. 

“Huh? Lefty?” I jumped to my feet. 

More giggling. Coming from behind the carton Id carried into the 
little room. 

I lunged toward the carton just as Lefty popped up from behind it. 
“Gotcha!” he cried, and collapsed over the carton, slapping the floor, 
laughing his head off. 

“Gotcha! Gotcha both!” 

“You little creep!” Zack screamed. 

He and I both pounced on Lefty at the same time. I pulled his arm 
back until he screamed. Zack messed up his hair, then tickled him. 

Lefty was screaming and laughing and squirming and crying all at 
the same time. I gave him a hard punch on the shoulder. “Don’t ever 
do that again,” I shouted angrily. 

Lefty laughed, so I gave him a hard shove and climbed to my feet. 

Zack and I, both breathing hard, both red in the face, glared 
angrily at Lefty. He was rolling around on the floor, covered in dust, 
still laughing like a lunatic. 

“You scared us to death. You really did!” I exclaimed heatedly. 

“I know,” Lefty replied happily. 

“Let’s beat him up some more,” Zack suggested, balling his hands 
into tight fists. 

“Okay,” I agreed. 

“You'll have to catch me first!” Lefty cried. He was on his feet in a 
flash, and out the door. 

I chased after him, tripped over a stack of old clothes, and went 
flying headfirst to the floor. “Ow!” I banged my leg hard. The pain 


shot up through my body. 

Pulling myself up slowly, I started after Lefty again. But voices on 
the attic stairway made me stop. 

Erin’s head popped up first. Then April appeared. 

Lefty was sitting on the windowsill at the far end of the attic, red- 
faced and sweaty, catching his breath. 

“Hey, how’s it going?” I called to the two girls, brushing dust off 
my jeans, then straightening my hair with one hand. 

“Your mom said you were here,” Erin explained, looking from 
Lefty to me. 

“What are you guys doing up here?” April asked. 

“Oh... just hanging out,” I said, casting an angry glance at my 
brother, who stuck his tongue out in reply. 

April picked up an old Life magazine from a stack of yellowed 
magazines and began flipping through it. But the pages crumbled as 
she looked at them. “Yuck,” she said, putting it down. “This stuff is so 
old.” 

“That’s what attics are for,” I said, starting to feel a little more 
normal. “Whoever heard of keeping new stuff in an attic?” 

“Ha-ha,” Lefty laughed sarcastically. 

“Where’s that mirror?” Erin asked, stepping into the center of the 
room. “The one that made that weird optical illusion last Saturday.” 

“It wasn’t an optical illusion,” I blurted out. I didn’t really feel 
like messing with the mirror anymore. Pd had enough scares for one 
afternoon. But the words just tumbled out of me. 

I can never keep a secret. It’s a real character flaw. 

“What do you mean?” Erin asked, very interested. She walked 
past me, heading to the open doorway of the little room. 

“You mean that wasn’t an optical illusion last week?” April asked, 
following her. 

“No, not really,” I said, glancing at Lefty, who hadn’t budged 
from the windowsill across the large room. “The mirror has strange 
powers or something. It really can turn you invisible.” 

April laughed scornfully. “Yeah. Right,” she said. “And I’m going 
to fly to Mars in a flying saucer tonight after dinner.” 

“Give me a break,” I muttered. I turned my eyes to Erin. “I’m 
serious.” 

Erin stared back at me, her face filled with doubt. “You’re trying 
to tell us that you’ve gone in that room and become invisible?” 

“Tm not trying to tell you,” I replied heatedly. “I am telling you!” 

April laughed. 

Erin continued to stare at me, studying my face. “You are 
serious,” she decided. 


“It’s a trick mirror,” April told her. “That’s all. That light on top of 
it is so bright, it makes your eyes go weird.” 

“Show us,” Erin said to me. 

“Yeah. Show them!” Lefty exclaimed eagerly. He jumped up from 
the windowsill and started running to the little room. “Pll go this 
time! Let me do it!” 

“No way,” I said. 

“Let me try it,” Erin volunteered. 

“Hey, do you know who else is here?” I asked the girls, following 
them to the room. “Zack is here.” I called to him. “Hey, Zack. Erin 
wants to go invisible. Think we should let her?” 

I stepped into the room. “Zack?” 

“Where’s he hiding?” Erin asked. 

I uttered a silent gasp. 

The mirror light was on. Zack was gone. 


10 


“Oh, no!” I cried. “I don’t believe this!” 

Lefty laughed. “Zack’s invisible,” he told Erin and April. 

“Zack—where are you?” I demanded angrily. 

Suddenly, the softball floated up from Lefty’s hand. “Hey, give 
that back!” Lefty shouted, and grabbed for it. But invisible Zack pulled 
the ball out of Lefty’s reach. 

Erin and April were both gaping at the ball as it floated in midair, 
their eyes bulging, their mouths wide open. 

“Hi, girls,” Zack called in a booming, deep voice that floated from 
in front of the mirror. 

April screamed and grabbed Erin’s arm. 

“Zack, stop kidding around. How long have you been invisible?” I 
asked. 

“I don’t know.” The ball flew back to Lefty, who dropped it and 
had to chase it out into the attic. 

“How long, Zack?” I repeated. 

“About five minutes, maybe,” he replied. 

“When you chased after Lefty, I turned on the light and went 
invisible. Then I heard you talking to Erin and April.” 

“You’ve been invisible the whole time?” I asked, feeling really 
nervous and upset. 

“Yeah. This is awesome!” he exclaimed. But then his tone grew 
doubtful. “I—I’m starting to feel kinda funny, though, Max.” 

“Funny?” Erin asked, staring at where Zack’s voice seemed to be 
coming from. “What do you mean ‘funny’?” 

“Kinda dizzy,” Zack replied weakly. “Everything’s kind of 
breaking up. You know. Like a bad TV picture. I mean, you’re starting 
to fade, to seem far away.” 

“I’m bringing you back,” I said. And without waiting for Zack to 
reply, I reached up and pulled the light chain. 

The light clicked off. Darkness seemed to roll into the room, 
filling the mirror with gray shadows. 

“Where is he?” April cried. “It didn’t work. He isn’t back.” 

“It takes a while,” I explained. 

“How long?” April asked. 

“I don’t really know,” I said. 

“Why aren’t I back?” Zack asked. He was standing right beside 
me. I could feel his breath on my neck. “I can’t see myself.” He 


sounded very frightened. 

“Don’t get tense,” I said, forcing myself to sound calm. “You know 
it takes a while. Especially since you stayed invisible so long.” 

“But how long?” Zack wailed. “Shouldn’t I be back by now? You 
were back by now. I remember.” 

“Just stay cool,” I told him, even though my stomach was 
churning and my throat was dry. 

“This is too scary. I hate this!” April moaned. 

“Be patient,” I repeated softly. “Everybody just be patient.” 

We all stared from the spot where we thought Zack was standing 
to the mirror, then back again. 

“Zack, how do you feel?” Erin asked, her voice trembling. 

“Weird,” Zack replied. “Like I’m never coming back.” 

“Don’t say that!” I snapped. 

“But that’s how I feel,” Zack said sadly. “Like I’m never coming 
back.” 

“Just chill,” I said. “Everybody. Just chill.” 

We stood in silence. Watching. Waiting. 

Waiting. 

I was never so frightened in all my life. 


11 


“Do something!” Zack, still invisible, pleaded. “Max—you’ve got to do 
something!” 

“Id better get Mom,” Lefty stammered. He dropped the 
softball to the floor and started to the door. 

“Mom? What could Mom do?” I cried in a panic. 

“But I’d better get somebody!” Lefty declared. 

At that moment, Zack shimmered back into view. “Wow!” He 
uttered a long, breathless sigh of relief and slumped to his knees on 
the floor. 

“Yaaaay!” Erin cried happily, clapping her hands as we all 
gathered around Zack. 

“How do you feel?” I asked, grabbing his shoulders. I think I 
wanted to know for sure that he was really back. 

“Tm back!” Zack proclaimed, smiling. “That’s all I care about.” 

“That was really scary,” April said quietly, hands shoved into the 
pockets of her white tennis shorts. “I mean, really.” 

“I wasn’t scared,” Zack said, suddenly changing his tune. “I knew 
there was no problem.” 

Do you believe this guy? 

One second, he’s whining and wailing, begging me to do 
something. 

The next second, he’s pretending he had the time of his life. 
Mister Confident. 

“What did it feel like?” Erin asked, resting one hand on the 
wooden mirror frame. 

“Awesome,” Zack replied. He climbed unsteadily to his feet. 
“Really. It was totally awesome! I want to get invisible again before 
school on Monday so I can go spy in the girls’ locker room!” 

“Zack, you're a pig!” Erin declared disgustedly. 

“What’s the point of being invisible if you can’t spy on girls?” 
Zack asked. 

“Are you sure you’re okay?” I asked, genuinely concerned. “You 
look kind of shaky to me.” 

“Well, I started to feel a little strange at the end,” Zack confessed, 
scratching the back of his head. 

“How do you mean?” I asked. 

“Well, like I was being pulled away. Away from the room. Away 
from you guys.” 


“Pulled where?” I demanded. 

He shrugged. “I don’t know. I only know one thing.” A smile 
began to form on his face, and his blue eyes seemed to light up. 

Uh-oh, I thought. 

“I only know one thing,” Zack repeated. 

“What?” I had to ask. 

“Tm the new invisible champ. I stayed invisible longer than you. 
At least five minutes. Longer than anybody.” 

“But I haven’t had a turn!” Erin protested. 

“I don’t want a turn!” April declared. 

“Chicken?” Zack teased her. 

“I think you’re stupid for messing around with this,” April said 
heatedly. “It isn’t a toy, you know. You don’t know anything about it. 
You don’t know what it really does to your body.” 

“I feel fine!” Zack told her, and pounded his chest with both 
hands like a gorilla to prove it. He glanced at the dark mirror. “I’m 
ready to go back—even longer.” 

“I want to get invisible and go outside and play tricks on people,” 
Lefty said enthusiastically. “Can I go next, Max?” 

“I—I don’t think so....” 

I was thinking about what April had said. We really were messing 
around with something that could be dangerous, something we didn’t 
know anything about. 

“Max has to go again,” Zack said, slapping me hard on the back, 
nearly sending me sprawling against the mirror. “To beat my record.” 
He grinned at me. “Unless you’re chicken, too.” 

“Tm not chicken!” I insisted. “I just think—” 

“Youre chicken,” Zack accused, laughing scornfully. He started 
clucking loudly, flapping his arms like a chicken. 

“I’m not chicken. Let me go,” Lefty pleaded. “I can break Zack’s 
record.” 

“It’s my turn,” Erin insisted. “You guys have all had turns. I 
haven’t gone once yet!” 

“Okay,” I said with a shrug. “You go first, Erin. Then me.” I was 
glad Erin was so eager to do it. I really didn’t feel like getting invisible 
again just yet. 

To be honest, I felt very fluttery and nervous. 

“Me next!” Lefty insisted. “Me next! Me next!” He started 
chanting the words over and over. 

I clamped my hand over his mouth. “Maybe we should all go 
downstairs,” I suggested. 

“Chicken?” Zack teased. “You’re chickening out?” 


“I don’t know, Zack,” I replied honestly. “I think—” I saw Erin 
staring at me. Was that disappointment on her face? Did Erin think I 
was a chicken, too? 

“Okay,” I said. “Go ahead, Erin. You go. Then Pll go. Then Lefty. 
We'll all beat Zack’s record.” 

Erin and Lefty clapped. April groaned and rolled her eyes. Zack 
grinned. 

It’s no big deal, I told myself. I’ve done it three times already. It’s 
perfectly painless. And if you just stay cool and wait patiently, you 
come right back the way you were. 

“Does anyone have a watch?” Erin asked. “We need to keep time 
so I know what time I have to beat.” 

I could see that Erin was really into this competition. 

Lefty seemed really excited, too. And of course Zack would 
compete in anything. 

Only April was unhappy about the whole thing. She walked 
silently to the back of the room and sat down on the floor with her 
back against the wall, her arms folded over her knees. 

“Hey, you’re the only one with a watch,” Erin called to April. “So 
you be the timer, okay?” 

April nodded without enthusiasm. She raised her wrist and stared 
down at her watch. “Okay. Get ready.” 

Erin took a deep breath and stepped up to the mirror. She closed 
her eyes, reached up, and tugged the light chain. 

The light came on with a bright flash. Erin disappeared. 

“Oh, wow!” she cried. “This is way cool!” 

“How does it feel?” April called from behind us, her eyes glancing 
from the mirror to her watch. 

“I don’t feel any different at all,” Erin said. “What a great way to 
lose weight!” 

“Fifteen seconds,” April announced. 

Lefty’s hair suddenly stood straight up in the air. “Cut it out, 
Erin!” he shouted, twisting away from her invisible hands. 

We heard Erin laugh from somewhere near Lefty. 

Then we heard her footsteps as she walked out of the room and 
into the attic. We saw an old coat rise up into the air and dance 
around. After it dropped back into its carton, we saw an old magazine 
fly up and its pages appear to flip rapidly. 

“This is so much fun!” Erin called to us. The magazine dropped 
back onto the stack. “I can’t wait to go outside like this and really 
scare people!” 

“One minute,” April called. She hadn’t moved from her sitting 
position against the wall. 


Erin moved around the attic for a while, making things fly and 
float. Then she returned to the little room to admire herself in the 
mirror. 

“Pm really invisible!” we heard her exclaim excitedly. “Just like 
in a movie or something!” 

“Yeah. Great special effects!” I said. 

“Three minutes,” April announced. 

Erin continued to enjoy herself until about four minutes had 
passed. Then her voice suddenly changed. She started to sound 
doubtful, frightened. 

“J—I don’t like this,” she said. “I feel kind of strange.” 

April jumped to her feet and ran up to me. “Bring her back!” she 
demanded. “Hurry!” 

I hesitated. 

“Yes. Bring me back,” Erin said weakly. 

“But you haven’t beaten my record!” Zack declared. “Are you sure 
—?” 

“Yes. Please. I don’t feel right.” Erin suddenly sounded far away. 

I stepped up to the mirror and pulled the chain. The light clicked 
off. 

We waited for Frin to return. 

“How do you feel?” I asked. 

“Just... weird,” she replied. She was standing right next to me, 
but I still couldn’t see her. 

It took nearly three minutes for Erin to reappear. Three very tense 
minutes. 

When she shimmered back into view, she shook herself like a dog 
shaking water off after a bath. Then she grinned at us reassuringly. 
“Tm okay. It was really terrific. Except for the last few seconds.” 

“You didn’t beat my record,” Zack reported happily. “You came 
so close. But you folded. Just like a girl.” 

“Hey—” Erin gave Zack a hard shove. “Stop being such a jerk.” 

“But you only had fifteen seconds to go, and you wimped out!” 
Zack told her. 

“I don’t care,” Erin insisted, frowning angrily at him. “It was 
really neat. lll beat your record next time, Zack.” 

“Tm going to be the winner,” Lefty announced. “I’m going to stay 
invisible for a whole day. Maybe two!” 

“Whoa!” I cried. “That might be dangerous, Lefty.” 

“Tt’s Max’s turn next,” Zack announced. “Unless you want to 
forfeit.” 

“No way,” I said, glancing at Erin. Reluctantly, I stepped up to the 


mirror and took a deep breath. “Okay, Zack, say good-bye to your 
record,” I said, trying to sound calm and confident. 

I didn’t really want to do it, I admitted to myself. But I didn’t 
want to look like a chicken in front of the others. For one thing, if I 
did wimp out, I knew that Lefty would only remind me of it twenty or 
thirty times a day for the rest of my life. 

So I decided to go ahead and do it. 

“One thing,” I said to Zack. “When I call out ‘ready’, that means I 
want to come back. So when I say ‘ready’, you pull the light chain as 
fast as you can—okay?” 

“Gotcha,” Zack replied, his expression turning serious. “Don’t 
worry. Illl bring you back instantly.” He snapped his fingers. “Like 
that. Remember, Max, you’ve got to beat five minutes.” 

“Okay. Here goes,” I said, staring at my reflection in the mirror. 

I suddenly had a bad feeling about this. 

A real bad feeling. 

But I reached up and pulled on the light anyway. 


12 


When the glaring light dimmed, I stared hard into the mirror. 

The reflections were bright and clear. Against the back wall, I 
could see April, slumped on the floor, staring intently at her watch. 

Lefty stood near the wall to the right, gaping at the spot where I 
had stood, a silly grin on his face. Zack stood next to him, his arms 
crossed over his chest, also staring into the mirror. Erin leaned against 
the wall to the left. Her eyes were on the light above the mirror frame. 

And where was I? 

Standing right in front of the mirror. Right in the center of it. 
Staring at their reflections. Staring at the spot where my reflection 
should be. 

Only it wasn’t. 

I felt perfectly normal. 

Experimenting, I kicked the floor. My invisible sneakers made the 
usual scraping sound. 

I grabbed my left arm with my right hand and squeezed it. It felt 
perfectly normal. 

“Hi, everyone,” I said. I sounded the same as ever. 

Only I was invisible. 

I glanced up at the light, casting a yellow rectangle down onto the 
mirror. What was the light’s power? I wondered. 

Did it do something to your molecules? Make them break apart 
somehow so you couldn’t be seen? 

No. That wasn’t a good theory. If your molecules broke up, you’d 
have to feel it. And you wouldn’t be able to kick the floor, or squeeze 
your arm, or talk. 

So what did the light do? Did it cover you up somehow? Did the 
light form some kind of blanket? A covering that hid you from 
yourself and everyone else? 

What a mystery! 

I had the feeling I’d never be able to figure it out, never know the 
answer. 

I turned my eyes away from the light. It was starting to hurt my 
eyes. 

I closed my eyes, but the bright glare stayed with me. Two white 
circles that refused to dim. 

“How do you feel, Max?” Erin’s voice broke into my thoughts. 

“Okay, I guess,” I said. My voice sounded weird to me, kind of far 


away. 

“Four minutes, thirty seconds,” April announced. 

“The time went so fast,” I said. 

At least, I thought I said it. I realized I couldn’t tell if I was saying 
the words or just thinking them. 

The bright yellow light glowed even brighter. 

I had the sudden feeling that it was pouring over me, surrounding 


Pulling me. 

“I—I feel weird,” I said. 

No response. 

Could they hear me? 

The light folded over me. I felt myself begin to float. 

It was a frightening feeling. As if I were losing control of my 
body. 

“Ready!” I screamed. “Zack—ready! Can you hear me, Zack?” 

It seemed to take Zack hours to reply. “Okay,” I heard him say. 
His voice sounded so tiny, so far away. 

Miles and miles away. 

“Ready!” I cried. “Ready!” 

“Okay!” Again I heard Zack’s voice. 

But the light was so bright, so blindingly bright. Waves of yellow 
light rolling over me. Ocean waves of light. 

Sweeping me away with it. 

“Pull the chain, Zack!” I screamed. At least, I think I was 
screaming. 

The light was tugging me so hard, dragging me away, far, far 
away. 

I knew I would float away. Float forever. 

Unless Zack pulled the chain and brought me back. 

“Pull it! Pull it! Please—pull it!” 

“Okay.” 

I saw Zack step up to the mirror. 

He was blurred in shadows. He stepped through dark shadows, on 
the other side of the light. 

So far away. 

I felt so feather light. 

I could see Zack in the shadows. He jumped up. He grabbed the 
lamp chain. 

He pulled it down hard. 

The light didn’t click off. It glowed even brighter. 

And then I saw Zack’s face fill with horror. 


He held up his hand. He was trying to show me something. 

He had the chain in his hand. 

“Max, the chain—” he stammered. “It broke off. I can’t turn off 
the light!” 


13 


Beyond the shimmering wall of yellow light, Zack’s outstretched hand 
came clearly into my view. The dark chain dangled from his hand like 
a dead snake. 

“It broke off!” he was crying, sounding very alarmed. 

I stared through the light at the chain, feeling myself hovering 
beside Zack, floating, fading. 

Somewhere far in the distance, April was screaming. I couldn’t 
make out her words. 

Lefty stood frozen in the center of the room. It seemed strange to 
see him standing so still. He was always moving, always bouncing, 
running, falling. But now he, too, stood staring at the chain. 

The light shimmered brighter. 

I saw sudden movement. 

Someone was crossing the room. I struggled to focus. 

It was Erin. She was dragging a large cardboard box across the 
floor. The scraping sound it made seemed so far away. 

Feeling myself being pulled away, I struggled to watch her. She 
pulled the box next to the mirror. Then she climbed up onto it. 

I saw her reaching up to the lamp. I saw her staring into the light. 

I wanted to ask her what she was doing, but I was too far away. I 
was floating off. I felt so light, so feather light. 

And as I floated, the yellow light spread over me. It covered me. 
Pulled me. 

And then with startling suddenness, it was gone. 

And all was darkness. 

“I did it!” Erin proclaimed. 

I heard her explaining to the others. “There was a little bit of 
chain left up there. I pulled it and turned off the light.” Her eyes 
darted frantically around the room, searching for me. “Max—are you 
okay? Can you hear me?” 

“Yeah. I’m okay,” I replied. 

I felt better. Stronger. Closer. 

I stepped up to the mirror and searched for my reflection. 

“That was scary,” Lefty said behind me. 

“I can feel myself coming back,” I told them. 

“What was his time?” Zack asked April. 

April’s features were tight with worry. Sitting against the wall, 
she looked pale and uncomfortable. “Five forty-eight,” she told Zack. 


And then quickly added, “I really think this stupid competition is a big 
mistake.” 

“You beat my record!” Zack groaned, turning to where he figured 
I was standing. “I don’t believe it! Almost six minutes!” 

‘Tm going for longer than that,” Lefty said, pushing past Zack and 
stepping up to the mirror. 

“We have to fix the chain first,” Erin told him. “It’s too hard to 
keep climbing up on a box to pull that little piece of chain.” 

“I felt pretty strange at the end,” I told them, still waiting to 
reappear. “The light grew brighter and brighter.” 

“Did you feel like you were being pulled away?” Erin asked. 

“Yeah,” I replied. “Like I was fading or something.” 

“That’s how I started to feel,” Erin cried. 

“This is just so dangerous,” April said, shaking her head. 

I popped back. 

My knees buckled and I almost fell to the floor. But I grabbed the 
mirror and held myself up. After a few seconds, my legs felt strong 
again. I took a few steps and regained my balance. 

“What if we couldn’t turn off the light?” April demanded, 
climbing to her feet, brushing the dust off the back of her jeans with 
both hands. “What if the chain completely broke and the light stayed 
on? What then?” 

I shrugged. “I don’t know.” 

“You broke my record,” Zack said, making a disgusted face. “That 
means I have to have another turn.” 

“No way!” Lefty shouted. “It’s my turn next!” 

“None of you are listening to me!” April cried. “Answer my 
question. What if one of you is invisible and the light won’t go out?” 

“That won’t happen,” Zack told her. He pulled a string from his 
pocket. “Here. I’m going to tie this tightly to the chain.” He climbed 
up onto the box and began to work. “Pull the string. The light goes 
out,” he told April. “No problem.” 

“Which one of us is going to be first to get invisible and then go 
outside?” Erin asked. 

“I want to go to school and terrorize Miss Hawkins,” Lefty said, 
snickering. Miss Hawkins is his social studies teacher. “She’s been 
terrorizing me ever since school started. Wouldn’t it be cool just to 
sneak up behind her and say, ‘Hi, Miss Hawkins’? And she’d turn 
around and there’d be no one there?” 

“That’s the best you can do?” Erin scoffed. “Lefty, where’s your 
imagination? Don’t you want to make the chalk fly out of her hand, 
and the chalkboard erasers fly across the room, and the wastebasket 
spill everything out on her desk, and her yogurt fly into her face?” 


“Yeah! That’s way cool!” Lefty exclaimed. 

I laughed. It was a funny idea. The four of us could go around, 
completely invisible, doing whatever we wanted. We could wreck the 
whole school in ten minutes! Everyone would be screaming and 
running out the doors. What a goof! 

“We can’t do it now,” Lefty said, interrupting my thoughts. 
“Because it’s my turn to beat the record.” He turned back to April, 
who was standing tensely by the door, pulling at a strand of her black 
hair, a worried frown on her face. “Ready to time me?” 

“I guess,” she replied, sighing. 

Lefty pushed me out of the way. He stepped in front of the mirror, 
stared at his reflection, and reached for the string. 


14 


“Lefty!” a voice shouted from behind us. “Lefty!” 

Startled by the interruption, I uttered an alarmed cry. Lefty 
stepped back from the mirror. 

“Lefty, tell your brother his friends have to leave! It’s dinnertime. 
Grammy and Poppy are here. They’re eager to see you!” 

It was Mom, calling up from downstairs. 

“Okay, Mom. We'll be right down!” I shouted quickly. I didn’t 
want her to come up. 

“But that’s not fair!” Lefty whined. “I didn’t get my turn.” 

He stepped back up to the mirror and angrily grabbed for the 
string again. 

“Put it down,” I told him sternly. “We have to go downstairs. 
Quick. We don’t want Mom or Dad coming up here and seeing the 
mirror, do we?” 

“Okay, okay,” Lefty grumbled. “But next time, I get to go first.” 

“And then me,” Zack said, heading toward the stairs. “I get a 
chance to beat your record, Max.” 

“Everybody, stop talking about it,” I warned as we all clomped 
down the stairs. “Talk about something else. We don’t want them to 
overhear anything.” 

“Can we come over tomorrow?” Erin asked. “We could start up 
the contest again.” 

“Tm busy tomorrow,” April said. 

“We can’t do it tomorrow,” I replied. “We’re visiting my cousins 
in Springfield.” I was sorry they’d reminded me. My cousins have this 
humongous sheepdog that likes to run through the mud and then 
jump on me and wipe its hairy paws all over my clothes. Not my idea 
of a good time. 

“There’s no school on Wednesday,” Zack said. “Teachers’ 
meetings, I think. Maybe we could all come over on Wednesday.” 

“Maybe,” I said. 

We stepped into the hallway. Everyone stopped talking. I could 
see that my grandparents and parents were already sitting at the 
dining room table. Grammy and Poppy liked to eat promptly. If their 
dinner came one minute late, it made them real cranky for the rest of 
the day. 

I ushered my friends out quickly, reminding them not to tell 
anyone about what we’d been doing. Zack asked again if Wednesday 


would be okay, and again I told him I wasn’t sure. 

Getting invisible was really exciting, really thrilling. But it also 
made me nervous. I wasn’t sure I wanted to do it again so soon. 

“Please!” Zack begged. He couldn’t wait to get invisible again and 
beat my record. He couldn’t stand it that he wasn’t the champ. 

I closed the front door behind them and hurried to the dining 
room to greet my grandparents. They were already slurping their soup 
when I came in. 

“Hi, Grammy. Hi, Poppy.” I walked around the table and gave 
them each a kiss on the cheek. Grammy smelled of oranges. Her cheek 
felt soft and mushy. 

Grammy and Poppy are the names I gave them when I was a kid. 
It’s really embarrassing to call them that now, but I still do. I don’t 
have much choice. They even call each other Grammy and Poppy! 

They look alike, almost like brother and sister. I guess that’s what 
happens when you’ve been married a hundred years. They both have 
long, thin faces and short white hair. They both wear thick glasses 
with silver wire frames. They’re both really skinny. And they both 
have sad eyes and sad expressions. 

I didn’t feel like sitting there at dinner and making small talk with 
them today. I was still really pumped about what we’d been doing all 
afternoon. 

Being invisible was just so weird and exciting. 

I wanted to be by myself and think about it. You know. Try to 
relive it, relive what it felt like. 

A lot of times after I’ve done something really exciting or 
interesting, I like to go up to my room, lie down on my bed, and just 
think about it. Analyze it. Tear it apart. 

Dad says I have a very scientific mind. I guess he’s right. 

I walked over to my place at the table. 

“You’re looking much shorter,” Poppy said, wiping his mouth 
with his cloth napkin. That was one of his standard jokes. He said it 
every time he saw me. 

I forced a laugh and sat down. 

“Your soup must be ice cold by now,” Grammy said, clicking her 
tongue. “Nothing I hate more than cold soup. I mean, what’s the point 
of having soup if it isn’t steaming hot?” 

“It tastes okay,” I said, taking a spoonful. 

“We had some delicious cold soup last summer,” Poppy said. He 
loved to contradict Grammy and start arguments with her. 
“Strawberry soup, remember? You wouldn’t want that hot, would 
you?” 

“It wasn’t strawberry,” Grammy told him, frowning. “It wasn’t 


even soup. It was some kind of fancy yogurt.” 

“No, it wasn’t,” Poppy insisted. “It was definitely cold soup.” 

“You’re wrong, as usual,” Grammy snapped. 

This could get ugly, I thought. “What kind of soup is this?” I 
asked, trying to stop their arguing. 

“Chicken noodle,” Mom answered quickly. “Didn’t you recognize 
it?” 

“Poppy and I had soup a few weeks ago that we couldn’t 
recognize,” my grandmother said, shaking her head. “I had to ask the 
waiter what it was. It didn’t look like what we’d ordered at all. Some 
kind of potato-leek soup, wasn’t it, Poppy?” 

Poppy took a long time swallowing some noodles. “No. Tomato,” 
he answered. 

“Where’s your brother?” Dad asked, staring at the empty chair 
next to me. 

“Huh?” I reacted with surprise. I had been so busy listening to my 
grandparents’ silly soup arguments, I had forgotten all about Lefty. 

“His soup is getting cold,” Poppy said. 

“You'll have to heat it up for him,” Grammy said, tsk-tsking 
again. 

“So where is he?” Dad asked. 

I shrugged. “He was right behind me,” I said. I turned toward the 
dining room doorway and shouted, “Lefty! Lef-teeeee!” 

“Don’t shout at the table,” Mom scolded. “Get up and go find 
him.” 

“Is there any more soup?” Poppy asked. “I didn’t really get 
enough.” 

I put my napkin down and started to get up. But before I was out 
of my chair, I saw Lefty’s soup bowl rise up into the air. 

Oh, no! I thought. 

I knew instantly what was happening. 

My idiot brother had made himself invisible, and now he thought 
he was being funny, trying to scare the daylights out of everyone at 
the table. 

The soup bowl floated up over Lefty’s place. 

I stood up and lunged for it and pulled it down as fast as I could. 

“Get out!” I whispered loudly to Lefty. 

“What did you say?” my mom asked, gaping at me. 

“I said Pm getting out and going to find Lefty,” I told her, 
thinking quickly. 

“Get out—now!” I whispered to Lefty. 

“Stop talking about finding him. Just go do it,” my mom said 


impatiently. 

I stood up just as my dumb invisible brother raised his water 
glass. The glass floated up over the table. 

I gasped and grabbed for it. 

But I grabbed too hard. I jerked the glass, and water spilled all 
over the table. 

“Hey!” Mom screamed. 

I pulled the glass down to its place. 

Then I looked up. Dad was glaring at me, his eyes burning angrily 
into mine. 

He knows, I thought, a heavy feeling of dread sweeping over me. 

He saw what just happened, and he knows. 

Lefty has spoiled it for everyone. 


15 


Dad glared angrily across the table at me. 

I waited for him to say, “Max, why is your brother invisible?” But 
instead, he yelled, “Stop fooling around, Max. We don’t appreciate 
your comedy act. Just get up and find your brother.” 

I was so relieved. Dad hadn’t realized what was really happening, 
after all. He thought I was just goofing. 

“Is there seconds on the soup?” I heard Poppy ask again as I 
gratefully pushed away from the table and hurried out of the dining 
room. 

“You’ve had enough,” Grammy scolded. 

“No, I haven’t!” 

I made my way quickly through the living room, taking long 
strides, climbed to the second floor, and stopped in the hallway at the 
door to the attic stairs. “Lefty?” I whispered. “I hope you followed 
me.” 

‘Tm here,” Lefty whispered back. I couldn’t see him, of course, 
but he was right beside me. 

“What’s the big idea?” I demanded angrily. I wasn’t angry. I was 
furious. “Are you trying to win the stupid championship?” 

Lefty didn’t care that I was upset. He started to giggle. 

“Shut up!” I whispered. “Just shut up! You really are a dork!” 

I clicked on the attic light and clomped angrily up the stairs. I 
could hear his sneakers clomping up behind mine. 

He was still giggling at the top of the stairs. “I win!” he declared. 
I felt a hand slap me hard on the back. 

“Stop it, jerk!” I screamed, storming into the little room that 
housed the mirror. “Don’t you realize you nearly spoiled it for 
everybody?” 

“But I win!” he repeated gleefully. 

The lamp over the mirror was shining brightly, the reflection 
glaring sun-yellow in the mirror. 

I really couldn’t believe Lefty. He was usually a pretty selfish kid. 
But not this selfish! 

“Don’t you realize the trouble you could have gotten us into?” I 
cried. 

“I win! I win!” he chanted. 

“Why? How long have you been invisible?” I asked. I stepped up 
to the mirror and pulled the string. The light went out. The glare 


remained in my eyes. 

“Ever since you guys went downstairs,” Lefty, still invisible, 
bragged. 

“That’s almost ten minutes!” I exclaimed. 

“Tm the champ!” Lefty proclaimed. 

I stared into the mirror, waiting for him to reappear. 

“The stupidity champ,” I repeated. “This was the dumbest thing 
you’ve ever done.” 

He didn’t say anything. Finally, he asked in a quiet voice, “Why is 
it taking so long for me to come back?” 

Before I could answer, I heard Dad calling from downstairs: 
“Max? Are you two up there?” 

“Yeah. We’ll be right down,” I shouted. 

“What are you two doing up there?” Dad demanded. I heard him 
start to climb the stairs. 

I ran to the top of the stairs to head him off. “Sorry, Dad,” I said. 
“We’re coming.” 

Dad stared up at me in the stairwell. “What on earth is so 
interesting up there?” 

“Just a lot of old stuff,” I muttered. “Nothing, really.” 

Lefty appeared behind me, looking like his old self. Dad 
disappeared back to the dining room. Lefty and I started down the 
stairs. 

“Wow, that was awesome!” Lefty exclaimed. 

“Didn’t you start to feel weird after a while?” I asked him, 
whispering even though we were alone. 

“No.” He shook his head. “I felt fine. It was really awesome! You 
should have seen the look on your face when I made the soup bowl 
float up in the air!” He started giggling again, that high-pitched giggle 
of his that I hate. 

“Listen, Lefty,” I warned, stopping at the bottom of the stairs, 
blocking his way to the hallway. “Getting invisible is fun, but it could 
be dangerous. You—” 

“It’s awesome!” he repeated. “And I’m the new champ.” 

“Listen to me,” I said heatedly, grabbing him by the shoulders. 
“Just listen. You’ve got to promise me that you won’t go up there and 
get invisible by yourself again. I mean it. You’ve got to wait till 
someone else is around. Promise?” I squeezed his shoulders hard. 

“Okay, okay,” he said, trying to squirm away. “I promise.” 

I looked down. He had his fingers crossed on both hands. 


Erin called me later that night. It was about eleven. I was in my 
pajamas, reading a book in bed, thinking about going downstairs and 


begging my parents to let me stay up and watch Saturday Night Live. 

Erin sounded really excited. She didn’t even say hello. Just started 
talking a mile a minute in that squeaky mouse voice, so fast I had 
trouble understanding her. 

“What about the science fair?” I asked, holding the phone away 
from my ear, hoping that would help me understand her better. 

“The winning project,” Erin said breathlessly. “The prize is a 
silver trophy and a gift certificate at Video World. Remember?” 

“Yeah. So?” I still wasn’t following her. I think I was sleepier than 
Pd thought. It had been a nervous, tiring day, after all. 

“Well, what if you brought the mirror to school?” Erin asked 
excitedly. “You know. I would make you go invisible. Then Pd bring 
you back, and Id get invisible. That could be our project.” 

“But, Erin—” I started to protest. 

“Wed win!” she interrupted. “We’d have to win! I mean, what 
else could beat it? We’d win first prize. And we’d be famous!” 

“Whoa!” I cried. “Famous?” 

“Of course. Famous!” she exclaimed. “Our picture would be in 
People magazine and everything!” 

“Erin, I’m not so sure about this,” I said softly, thinking hard. 

“Huh? Not so sure about what?” 

“Not so sure I want to be famous,” I replied. “I mean, I really 
don’t know if I want the whole world to know about the mirror.” 

“Why not?” she demanded impatiently. “Everyone wants to be 
famous. And rich.” 

“But they’ll take away the mirror,” I explained. “It’s an amazing 
thing, Erin. I mean, is it magic? Is it electronic? Is it someone’s 
invention? Whatever it is, it’s unbelievable! And they’re not going to 
let a kid keep it.” 

“But it’s yours!” she insisted. 

“They'll take it away to study it. Scientists will want it. 
Government guys will want it. Army guys. They’ll probably want to 
use it to make the army invisible or something.” 

“Scary,” Erin mumbled thoughtfully. 

“Yeah. Scary,” I said. “So I don’t know. I’ve got to think about 
this. A lot. In the meantime, it’s got to be a secret.” 

“Yeah, I guess,” she said doubtfully. “But think about the science 
fair, Max. We could win the prize. We really could.” 

“PI think about it,” I told her. 

I haven’t thought about anything else! I realized. 

“April wants to try it,” she said. 

“Huh?” 


“I convinced her. I told her it didn’t hurt or anything. So she 
wants to try it on Wednesday. We are going to do it on Wednesday, 
aren’t we, Max?” 

“I guess,” I replied reluctantly. “Since everyone wants to.” 

“Great!” she exclaimed. “I think PII beat your record.” 

“The new record is ten minutes,” I informed her. I explained 
about Lefty and his dinnertime adventure. 

“Your brother is really a nut,” Erin remarked. 

I agreed with her, then said good night. 

I couldn’t get to sleep that night. I tried sleeping on one side, then 
the other. I tried counting sheep. Everything. 

I knew I was sleepy. But my heart was racing. I just couldn’t get 
comfortable. I stared up at the ceiling, thinking about the mirror in 
the little room above me. 

It was nearly three in the morning when I crept barefoot out of 
my room, wide awake, and headed up to the attic. As before, I leaned 
heavily on the banister as I climbed, trying to keep the wooden stairs 
from their usual symphony of creaks and groans. 

In my hurry to get to the little room, I stubbed my toe on the 
corner of a wooden crate. 

“Ow!” I screamed as quietly as possible. I wanted to hop up and 
down, but I forced myself to stand still, and waited for the pain to 
fade. 

As soon as I could walk again, I made my way into the little 
room. I pulled a carton in front of the mirror and sat down on it. 

My toe still throbbed, but I tried to ignore it. I stared at my dark 
reflection in the mirror, studying my hair first, of course. It was totally 
messed up, but I really didn’t care. 

Then I peered beyond my reflection, behind it. I guess I was 
trying to look deep into the glass. I don’t really know what I was 
doing or why I was up there. 

I was so tired and pumped up at the same time, so curious and 
confused, sleepy and nervous. 

I ran a hand along the glass, surprised again at how cool it felt in 
the hot, nearly airless little room. I pushed my open hand against the 
glass, then pulled it away. It left no handprint. 

I moved my hand to the wooden frame, once again rubbing the 
smooth wood. I stood up and slowly walked around to the back of the 
mirror. It was too dark back here to really examine it carefully. But 
there wasn’t anything to examine. The back of the frame was smooth, 
plain, and uninteresting. 

I came back around to the front and gazed up at the light. It 
looked like an ordinary lamp. Nothing at all special about it. The bulb 


was an odd shape, long and very thin. But it looked like an ordinary 
light bulb. 

Sitting back down on the carton, I rested my head in my hands 
and stared drowsily into the mirror. I yawned silently. 

I knew I should go back downstairs and go to sleep. Mom and 
Dad were going to wake us up early the next morning to drive to 
Springfield. 

But something was holding me there. 

My curiosity, I guess. 

I don’t know how long I sat there, still as a statue, watching my 
own unmoving reflection. It may have been just a minute or two. Or it 
might have been half an hour. 

But after a while, as I stared into the mirror, the reflection 
seemed to lose its sharpness. Now I found myself staring at vague 
shapes, blurred colors, deepening shadows. 

And then I heard the soft whisper. 

“Maaaaaaaax. ” 

Like the wind through the trees. The hushed shaking of leaves. 

Not a voice at all. Not even a whisper. 

Just the hint of a whisper. 

“Maaaaaaaaax.” 

At first, I thought it was inside my own head. 

So faint. So soft. But so near. 

I held my breath, listened hard. 

Silence now. 

So it was inside my head, I told myself. I was imagining it. 

I took a deep breath, let it out slowly. 

“Maaaaax.” 

Again, the whisper. 

Louder this time. Sad, somehow. Almost a plea. A call for help. 
From far, far away. 

“Maaaaaaaax.” 

I raised my hands to my ears. Was I trying to shut it out? To see if 
I could make it go away? 

Inside the mirror, the dark reflected shapes shifted slowly. I 
stared back at myself, my expression tense, frightened. I realized I was 
chilled from head to foot. My whole body shivered from the cold. 

“Maaaaax.” 

The whisper, I realized, was coming from the mirror. 

From my own reflection? From somewhere behind my reflection? 

I leapt to my feet, turned away, and ran. My bare feet slapped 
against the hardwood floor. I plunged down the stairs, flew across the 


hall, dived into my bed. 
I shut my eyes tight and prayed the frightening whisper wouldn’t 
follow me. 


16 


I pulled the covers up to my chin. I felt so cold. My entire body was 
trembling. 

I was breathing hard, gripping the top of the blanket with both 
hands, waiting, listening. 

Would the whispers follow me into my room? Were they real, or 
only in my head? 

Who was calling to me, whispering my name in that sad, 
desperate voice? 

Suddenly I heard panting louder than mine. I felt hot breath on 
my face. Sour-smelling and moist. 

It reached for me. It grabbed my face. 

I opened my eyes in terror. 

“Whitey!” I cried. 

The dumb dog was standing on his hind paws, leaning over the 
blanket, furiously licking my face. 

“Whitey, good dog!” I cried, laughing. His scratchy tongue 
tickled. I was never so glad to see him. 

I hugged him and pulled him up into the bed. He whimpered 
excitedly. His tail was wagging like crazy. 

“Whitey, what’s got you so worked up?” I asked, hugging him. 
“Do you hear voices, too?” 

He uttered a low bark, as if answering the question. Then he 
hopped off the bed and shook himself. He turned three times in a tight 
circle, making a place for himself on the carpet, and lay down, 
yawning loudly. 

“You're definitely weird tonight,” I said. He curled himself into a 
tight ball and chewed softly on his tail. 

Accompanied by the dog’s gentle snores, I eventually drifted into 
a restless sleep. 

When I awoke, the morning sky outside my bedroom window was 
still gray. The window was open just a crack, and the curtains were 
swaying in a strong breeze. 

I sat up quickly, instantly alert. I have to stop going up to the 
attic, I thought. 

I have to forget about the stupid mirror. 

I stood up and stretched. I’ve got to stop. And I’ve got to get 
everyone else to stop. 

I thought of the whispered cry from the night before. The dry, sad 


voice, whispering my name. 

“Max!” 

The voice from outside my room startled me out of my chilling 
thoughts. 

“Max—time to wake up! We’re going to Springfield, remember?” 
It was my mom out in the hallway. “Hurry. Breakfast is on the table.” 

“Tm already up!” I shouted. “Pll be down in a minute.” 

I heard her footsteps going down the stairs. Then I heard Whitey 
downstairs barking at the door to be let out. 

I stretched again. 

“Whoa!” I cried out as my closet door swung open. 

A red Gap T-shirt rose up off the top shelf and began to float 
across the room. 

I heard giggling. Familiar giggling. 

The T-shirt danced in front of me. 

“Lefty, you’re ridiculous!” I yelled angrily. I swiped at the T-shirt, 
but it danced out of my reach. “You promised you wouldn’t do this 
again!” 

“I had my fingers crossed,” he said, giggling. 

“I don’t care!” I cried. I lunged forward and grabbed the shirt. 
“You’ve got to stop. I mean it.” 

“I just wanted to surprise you,” he said, pretending his feelings 
were hurt. A pair of jeans floated up from the closet shelf and began 
to parade back and forth in front of me. 

“Lefty, ’m going to murder you!” I shouted. Then I lowered my 
voice, remembering that Mom and Dad might hear. “Put that down— 
now. Go upstairs and turn off the mirror light. Hurry!” 

I shook my fist at where the jeans were marching. I was so angry. 

Why did he have to be so dumb? Didn’t he realize that this wasn’t 
just a game? 

Suddenly, the jeans collapsed in a heap on the carpet. 

“Lefty, toss them to me,” I instructed him. “Then get upstairs and 
get yourself visible again.” 

Silence. 

The jeans didn’t move. 

“Lefty—don’t fool around,” I snapped, feeling a stab of dread in 
the pit of my stomach. “Toss me the jeans and get out of here.” 

No reply. 

The jeans remained crumpled on the carpet. 

“Stop this stupid game!” I screamed. “You’re not funny! So just 
stop it. Really. You’re scaring me!” 

I knew that’s what he wanted to hear. Once I admitted that he 


was scaring me, I was sure he’d giggle and go do as I said. 

But no. The room was still silent. The curtains fluttered toward 
me, then pulled back with a gentle rustling sound. The jeans lay 
crumpled on the carpet. 

“Lefty? Hey, Lefty?” I called, my voice trembling. No reply. 

“Lefty? Are you here?” No. Lefty was gone. 


17 


“Lefty?” My voice came out weak and trembling. 

He wasn’t there. It wasn’t a game. He was gone. 

Without thinking, I ran out of my room, down the hall, and up 
the stairs to the attic. My bare feet pounded on the steep wooden 
steps. My heart was pounding even louder. 

As I stepped into the heat of the attic, a wave of fear swept over 
me. 

What if Lefty had disappeared forever? 

With a frightened cry, I lunged into the tiny room. 

The bright light reflected in the mirror shone into my eyes. 

Shielding my eyes with one hand, I made my way to the mirror 
and pulled the string. The light went out immediately. 

“Lefty?” I called anxiously. 

No reply. 

“Lefty? Are you up here? Can you hear me?” 

Fear clogged my throat. I was panting loudly, barely able to 
speak. 

“Lefty?” 

“Hi, Max. I’m here.” My brother’s voice came from right beside 
me. 

I was so happy to hear it, I turned and gave him a hug, even 
though I couldn’t see him. 

‘Tm okay,” he said, startled by my emotion. “Really, Max. I’m 
okay.” 

It took a few minutes for him to reappear. 

“What happened?” I asked, checking him out, looking him up and 
down as if I hadn’t seen him for months. “You were clowning around 
in my room. Then you were gone.” 

“Tm fine,” he insisted with a shrug. 

“But where did you go?” I demanded. 

“Up here,” he repeated. 

“But Lefty—” Something about him looked different. I couldn’t 
quite put my finger on it. But staring at his face, I was sure that 
something was weird. 

“Stop staring at me like that, Max.” He shoved me away. “I’m 
fine. Really.” He started dancing away from me, heading to the stairs. 

“But, Lefty—” I followed him out of the room. 

“No more questions. Okay? I’m all right.” 


“Stay away from the mirror,” I said sternly. “Do you hear me?” 

He started down the stairs. 

“I mean it, Lefty. Don’t get invisible again.” 

“Okay, okay,” he snapped. “I won’t do it anymore.” 

I checked to make sure his fingers weren’t crossed. This time they 
weren't. 

Mom was waiting for us in the hall. “So there you are,” she said 
impatiently. “Max, you’re not dressed!” 

“PIL hurry,” I told her, and bolted into my room. 

“Lefty, what did you do to your hair?” I heard Mom ask my 
brother. “Did you brush it differently or something?” 

“No,” I heard Lefty reply. “It’s the same, Mom. Really. Maybe 
your eyes are different.” 

“Stop being such a smart mouth and get downstairs,” Mom told 
him. 

Something was definitely weird about Lefty. Mom had noticed it, 
too. But I couldn’t figure out what. 

As I picked my jeans up off the floor and pulled them on, I started 
to feel a little better. I had been so frightened, frightened that 
something terrible had happened to my brother. Frightened that he’d 
disappeared for good, and I’d never see him again. 

All because of that stupid mirror. 

All because it was such a thrill to get invisible. 

I suddenly thought about Erin, April, and Zack. 

They were so excited about Wednesday. About the big 
competition. Even April was going to get invisible this time. 

No, I thought. 

I have to call them. I have to tell them. 

I’ve really made up my mind. 

No more mirror. No more getting invisible. 

I'll call all three of them when I get back from Springfield. And Ill 
tell them the competition is cancelled. 

I sat down on my bed to tie my sneakers. 

Whew, I thought. That’s a load off my mind. 

And it was. Having decided not to use the mirror ever again made 
me feel much, much better. All of my fear seemed to float away. 

Little did I know that the most frightening time was still to come. 


18 


Imagine my surprise when Zack, Erin, and April showed up at my 
front door on Wednesday morning. 

“I told you guys the competition is off,” I sputtered, staring at 
them in astonishment through the screen door. 

“But Lefty called us,” Erin replied. “He said you changed your 
mind.” The other two agreed. 

My mouth dropped open to my knees. “Lefty?” 

They nodded. “He called us yesterday,” April said. 

“But Lefty isn’t even here this morning,” I told them as they 
marched into the house. “He’s at the playground playing softball with 
some of his friends.” 

“Who’s here?” my mom called. She came walking into the 
hallway, drying her hands on a dish towel. She recognized my friends, 
then turned to me, a bewildered look on her face. “Max, I thought you 
were going to help me down in the basement. I didn’t know you’d 
made plans with Zack, Erin, and April.” 

“I didn’t,” I replied weakly. “Lefty—” 

“We just dropped by,” Zack told Mom, coming to my rescue. 

“If you’re busy, Max, we can go,” Erin added. 

“No, that’s okay,” Mom told them. “Max was complaining about 
how boring it would be to help me. It’s good you three showed up.” 

She disappeared back into the kitchen. As soon as she was gone, 
my three friends practically pounced on me. 

“Upstairs!” Zack cried eagerly, pointing to the stairs. 

“Let’s get invisible!” Erin whispered. 

“I get to go first since I’ve never gone,” April said. 

I tried to argue with them, but I was outnumbered and outvoted. 
“Okay, okay,” I reluctantly agreed. I started to follow them up the 
stairs when I heard scratching noises at the door. 

I recognized the sound. It was Whitey, back from his morning 
walk. I pushed open the screen door and he trotted in, wagging his 
tail. 

The dumb dog had some burrs stuck to his tail. I chased him into 
the kitchen and managed to get him to stand still long enough to pull 
them off. Then I hurried up to the attic to join my friends. 

By the time I got up there, April was already standing in front of 
the mirror, and Zack was standing beside her, ready to pull the light 
on. 


“Whoa!” I called. 

They turned to look at me. I could see that April had a frightened 
expression on her face. “I have to do this right away. Or else I might 
wimp out,” she explained. 

“I just think we should get the rules straight first,” I said sternly. 
“This mirror really isn’t a toy, and—” 

“We know, we know,” Zack interrupted, grinning. “Come on, 
Max. No lectures today, okay? We know you’re nervous because 
you're going to lose. But that’s no reason—” 

“I don’t want to compete,” April said nervously. “I just want to 
see what it’s like to be invisible. For just a minute. Then I want to 
come back.” 

“Well, I’m going for the world’s record,” Zack boasted, leaning 
against the mirror frame. 

“Me, too,” Erin said. 

“T really don’t think it’s a good idea,” I told them, staring at my 
reflection in the mirror. “We should just get invisible for a short time. 
It’s too dangerous to—” 

“What a wimp!” Zack declared, shaking his head. 

“We'll be careful, Max,” Erin said. 

“I just have a really bad feeling,” I confessed. My hair was 
standing up in the back. I stepped closer to the mirror to see better, 
and smoothed it down with my hand. 

“I think we should all get invisible at the same time,” Zack said to 
me, his blue eyes lighting up with excitement. “Then we could go to 
the playground and scare your brother to death!” 

Everyone laughed except April. “I just want to try it for a 
minute,” she insisted. “That’s all.” 

“First we compete,” Erin told Zack. “Then we go out and scare 
people.” 

“Yeah! All right!” Zack exclaimed. 

I decided to give up. There was no sense in trying to reason with 
Zack and Erin. They were too psyched for this competition. “Okay, 
let’s get it over with,” I told them. 

“But first I go,” April said, turning back to the mirror. 

Zack reached up for the string again. “Ready? On three,” he said. 

I turned to the door as Whitey came sniffing his way in, his nose 
lowered to the floor, his tail straight out behind him. 

“Whitey, what are you doing up here?” I asked. 

He ignored me and continued sniffing furiously. 

“One... two...” Zack started. 

“When I say ‘ready’, bring me back. Okay?” April asked, standing 
stiffly, staring straight ahead into the mirror. “No jokes or anything, 


Zack.” 

“No jokes,” Zack replied seriously. “As soon as you want to come 
back, Pll turn off the light.” 

“Good,” April replied softly. 

Zack began his count again. “One... two... three!” 

As he said three and pulled the string, Whitey stepped up beside 
April. 

The light flashed on. 

“Whitey!” I screamed. “Stop!” 

But it was too late. 

With a yelp of surprise, the dog vanished along with April. 


19 


“The dog!” Erin screamed. 

“Hey—I’m gone! I’m invisible!” April exclaimed at the same time. 

I could hear Whitey whimpering. He sounded really frightened. 

“Pull the string!” I shouted to Zack. 

“Not yet!” April protested. 

“Pull it!” I insisted. 

Zack pulled the string. The light went out. April reappeared first, 
with an angry expression on her face. 

Whitey reappeared, and fell down. He jumped up quickly, but his 
legs were all wobbly. 

He looked so funny, we all started to laugh. 

“What’s going on up there?” My mom’s voice from the stairwell 
startled us into instant silence. “What are you doing?” 

“Nothing, Mom,” I answered quickly, signalling for my friends to 
remain silent. “Just hanging out.” 

“I don’t understand what’s so interesting up there in that dusty 
old attic,” she called up. 

I crossed my fingers, hoping she wouldn’t come upstairs to find 
out. 

“We just like it up here,” I replied. Pretty lame, but it was the 
only thing I could think of to say. 

Whitey, having recovered his balance, went running to the stairs. 
I heard the dog’s toenails click on the wooden stairs as he went down 
to join my mom. 

“That wasn’t fair,” April complained after Mom and Whitey were 
gone. “I didn’t get any time.” 

“I think we should get out of here,” I pleaded. “You see how 
unpredictable it is. You never know what’s going to happen.” 

“That’s sort of the fun of it,” Erin insisted. 

“I want another turn,” April said. 

We argued for about ten minutes. Once again, I lost. 

It was time to start the competition. Erin was going first. 

“Ten minutes is the time to beat,” Zack instructed her. 

“No problem,” Erin said, making funny faces at herself in the 
mirror. “Ten minutes is too easy.” 

April had resumed her position, sitting on the floor with her back 
against the wall, studying her watch. We had agreed that she would 
take another turn after the competition was over. 


After it was over... 

Standing there watching Erin get ready, I wished it were over 
already. I felt cold all over. I had a heavy feeling of dread weighing 
me down. 

Please, please, I thought to myself, let everything go okay. 

Zack pulled the string. 

Erin disappeared in the flash of light. 

April studied her watch. 

Zack took a step back from the mirror and crossed his arms in 
front of his chest. His eyes glowed with excitement. 

“How do I look?” Erin teased. 

“You never looked better,” Zack joked. 

“I like what you did with your hair,” April teased, glancing up 
from the watch. 

Even April was joking and having a good time. Why couldn’t I 
relax, too? Why was I suddenly so frightened? 

“You feel okay?” I asked Erin. The words nearly caught in my 
throat. 

“Fine,” Erin replied. 

I could hear her footsteps as she walked around the room. 

“If you start to feel weird, just say ‘ready’, and Zack’ll pull the 
string,” I said. 

“I know,” she replied impatiently. “But I won’t be ready to come 
back until I break the record.” 

‘Tm going next,” Zack told Erin, arms still crossed in front of him. 
“So your record won’t last for long.” 

Suddenly Zack’s arms uncrossed. His hands flew wildly up in the 
air, and he began slapping his face with both hands. 

“Ow! Cut it out, Erin!” he yelled, trying to squirm away. “Let go!” 

We heard Erin laugh as Zack slapped himself a few more times, 
then finally managed to wrestle out of her grip. 

“One minute,” April announced from behind us. 

“Ow! You hurt me!” Zack said, scowling and rubbing his red 
cheeks. 

Erin laughed again. 

“You still feel okay?” I asked, glancing into the mirror. 

“Fine. Stop worrying, Max,” Erin scolded. 

My T-shirt suddenly pulled up over my head. Erin laughed. 

“Give me a break!” I cried, spinning away. 

“Two minutes,” April announced. 

I heard the attic stairs creaking. A few seconds later, Whitey 
poked his head in. This time, he stopped in the doorway and peered 


into the room without entering. 

“Go back downstairs, boy,” I told him. “Go down.” 

He stared back at me as if considering my request. But he didn’t 
budge from the doorway. 

I didn’t want to take another chance of him getting too close to 
the mirror. So I grabbed him by the collar and guided him to the 
stairs. Then it took a while for the dumb dog to get the idea that he 
was supposed to go down the stairs! 

When I returned to the little room, April had just called out four 
minutes. Zack was pacing impatiently back and forth in front of the 
mirror. I guess he couldn’t wait for it to be his turn. 

I found myself thinking about Lefty. Lefty knew I had called 
everyone and canceled the competition. So why had he called Zack, 
Erin, and April and told them it was back on? 

Just one of his practical jokes, I decided. 

Pd have to find a way to pay him back for this. 

Something really evil... 

“Eight minutes,” April said, stretching. 

“Pretty good,” Zack told Erin. “Sure you don’t want to quit now? 
There’s no way you can win. Why not save everyone the time?” 

“Do you still feel okay?” I asked anxiously. 

No reply. 

“Erin?” I called, searching around as if I had a chance of spotting 
her. “You feel okay?” 

No reply. 

“Erin—don’t mess around. It’s not funny!” I cried. 

“Yeah. Answer us!” Zack demanded. 

Still no reply. 

Glancing into the mirror, I saw April’s reflection, caught her 
horrified expression. “Erin’s gone,” she uttered, her voice a frightened 
whisper. 


20 


“Erin—where are you?” I shouted. 

When she didn’t reply, I ran over to the string. Just as I grabbed 
it, I heard footsteps outside the room. A few seconds later, a can of 
Coke came floating through the door. 

“Miss me?” Erin asked playfully. 

“You scared us to death!” I cried, my voice squeaking. 

Erin laughed. “I didn’t know you cared.” 

“That wasn’t funny, Erin,” Zack said sternly. For once he was 
agreeing with me. “You really did scare us.” 

“I got thirsty,” Erin replied. The Coke can tilted up. We saw Coke 
start to pour out of it. The liquid abruptly disappeared as it flowed 
into Erin’s mouth. 

“I guess being invisible makes you really thirsty,” Erin explained. 
“So I slipped downstairs and got a Coke.” 

“But you should’ve told us,” April scolded, her eyes turned back 
to her watch. “Nine minutes.” 

“You shouldn’t go downstairs,” I added heatedly. “I mean, what if 
my mom saw you?” 

“Saw me?” 

“Well... you know what I mean,” I muttered. 

Erin laughed. I didn’t think it was funny. 

Why was I the only one taking this seriously? 

Erin beat Lefty’s record and kept going. When April called out 
twelve minutes, Zack asked Erin if she wanted to come back. 

No reply. 

“Erin? Are you goofing on us again?” I demanded. 

Still no reply. 

I could feel my throat tighten once again with fear. I walked over 
and pulled the string. My hand was shaking as I pulled it. I prayed 
silently to myself that Erin would return okay. 

The light went out. The three of us waited tensely for Erin to 
come back. 

After what seemed an endless wait, she shimmered back into 
view. She turned quickly away from the mirror, a triumphant smile on 
her face. “The new champ!” she declared, raising her fists in a gesture 
of victory. 

“You’re okay?” I asked, my feeling of fear refusing to leave. 

She nodded. “Just fine, worrywart.” She stepped away from the 


mirror, walking unsteadily. 

I stared at her. Something about her looked different. 

She looked perfectly okay. Not pale or sick-looking or anything. 
But something was different. Her smile? Her hair? I wished I could 
figure out what. 

“Max, pull the string.” Zack’s eager voice jerked me away from 
my thoughts. “Let’s go, man. I’m going for fifteen minutes.” 

“Okay. Get ready,” I said, glancing at Erin as I grabbed for the 
string. She flashed me a reassuring smile. 

But something about her smile was different. 

Something. 

But what? 

I pulled the string. Zack vanished in the flash of bright light. 

“Return of the Invisible Man!” he cried in a deep voice. 

“Not so loud,” I warned him. “My mom'’ll hear you downstairs.” 

Erin had lowered herself to the floor beside April. I walked over 
and stood over her. “You sure you’re okay?” I asked. “You don’t feel 
dizzy or weird or anything?” 

She shook her head. “No. Really. Why don’t you believe me, 
Max?” 

As I stared down at her, I tried to figure out what was different 
about her appearance. What a mystery! I just couldn’t put my finger 
on it. 

“Well, how come you didn’t answer when I called you?” I 
demanded. 

“Huh?” Her face filled with surprise. “When?” 

“At about twelve minutes,” I told her. “I called you and Zack 
called you. But you didn’t answer us.” 

Erin’s expression turned thoughtful. “I guess I didn’t hear you,” 
she replied finally. “But I’m fine, Max. Really. I feel great. It was really 
awesome.” 

I joined them on the floor and leaned back against the wall to 
wait for Zack’s turn to be over. “I really mean it. Don’t turn off the 
light till fifteen minutes,” he reminded me. 

Then he messed up my hair, making it stand straight up in the air. 

Both girls laughed. 

I had to get up, walk over to the mirror, and comb it back down. I 
don’t know why people think messed-up hair is such a riot. I really 
don’t get it. 

“Hey, follow me. I’ve got an idea,” Zack said. His voice was 
coming from the doorway. 

“Whoa—hold on!” I called. But I could hear his sneakers 


clomping across the attic. 

“Follow me outside,” he called to us. We heard his footsteps on 
the attic stairs. 

“Zack—don’t do it,” I pleaded. “Whatever it is, don’t do it!” 

But there was no way he was going to listen to me. 

A few seconds later, we were out the back door, following our 
invisible friend toward our neighbor Mr. Evander’s back yard. 

This is going to be trouble, I thought unhappily. Big trouble. 

Erin, April, and I hid behind the hedge that separated our two 
yards. As usual, Mr. Evander was out in his tomato garden, stooped 
over, pulling up weeds, his big belly hanging out under his T-shirt, his 
red bald head shiny under the sun. 

What is Zack going to do? I wondered, holding my breath, my 
whole body heavy with dread. 

And then I saw three tomatoes float up from the ground. They 
hovered in the air, then floated closer to Mr. Evander. 

Oh, no, I thought, groaning silently to myself. 

Please, Zack. Please don’t do it. 

Erin, April, and I were huddled together behind the hedge, staring 
in disbelief as the three tomatoes began to circle each other rapidly in 
the air. 

Invisible Zack was juggling them. Showing off, as usual. He was 
always bragging about how he could juggle, and we couldn’t. 

It took a while for Mr. Evander to notice. 

But when he finally saw the three tomatoes spinning around in 
midair a few feet in front of him, his eyes bugged out and his face 
turned as red as the tomatoes! 

“Oh!” he cried. He let the weeds fall from his hands. And then he 
just stared at the spinning tomatoes, like he was frozen. 

Zack tossed the tomatoes higher as he juggled. 

April and Erin held hands over their mouths to stifle their 
laughter. They thought Zack’s stunt was a real hoot. But I just wanted 
to get Zack back up to the attic. 

“Hey, Mary! Mary!” Mr. Evander started calling to his wife. “Mary 
—come out here! You’ve got to see this! Mary!” 

A few seconds later, his wife came running across the yard, a 
frightened expression on her face. “Mike, what’s wrong? What’s 
wrong?” 

“Look—these tomatoes are twirling in the air!” Mr. Evander cried, 
motioning wildly for her to hurry. 

Zack let the tomatoes fall to the ground. 

“Where?” Mrs. Evander asked breathlessly, running as fast as she 
could. 


“There. Look!” Mr. Evander pointed. 

“I don’t see any tomatoes,” Mrs. Evander said, stopping in front of 
her husband, panting loudly. 

“Yes! They’re spinning. They’re—” 

“Those tomatoes?” Mrs. Evander asked, pointing to the three 
tomatoes on the ground. 

“Well... yes. They were twirling around, and—” Looking terribly 
confused, Mr. Evander scratched the back of his neck. 

“Mike, how long have you been out in the sun?” his wife scolded. 
“Didn’t I tell you to wear a cap?” 

“Uh... I'll be in in a few minutes,” Mr. Evander said softly, staring 
down at the tomatoes. 

As soon as Mrs. Evander turned and headed back to the house, 
the three tomatoes floated up from the ground and began twirling in 
the air again. 

“Mary, look!” Mr. Evander shouted excitedly. “Look—quick! 
They’re doing it again!” 

Zack let the tomatoes drop to the ground. 

Mrs. Evander spun around and stared into empty space. “Mike, 
you’d better come with me—right now,” she insisted. She hurried back, 
grabbed Mr. Evander by the arm, and pulled him away. The poor man 
looked totally bewildered, staring at the tomatoes on the ground, still 
scratching the back of his neck as his wife pulled him to the house. 

“Hey, this is awesome!” Zack cried, right in front of me. 

Erin and April collapsed in wild giggles. I had to admit it was 
pretty funny. We laughed about it for a while. Then we sneaked back 
into the house and up to the attic. 

In the safety of the little room, we laughed some more about 
Zack’s juggling stunt. Zack bragged that he was the world’s first 
invisible juggler. 

Then, at twelve minutes, Zack suddenly stopped answering us. 

Just as Erin had. 

The three of us called his name over and over. 

Silence. 

Zack didn’t reply. 

‘Tm going to bring him back,” I said, instantly gripped with fear 
once again. I ran to the string. 

“Wait,” Erin said, holding me back. 

“Huh? What for?” I pulled away from her. 

“He said to wait till fifteen minutes, remember?” she argued. 

“Erin, he’s completely disappeared!” I cried. 

“But he’ll be really mad,” Erin pleaded. 


“I say bring him back,” April said anxiously. 

“Give him until fifteen minutes,” Erin insisted. 

“No,” I said. I pulled the string. 

The light clicked off. 

A few minutes later, Zack flickered back. He smiled at us. “How 
long?” he asked, turning to April. 

“Thirteen minutes, twenty seconds,” she told him. 

His grin widened. “The new champ!” 

“You’re okay? You didn’t answer us,” I said, studying his face. 

‘Tm fine. I didn’t hear you calling me. But I’m fine.” 

Zack looked different to me, too. Something was very different 
about him. But what? 

“What’s your problem, Max?” he demanded. “Why are you staring 
at me like I’m some kind of alien life-form or something?” 

“Your hair,” I said, studying him. “Was it like that before?” 

“Huh? What are you talking about? Are you freaking out or 
something?” Zack asked, rolling his eyes. 

“Was your hair like that before?” I repeated. “Buzzed real short 
on the right and then combed long to the left? Wasn’t it the other way 
around?” 

“You’re messed up, Max,” he said, grinning at Erin and April. “My 
hair is the same it’s always been. You’ve been staring in that mirror 
too long or something.” 

I could’ve sworn his hair had been short on the left, long on the 
right. But I guess Zack would know his own hair. 

“Are you going to go?” Erin asked, jumping up behind me. 

“Yeah, are you going to beat fifteen minutes?” Zack asked. 

I shook my head. “No, I really don’t feel like it,” I told them 
truthfully. “Let’s declare Zack the winner and get out of here.” 

“No way!” Zack and Erin declared in unison. 

“You’ve got to try,” Zack insisted. 

“Don’t wimp out, Max. You can beat Zack. I know you can,” Erin 
declared. 

She and Zack both pushed me up to the mirror. 

I tried to pull back. But they practically held me in place. 

“No. Really,” I said. “Zack can be the winner. I—” 

“Go for it, Max!” Erin urged. “I’m betting on you!” 

“Yeah. Go for it,” Zack repeated, his hand firmly on my shoulder. 

“No. Please—” I said. 

But Zack reached up with his free hand and pulled the string. 


21 


I stared into the mirror for a moment, waiting for the glare to fade 
from my eyes. It was always such a shock. That first moment, when 
your reflection disappeared. When you stared at the spot where you 
knew you were standing—and realized you were looking right 
through yourself! 

“How do you feel, Max? How do you feel?” Erin asked, imitating 
me. 

“Erin, what’s your problem?” I snapped. It wasn’t like her to be so 
sarcastic. 

“Just giving you a taste of your own medicine,” she replied, 
grinning. 

Something about her smile was lopsided, not normal. 

“Think you can beat my record?” Zack demanded. 

“I don’t know. Maybe,” I replied uncertainly. 

Zack stepped up to the mirror and studied his reflection. I had the 
strangest feeling as I watched him. I can’t really explain it. Pd never 
seen Zack stand in just that position and admire himself in just that 
way. 

Something was different. I knew it. But I couldn’t figure out what. 

Maybe it’s just my nervousness, I told myself. 

I’m just so stressed out. Maybe it’s affecting the way I look at my 
friends. Maybe I’m making all this up. 

“Two minutes,” April announced. 

“Are you just going to stand there?” Erin asked, staring into the 
mirror. “Aren’t you going to move around or anything, Max?” 

“No. I don’t think so,” I said. “I mean, I can’t think of anything I 
want to do. I’m just going to wait till the time is up.” 

“You want to quit now?” Zack asked, grinning at the spot where 
he thought I was standing. 

I shook my head. Then I remembered that no one could see it. 
“No. I might as well go the distance,” I told him. “Since I’m here, I 
might as well make you look bad, Zack.” 

He laughed scornfully. “You won’t beat thirteen-twenty,” he said 
confidently. “No way.” 

“Well, you know what?” I said, angered by his smug tone of 
voice. “I’m just going to stand here until I do.” 

And that’s what I did. I stood in place, leaning against the mirror 
frame, while April counted off the minutes. 


I did okay until a short while after she had called out eleven 
minutes. Then, suddenly, the glare of the light began to hurt my eyes. 

I closed my eyes, but it didn’t help. The light grew brighter, 
harsher. It seemed to sweep around me, surround me, fold over me. 

And then I began to feel dizzy and light. As if I were about to 
float away, even though I knew I was standing in place. 

“Hey, guys?” I called out. “I think I’ve had enough.” 

My voice sounded tiny and far away, even to me. 

The light swirled around me. I felt myself grow lighter, lighter, 
until I had to struggle to keep my feet on the floor to keep from 
floating away. 

I uttered a high-pitched cry. I was suddenly gripped by panic. 

Cold panic. 

“Zack—bring me back!” I shouted. 

“Okay, Max. No problem,” I heard Zack reply. 

He seemed miles and miles away. 

I struggled to see him through the blinding yellow light. He was a 
dark figure behind the wall of light, a dark figure moving quickly to 
the mirror. 

“Tm bringing you back now, Max. Hold on,” I heard Zack say. 

The bright light glowed even brighter. It hurt so much. Even with 
my eyes closed, it hurt. 

“Zack, pull the string!” I shouted. 

I opened my eyes to see his dim shadow reaching up to the string. 

Pull it, pull it, pull it! I urged silently. 

I knew that in a second, the light would go off. And I’d be safe. 

A second. 

One tug of the string. 

Pull it, pull it, pull it, Zack! 

Zack reached for the string. I saw him grab it. 

And then I heard another voice in the room. A new voice. A 
surprised voice. 

“Hi. What’s going on up here? What are you kids doing?” 

I saw the shadowy figure of Zack drop the string and step away 
without pulling it. 

My mom had burst into the room. 


22 


“Please—pull the string!” I called. 

No one seemed to hear me. 

“We’re just hanging out,” I heard Zack tell my mom. 

“But where’s Max?” I heard her ask. “How did you find this little 
room? What are you all doing in here?” Her voice sounded as if it were 
coming from underwater, far, far away. 

The entire room began to shimmer in the light, flickering on and 
off. I held on tightly to the frame of the mirror, struggling not to float 
away. 

“Can you hear me?” I called. “Please, somebody—pull the string! 
Bring me back!” 

They were just gray shadows in the wavering, rolling light. They 
didn’t seem to hear me. 

Gripping the frame tightly, I saw a shadow approach the mirror. 
My mom. She walked around it, admiring it. 

“I can’t believe we never knew about this room. Where did this old 
mirror come from?” I heard her ask. 

She was standing so close to me. They all were. 

They were so close and so far away at the same time. 

“Please bring me back!” I shouted. 

I listened for an answer. But the voices faded away. 

The shadows moved in a flickering blur. I tried to reach out to 
them, but they were too far away. 

I let go of the mirror frame and began to float. 

“Mom, I’m right here. Can’t you hear me? Can’t you do 
anything?” 

So light, so completely weightless, I floated in front of the mirror. 

My feet were off the floor. I couldn’t see them in the blinding 
glare. 

I floated to the mirror glass, under the light. 

I could feel the light pull me closer. Closer. 

Until it pulled me right into the mirror. 

I knew I was inside the mirror. Inside a glistening blur of colors. 
The shapes shimmered and rolled together as if underwater. 

And I floated through the glimmering shards of light and color, 
floated silently away from my friends, away from my mom, floated 
away from the tiny attic room. 

Into the center of the mirror. 


Into the center of an undulating, rolling world of twisting lights 
and colors. 

“Help me!” I cried. 

But my voice was muffled by the blurred, shifting colors. 

“Bring me back! Get me back!” 

Floating deeper into this glimmering world, I could barely hear 
myself. 

Deeper into the mirror. And still deeper. 

The colors gave way to shapes of gray and black. It was cold here. 
Cold as glass. 

And as I floated deeper, deeper, the grays and blacks faded, too. 
The world was white now. Pure white all around. Shadowless white as 
far as I could see. 

I stared straight ahead, no longer calling out, too frightened to 
call out, too mystified by the cold, ivory world I had entered. 

“Hello, Max,” a familiar voice said. 

“Ohh!” I cried out, realizing I was not alone. 


23 


A scream of terror escaped my lips. I tried to form words, but my 
brain seemed to be paralyzed. 

The figure approached quickly, silently, through the cold, white 
world of the mirror. He smiled at me, an eerie, familiar smile. 

“You!” I managed to scream. 

He stopped inches away from me. 

I stared at him in disbelief. 

I was staring at myself. Me. Smiling back at me. The smile as cold 
as the glass that surrounded us. 

“Don’t be afraid,” he said. “I’m your reflection.” 

“No!” 

His eyes—my eyes—studied me hungrily, like a dog staring at a 
meaty bone. His smile grew wider as I cried out my fear. 

‘Tve been waiting here for you,” my reflection said, his eyes 
locked on mine. 

“No!” I repeated. 

I turned away. 

I knew I had to get away. 

I started to run. 

But I stopped short when I saw the faces in front of me. Distorted, 
unhappy faces, dozens of them, fun house mirror faces, with 
enormous, drooping eyes, and tiny mouths tight with sadness. 

The faces seemed to hover just ahead of me. The gaping eyes 
staring at me, the tiny mouths moving rapidly as if calling to me, 
warning me, telling me to get away. 

Who were these people, these faces? 

Why were they inside the mirror with me? 

Why did their distorted, twisted images reveal so much sadness, 
so much pain? 

“No!” 

I gasped as I thought I recognized two of the floating faces, their 
mouths working furiously, their eyebrows rising wildly up and down. 

Erin and Zack? 

No. 

That was impossible, wasn’t it? 

I stared hard at them. Why were they talking so frantically? What 
were they trying to tell me? 

“Help me!” I called. But they didn’t seem to hear me. 


The faces, dozens of them, bobbed and floated. 

“Help me—please!” 

And then I felt myself being spun around. I stared into the eyes of 
my reflection as he gripped my shoulders and held me in place. 

“Yow’re not leaving,” he told me. His quiet voice echoed through 
the clear stillness, icicles scratching against glass. 

I struggled to free myself, but his grip was strong. 

‘Tm the one to leave,” he told me. “I’ve been waiting so long. 
Ever since you turned on the light. And now I’m going to step out 
from here and join the others.” 

“Others?” I cried. 

“Your friends gave in easily,” he said. “They did not resist. The 
switch was made. And now you and I will also make a switch.” 

“No!” I screamed, and my cry seemed to echo through the icy 
cold for miles. 

“Why are you so afraid?” he asked, turning me around, still 
gripping my shoulders, bringing his face close to mine. “Are you so 
afraid of your other side, Max?” 

He stared at me intently. “That’s what I am, you know,” he said. 
“I am your reflection. Your other side. Your cold side. Don’t be afraid 
of me. Your friends were not afraid. They made the switch without 
much of a struggle. Now they are inside the mirror. And their 
reflections...” 

His voice trailed off. He didn’t have to finish his sentence. I knew 
what he was saying. 

Now I understood about Erin and Zack. Now I understood why 
they looked different to me. 

They were reversed. They were their own reflections. 

And now I understood why they pushed me into the mirror, why 
they forced me to disappear, too. 

If I didn’t do something, I realized, my reflection would switch 
places with me. My reflection would step into the attic. And Pd be 
trapped inside the mirror forever, trapped forever with the sad, 
bobbing faces. 

But what could I do? 

Staring at myself, I decided to stall, to ask questions, to give 
myself a little time to think. 

“Whose mirror is it? Who built it?” I demanded. 

He shrugged. “How should I know? I’m only your reflection, 
remember?” 

“But how—” 

“It’s time,” he said eagerly. “Don’t try to stall with foolish 
questions. Time to make the switch. Time for you to become my 


reflection!” 


24 


I pulled away. 

I started to run. 

The sad, distorted faces hovered in front of me. 

I shut my eyes and dodged away from them. 

I couldn’t think. Couldn’t breathe. 

My legs pumped. My arms flew out at my sides. It was so clear 
and bright, I couldn’t tell if I was moving or not. My feet couldn’t feel 
a floor. There were no walls, no ceiling. There was no air brushing my 
face as I ran. 

But my fear kept me moving. Through the clear, cold, shimmering 
light. 

He was behind me. 

I couldn’t hear him. 

He had no shadow. 

But I knew he was right behind me. 

And I knew that if he caught me, I’d be lost. Lost inside this blank 
world, unable to see, to hear, to smell, to touch anything, lost in the 
cold glass forever. 

Another silent, bobbing face. 

And so I kept running. 

Until the colors returned. 

Until light bent to form shapes. 

And I saw shadows moving and shifting in front of me. 

“Stop, Max!” I heard my reflection’s voice right behind me. “Stop 
right there!” 

But now he sounded worried. 

And so I kept running, running into the colors and moving shapes. 

Suddenly, Zack turned off the light. 

I came bursting out of the mirror, into the tiny attic room, into an 
explosion of sound, of color, of hard surfaces, of real things. The real 
world. 

I stood up, panting, gasping for breath. I tested my legs. I 
stomped on the floor. The solid floor. 

I turned my eyes to my friends, who were standing in front of me, 
startled expressions on their faces. My mom, I realized, must have 
retreated back downstairs. 

“Did you make the switch?” Zack asked eagerly, his eyes glowing 
with excitement. 


“Are you one of us?” Erin asked at the same time. 

“No,” said a voice—my voice—coming from just behind me. 

We all stared into the mirror. 

Inside it, my reflection, red-faced and angry, glared out at us, his 
hands pressed against the glass. “He got away,” my reflection told my 
friends. “The switch wasn’t made.” 

“I don’t understand!” I heard April cry. “What’s going on, guys?” 

Zack and Erin ignored her. They stepped up quickly and grabbed 
me by the arms. They spun me around roughly. 

“The switch wasn’t made,” my reflection repeated from inside the 
glass. 

“No problem,” Erin told it. 

She and Zack forced me up to the mirror. 

“You’re going back in, Max,” Zack said heatedly. 

He reached up and pulled the light cord. 


25 


The light flashed on. 

I went invisible. 

My reflection remained in the mirror, open palms pressed against 
the inside of the glass, staring out. 

“Tm waiting for you, Max,” he said. “In a few minutes, you’ll join 
me in here.” 

“No!” I shouted. “I’m leaving. I’m going downstairs.” 

“No, you’re not,” my reflection said, shaking his head. “Erin and 
Zack won’t let you escape. But don’t be so frightened, Max. It’s all 
quite painless. Really.” He smiled. It was my smile. But it was cold. 
Cruel. 

“I don’t get this,” April was protesting back by the door. “Will 
someone tell me what’s going on?” 

“You'll see, April,” Erin told her soothingly. 

What am I going to do? I wondered, frozen in panic. 

What can I do? 

“Just a few more minutes,” my reflection said calmly, already 
celebrating his victory. His freedom. 

“April, get help!” I cried. 

She spun around at the sound of my voice. “Huh?” 

“Get help! Go downstairs. Get help! Hurry!” I screamed. 

“But—I don’t understand—” April hesitated. 

Erin and Zack moved to block her path. 

But the door suddenly swung open. 

I saw Lefty stop at the doorway. He peered in. Saw my reflection. 

He must have thought the reflection was me. 

“Think fast!” he shouted, and he tossed a softball. 

The ball smashed into the mirror. 

I saw the startled look on Lefty’s face. And then I heard the crash 
and saw the mirror crack and shatter. 

My reflection didn’t have time to react. He broke into shards of 
glass and fell to the floor. 

“Nooooo!” Erin and Zack shrieked. 

I popped back into view just as Erin’s and Zack’s reflections 
floated up off the floor. They were sucked into the broken mirror— 
screaming all the way—sucked into it as if a powerful vacuum cleaner 
were pulling them in. 

The two reflections flew screaming into the mirror and appeared 


to crack into hundreds of pieces. 

“Whoa!” Lefty cried, gripping the door with all his strength, 
pressing his body against the doorframe, struggling to keep himself 
from being sucked into the room. 

And then Erin and Zack dropped onto the floor on their knees, 
looking dazed and confused, staring at the pieces of shattered mirror 
that littered the floor around them. 

“You're back!” I cried happily. “It’s really you!” 

“Yeah. It’s me,” Zack said, climbing unsteadily to his feet, then 
turning to help Erin up. 

The mirror was shattered. The reflections were gone. 

Erin and Zack gazed around the room, still shaken and dazed. 

April stared at me in total confusion. 

Lefty remained outside the doorway, shaking his head. “Max,” he 
said, “you should’ve caught the ball. That was an easy catch.” 

Erin and Zack were back. And they were okay. 

It didn’t take long to get everything back to normal. 

We explained everything to April and Lefty as best we could. 

April went home. She had to baby-sit her little sister. 

Erin and Zack—the real Erin and Zack—helped me sweep up the 
broken glass. Then we closed the door to the little room. I latched it 
tightly, and we all carried cartons over and stacked them up to block 
off the door. 

We knew we’d never go in there again. 

We vowed never to tell anyone about getting invisible or the 
mirror or what happened in that little room. Then Erin and Zack 
headed home. 

Later, Lefty and I were hanging around out in the back yard. 
“That was so scary,” I told Lefty with a shudder. “You just can’t 
imagine what it was like.” 

“Sounds pretty scary,” Lefty replied absently. He tossed his 
softball from hand to hand. “But at least everything is okay now. Want 
to play a little catch?” 

“No,” I shook my head. I wasn’t in the mood. But then I changed 
my mind. “Maybe it’ll take my mind off what happened this morning,” 
I said. 

Lefty tossed me the ball. We trotted behind the garage, our usual 
place for tossing the ball around. 

I lobbed it back to him. 

We were having a pretty good game of catch. 

Until about five minutes had gone by. 

Until... 


Until I stopped and froze in place. 

Were my eyes playing tricks on me? 

“Here comes my fastball,” he said. He heaved it at me. 
No. No. No. 

I gaped open-mouthed as the ball shot past me. 

I didn’t even try to catch it. I couldn’t move. 

I could only stare in horror. 

My brother was throwing right-handed. 


Scanning, formatting and 
proofing by Undead. 

Skip to main content
 
Texts
 
Video
 
Audio
 
Software
 
Images
My uploads
My loans
My favorites
My lists
My collections
My web archives
Account settings
Get help
Log out
 Search metadata
 Search text contents
 Search TV news captions
 Search radio transcripts
 Search archived web sites
Advanced Search
About Blog Projects Help Donate  Contact Jobs Volunteer People
Full text of "All 62 Goosebumps novels"
See other formats
KE 


He walks. He stalks... 


NIGHT OF THE LIVING DUMMY 


[ja SCHOLASTIC) 


NIGHT OF THE 
LIVING DUMMY 


Goosebumps - 07 
R.L. Stine 
(An Undead Scan v1.5) 


“Mmmmm! Mmmm! Mmmmm!” 

Kris Powell struggled to get her twin sister’s attention. 

Lindy Powell glanced up from the book she was reading to 
see what the problem was. Instead of her sister’s pretty face, 
Lindy saw a round, pink bubble nearly the size of Kris’ head. 

“Nice one,” Lindy said without much enthusiasm. With a 
sudden move, she poked the bubble and popped it. 

“Hey!” Kris cried as the pink bubble gum exploded onto her 
cheeks and chin. 

Lindy laughed. “Gotcha.” 

Kris angrily grabbed Lindy’s paperback and slammed it shut. 
“Whoops—lost your place!” she exclaimed. She knew her sister 
hated to lose her place in a book. 

Lindy grabbed the book back with a scowl. Kris struggled to 
pull the pink gum off her face. 

“That was the biggest bubble I ever blew,” she said angrily. 
The gum wasn’t coming off her chin. 

“Tve blown much bigger than that,” Lindy said with a 
superior sneer. 

“T don’t believe you two,” their mother muttered, making her 
way into their bedroom and dropping a neatly folded pile of 
laundry at the foot of Kris’ bed. “You even compete over bubble 
gum?” 

“We're not competing,” Lindy muttered. She tossed back her 
blonde ponytail and returned her eyes to her book. 

Both girls had straight blonde hair. But Lindy kept hers long, 
usually tying it behind her head or on one side in a ponytail. And 
Kris had hers cut very short. 

It was a way for people to tell the twins apart, for they were 
nearly identical in every other way. Both had broad foreheads 
and round, blue eyes. Both had dimples in their cheeks when they 
smiled. Both blushed easily, large pink circles forming on their 
pale cheeks. 

Both thought their noses were a little too wide. Both wished 
they were a little taller. Lindy’s best friend, Alice, was nearly 
three inches taller, even though she hadn’t turned twelve yet. 

“Did I get it all off?” Kris asked, rubbing her chin, which was 
red and sticky. 


“Not all,” Lindy told her, glancing up. “There's some in your 
hair.” 

“Oh, great,” Kris muttered. She grabbed at her hair, but 
couldn't find any bubble gum. 

“Gotcha again,” Lindy said, laughing. “You’re too easy!” 

Kris uttered an angry growl. “Why are you always so mean to 
me?” 

“Me? Mean?” Lindy looked up in wide-eyed innocence. “I’m 
an angel. Ask anyone.” 

Exasperated, Kris turned back to her mother, who was 
stuffing socks into a dresser drawer. “Mom, when am I going to 
get my own room?” 

“On the Twelfth of Never,” Mrs. Powell replied, grinning. 

Kris groaned. “That’s what you always say.” 

Her mother shrugged. “You know we don’t have a spare inch, 
Kris.” She turned to the bedroom window. Bright sunlight 
streamed through the filmy curtains. “It’s a beautiful day. What 
are you two doing inside?” 

“Mom, we're not little girls,” Lindy said, rolling her eyes. 
“Were twelve. We're too old to go out and play.” 

“Did I get it all?” Kris asked, still scraping pink patches of 
bubble gum off her chin. 

“Leave it. It improves your complexion,” Lindy told her. 

“T wish you girls would be nicer to each other,” Mrs. Powell 
said with a sigh. 

They suddenly heard shrill barking coming from downstairs. 
“What's Barky excited about now?” Mrs. Powell fretted. The little 
black terrier was always barking about something. “Why not take 
Barky for a walk?” 

“Don’t feel like it,” Lindy muttered, nose in her book. 

“What about those beautiful new bikes you got for your 
birthdays?” Mrs. Powell said, hands on hips. “Those bikes you just 
couldn’t live without. You know, the ones that have been sitting 
in the garage since you got them.” 

“Okay, okay. You don’t have to be sarcastic, Mom,” Lindy 
said, closing her book. She stood up, stretched, and tossed the 
book onto her bed. 

“You want to?” Kris asked Lindy. 

“Want to what?” 

“Go for a bike ride. We could ride to the playground, see if 
anyone’s hanging out at school.” 

“You just want to see if Robby is there,” Lindy said, making a 
face. 


“So?” Kris said, blushing. 

“Go on. Get some fresh air,” Mrs. Powell urged. “TII see you 
later. I’m off to the supermarket.” 

Kris peered into the dresser mirror. She had gotten most of 
the gum off. She brushed her short, hair back with both hands. 
“Come on. Let's go out,” she said. “Last one out is a rotten egg.” 
She darted to the doorway, beating her sister by half a step. 

As they burst out the back door, with Barky yipping shrilly 
behind them, the afternoon sun was high in a cloudless sky. The 
air was still and dry. It felt more like summer than spring. 

Both girls were wearing shorts and sleeveless T-shirts. Lindy 
bent to pull open the garage door, then stopped. The house next 
door caught her eye. 

“Look—they've got the walls up,” she told Kris, pointing 
across their back yard. 

“That new house is going up so guickly. It's amazing,” Kris 
said following her sister's gaze. 

The builders had knocked down the old house during the 
winter. The new concrete foundation had been put down in 
March. Lindy and Kris had walked around on it when no workers 
were there, trying to figure out where the different rooms would 
go. 

And now the walls had been built. The construction suddenly 
looked like a real house, rising up in the midst of tall stacks of 
lumber, a big mound of red-brown dirt, a pile of concrete blocks, 
and an assortment of power saws, tools, and machinery. 

“No one’s working today,” Lindy said. 

They took a few steps toward the new house. “Who do you 
think will move in?” Kris wondered. “Maybe some great-looking 
guy our age. Maybe great-looking twin guys!” 

“Yuck!” Lindy made a disgusted face. “Twin guys? How 
drippy can you get! I can’t believe you and I are in the same 
family.” 

Kris was used to Lindy’s sarcasm. Both girls liked being twins 
and hated being twins at the same time. Because they shared 
nearly everything—their looks, their clothing, their room—they 
were closer than most sisters ever get. 

But because they were so much alike, they also managed to 
drive each other crazy a lot of the time. 

“No one’s around. Let’s check out the new house,” Lindy said. 

Kris followed her across the yard. A squirrel, halfway up the 
wide trunk of a maple tree, watched them warily. 

They made their way through an opening in the low shrubs 


that divided the two yards. Then, walking past the stacks of 
lumber and the tall mound of dirt, they climbed the concrete 
stoop. 

A sheet of heavy plastic had been nailed over the opening 
where the front door would go. Kris pulled one end of the plastic 
up, and they slipped into the house. 

It was dark and cool inside and had a fresh wood smell. The 
plaster walls were up but hadn’t been painted. 

“Careful,” Lindy warned. “Nails.” She pointed to the large 
nails scattered over the floor. “If you step on one, you'll get 
lockjaw and die.” 

“You wish,” Kris said. 

“I don't want you to die,” Lindy replied. “Just get lockjaw.” 
She snickered. 

“Ha-ha,” Kris said sarcastically. “This must be the living 
room,” she said, making her way carefully across the front room 
to the fireplace against the back wall. 

“A cathedral ceiling,” Lindy said, staring up at the dark, 
exposed wooden beams above their heads. “Neat.” 

“This is bigger than our living room,” Kris remarked, peering 
out the large picture window to the street. 

“It smells great,” Lindy said, taking a deep breath. “All the 
sawdust. It smells so piney.” 

They made their way through the hall and explored the 
kitchen. “Are those wires on?” Kris asked, pointing to a cluster of 
black electrical wires suspended from the ceiling beams. 

“Why don’t you touch one and find out?” Lindy suggested. 

“You first,” Kris shot back. 

“The kitchen isn’t very big,” Lindy said, bending down to 
stare into the holes where the kitchen cabinets would go. 

She stood up and was about to suggest they check out the 
upstairs when she heard a sound. “Huh?” Her eyes widened in 
surprise. “Is someone in here?” 

Kris froze in the middle of the kitchen. 

They both listened. 

Silence. 

Then they heard soft, rapid footsteps. Close by. Inside the 
house. 

“Let’s go!” Lindy whispered. 

Kris was already ducking under the plastic, heading out the 
doorway opening. She leapt off the back stoop and started 
running toward their back yard. 

Lindy stopped at the bottom of the stoop and turned back to 


the new house. “Hey —look!” she called. 

A sguirrel came flying out a side window. It landed on the 
dirt with all four feet moving and scrambled toward the maple 
tree in the Powells’ yard. 

Lindy laughed. “Just a dumb sguirrel.” 

Kris stopped near the low shrubs. “You sure?” She hesitated, 
watching the windows of the new house. “That was a pretty loud 
squirrel.” 

When she turned back from the house, she was surprised to 
find that Lindy had disappeared. 

“Hey—where’d you go?” 

“Over here,” Lindy called. “I see something!” 

It took Kris a while to locate her sister. Lindy was half-hidden 
behind a large black trash Dumpster at the far end of the yard. 

Kris shielded her eyes with one hand to see better. Lindy was 
bent over the side of the Dumpster. She appeared to be 
rummaging through some trash. 

“What’s in there?” Kris called. 

Lindy was tossing things around and didn’t seem to hear her. 

“What is it?” Kris called, taking a few reluctant steps toward 
the Dumpster. 

Lindy didn’t reply. 

Then, slowly, she pulled something out. She started to hold it 
up. Its arms and legs dangled down limply. Kris could see a head 
with brown hair. 

A head? Arms and legs? 

“Oh, no!” Kris cried aloud, raising her hands to her face in 
horror. 


A child? 

Kris uttered a silent gasp, staring in horror as Lindy lifted 
him out of the trash Dumpster. 

She could see his face, frozen in a wide-eyed stare. His brown 
hair stood stiffly on top of his head. He seemed to be wearing 
some sort of gray suit. 

His arms and legs dangled lifelessly. 

“Lindy!” Kris called, her throat tight with fear. “Is it—is he... 
alive?” 

Her heart pounding, Kris started to run to her sister. Lindy 
was cradling the poor thing in her arms. 

“Is he alive?” Kris repeated breathlessly. 

She stopped short when her sister started to laugh. 

“No. Not alive!” Lindy called gleefully. 

And then Kris realized that it wasn’t a child after all. “A 
dummy!” she shrieked. 

Lindy held it up. “A ventriloquist’s dummy,” she said. 
“Someone threw him out. Do you believe it? He’s in perfect 
shape.” 

It took Lindy a while to notice that Kris was breathing hard, 
her face bright red. “Kris, what’s your problem? Oh, wow. Did 
you think he was a real kid?” Lindy laughed scornfully. 

“No. Of course not,” Kris insisted. 

Lindy held the dummy up and examined his back, looking for 
the string to pull to make his mouth move. “I am a real kid!” 
Lindy made him say. She was speaking in a high-pitched voice 
through gritted teeth, trying not to move her lips. 

“Dumb,” Kris said, rolling her eyes. 

“I am not dumb. You're dumb!” Lindy made the dummy say 
in a high, squeaky voice. When she pulled the string in his back, 
the wooden lips moved up and down, clicking as they moved. She 
moved her hand up his back and found the control to make his 
painted eyes shift from side to side. 

“He’s probably filled with bugs,” Kris said, making a 
disgusted face. “Throw him back, Lindy.” 

“No way,” Lindy insisted, rubbing her hand tenderly over the 
dummy’s wooden hair. “I’m keeping him.” 

“She’s keeping me,” she made the dummy say. 


Kris stared suspiciously at the dummy. His brown hair was 
painted on his head. His blue eyes moved only from side to side 
and couldn't blink. He had bright red painted lips, curved up into 
an eerie smile. The lower lip had a chip on one side so that it 
didn't guite match the upper lip. 

The dummy wore a gray, double-breasted suit over a white 
shirt collar. The collar wasn't attached to a shirt. Instead, the 
dummy's wooden chest was painted white. Big brown leather 
shoes were attached to the ends of his thin, dangling legs. 

“My name is Slappy,” Lindy made the dummy say, moving 
his grinning mouth up and down. 

“Dumb,” Kris repeated, shaking her head. “Why Slappy?” 

“Come over here and IIl slap you!” Lindy made him say, 
trying not to move her lips. 

Kris groaned. “Are we going to ride our bikes to the 
playground or not, Lindy?” 

“Afraid poor Robby misses you?” Lindy made Slappy ask. 

“Put that ugly thing down,” Kris replied impatiently. 

“Tm not ugly,” Slappy said in Lindy’s squeaky voice, sliding 
his eyes from side to side. “You’re ugly!” 

“Your lips are moving,” Kris told Lindy. “You’re a lousy 
ventriloquist.” 

“TII get better,” Lindy insisted. 

“You mean you're really keeping it?” Kris cried. 

“T like Slappy. He’s cute,” Lindy said, cuddling the dummy 
against the front of her T-shirt. 

“Tm cute,” she made him say. “And you're ugly.” 

“Shut up,” Kris snapped to the dummy. 

“You shut up!” Slappy replied in Lindy’s tight, high-pitched 
voice. 

“What do you want to keep him for?” Kris asked, following 
her sister toward the street. 

“T always liked puppets,” Lindy recalled. “Remember those 
marionettes I used to have? I played with them for hours at a 
time. I made up long plays with them.” 

“I always played with the marionettes, too, 
remembered. 

“You got the strings all tangled up,” Lindy said, frowning. 
“You weren’t any good at it.” 

“But what are you going to do with this dummy?” Kris 
demanded. 

“I don’t know. Maybe Pll work up an act,” Lindy said 
thoughtfully, shifting Slappy to her other arm. “TII bet I could 


77 


Kris 


earn some money with him. You know. Appear at kids’ birthday 
parties. Put on shows.” 

“Happy birthday!” she made Slappy declare. “Hand over 
some money!” 

Kris didn’t laugh. 

The two girls walked along the street in front of their house. 
Lindy cradled Slappy in her arms, one hand up his back. 

“T think he’s creepy,” Kris said, kicking a large pebble across 
the street. “You should put him back in the Dumpster.” 

“No way,” Lindy insisted. 

“No way,” she made Slappy say, shaking his head, his glassy 
blue eyes moving from side to side. “TII put you in the Dumpster!” 
“Slappy sure is mean,” Kris remarked, frowning at Lindy. 

Lindy laughed. “Don’t look at me,” she teased. “Complain to 
Slappy.” 

Kris scowled. 

“Youre jealous,” Lindy said. “Because I found him and you 
didn’t.” 

Kris started to protest, but they both heard voices. Kris 
looked up to see the two Marshall kids from down the block 
running toward them. They were cute, red-headed kids that Lindy 
and Kris sometimes baby-sat for. 

“What’s that?” Amy Marshall asked, pointing at Slappy. 

“Does he talk?” her younger brother, Ben, asked, staying 
several feet away, an uncertain expression on his freckled face. 

“Hi, Tm Slappy!” Lindy made the dummy call out. She 
cradled Slappy in one arm, making him sit up straight, his arms 
dangling at his sides. 

“Where’d you get him?” Amy asked. 

“Do his eyes move?” Ben asked, still hanging back. 

“Do your eyes move?” Slappy asked Ben. 

Both Marshall kids laughed. Ben forgot his reluctance. He 
stepped up and grabbed Slappy’s hand. 

“Ouch! Not so hard!” Slappy cried. 

Ben dropped the hand with a gasp. Then he and Amy 
collapsed in gleeful laughter. 

“Ha-ha-ha-ha!” Lindy made Slappy laugh, tilting his head 
back and opening his mouth wide. 

The two kids thought that was a riot. They laughed even 
harder. 

Pleased by the response she was getting, Lindy glanced at her 
sister. Kris was sitting on the curb, cradling her head in her 


hands, a dejected look on her face. 

She's jealous, Lindy realized. Kris sees that the kids really like 
Slappy and that I’m getting all the attention. And she’s totally 
jealous. 

Tm definitely keeping Slappy! Lindy told herself, secretly 
pleased at her little triumph. 

She stared into the dummy’s bright blue painted eyes. To her 
surprise, the dummy seemed to be staring back at her, a twinkle 
of sunlight in his eyes, his grin wide and knowing. 


“Who was that on the phone?” Mr. Powell asked, shoveling 
another forkful of spaghetti into his mouth. 

Lindy slipped back into her place at the table. “It was Mrs. 
Marshall. Down the block.” 

“Does she want you to baby-sit?” Mrs. Powell asked, reaching 
for the salad bowl. She turned to Kris. “Don't you want any 
salad?” 

Kris wiped spaghetti sauce off her chin with her napkin. 
“Maybe later.” 

“No,” Lindy answered. “She wants me to perform. At Amy's 
birthday party. With Slappy.” 

“Your first job,” Mr. Powell said, a smile crossing his slender 
face. 

“Amy and Ben liked Slappy so much, they insisted on him,” 
Lindy said. “Mrs. Marshall is going to pay me twenty dollars.” 

“That's great!” their mother exclaimed. She passed the salad 
bowl across the table to her husband. 

It had been a week since Lindy rescued Slappy from the trash 
Dumpster. Every day after school, she had spent hours up in her 
room rehearsing with him, working on his voice, practicing not 
moving her lips, thinking up jokes to perform with him. 

Kris kept insisting the whole thing was dumb. “I can't believe 
you're being such a nerd,” she told her sister. She refused to be an 
audience for Lindy's routines. 

But when Lindy brought Slappy into school on Friday, Kris’ 
attitude began to change. A group of kids had gathered around 
Lindy outside her locker. 

As Lindy made Slappy talk for them, Kris watched from down 
the hall. She’s going to make a total fool of herself, Kris thought. 

But to her surprise, the kids hooted and howled. They 
thought Slappy was a riot. Even Robby Martin, the guy Kris had 
had a crush on for two years, thought Lindy was terrific. 

Watching Robby laugh along with the other kids made Kris 
think hard. Becoming a ventriloquist might be fun. 

And profitable. Lindy was going to earn twenty dollars at the 
Marshalls’ birthday party. And when word got around, she’d 
probably perform at a lot of parties and earn even more money. 

After dinner that evening, Lindy and Kris washed and dried 
the dishes. Then Lindy asked her parents if she could practice her 


new comedy routine on them. She hurried up to her room to get 
Slappy. 

Mr. and Mrs. Powell took a seat on the living room couch. 
“Maybe Lindy will be a TV star,” Mrs. Powell said. 

“Maybe,” Mr. Powell agreed, settling back on the couch, a 
pleased smile on his face. Barky yapped and climbed between Mr. 
and Mrs. Powell, his tiny stub of a tail wagging furiously. 

“You know you're not allowed on the couch,” Mrs. Powell 
said, sighing. But she made no move to push Barky off. 

Kris sat down away from the others, on the floor by the steps, 
cradling her chin in her hands. 

“You're looking glum this evening,” her father remarked. 

“Can I get a dummy, too?” Kris asked. She hadn’t really 
planned to say it. The question just popped out of her mouth. 

Lindy came back into the room, carrying Slappy around the 
waist. “Ready?” she asked. She pulled a dining room chair into 
the center of the living room and sat down on it. 

“Well, can I?” Kris repeated. 

“You really want one, too?” Mrs. Powell asked, surprised. 

“Want what?” Lindy asked, confused. 

“Kris says she wants a dummy, too,” Mrs. Powell reported. 

“No way,” Lindy said heatedly. “Why do you want to be such 
a copycat?” 

“It looks like fun,” Kris replied, her cheeks turning bright 
pink. “If you can do it, I can do it, too,” she added shrilly. 

“You always copy everything I do,” Lindy protested angrily. 
“Why don’t you find something of your own for once? Go upstairs 
and work on your junk jewelry collection. That’s your hobby. Let 
me be the ventriloquist.” 

“Girls’—Mr. Powell started, raising a hand for quiet 
—“please, don’t fight over a dummy.” 

“T really think I’d be better at it,” Kris said. “I mean, Lindy 
isn’t very funny.” 

“Everyone thinks I’m funny,” Lindy insisted. 

“That’s not very nice, Kris,” Mrs. Powell scolded. 

“Well, I just think if Lindy has one, I should be able to have 
one, too,” Kris said to her parents. 

“Copycat,” Lindy repeated, shaking her head. “You’ve been 
putting me down all week. You said it was nerdy. But I know why 
you changed your mind. You’re upset because I’m going to earn 
some money and you're not.” 

“T really wish you two wouldn’t argue about everything,” Mr. 
Powell said disgustedly. 


“Well, can I have a dummy?” Kris asked him. 

“They're expensive,” Mr. Powell replied, glancing at his wife. 
“A good one will cost more than a hundred dollars. I really don’t 
think we can afford to buy one now.” 

“Why don't you both share Slappy?” Mrs. Powell suggested. 

“Huh?” Lindy's mouth dropped open in protest. 

“You two always share everything,” Mrs. Powell continued. 
“So why don't you share Slappy?” 

“But, Mom—” Lindy whined unhappily. 

“Excellent idea,” Mr. Powell interrupted. He motioned to 
Kris. “Try it out. After you share him for a while, I’m sure one of 
you will lose interest in him. Maybe even both of you.” 

Kris climbed to her feet and walked over to Lindy. She 
reached out for the dummy. “I don’t mind sharing,” she said 
quietly, searching her sister’s eyes for approval of the idea. “Can I 
hold him for just a second?” 

Lindy held onto Slappy tightly. 

Suddenly the dummy’s head tilted back and his mouth 
opened wide. “Beat it, Kris!” he snarled in a harsh raspy voice. 
“Get lost, you stupid moron!” 

Before Kris could back away, Slappy’s wooden hand shot up, 
and he slapped her hard across the face. 


“Ow!” 

Kris screamed and raised her hand to her cheek, which was 
bright pink. She stepped back. “Stop it, Lindy! That hurt!” 

“Me?” Lindy cried. “I didn't do it! Slappy did!” 

“Don't be dumb,” Kris protested, rubbing her cheek. “You 
really hurt me.” 

“But I didn’t do it!” Lindy cried. She turned Slappy’s face 
toward her. “Why were you so rude to Kris?” 

Mr. Powell jumped up from the couch. “Stop acting dumb 
and apologize to your sister,” he ordered. 

Lindy bowed Slappy’s head. “I’m sorry,” she made the 
dummy say. 

“No. In your own voice,” Mr. Powell insisted, crossing his 
arms in front of his chest. “Slappy didn’t hurt Kris. You did.” 

“Okay, okay,” Lindy muttered, blushing. She avoided Kris’ 
angry stare. “I’m sorry. Here.” She dumped Slappy into Kris’ arms. 

Kris was so surprised, she nearly dropped the dummy. Slappy 
was heavier than she’d imagined. 

“Now what am I supposed to do with him?” Kris asked Lindy. 

Lindy shrugged and crossed the room to the couch, where 
she dropped down beside her mother. 

“Why'd you make such a fuss?” Mrs. Powell whispered, 
leaning close to Lindy. “That was so babyish.” 

Lindy blushed. “Slappy is mine! Why can’t something be mine 
for once?” 

“Sometimes you girls are so nice to each other, and 
sometimes...” Mrs. Powell’s voice trailed off. 

Mr. Powell took a seat on the padded arm of the chair across 
the room. 

“How do I make his mouth work?” Kris asked, tilting the 
dummy upside down to examine its back. 

“There’s a string in his back, inside the slit in his jacket,” 
Lindy told her grudgingly. “You just pull it.” 

I don’t want Kris to work Slappy, Lindy thought unhappily. 

I don’t want to share Slappy. 

Why can’t I have something that just belongs to me? Why do 
I have to share everything with her? 

Why does Kris always want to copy me? 


She gritted her teeth and waited for her anger to fade. 


Later that night, Kris sat straight up in bed. She'd had a bad 
dream. 

I was being chased, she remembered, her heart still 
pounding. Chased by what? By whom? 

She couldn't remember. 

She glanced around the shadowy room, waiting for her 
heartbeat to return to normal. The room felt hot and stuffy, even 
though the window was open and the curtains were fluttering. 

Lindy lay sound asleep on her side in the twin bed next to 
Kris”. She was snoring softly, her lips slightly parted, her long hair 
falling loose about her face. 

Kris glanced at the clock-radio on the bed table between the 
two twin beds. It was nearly three in the morning. 

Even though she was now wide awake, the nightmare 
wouldn't completely fade away. She still felt uncomfortable, a 
little frightened, as if she were still being chased by someone or 
something. The back of her neck felt hot and prickly. 

She turned and fluffed up her pillow, propping it higher on 
the headboard. As she lay back on it, something caught her eye. 

Someone sitting in the chair in front of the bedroom window. 
Someone staring at her. 

After a sharp intake of breath, she realized it was Slappy. 

Yellow moonlight poured over him, making his staring eyes 
glow. He was sitting up in the chair, tilted to the right at a slight 
angle, one arm resting on the slender arm of the chair. 

His mouth locked in a wide, mocking grin, his eyes seemed to 
be staring right at Kris. 

Kris stared back, studying the dummy’s expression in the 
eerie yellow moonlight. Then, without thinking, without even 
realizing what she was doing, she climbed silently out of bed. 

Her foot got tangled in the bedsheet and she nearly tripped. 
Kicking the sheet away, she made her way quickly across the 
room to the window. 

Slappy stared up at her as her shadow fell over him. His grin 
seemed to grow wider as Kris leaned closer. 

A gust of wind made the soft curtains flutter against her face. 
Kris pushed them away and peered down at the dummy’s painted 
head. 

She reached a hand out and rubbed his wooden hair, shining 
in the moonlight. His head felt warm, warmer than she’d 
imagined. 


Kris guickly jerked her hand away. 

What was that sound? 

Had Slappy snickered? Had he laughed at her? 

No. Of course not. 

Kris realized she was breathing hard. 

Why am I so freaked out by this stupid dummy? she thought. 

In the bed behind her, Lindy made a gurgling sound and 
rolled onto her back. 

Kris stared hard into Slappy's big eyes, gleaming in the light 
from the window. She waited for him to blink or to roll his eyes 
from side to side. 

She suddenly felt foolish. 

He's just a stupid wooden dummy, she told herself. 

She reached out and pushed him over. 

The stiff body swung to the side. The hard head made a soft 
clonk as it hit the wooden arm of the chair. 

Kris stared down at him, feeling strangely satisfied, as if she’d 
somehow taught him a lesson. 

The curtains rustled against her face again. She pushed them 
away. 

Feeling sleepy, she started back to bed. 

She had only gone one step when Slappy reached up and 
grabbed her wrist. 


“Oh!” As the hand tightened around her wrist, Kris cried out and 
spun around. 

To her surprise, Lindy was crouched beside her. Lindy had a 
tight grip on Kris’ wrist. 

Kris jerked her hand from Lindy’s grasp. 

Moonlight through the window lit up Lindy’s devilish grin. 
“Gotcha again!” she declared. 

“You didn’t scare me!” Kris insisted. But her voice came out a 
trembling whisper. 

“You jumped a mile!” Lindy exclaimed gleefully. “You really 
thought the dummy grabbed you.” 

“Did not!” Kris replied. She hurried to her bed. 

“What were you doing up, anyway?” Lindy demanded. “Were 
you messing with Slappy?” 

“No. I... uh... had a bad dream,” Kris told her. “I just went to 
look out the window.” 

Lindy snickered. “You should’ve seen the look on your face.” 

“Tm going back to sleep. Leave me alone,” Kris snapped. She 
pulled the covers up to her chin. 

Lindy pushed the dummy back to a sitting position. Then she 
returned to her bed, still chuckling over the scare she’d given her 
sister. 

Kris rearranged her pillows, then glanced across the room to 
the window. The dummy’s face was half covered in shadow now. 
But the eyes glowed as if he were alive. And they stared into hers 
as if they were trying to tell her something. 

Why does he have to grin like that? Kris asked herself, trying to 
rub away the prickly feeling on the back of her neck. 

She pulled up the sheet, settled into the bed, and turned on 
her side, away from the wide, staring eyes. 

But even with her back turned, she could feel them gazing at 
her. Even with her eyes closed and the covers pulled up to her 
head, she could picture the shadowy, distorted grin, the 
unblinking eyes. Staring at her. Staring. Staring. 

She drifted into an uncomfortable sleep, drifted into another 
dark nightmare. Someone was chasing her. Someone very evil 
was chasing her. 

But who? 


On Monday afternoon, Lindy and Kris both stayed after school to 
rehearse for the spring concert. It was nearly five when they 
arrived home, and they were surprised to see their dad’s car in 
the driveway. 

“You’re home so early!” Kris exclaimed, finding him in the 
kitchen helping their mother prepare dinner. 

“Tm leaving tomorrow for a sales conference in Portland,” 
Mr. Powell explained, peeling an onion over the sink with a small 
paring knife. “So I only worked half a day today.” 

“What’s for dinner?” Lindy asked. 

“Meatloaf,” Mrs. Powell replied, “if your father ever gets the 
onion peeled.” 

“There’s a trick to not crying when you peel an onion,” Mr. 
Powell said, tears rolling down his cheeks. “Wish I knew it.” 

“How was chorus rehearsal?” Mrs. Powell asked, kneading a 
big ball of red ground beef in her hands. 

“Boring,” Lindy complained, opening the refrigerator and 
taking out a can of Coke. 

“Yeah. We’re doing all these Russian and Yugoslavian songs,” 
Kris said. “They’re so sad. They’re all about sheep or something. 
We don’t really know what they’re about. There’s no translation.” 

Mr. Powell rushed to the sink and began splashing cold water 
on his red, runny eyes. “I can’t take this!” he wailed. He tossed 
the half-peeled onion back to his wife. 

“Crybaby,” she muttered, shaking her head. 

Kris headed up the stairs to drop her backpack in her room. 
She tossed it onto the desk she shared with Lindy, then turned to 
go back downstairs. 

But something by the window caught her eye. 

Spinning around, she gasped. 

“Oh, no!” The startled cry escaped her lips. 

Kris raised her hands to her cheeks and stared in disbelief. 

Slappy was propped up in the chair in front of the window, 
grinning at her with his usual wide-eyed stare. And seated beside 
him was another dummy, also grinning at her. 

And they were holding hands. 

“What’s going on here?” Kris cried aloud. 


“Do you like him?” 

At first, Kris thought that Slappy had asked the guestion. 

She gaped in stunned disbelief. 

“Well? What do you think of him?” 

It took Kris a long moment to realize that the voice was 
coming from behind her. She turned to find her father standing in 
the doorway, still dabbing at his eyes with a wet dishtowel. 

“The—the new dummy?” Kris stammered. 

“He's for you,” Mr. Powell said, stepping into the room, the 
wet towel pressed against both eyes. 

“Really?” Kris hurried over to the chair and picked the new 
dummy up to examine him. 

“There's a tiny pawnshop on the corner across from my 
office,” Mr. Powell said, lowering the towel. “I was walking past 
and, believe it or not, this guy was in the window. He was cheap, 
too. I think the pawnbroker was glad to get rid of him.” 

“He’s... cute,” Kris said, searching for the right word. “He 
looks just like Lindy’s dummy, except his hair is bright red, not 
brown.” 

“Probably made by the same company,” Mr. Powell said. 

“His clothes are better than Slappy’s,” Kris said, holding the 
dummy out at arm’s length to get a good view. “I hate that stupid 
gray suit on Lindy’s dummy.” 

The new dummy wore blue denim jeans and a red-and-green 
flannel shirt. And instead of the formal-looking, shiny brown 
shoes, he had white high-top sneakers on his feet. 

“So you like him?” Mr. Powell asked, smiling. 

“T love him!” Kris cried happily. She crossed the room and 
gave her dad a hug. 

Then she picked up the dummy and ran out of the room, 
down the stairs, and into the kitchen. “Hey, everybody! Meet Mr. 
Wood!” she declared happily, holding the grinning dummy up in 
front of her. 

Barky yapped excitedly, leaping up to nip at the dummy’s 
sneakers. Kris pulled her dummy away. 

“Hey!” Lindy cried in surprise. “Where’d you get that?” 

“From Daddy,” Kris said, her grin wider than the dummy’s. 
“I’m going to start practicing with him after dinner, and I’m going 


to be a better ventriloguist than you.” 

“Kris!” Mrs. Powell scolded. “Everything isn't a competition, 
you know!” 

“T already have a job with Slappy,” Lindy said with a superior 
sneer. “And you're just getting started. You're just a beginner.” 

“Mr. Wood is much better-looking than Slappy,” Kris said, 
mirroring her twin's sneer. “Mr. Wood is cool-looking. That gray 
suit on your dummy is the pits.” 

“You think that ratty old shirt is cool-looking?” Lindy scoffed, 
making a disgusted face. “Yuck. That old dummy probably has 
worms!” 

“You have worms!” Kris exclaimed. 

“Your dummy won't be funny,” Lindy said nastily, “because 
you don't have a sense of humor.” 

“Oh, yeah?” Kris replied, tossing Mr. Wood over her 
shoulder. “I must have a sense of humor. I put up with you, don't 
1?” 

“Copycat! Copycat!” Lindy cried angrily. 

“Out of the kitchen!” Mrs. Powell ordered with an impatient 
shriek. “Out! Get out! You two are impossible! The dummies have 
better personalities than either of you!” 

“Thanks, Mom,” Kris said sarcastically. 

“Call me for dinner,” Lindy called back. “I’m going upstairs 
to practice my act with Slappy for the birthday party on 
Saturday.” 


It was the next afternoon, and Kris was sitting at the dressing 
table she shared with Lindy. Kris rummaged in the jewelry box 
and pulled out another string of brightly colored beads. She 
slipped them over her head and untangled them from the other 
three strands of beads she was wearing. Then she gazed at herself 
in the mirror, shaking her head to better see the long, dangly 
earrings. 

I love my junk jewelry collection, she thought, digging into 
the depths of the wooden jewelry box to see what other treasures 
she could pull out. 

Lindy had no interest in the stuff. But Kris could spend hours 
trying on the beads, fingering the dozens of little charms, running 
her fingers over the plastic bracelets, jangling the earrings. Her 
jewelry collection always cheered her up. 

She shook her head again, making the long earrings jangle. A 
knock on the bedroom door made her spin around. 

“Hey, Kris, how’s it going?” Her friend Cody Matthews 


stepped into the room. He had straight, white-blond hair, and 
pale gray eyes in a slender, serious face. Cody always looked as if 
he were deep in thought. 

“You ride your bike over?” Kris asked, removing several 
strands of beads at once and tossing them into the jewelry box. 

“No. Walked,” Cody replied. “Why'd you call? You just want 
to hang out?” 

“No.” Kris jumped to her feet. She walked over to the chair 
by the window and grabbed up Mr. Wood. “I want to practice my 
act.” 

Cody groaned. “I’m the guinea pig?” 

“No. The audience. Come on.” 

She led him out to the bent old maple tree in the middle of 
her back yard. The afternoon sun was just beginning to lower 
itself in the clear, spring-blue sky. 

She raised one foot against the tree trunk and propped Mr. 
Wood on her knee. Cody sprawled on his back in the shade. “Tell 
me if this is funny,” she instructed. 

“Okay. Shoot,” Cody replied, narrowing his eyes in 
concentration. 

Kris turned Mr. Wood to face her. “How are you today?” she 
asked him. 

“Pretty good. Knock wood,” she made the dummy say. 

She waited for Cody to laugh, but he didn’t. “Was that 
funny?” she asked. 

“Kinda,” he replied without enthusiasm. “Keep going.” 

“Okay.” Kris lowered her head so that she was face-to-face 
with her dummy. “Mr. Wood,” she said, “why were you standing 
in front of the mirror with your eyes closed?” 

“Well,” answered the dummy in a high-pitched, squeaky 
voice, “I wanted to see what I look like when I’m asleep!” 

Kris tilted the dummy’s head back and made him look as if 
he were laughing. “How about that joke?” she asked Cody. 

Cody shrugged. “Better, I guess.” 

“Aw, you're no help!” Kris screamed angrily. She lowered her 
arms, and Mr. Wood crumpled onto her lap. “You're supposed to 
tell me if it’s funny or not.” 

“T guess not,” Cody said thoughtfully. 

Kris groaned. “I need some good joke books,” she said. 
“That’s all. Some good joke books with some really funny jokes. 
Then Id be ready to perform. Because I’m a pretty good 
ventriloquist, right?” 

“T guess,” Cody replied, pulling up a handful of grass and 


letting the moist, green blades sift through his fingers. 

“Well, I don't move my lips very much, do I?” Kris 
demanded. 

“Not too much,” Cody allowed. “But you don’t really throw 
your voice.” 

“No one can throw her voice,” Kris told him. “It’s just an 
illusion. You make people think you’re throwing your voice. You 
don’t really throw it.” 

“Oh,” Cody said, pulling up another handful of grass. 

Kris tried out several more jokes. “What do you think?” she 
asked Cody. 

“I think I have to go home,” Cody said. He tossed a handful 
of grass at her. 

Kris brushed the green blades off Mr. Wood’s wooden head. 
She rubbed her hand gently over the dummy’s painted red hair. 
“You’re hurting Mr. Wood’s feelings,” she told Cody. 

Cody climbed to his feet. “Why do you want to mess with 
that thing, anyway?” he asked, pushing his white-blond hair back 
off his forehead. 

“Because it’s fun,” Kris replied. 

“Ts that the real reason?” Cody demanded. 

“Well... I guess I want to show Lindy that I’m better at it 
than she is.” 

“You two are weird!” Cody declared. “See you in school.” He 
gave her a little wave, then turned and headed for his home down 
the block. 


Kris pulled down the blankets and climbed into bed. Pale 
moonlight filtered in through the bedroom window. 

Yawning, she glanced at the clock-radio. Nearly ten. She 
could hear Lindy brushing her teeth in the bathroom across the 
hall. 

Why does Lindy always hum when she brushes her teeth? 
Kris wondered. How can one twin sister do so many annoying 
things? 

She gave Mr. Wood one last glance. He was propped in the 
chair in front of the window, his hands carefully placed in his lap, 
his white sneakers hanging over the chair edge. 

He looks like a real person, Kris thought sleepily. 

Tomorrow I’m going to check out some good joke books from 
the library at school. I can be funnier than Lindy. I know I can. 

She settled back sleepily on her pillow. I’ll be asleep as soon 
as we turn off the lights, she thought. 


A few seconds later, Lindy entered the room, wearing her 
nightshirt and carrying Slappy under one arm. “You asleep?” she 
asked Kris. 

“Almost,” Kris replied, yawning loudly. “Tve been studying 
for the math final all night. Where've you been?” 

“Over at Alice's,” Lindy told her, setting Slappy down in the 
chair beside Mr. Wood. “Some kids were over, and I practiced my 
act for them. They laughed so hard, I thought they'd split a gut. 
When Slappy and I did our rap routine, Alice spit her chocolate 
milk out her nose. What a riot!” 

“That's nice,” Kris said without enthusiasm. “Guess you and 
Slappy are ready for Amy's birthday party on Saturday.” 

“Yeah,” Lindy replied. She placed Slappy's arm around Mr. 
Wood’s shoulder. “They look so cute together,” she said. Then she 
noticed the clothing neatly draped over the desk chair. “What's 
that?” she asked Kris. 

Kris raised her head from the pillow to see what her sister 
was pointing at. “My outfit for tomorrow,” she told her. “We're 
having a dress-up party in Miss Finch’s class. It’s a farewell party. 
For Margot. You know. The student teacher.” 

Lindy stared at the clothes. “Your Betsey Johnson skirt? Your 
silk blouse?” 

“We're supposed to get really dressed up,” Kris said, 
yawning. “Can we go to sleep now?” 

“Yeah. Sure.” Lindy made her way to her bed, sat down, and 
clicked off the bed-table lamp. “Are you getting any better with 
Mr. Wood?” she asked, climbing between the sheets. 

Kris was stung by the guestion. It was such an obvious put- 
down. “Yeah. I’m getting really good. I did some stuff for Cody. 
Out in the back yard. Cody laughed so hard, he couldn't breathe. 
Really. He was holding his sides. He said Mr. Wood and I should 
be on TV.” 

“Really?” Lindy replied after a long moment’s hesitation. 
“That’s weird. I never thought Cody had much of a sense of 
humor. He’s always so grim. I don’t think I’ve ever seen him 
laugh.” 

“Well, he was laughing at Mr. Wood and me,” Kris insisted, 
wishing she were a better liar. 

“Awesome,” Lindy muttered. “I can’t wait to see your act.” 

Neither can I, Kris thought glumly. 

A few seconds later, they were both asleep. 


Their mother’s voice, calling from downstairs, awoke them at 


seven the next morning. Bright, morning-orange sunlight poured 
in through the window. Kris could hear birds chirping happily in 
the old maple tree. 

“Rise and shine! Rise and shine!” Every morning, Mrs. Powell 
shouted up the same words. 

Kris rubbed the sleep from her eyes, then stretched her arms 
high over her head. She glanced across the room, then uttered a 
quiet gasp. “Hey—what’s going on?” She reached across to 
Lindy’s bed and shook Lindy by the shoulder. “What’s going on?” 

“Huh?” Lindy, startled, sat straight up. 

“What’s the joke? Where is he?” Kris demanded. 

“Huh?” 

Kris pointed to the chair across the room. 

Sitting straight up in the chair, Slappy grinned back at them, 
bathed in morning sunlight. 

But Mr. Wood was gone. 


Kris blinked several times and pushed herself up in bed with both 
hands. Her left hand tingled. She must have been sleeping on it, 
she realized. 

“What? What's wrong?” Lindy asked, her voice fogged with 
sleep. 

“Where's Mr. Wood?” Kris demanded impatiently. “Where'd 
you put him?” 

“Huh? Put him?” Lindy struggled to focus her eyes. She saw 
Slappy sitting stiffly on the chair across the room. By himself. 

“It's not funny,” Kris snapped. She climbed out of bed, pulled 
down the hem of her nightshirt, and made her way quickly to the 
chair in front of the window. “Don’t you ever get tired of playing 
stupid jokes?” 

“Jokes? Huh?” Lindy lowered her feet to the floor. 

Kris bent down to search the floor under the chair. Then she 
moved to the foot of the bed and got down on her knees to search 
under both twin beds. 

“Where is he, Lindy?” she asked angrily, on her knees at the 
foot of the bed. “I don’t think this is funny. I really don’t.” 

“Well, neither do I,” Lindy insisted, standing up and 
stretching. 

Kris climbed to her feet. Her eyes went wide as she spotted 
the missing dummy. 

“Oh!” 

Lindy followed her sister’s startled gaze. 

Mr. Wood grinned at them from the doorway. He appeared to 
be standing, his skinny legs bent at an awkward angle. 

He was wearing Kris’ dress-up clothes, the Betsey Johnson 
skirt and the silk blouse. 

Her mouth wide open in surprise, Kris made her way quickly 
to the doorway. She immediately saw that the dummy wasn’t 
really standing on his own. He had been propped up, the 
doorknob shoved into the opening in his back. 

She grabbed the dummy by the waist and pulled him away 
from the door. “My blouse. It’s all wrinkled,” she cried, holding it 
so Lindy could see. She narrowed her eyes angrily at her sister. 
“This was so obnoxious of you, Lindy.” 

“Me?” Lindy shrieked. “I swear, Kris, I didn’t do it. I slept like 
a rock last night. I didn’t move. I didn’t get up till you woke me. I 


didn't do it. Really!” 

Kris stared hard at her sister, then lowered her eyes to the 
dummy. 

In her blouse and skirt, Mr. Wood grinned up at her, as if 
enjoying her bewilderment. 

“Well, Mr. Wood,” Kris said aloud, “I guess you put on my 
clothes and walked to the door all by yourself!” 

Lindy started to say something. But their mother’s voice from 
downstairs interrupted. “Are you girls going to school today? 
Where are you? You're late!” 

“Coming!” Kris called down, casting an angry glance at 
Lindy. She carefully set Mr. Wood down on his back on her bed 
and pulled her skirt and blouse off him. She looked up to see 
Lindy making a mad dash across the hall to be first in the 
bathroom. 

Sighing, Kris stared down at Mr. Wood. The dummy grinned 
up at her, a mischievous grin. 

“Well? What’s going on?” she asked the dummy. “I didn’t 
dress you up and move you. And Lindy swears she didn’t do it.” 

But if we didn’t do it, she thought, who did? 


“Tilt his head forward,” Lindy instructed. “That's it. If you bounce 
him up and down a little, it'll make it look like he’s laughing.” 

Kris obediently bounced Mr. Wood on her lap, making him 
laugh. 

“Don't move his mouth so much,” Lindy told her. 

“I think you're both crazy,” Lindy’s friend Alice said. 

“So what else is new?” Cody joked. 

All four of them were sitting in a small patch of shade under 
the bent old maple tree in the Powells’ back yard. It was a hot 
Saturday afternoon, the sun high in a pale blue sky, streaks of 
yellow light filtering down through the shifting leaves above their 
heads. 

Barky sniffed busily around the yard, his little tail wagging 
nonstop. 

Kris sat on a folding chair, which leaned back against the 
gnarled tree trunk. She had Mr. Wood on her lap. 

Lindy and Alice stood at the edge of the shade, their hands 
crossed over their chests, watching Kris’ performance with frowns 
of concentration on their faces. 

Alice was a tall, skinny girl, with straight black hair down to 
her shoulders, a snub nose, and a pretty, heart-shaped mouth. She 
was wearing white shorts and a bright blue midriff top. 

Cody was sprawled on his back in the grass, his hands behind 
his head, a long blade of grass between his teeth. 

Kris was trying to show off her ventriloquist skills. But Lindy 
kept interrupting with “helpful” suggestions. When she wasn’t 
making suggestions, Lindy was nervously glancing at her watch. 
She didn’t want to be late for her job at Amy’s birthday party at 
two o’clock. 

“I think you're way weird,” Alice told Lindy. 

“Hey, no way,” Lindy replied. “Slappy is a lot of fun. And Im 
going to make a lot of money with him. And maybe I'll be a 
comedy star or something when I’m older.” She glanced at her 
watch again. 

“Well, everyone at school thinks that both of you are weird,” 
Alice said, swatting a fly off her bare arm. 

“Who cares?” Lindy replied sharply. “They're all weird, too.” 

“And so are you,” Kris made Mr. Wood say. 


“T could see your lips move,” Lindy told Kris. 

Kris rolled her eyes. “Give me a break. You've been giving 
me a hard time all morning.” 

“Just trying to help,” Lindy said. “You don't have to be so 
defensive, do you?” 

Kris uttered an angry growl. 

“Was that your stomach?” she made Mr. Wood say. 

Cody laughed. 

“At least one person thinks you're funny,” Lindy said dryly. 
“But if you want to do parties, you really should get some better 
jokes.” 

Kris let the dummy slump to her lap. “I can't find any good 
joke books,” she said dejectedly. “Where do you find your jokes?” 

A superior sneer formed on Lindy’s face. She tossed her long 
hair behind her shoulder. “I make up my own jokes,” she replied 
snootily. 

“You are a joke!” Cody said. 

“Ha-ha. Remind me to laugh later,” Lindy said sarcastically. 

“T can’t believe you don’t have your dummy out here,” Alice 
told Lindy. “I mean, don’t you want to rehearse for the party?” 

“No need,” Lindy replied. “I’ve got my act down. I don’t want 
to over-rehearse.” 

Kris groaned loudly. 

“Some of the other parents are staying at the birthday party 
to watch Slappy and me,” Lindy continued, ignoring Kris’ 
sarcasm. “If the kids like me, their parents might hire me for their 
parties.” 

“Maybe you and Kris should do an act together,” Alice 
suggested. “That could be really awesome.” 

“Yeah. What an act! Then there’d be four dummies!” Cody 
joked. 

Alice was the only one to laugh. 

Lindy made a face at Cody. “That might actually be fun,” she 
said thoughtfully. And then she added, “When Kris is ready.” 

Kris drew in her breath and prepared to make an angry reply. 

But before she could say anything, Lindy grabbed Mr. Wood 
from her hands. “Let me give you a few pointers,” Lindy said, 
putting one foot on Kris’ folding chair and arranging Mr. Wood on 
her lap. “You have to hold him up straighter, like this.” 

“Hey—give him back,” Kris demanded, reaching for her 
dummy. 

As she reached up, Mr. Wood suddenly lowered his head 
until he was staring down at her. “You’re a jerk!” he rasped in 


Kris’ face, speaking in a low, throaty growl. 

“Huh?” Kris pulled back in surprise. 

“You’re a stupid jerk!” Mr. Wood repeated nastily in the same 
harsh growl. 

“Lindy—stop it!” Kris cried. 

Cody and Alice both stared in openmouthed surprise. 

“Stupid moron! Get lost! Get lost, stupid jerk!” the dummy 
rasped in Kris’ face. 

“Whoa!” Cody exclaimed. 

“Make him stop!” Kris screamed at her sister. 

“T can’t!” Lindy cried in a trembling voice. Her face became 
pale, her eyes wide with fear. “I can’t make him stop, Kris! He— 
he’s speaking for himself!” 


The dummy glared at Kris, its grin ugly and evil. 

“I—II can't make him stop. I’m not doing it,” Lindy cried. 
Tugging with all her might, she pulled Mr. Wood out of Kris’ face. 

Cody and Alice flashed each other bewildered glances. 

Frightened, Kris raised herself from the folding chair and 
backed up against the tree trunk. “He—he’s talking on his own?” 
She stared hard at the grinning dummy. 

“J—I think so. I’m... all mixed up!” Lindy declared, her 
cheeks bright pink. 

Barky yipped and jumped on Lindy’s legs, trying to get her 
attention. But she kept her gaze on Kris’ frightened face. 

“This is a joke—right?” Cody asked hopefully. 

“What's going on?” Alice demanded, her arms crossed in 
front of her chest. 

Ignoring them, Lindy handed Mr. Wood back to Kris. “Here. 
Take him. He's yours. Maybe you can control him.” 

“But, Lindy—” Kris started to protest. 

Lindy glared at her watch. “Oh, no! The party! Pm late!” 
Shaking her head, she took off toward the house. “Later!” she 
called without looking back. 

“But Lindy—” Kris called. 

The kitchen door slammed behind Lindy. 

Holding Mr. Wood by the shoulders, Kris lowered her eyes to 
his face. He grinned up at her, a devilish grin, his eyes staring 
intently into hers. 


Kris swung easily, leaning back and raising her feet into the air. 
The chains sgueaked with every swing. The old back yard 
swingset, half covered with rust, hadn't been used much in recent 
years. 

The early evening sun was lowering itself behind the house. 
The aroma of a roasting chicken floated out from the kitchen 
window. Kris could hear her mother busy in the kitchen preparing 
dinner. 

Barky yapped beneath her. Kris dropped her feet to the 
ground and stopped the swing to avoid kicking him. “Dumb dog. 
Don't you know you could get hurt?” 

She looked up to see Lindy come running up the driveway, 


holding Slappy under her arm. From the smile on Lindy's face, 
Kris knew at once that the birthday party had been a triumph. But 
she had to ask anyway. “How'd it go?” 

“It was awesome!” Lindy exclaimed. “Slappy and I were 
great!” 

Kris pulled herself off the swing and forced a smile to her 
face. “That's nice,” she offered. 

“The kids thought we were a riot!” Lindy continued. She 
pulled Slappy up. “Didn't they, Slappy?” 

“They liked me. Hated you!” Slappy declared in Lindy's high- 
pitched voice. 

Kris forced a laugh. “I’m glad it went okay,” she said, trying 
hard to be a good sport. 

“T did a sing-along with Slappy, and it went over really well. 
Then Slappy and I did our rap routine. What a hit!” Lindy gushed. 

She’s spreading it on a little thick, Kris thought bitterly. Kris 
couldn’t help feeling jealous. 

“The kids all lined up to talk to Slappy,” Lindy continued. 
“Didn’t they, Slappy?” 

“Everyone loved me,” she made the dummy say. “Where’s my 
share of the loot?” 

“So you got paid twenty dollars?” Kris asked, kicking at a 
clump of weeds. 

“Twenty-five,” Lindy replied. “Amy’s mom said I was so 
good, she’d pay me extra. Oh. And guess what else? You know 
Mrs. Evans? The woman who always wears the leopardskin 
pants? You know—Anna’s mom? She asked me to do Anna’s party 
next Sunday. She’s going to pay me thirty dollars! I’m going to be 
rich!” 

“Wow. Thirty dollars,” Kris muttered, shaking her head. 

“T get twenty. You get ten,” Lindy made Slappy say. 

“T have to go tell Mom the good news!” Lindy said. “What 
have you been doing all afternoon?” 

“Well, after you left, I was pretty upset,” Kris replied, 
following Lindy to the house. “You know. About Mr. Wood. I—I 
put him upstairs. Alice and Cody went home. Then Mom and I 
went to the mall.” 

His tail wagging furiously, Barky ran right over their feet, 
nearly tripping both of them. “Barky, look out!” Lindy yelled. 

“Oh. I nearly forgot,” Kris said, stopping on the back stoop. 
“Something good happened.” 

Lindy stopped, too. “Something good?” 

“Yeah. I ran into Mrs. Berman at the mall.” Mrs. Berman was 


their music teacher and organizer of the spring concert. 

“Thrills,” Lindy replied sarcastically. 

“And Mrs. Berman asked if Mr. Wood and I wanted to be 
master of ceremonies for the spring concert.” Kris smiled at her 
sister. 

Lindy swallowed hard. “She asked you to host the concert?” 

“Yeah. I get to perform with Mr. Wood in front of everyone!” 
Kris gushed happily. She saw a flash of jealousy on Lindy's face, 
which made her even happier. 

Lindy pulled open the screen door. “Well, good luck,” she 
said dryly. “With that weird dummy of yours, you'll need it.” 


Dinner was spent talking about Lindy’s performance at Amy 
Marshall’s birthday party. Lindy and Mrs. Powell chatted 
excitedly. Kris ate in silence. 

“At first I thought the whole thing was strange, I have to 
admit,” Mrs. Powell said, scooping ice cream into bowls for 
dessert. “I just couldn't believe you'd be interested in 
ventriloquism, Lindy. But I guess you have a flair for it. I guess 
you have some talent.” 

Lindy beamed. Mrs. Powell normally wasn’t big on 
compliments. 

“T found a book in the school library about ventriloquism,” 
Lindy said. “It had some pretty good tips in it. It even had a 
comedy routine to perform.” She glanced at Kris. “But I like 
making up my own jokes better.” 

“You should watch your sister’s act,” Mrs. Powell told Kris, 
handing her a bowl of ice cream. “I mean, you could probably 
pick up some pointers for the concert at school.” 

“Maybe,” Kris replied, trying to hide how annoyed she was. 

After dinner, Mr. Powell called from Portland, and they all 
talked with him. Lindy told him about her success with Slappy at 
the birthday party. Kris told him about being asked to host the 
concert with Mr. Wood. Her father promised he wouldn’t 
schedule any road trips so that he could attend the concert. 

After watching a video their mother had rented at the mall, 
the two sisters went up to their room. It was a little after eleven. 

Kris clicked on the light. Lindy followed her in. 

They both glanced across the room to the chair where they 
kept the two dummies—and gasped. 

“Oh, no!” Lindy cried, raising one hand to her wide open 
mouth. 

Earlier that night, the dummies had been placed side by side 


in a sitting position. 

But now Slappy was upside down, falling out of the chair, his 
head on the floor. His brown shoes had been pulled off his feet 
and tossed against the wall. His suit jacket had been pulled 
halfway down his arms, trapping his hands behind his back. 

“L-look!” Kris stammered, although her sister was already 
staring in horror at the scene. “Mr. Wood—he's...” Kris’ voice 
caught in her throat. 

Mr. Wood was sprawled on top of Slappy. His hands were 
wrapped around Slappy's throat, as if he were strangling him. 


10 


“J—I don’t believe this!” Kris managed to whisper. She turned and 
caught the frightened expression on Lindy’s face. 

“What’s going on?” Lindy cried. 

Both sisters hurried across the room. Kris grabbed Mr. Wood 
by the back of the neck and pulled him off the other dummy. She 
felt as if she were separating two fighting boys. 

She held Mr. Wood up in front of her, examining him 
carefully, staring at his face as if half-expecting him to talk to her. 

Then she lowered the dummy and tossed it facedown onto 
her bed. Her face was pale and taut with fear. 

Lindy stooped and picked up Slappy’s brown shoes from the 
floor. She held them up and studied them, as if they would offer a 
clue as to what had happened. 

“Kris—did you do this?” Lindy asked softly. 

“Huh? Me?” Kris reacted with surprise. 

“I mean, I know you're jealous of Slappy and me—” Lindy 
started. 

“Whoa. Wait a minute,” Kris replied angrily in a shrill, 
trembling voice. “I didn’t do this, Lindy. Don’t accuse me.” 

Lindy glared at her sister, studying her face. Then her 
expression softened and she sighed. “I don’t get. I just don’t get it. 
Look at Slappy. He’s nearly been torn apart.” 

She set the shoes down on the chair and picked the dummy 
up gently as if picking up a baby. Holding him in one hand, she 
struggled to pull his suit jacket up with the other. 

Kris heard her sister mutter something. It sounded like “Your 
dummy is evil.” 

“What did you say?” Kris demanded. 

“Nothing,” Lindy replied, still struggling with the jacket. 
“Tm... uh... Fm kind of scared about this,” Lindy confessed, 
blushing, avoiding Kris’ eyes. 

“Me, too,” Kris admitted. “Something weird is going on. I 
think we should tell Mom.” 

Lindy buttoned the jacket. Then she sat down on the bed 
with Slappy on her lap and started to replace the dummy’s shoes. 
“Yeah. I guess we should,” she replied. “It—it’s just so creepy.” 

Their mother was in bed, reading a Stephen King novel. Her 
bedroom was dark except for a tiny reading lamp on her 


77 


headboard that threw down a narrow triangle of yellow light. 

Mrs. Powell uttered a short cry as her two daughters 
appeared out of the shadows. “Oh. You startled me. This is such a 
scary book, and I think I was just about to fall asleep.” 

“Can we talk to you?” Kris asked eagerly in a low whisper. 

“Something weird is going on,” Lindy added. 

Mrs. Powell yawned and closed her book. “What's wrong?” 

“Its about Mr. Wood,” Kris said. “He's been doing a lot of 
strange things.” 

“Huh?” Mrs. Powell's eyes opened wide. She looked pale and 
tired under the harsh light from the reading lamp. 

“He was strangling Slappy,” Lindy reported. “And this 
afternoon, he said some really gross things. And —” 

“Stop!” Mrs. Powell ordered, raising one hand. “Just stop.” 

“But, Mom—” Kris started. 

“Give me a break, girls,” their mother said wearily. “I’m tired 
of your silly competitions.” 

“You don't understand,” Lindy interrupted. 

“Yes, I do understand,” Mrs. Powell said sharply. “You two 
are even competing with those ventriloguist dummies.” 

“Mom, please!” 

“T want it to stop right now,” Mrs. Powell insisted, tossing the 
book onto her bed table. “I mean it. I don't want to hear another 
word from either of you about those dummies. If you two have 
problems, settle it between yourselves.” 

“Mom, listen—” 

“And if you can't settle it, [II take the dummies away. Both 
of them. I’m serious.” Mrs. Powell reached above her head and 
clicked off the reading light, throwing the room into darkness. 
“Good night,” she said. 

The girls had no choice but to leave the room. They slunk 
down the hall in silence. 

Kris hesitated at the doorway to their bedroom. She expected 
to find Mr. Wood strangling Slappy again. She breathed a sigh of 
relief when she saw the two dummies on the bed where they had 
been left. 

“Mom wasn’t too helpful,” Lindy said dryly, rolling her eyes. 
She picked up Slappy and started to arrange him in the chair in 
front of the window. 

“T think she was asleep and we woke her up,” Kris replied. 

She picked up Mr. Wood and started toward the chair with 
him—then stopped. “You know what? I think I’m going to put 
him in the closet tonight,” she said thoughtfully. 


“Good idea,” Lindy said, climbing into bed. 

Kris glanced down at the dummy, half-expecting him to 
react. To complain. To start calling her names. 

But Mr. Wood grinned up at her, his painted eyes dull and 
lifeless. 

Kris felt a chill of fear. 

I’m becoming afraid of a stupid ventriloquist’s dummy, she 
thought. 

I’m shutting him up in the closet tonight because I’m afraid. 

She carried Mr. Wood to the closet. Then, with a groan, she 
raised him high above her head and slid him onto the top shelf. 
Carefully closing the closet door, listening for the click, she made 
her way to her bed. 

She slept fitfully, tossing on top of the covers, her sleep filled 
with disturbing dreams. She awoke to find her nightshirt 
completely twisted, cutting off the circulation to her right arm. 
She struggled to straighten it, then fell back to sleep. 


She awoke early, drenched in sweat. The sky was still dawn-gray 
outside the window. 

The room felt hot and stuffy. She sat up slowly, feeling 
weary, as if she hadn’t slept at all. 

Blinking away the sleep, her eyes focused on the chair in 
front of the window. 

There sat Slappy, exactly where Lindy had placed him. 

And beside him sat Mr. Wood, his arm around Slappy’s 
shoulder, grinning triumphantly at Kris as if he had just pulled off 
a wonderful joke. 


11 


“Now, Mr. Wood, do you go to school?” 

“Of course I do. Do you think Im a dummy?” 

“And what's your favorite class?” 

“Wood shop, of course!” 

“What project are you building in shop class, Mr. Wood?” 

“Tm building a girl dummy! What else? Ha-ha! Think I want 
to spend the rest of my life on your lap?!” 

Kris sat in front of the dressing table mirror with Mr. Wood 
on her lap, studying herself as she practiced her routine for the 
school concert. 

Mr. Wood had been well-behaved for two days. No 
frightening, mysterious incidents. Kris was beginning to feel 
better. Maybe everything would go okay from now on. 

She leaned close to the mirror, watching her lips as she made 
the dummy talk. 

The b's and the m’s were impossible to pronounce without 
moving her lips. She'd just have to avoid those sounds as best she 
could. 

I’m getting better at switching from Mr. Wood's voice back to 
mine, she thought happily. But I’ve got to switch faster. The faster 
he and I talk, the funnier it is. 

“Let’s try it again, Mr. Wood,” she said, pulling her chair 
closer to the mirror. 

“Work, work, work,” she made the dummy grumble. 

Before she could begin the routine, Lindy came rushing 
breathlessly into the room. Kris watched her sister in the mirror 
as she came up behind her, her long hair flying loosely over her 
shoulders, an excited smile on her face. 

“Guess what?” Lindy asked. 

Kris started to reply, but Lindy didn’t give her a chance. 

“Mrs. Petrie was at Amy Marshall’s birthday party,” Lindy 
gushed excitedly. “She works for Channel Three. You know. The 
TV station. And she thinks 'm good enough to go on Talent 
Search, the show they have every week.” 

“Huh? Really?” was all Kris could manage in reply. 

Lindy leapt excitedly in the air and cheered. “Slappy and I 
are going to be on TV!” she cried. “Isn’t that fabulous?” 

Staring at her sister’s jubilant reflection in the mirror, Kris 


felt a stab of jealousy. 

“Tve got to tell Mom!” Lindy declared. “Hey, Mom! Mom!” 
She ran from the room. Kris heard her shouting all the way down 
the stairs. 

“Aaaaaargh!” Kris couldn't hold it in. She uttered an angry 
Cry. 

“Why does everything good happen to Lindy?” Kris screamed 
aloud. “I’m hosting a stupid concert for maybe a hundred parents 
—and she’s going to be on TV! I’m just as good as she is. Maybe 
better!” 

In a rage, she raised Mr. Wood high over her head and 
slammed him to the floor. 

The dummy's head made a loud clonk as it hit the hardwood 
floor. The wide mouth flew open as if about to scream. 

“Oh.” Kris struggled to regain her composure. 

Mr. Wood, crumpled at her feet, stared up at her accusingly. 

Kris lifted him up and cradled the dummy against her. 
“There, there, Mr. Wood,” she whispered soothingly. “Did I hurt 
you? Did I? Pm so sorry. I didn't mean to.” 

The dummy continued to stare up at her. His painted grin 
hadn’t changed, but his eyes seemed cold and unforgiving. 


It was a still night. No breeze. The curtains in front of the open 
bedroom window didn’t flutter or move. Pale silver moonlight 
filtered in, creating long, purple shadows that appeared to creep 
across the girls’ bedroom. 

Lindy had been sleeping fitfully, a light sleep filled with 
busy, colorful dreams. She was startled awake by a sound. A 
gentle thud. 

“Huh?” she raised her head from the damp pillow and 
turned. 

Someone was moving in the darkness. 

The sounds she’d heard were footsteps. 

“Hey!” she whispered, wide awake now. “Who is it?” 

The figure turned in the doorway, a shadow against even 
blacker shadows. “It’s only me,” came a whispered reply. 

“Kris?” 

“Yeah. Something woke me up. My throat is sore,” Kris 
whispered from the doorway. “I’m going down to the kitchen for 
a glass of water.” 

She disappeared into the shadows. Her head still raised off 
the pillow, Lindy listened to her footsteps padding down the 
stairs. 


When the sounds faded, Lindy shut her eyes and lowered her 
head to the pillow. 
A few seconds later, she heard Kris’ scream of horror. 


12 


Her heart pounding, Lindy struggled out of bed. The sheet tangled 
around her legs, and she nearly fell. 

Kris? bloodcurdling scream echoed in her ears. 

She practically leapt down the dark stairway, her bare feet 
thudding hard on the thin carpet of the steps. 

It was dark downstairs, except for a thin sliver of yellow light 
from the kitchen. 

“Kris—Kris—are you okay?” Lindy called, her voice sounding 
small and frightened in the dark hallway. 

“Kris?” 

Lindy stopped at the kitchen doorway. 

What was that eerie light? 

It took her a while to focus. Then she realized she was staring 
at the dim yellow light from inside the refrigerator. 

The refrigerator door was wide open. 

And... the refrigerator was empty. 

“What—what’s going on here?” 

She took a step into the kitchen. Then another. 

Something cold and wet surrounded her foot. 

Lindy gasped and, looking down, saw that she had stepped 
into a wide puddle. 

An overturned milk carton beside her foot revealed that the 
puddle was spilled milk. 

She raised her eyes to Kris, who was standing in darkness 
across the room, her back against the wall, her hands raised to 
her face in horror. 

“Kris, what on earth—” 

The scene was coming into focus now. It was all so weird, 
so... wrong. It was taking Lindy a long time to see the whole 
picture. 

But, now, following Kris’ horrified stare, Lindy saw the mess 
on the floor. And realized why the refrigerator was empty. 

Everything inside it had been pulled out and dumped on the 
kitchen floor. An orange juice bottle lay on its side in a puddle of 
orange juice. Eggs were scattered everywhere. Fruits and 
vegetables were strewn over the floor. 

“Ohh!” Lindy moaned in utter disbelief. 

Everything seemed to sparkle and gleam. 


What was all that shiny stuff among the food? 

Kris’ jewelry! 

There were earrings and bracelets and strands of beads tossed 
everywhere, mixed with the spilled, strewn food like some kind of 
bizarre salad. 

“Oh, no!” Lindy shrieked as her eyes came to rest on the 
figure on the floor. 

Sitting upright in the middle of the mess was Mr. Wood, 
grinning gleefully at her. He had several strands of beads around 
his neck, long, dangling earrings hanging from his ears, and a 
platter of leftover chicken on his lap. 


13 


“Kris, are you okay?” Lindy cried, turning her eyes away from the 
grinning, jewelry-covered dummy. 

Kris didn't seem to hear her. 

“Are you okay?” Lindy repeated the guestion. 

“Wh-what's going on?” Kris stammered, her back pressed 
against the wall, her expression taut with terror. “Who—who did 
this? Did Mr. Wood—?” 

Lindy started to reply. But their mother’s howl of surprise 
from the doorway cut off her words. “Mom—” Lindy cried, 
spinning around. 

Mrs. Powell clicked on the ceiling light. The kitchen seemed 
to flare up. All three of them blinked, struggling to adjust to the 
sudden brightness. 

“What on earth!” Mrs. Powell cried. She started to call to her 
husband, then remembered he wasn’t home. “I—I don’t believe 
this!” 

Barky came bounding into the room, his tail wagging. He 
lowered his head and started to lick up some spilled milk. 

“Out you go,” Mrs. Powell said sternly. She picked up the 
dog, carried him out, and closed the kitchen door. Then she 
strode into the center of the room, shaking her head, her bare feet 
narrowly missing the puddle of milk. 

“T came down for a drink, and I—I found this mess,” Kris said 
in a trembling voice. “The food. My jewelry. Everything...” 

“Mr. Wood did it,” Lindy accused. “Look at him!” 

“Stop it! Stop it!” Mrs. Powell screamed. “I’ve had enough.” 

Mrs. Powell surveyed the mess, frowning and tugging at a 
strand of blonde hair. Her eyes stopped on Mr. Wood, and she 
uttered a groan of disgust. 

“T knew it,” she said in a low voice, raising her eyes 
accusingly to the two girls. “I knew this had something to do with 
those ventriloquist dummies.” 

“Mr. Wood did it, Mom,” Kris said heatedly, stepping away 
from the wall, her hands tensed into fists. “I know it sounds 
dumb, but—” 

“Stop it,” Mrs. Powell ordered, narrowing her eyes. “This is 
just sick. Sick!” She stared hard at the jewel-bedecked dummy, 
who grinned up at her over the big platter of chicken. 

“Tm going to take the dummies away from you both,” Mrs. 


Powell said, turning back to Lindy and Kris. “This whole thing has 
just gotten out of control.” 

“No!” Kris cried. 

“That's not fair!” Lindy declared. 

“Tm sorry. They have to be put away,” Mrs. Powell said 
firmly. She let her eyes move over the cluttered floor, and let out 
another weary sigh. “Look at my kitchen.” 

“But I didn’t do anything!” Lindy screamed. 

“T need Mr. Wood for the spring concert!” Kris protested. 
“Everyone is counting on me, Mom.” 

Mrs. Powell glanced from one to the other. Her eyes stayed 
on Kris. “That’s your dummy on the floor, right?” 

“Yeah,” Kris told her. “But I didn’t do this. I swear!” 

“You both swear you didn’t do it, right?” Mrs. Powell said, 
suddenly looking very tired under the harsh ceiling light. 

“Yes,” Lindy answered quickly. 

“Then you both lose your dummies. I’m sorry,” Mrs. Powell 
said. “One of you is lying. I—I really can’t believe this.” 

A heavy silence blanketed the room as all three Powells 
stared down in dismay at the mess on the floor. 

Kris was the first to speak. “Mom, what if Lindy and I clean 
everything up?” 

Lindy caught on quickly. Her face brightened. “Yeah. What if 
we put everything back. Right now. Make the kitchen just like 
normal. Make it spotless. Can we keep our dummies?” 

Mrs. Powell shook her head. “No. I don’t think so. Look at 
this mess. All the vegetables are spoiled. And the milk.” 

“We'll replace it all,” Kris said quickly. “With our allowance. 
And we'll clean it up perfectly. Please. If we do that, give us one 
more chance?” 

Mrs. Powell twisted her face in concentration, debating with 
herself. She stared at her daughters’ eager faces. “Okay,” she 
replied finally. “I want the kitchen spotless when I come down in 
the morning. All the food, all the jewelry. Everything back where 
it goes.” 

“Okay,” both girls said in unison. 

“And I don’t want to see either of those dummies down here 
in my kitchen again,” Mrs. Powell demanded. “If you can do that, 
TII give you one more chance.” 

“Great!” both girls cried at once. 

“And I don’t want to hear any more arguments about those 
dummies,” Mrs. Powell continued. “No more fights. No more 
competing. No more blaming everything on the dummies. I don’t 


want to hear anything about them. Ever.” 

“You won't,” Kris promised, glancing at her sister. 

“Thanks, Mom,” Lindy said. “You go to bed. We’ll clean up.” 
She gave her mother a gentle shove toward the doorway. 

“Not another word,” Mrs. Powell reminded them. 

“Right, Mom,” the twins agreed. 

Their mother disappeared toward her room. They began to 
clean up. Kris pulled a large garbage bag from the drawer and 
held it while Lindy tossed in empty cartons and spoiled food. 

Kris carefully collected her jewelry and carried it upstairs. 

Neither girl spoke. They worked in silence, picking up, 
cleaning, and mopping until the kitchen was clean. Lindy closed 
the refrigerator door. She yawned loudly. 

Kris inspected the floor on her hands and knees, making sure 
it was spotless. Then she picked up Mr. Wood. He grinned back at 
her as if it was all a big joke. 

This dummy has been nothing but trouble, Kris thought. 

Nothing but trouble. 

She followed Lindy out of the kitchen, clicking off the light as 
she left. The two girls climbed the stairs silently. Neither of them 
had spoken a word. 

Pale moonlight filtered into their room through the open 
window. The air felt hot and steamy. 

Kris glanced at the clock. It was a little past three in the 
morning. 

Slappy sat slumped in the chair in front of the window, 
moonlight shining on his grinning face. Lindy, yawning, climbed 
into bed, pushed down the blanket, and pulled up the sheet. She 
turned her face away from her sister. 

Kris lowered Mr. Wood from her shoulder. You’re nothing but 
trouble, she thought angrily, holding him in front of her and 
staring at his grinning face. 

Nothing but trouble. 

Mr. Wood’s wide, leering grin seemed to mock her. 

A chill of fear mixed with her anger. 

I’m beginning to hate this dummy, she thought. 

Fear him and hate him. 

Angrily, she pulled open the closet door and tossed the 
dummy into the closet. It fell in a crumpled heap on the closet 
floor. 

Kris slammed the closet door shut. 

Her heart thudding, she climbed into bed and pulled up the 


covers. She suddenly felt very tired. Her entire body ached from 
weariness. 

She buried her face in the pillow and shut her eyes. 

She had just about fallen asleep when she heard the tiny 
voice. 

“Let me out! Let me out of here!” it cried. A muffled voice, 
coming from inside the closet. 


14 


“Let me out! Let me out!” the high-pitched voice called angrily. 

Kris sat up with a jolt. Her entire body convulsed in a 
shudder of fear. 

Her eyes darted to the other bed. Lindy hadn't moved. 

“Did—did you hear it?” Kris stammered. 

“Hear what?” Lindy asked sleepily. 

“The voice,” Kris whispered. “In the closet.” 

“Huh?” Lindy asked sleepily. “What are you talking about? 
It’s three in the morning. Can’t we get some sleep?” 

“But, Lindy—” Kris lowered her feet to the floor. Her heart 
was thudding in her chest. “Wake up. Listen to me! Mr. Wood was 
calling to me. He was talking!” 

Lindy raised her head and listened. 

Silence. 

“I don’t hear anything, Kris. Really. Maybe you were 
dreaming.” 

“No!” Kris shrieked, feeling herself lose control. “It wasn’t a 
dream! I’m so scared, Lindy. I’m just so scared!” 

Suddenly Kris was trembling all over, and hot tears were 
pouring down her cheeks. 

Lindy stood up and moved to the edge of her sister’s bed. 

“Something h-horrible is going on here, Lindy,” Kris 
stammered through her tears. 

“And I know who’s doing it,” Lindy whispered, leaning over 
her twin, putting a comforting hand on her quivering shoulder. 

“Huh?” 

“Yes. I know who’s been doing it all,” Lindy whispered. “I 
know who it is.” 

“Who?” Kris asked breathlessly. 


15 


“Who?” Kris repeated, letting the tears run down her cheeks. 
“Who?” 

“T have,” Lindy said. Her smile spread into a grin almost as 
wide as Slappy's. She closed her eyes and laughed. 

“Huh?” Kris didn't understand. “What did you say?” 

“T said I have been doing it,” Lindy repeated. “Me. Lindy. It 
was all a joke, Kris. I gotcha again.” She nodded her head as if 
confirming her words. 

Kris gaped at her twin in disbelief. “It was all a joke?” 

Lindy kept nodding. 

“You moved Mr. Wood during the night? You dressed him in 
my clothes and made him say those gross things to me? You put 
him in the kitchen? You made that horrible mess?” 

Lindy chuckled. “Yeah. I really scared you, didn’t I?” 

Kris balled her hands into angry fists. “But—but—” she 
sputtered. “Why?” 

“For fun,” Lindy replied, dropping back onto her bed, still 
grinning. 

“Fun?” 

“T wanted to see if I could scare you,” Lindy explained. “It 
was just a joke. You know. I can’t believe you fell for that voice in 
the closet just now! I must be a really good ventriloquist!” 

“But, Lindy—” 

“You really believed Mr. Wood was alive or something!” 
Lindy said, laughing, enjoying her victory. “You’re such a nit!” 

“Nit?” 

“Half a nitwit!” Lindy burst into wild laughter. 

“Tt isn’t funny,” Kris said softly. 

“I know,” Lindy replied. “It's a riot! You should’ve seen the 
look on your face when you saw Mr. Wood downstairs in your 
precious beads and earrings!” 

“How—how did you ever think of such a mean joke?” Kris 
demanded. 

“It just came to me,” Lindy answered with some pride. 
“When you got your dummy.” 

“You didn’t want me to get a dummy,” Kris said thoughtfully. 

“You're right,” Lindy quickly agreed. “I wanted something 
that would be mine, for a change. I’m so tired of you being a 


77 


copycat. So—” 

“So you thought of this mean joke,” Kris accused. 

Lindy nodded. 

Kris strode angrily to the window and pressed her forehead 
against the glass. “I—I can’t believe I was so stupid,” she 
muttered. 

“Neither can I,” Lindy agreed, grinning again. 

“You really made me start thinking that Mr. Wood was alive 
or something,” Kris said, staring out the window to the back yard 
below. “You really made me afraid of him.” 

“Aren’t I brilliant!” Lindy proclaimed. 

Kris turned to face her sister. “Pm never speaking to you 
again,” she said angrily. 

Lindy shrugged. “It was just a joke.” 

“No,” Kris insisted. “It was too mean to be just a joke. I’m 
never speaking to you again. Never.” 

“Fine,” Lindy replied curtly. “I thought you had a sense of 
humor. Fine.” She slid into bed, her back to Kris, and pulled the 
covers up over her head. 

I’ve got to find a way to pay her back for this, Kris thought. But 
how? 


16 


After school a few days later, Kris walked home with Cody. It was 
a hot, humid afternoon. The trees were still, and seemed to throw 
little shade on the sidewalk. The air above the pavement 
shimmered in the heat. 

“Wish we had a swimming pool,” Kris muttered, pulling her 
backpack off her shoulder. 

“I wish you had one, too,” Cody said, wiping his forehead 
with the sleeve of his red T-shirt. 

“Td like to dive into an enormous pool of iced tea,” Kris said, 
“like in the TV commercials. It always looks so cold and 
refreshing.” 

Cody made a face. “Swim in iced tea? With ice cubes and 
lemon?” 

“Forget it,” Kris muttered. 

They crossed the street. A couple of kids they knew rode by 
on bikes. Two men in white uniforms were up on ladders, leaning 
against the corner house, painting the gutters. 

“Bet they’re hot,” Cody remarked. 

“Let’s change the subject,” Kris suggested. 

“How are you doing with Mr. Wood?” Cody asked. 

“Not bad,” Kris said. “I think Pve got some pretty good jokes. 
I should be ready for the concert tomorrow night.” 

They stopped at the corner and let a large blue van rumble 
past. 

“Are you talking to your sister?” Cody asked as they crossed 
the street. The bright sunlight made his white-blond hair glow. 

“A little,” Kris said, making a face. “I’m talking to her. But I 
haven’t forgiven her.” 

“That was such a dumb stunt she pulled,” Cody said 
sympathetically. He wiped the sweat off his forehead with the 
sleeve of his T-shirt. 

“It just made me feel like such a dork,” Kris admitted. “I 
mean, I was so stupid. She really had me believing that Mr. Wood 
was doing all that stuff.” Kris shook her head. Thinking about it 
made her feel embarrassed all over again. 

Her house came into view. She unzipped the back 
compartment of her backpack and searched for the keys. 

“Did you tell your mom about Lindy’s practical joke?” Cody 


asked. 

Kris shook her head. “Mom is totally disgusted. We're not 
allowed to mention the dummies to her. Dad got home from 
Portland last night, and Mom told him what was going on. So 
we're not allowed to mention the dummies to him, either!” She 
found the keys and started up the drive. “Thanks for walking 
home with me.” 

“Yeah. Sure.” Cody gave her a little wave and continued on 
toward his house up the street. 

Kris pushed the key into the front door lock. She could hear 
Barky jumping and yipping excitedly on the other side of the 
door. “I’m coming, Barky,” she called in. “Hold your horses.” 

She pushed open the door. Barky began leaping on her, 
whimpering as if she'd been away for months. “Okay, okay!” she 
cried laughing. 

It took several minutes to calm the dog down. Then Kris got a 
snack from the kitchen and headed up to her room to practice 
with Mr. Wood. 

She hoisted the dummy up from the chair where it had spent 
the day beside Lindy’s dummy. A can of Coke in one hand, the 
dummy over her shoulder, she headed to the dressing table and 
sat down in front of the mirror. 

This was the best time of day to rehearse, Kris thought. No 
one was home. Her parents were at work. Lindy was at some 
after-school activity. 

She arranged Mr. Wood on her lap. “Time to go to work,” she 
made him say, reaching into his back to move his lips. She made 
his eyes slide back and forth. 

A button on his plaid shirt had come unbuttoned. Kris leaned 
him down against the dressing table and started to fasten it. 

Something caught her eye. Something yellow inside the 
pocket. 

“Weird,” Kris said aloud. “I never noticed anything in there.” 

Slipping two fingers into the slender pocket, she pulled out a 
yellowed sheet of paper, folded up. 

Probably just the receipt for him, Kris thought. 

She unfolded the sheet of paper and held it up to read it. 

It wasn't a receipt. The paper contained a single sentence 
handwritten very cleanly in bold black ink. It was in a language 
Kris didn't recognize. “Did someone send you a love note, Mr. 
Wood?” she asked the dummy. 

It stared up at her lifelessly. 

Kris lowered her eyes to the paper and read the strange 


sentence out loud: 

“Karru marri odonna loma molonu karrano.” 

What language is that? Kris wondered. 

She glanced down at the dummy and uttered a low cry of 
surprise. 

Mr. Wood appeared to blink. 

But that wasn’t possible —was it? 

Kris took a deep breath, then let it out slowly. 

The dummy stared up at her, his painted eyes as dull and 
wide open as ever. 

Let's not get paranoid, Kris scolded herself. 

“Time to work, Mr. Wood,” she told him. She folded up the 
piece of yellow paper and slipped it back into his shirt pocket. 
Then she raised him to a sitting position, searching for the eye 
and mouth controls with her hand. 

“How are things around your house, Mr. Wood?” 

“Not good, Kris. I’ve got termites. I need termites like I need 
another hole in my head! Ha-ha!” 


“Lindy! Kris! Could you come downstairs, please!” Mr. Powell 
called from the foot of the stairs. 

It was after dinner, and the twins were up in their room. 
Lindy was sprawled on her stomach on the bed, reading a book 
for school. Kris was in front of the dressing table mirror, 
rehearsing quietly with Mr. Wood for tomorrow night’s concert. 

“What do you want, Dad?” Lindy shouted down, rolling her 
eyes. 

“We're kind of busy,” Kris shouted, shifting the dummy on 
her lap. 

“The Millers are here, and they’re dying to see your 
ventriloquist acts,” their father shouted up. 

Lindy and Kris both groaned. The Millers were the elderly 
couple who lived next door. They were very nice people, but very 
boring. 

The twins heard Mr. Powell’s footsteps on the stairs. A few 
seconds later, he poked his head into their room. “Come on, girls. 
Just put on a short show for the Millers. They came over for 
coffee, and we told them about your dummies.” 

“But I have to rehearse for tomorrow night,” Kris insisted. 

“Rehearse on them,” her father suggested. “Come on. Just do 
five minutes. They'll get a real kick out of it.” 

Sighing loudly, the girls agreed. Carrying their dummies over 
their shoulders, they followed their father down to the living 


room. 

Mr. and Mrs. Miller were side by side on the couch, coffee 
mugs in front of them on the low coffee table. They smiled and 
called out cheerful greetings as the girls appeared. 

Kris was always struck by how much the Millers looked alike. 
They both had slender, pink faces topped with spongy white hair. 
They both wore silver-framed bifocals, which slipped down on 
nearly identical, pointy noses. They both had the same smile. Mr. 
Miller had a small, gray mustache. Lindy always joked that he 
grew it so the Millers could tell each other apart. 

Is that what happens to you when you’ve been married a long 
time? Kris found herself thinking. You start to look exactly alike? 

The Millers were even dressed alike, in loose-fitting tan 
Bermuda shorts and white cotton sports shirts. 

“Lindy and Kris took up ventriloquism a few weeks ago,” 
Mrs. Powell was explaining, twisting herself forward to see the 
girls from the armchair. She motioned them to the center of the 
room. “And they both seem to have some talent for it.” 

“Have you girls ever heard of Bergen and McCarthy?” Mrs. 
Miller asked, smiling. 

“Who?” Lindy and Kris asked in unison. 

“Before your time,” Mr. Miller said, chuckling. “They were a 
ventriloquist act.” 

“Can you do something for us?” Mrs. Miller asked, picking up 
her coffee mug and setting it in her lap. 

Mr. Powell pulled a dining room chair into the center of the 
room. “Here. Lindy, why don’t you go first?” He turned to the 
Millers. “They're very good. You'll see,” he said. 

Lindy sat down and arranged Slappy on her lap. The Millers 
applauded. Mrs. Miller nearly spilled her coffee, but she caught 
the mug just in time. 

“Don’t applaud—just throw money!” Lindy made Slappy say. 
Everyone laughed as if they’d never heard that before. 

Kris watched from the stairway as Lindy did a short routine. 
Lindy was really good, she had to admit. Very smooth. The 
Millers were laughing so hard, their faces were bright red. An 
identical shade of red. Mrs. Miller kept squeezing her husband’s 
knee when she laughed. 

Lindy finished to big applause. The Millers gushed about how 
wonderful she was. Lindy told them about the TV show she might 
be on, and they promised they wouldn’t miss it. “We’ll tape it,” 
Mr. Miller said. 

Kris took her place on the chair and sat Mr. Wood up in her 


lap. “This is Mr. Wood,” she told the Millers. “We're going to be 
the hosts of the spring concert at school tomorrow night. So PII 
give you a preview of what we're going to say.” 

“That’s a nice-looking dummy,” Mrs. Miller said quietly. 

“You're a nice-looking dummy, too!” Mr. Wood declared in a 
harsh, raspy growl of a voice. 

Kris’ mother gasped. The Millers’ smiles faded. 

Mr. Wood leaned forward on Kris’ lap and stared at Mr. 
Miller. “Is that a mustache, or are you eating a rat?” he asked 
nastily. 

Mr. Miller glanced uncomfortably at his wife, then forced a 
laugh. They both laughed. 

“Don’t laugh so hard. You might drop your false teeth!” Mr. 
Wood shouted. “And how do you get your teeth that disgusting shade 
of yellow? Does your bad breath do that?” 

“Kris!” Mrs. Powell shouted. “That’s enough!” 

The Millers’ faces were bright red now, their expressions 
bewildered. 

“That’s not funny. Apologize to the Millers,” Mr. Powell 
insisted, crossing the room and standing over Kris. 

“ILI didn’t say any of it!” Kris stammered. “Really, I—” 

“Kris—apologize!” her father demanded angrily. 

Mr. Wood turned to the Millers. “I’m sorry,” he rasped. “I’m 
sorry you’re so ugly! I’m sorry you’re so old and stupid, too!” 

The Millers stared at each other unhappily. “I don’t get her 
humor,” Mrs. Miller said. 

“Tt’s just crude insults,” Mr. Miller replied quietly. 

“Kris—what is wrong with you?” Mrs. Powell demanded. She 
had crossed the room to stand beside her husband. “Apologize to 
the Millers right now! I don’t believe you!” 

“J—I—” Gripping Mr. Wood tightly around the waist, Kris 
rose to her feet. “I—I—” She tried to utter an apology, but no 
words would come out. 

“Sorry!” she finally managed to scream. Then, with an 
embarrassed cry, she turned and fled up the stairs, tears 
streaming down her face. 


17 


“You have to believe me!” Kris cried in a trembling voice. “I really 
didn't say any of those things. Mr. Wood was talking by himself!” 

Lindy rolled her eyes. “Tell me another one,” she muttered 
sarcastically. 

Lindy had followed Kris upstairs. Down in the living room, 
her parents were still apologizing to the Millers. Now, Kris sat on 
the edge of her bed, wiping tears off her cheeks. Lindy stood with 
her arms crossed in front of the dressing table. 

“T don't make insulting jokes like that,” Kris said, glancing at 
Mr. Wood, who lay crumpled in the center of the floor where Kris 
had tossed him. “You know that isn’t my sense of humor.” 

“So why’d you do it?” Lindy demanded. “Why’d you want to 
make everyone mad?” 

“But I didn’t!” Kris shrieked, tugging at the sides of her hair. 
“Mr. Wood said those things! I didn’t!” 

“How can you be such a copycat?” Lindy asked disgustedly. 
“T already did that joke, Kris. Can't you think of something 
original?” 

“It's not a joke,” Kris insisted. “Why don't you believe me?” 

“No way,” Lindy replied, shaking her head, her arms still 
crossed in front of her chest. “No way I'm going to fall for the 
same gag.” 

“Lindy, please!” Kris pleaded. “I’m frightened. I'm really 
frightened.” 

“Yeah. Sure,” Lindy said sarcastically. “I’m shaking all over, 
too. Wow. You really fooled me, Kris. Guess you showed me you 
can play funny tricks, too.” 

“Shut up!” Kris snapped. More tears formed in the corners of 
her eyes. 

“Very good crying,” Lindy said. “But it doesn’t fool me, 
either. And it won’t fool Mom and Dad.” She turned and picked 
up Slappy. “Maybe Slappy and I should practice some jokes. After 
your performance tonight, Mom and Dad might not let you do the 
concert tomorrow night.” 

She slung Slappy over her shoulder and, stepping over the 
crumpled form of Mr. Wood, hurried from the room. 


It was hot and noisy backstage in the auditorium. Kris’ throat was 
dry, and she kept walking over to the water fountain and slurping 


mouthfuls of the warm water. 

The voices of the audience on the other side of the curtain 
seemed to echo off all four walls and the ceiling. The louder the 
noise became as the auditorium filled, the more nervous Kris felt. 

How am I ever going to do my act in front of all those 
people? she asked herself, pulling the edge of the curtain back a 
few inches and peering out. Her parents were off to the side, in 
the third row. 

Seeing them brought memories of the night before flooding 
back to Kris. Her parents had grounded her for two weeks as 
punishment for insulting the Millers. They almost hadn’t let her 
come to the concert. 

Kris stared at the kids and adults filing into the large 
auditorium, recognizing a lot of faces. She realized her hands 
were ice cold. Her throat was dry again. 

Don’t think of it as an audience, she told herself. Think of it 
as a bunch of kids and parents, most of whom you know. 

Somehow that made it worse. 

She let go of the curtain, hurried to get one last drink from 
the fountain, then retrieved Mr. Wood from the table she had left 
him on. 

It suddenly grew quiet on the other side of the curtain. The 
concert was about to begin. 

“Break a leg!” Lindy called across to her as she hurried to 
join the other chorus members. 

“Thanks,” Kris replied weakly. She pulled up Mr. Wood and 
straightened his shirt. “Your hands are clammy!” she made him 
say. 

“No insults tonight,” Kris told him sternly. 

To her shock, the dummy blinked. 

“Hey!” she cried. She hadn't touched his eye controls. 

She had a stab of fear that went beyond stage fright. Maybe I 
shouldn't go on with this, she thought, staring intently at Mr. 
Wood, watching for him to blink again. 

Maybe I should say I’m sick and not perform with him. 

“Are you nervous?” a voice whispered. 

“Huh?” At first, she thought it was Mr. Wood. But then she 
quickly realized that it was Mrs. Berman, the music teacher. 

“Yeah. A little,” Kris admitted, feeling her face grow hot. 

“You'll be terrific,” Mrs. Berman gushed, squeezing Kris’ 
shoulder with a sweaty hand. She was a large, heavyset woman 
with several chins, a red lipsticked mouth, and flowing black hair. 
She was wearing a long, loose-fitting dress of red-and-blue flower 


patterns. “Here goes,” she said, giving Kris’ shoulder one more 
squeeze. 

Then she stepped onstage, blinking against the harsh white 
light of the spotlight, to introduce Kris and Mr. Wood. 

Am I really doing this? Kris asked herself. 

Can I do this? 

Her heart was pounding so hard, she couldn’t hear Mrs. 
Berman’s introduction. Then, suddenly, the audience was 
applauding, and Kris found herself walking across the stage to the 
microphone, carrying Mr. Wood in both hands. 

Mrs. Berman, her flowery dress flowing around her, was 
heading offstage. She smiled at Kris and gave her an encouraging 
wink as they passed each other. 

Squinting against the bright spotlight, Kris walked to the 
middle of the stage. Her mouth felt as dry as cotton. She 
wondered if she could make a sound. 

A folding chair had been set up for her. She sat down, 
arranging Mr. Wood on her lap, then realized that the 
microphone was much too high. 

This drew titters of soft laughter from the audience. 

Embarrassed, Kris stood up and, holding Mr. Wood under one 
arm, struggled to lower the microphone. 

“Are you having trouble?” Mrs. Berman called from the side 
of the stage. She hurried over to help Kris. 

But before the music teacher got halfway across the stage, 
Mr. Wood leaned into the microphone. “What time does the blimp 
go up?” he rasped nastily, staring at Mrs. Berman’s dress. 

“What?” She stopped in surprise. 

“Your face reminds me of a wart I had removed!” Mr. Wood 
growled at the startled woman. 

Her mouth dropped open in horror. “Kris!” 

“Tf we count your chins, will it tell us your age?” 

There was laughter floating up from the audience. But it was 
mixed with gasps of horror. 

“Kris—that’s enough!” Mrs. Berman cried, the microphone 
picking up her angry protest. 

“You’re more than enough! You’re enough for two!” Mr. Wood 
declared nastily. “If you got any bigger, you’d need your own zip 
code!” 

“Kris—really! Fm going to ask you to apologize,” Mrs. 
Berman said, her face bright red. 

“Mrs. Berman, I—I’m not doing it!” Kris stammered. “I’m not 
saying these things!” 


“Please apologize. To me and to the audience,” Mrs. Berman 
demanded. 

Mr. Wood leaned into the microphone. “Apologize for THIS!” 
he screamed. 

The dummy's head tilted back. His jaw dropped. His mouth 
opened wide. 

And a thick green liquid came spewing out. 

“Yuck!” someone screamed. 

It looked like pea soup. It spurted up out of Mr. Wood’s open 
mouth like water rushing from a fire hose. 

Voices screamed and cried out their surprise as the thick, 
green liquid showered over the people in the front rows. 

“Stop it!” 

“Help!” 

“Somebody—turn it off!” 

“Tt stinks!” 

Kris froze in horror, staring as more and more of the 
disgusting substance poured from her dummy’s gaping mouth. 

A putrid stench—the smell of sour milk, of rotten eggs, of 
burning rubber, of decayed meat—rose up from the liquid. It 
puddled over the stage and showered over the front seats. 

Blinded by the spotlight, Kris couldn’t see the audience in 
front of her. But she could hear the choking and the gagging, the 
frantic cries for help. 

“Clear the auditorium! Clear the auditorium!” Mrs. Berman 
was shouting. 

Kris heard the rumble and scrape of people shoving their way 
up the aisles and out the doors. 

“Tt stinks!” 

“Tm sick!” 

“Somebody—help!” 

Kris tried to clamp her hand over the dummy’s mouth. But 
the force of the putrid green liquid frothing and spewing out was 
too strong. It pushed her hand away. 

Suddenly she realized she was being shoved from behind. Off 
the stage. Away from the shouting people fleeing the auditorium. 
Out of the glaring spotlight. 

She was backstage before she realized that it was Mrs. 
Berman who was pushing her. 

“J—I don’t know how you did that. Or why!” Mrs. Berman 
shouted angrily, frantically wiping splotches of the disgusting 
green liquid off the front of her dress with both hands. “But ’m 
going to see that you’re suspended from school, Kris! And if I 


have my way,” she sputtered, “you'll be suspended for life!” 


18 


“That's right. Close the door,” Mr. Powell said sternly, glaring 
with narrowed eyes at Kris. 

He stood a few inches behind her, arms crossed in front of 
him, making sure she followed his instructions. She had carefully 
folded Mr. Wood in half and shoved him to the back of her closet 
shelf. Now she closed the closet, making sure it was completely 
shut, as he ordered. 

Lindy watched silently from her bed, her expression troubled. 

“Does the closet door lock?” Mr. Powell asked. 

“No. Not really,” Kris told him, lowering her head. 

“Well, that will have to do,” he said. “On Monday, I’m taking 
him back to the pawn shop. Do not take him out until then.” 

“But, Dad—” 

He raised a hand to silence her. 

“We have to talk about this,” Kris pleaded. “You have to 
listen to me. What happened tonight—it wasn't a practical joke. I 


77 


Her father turned away from her, a scowl on his face. “Kris, 
I’m sorry. We’ll talk tomorrow. Your mother and I—we’re both 
too angry and too upset to talk now.” 

“But, Dad—” 

Ignoring her, he stormed out of the room. She listened to his 
footsteps, hard and hurried, down the stairs. Then Kris slowly 
turned to Lindy. “Now do you believe me?” 

“J—I don’t know what to believe,” Lindy replied. “It was just 
so... unbelievably gross.” 

“Lindy, tl" 

“Daddy’s right. Let’s talk tomorrow,” Lindy said. “I’m sure 
everything will be clearer and calmer tomorrow.” 


But Kris couldn't sleep. She shifted from side to side, 
uncomfortable, wide awake. She pulled the pillow over her face, 
held it there for a while, welcoming the soft darkness, then tossed 
it to the floor. 

Tm never going to sleep again, she thought. 

Every time she closed her eyes, she saw the hideous scene in 
the auditorium once again. She heard the astonished cries of the 
audience, the kids and their parents. And she heard the cries of 


shock turn to groans of disgust as the putrid gunk poured out over 
everyone. 

Sickening. So totally sickening. 

And everyone blamed her. 

My life is ruined, Kris thought. I can never go back there 
again. I can never go to school. I can never show my face 
anywhere. 

Ruined. My whole life. Ruined by that stupid dummy. 

In the next bed, Lindy snored softly, in a slow, steady 
rhythm. 

Kris turned her eyes to the bedroom window. The curtains 
hung down over the window, filtering the pale moonlight from 
outside. Slappy sat in his usual place in the chair in front of the 
window, bent in two, his head between his knees. 

Stupid dummies, Kris thought bitterly. So stupid. 

And now my life is ruined. 

She glanced at the clock. One-twenty. Outside the window, 
she heard a low, rumbling sound. A soft whistle of brakes. 
Probably a large truck going by. 

Kris yawned. She closed her eyes and saw the gross green 
gunk spewing out of Mr. Wood’s mouth. 

Will I see that every time I close my eyes? she wondered. 

What on earth was it? How could everyone blame me for 
something so... so... 

The rumbling of the truck faded into the distance. 

But then Kris heard another sound. A rustling sound. 

A soft footstep. 

Someone was moving. 

She sucked in her breath and held it, listening hard. 

Silence now. Silence so heavy, she could hear the loud 
thudding of her heart. 

Then another soft footstep. 

A shadow moved. 

The closet door swung open. 

Or was it just shadows shifting? 

No. Someone was moving. Moving from the open closet. 
Someone was creeping toward the bedroom door. Creeping so 
softly, so silently. 

Her heart pounding, Kris pulled herself up, trying not to 
make a sound. Realizing that she’d been holding her breath, she 
let it out slowly, silently. She took another breath, then sat up. 

The shadow moved slowly to the door. 


Kris lowered her feet to the floor, staring hard into the 
darkness, her eyes staying with the silent, moving figure. 

What's happening? she wondered. 

The shadow moved again. She heard a scraping sound, the 
sound of a sleeve brushing the doorframe. 

Kris pushed herself to her feet. Her legs felt shaky as she 
crept to the door, following the moving shadow. 

Out into the hallway. Even darker out here because there 
were no windows. 

Toward the stairway. 

The shadow moved more quickly now. 

Kris followed, her bare feet moving lightly over the thin 
carpet. 

What’s happening? What’s happening? 

She caught up to the shadowy figure on the landing. “Hey!” 
she called, her voice a tight whisper. 

She grabbed the shoulder and turned the figure around. 

And stared into the grinning face of Mr. Wood. 


19 


Mr. Wood blinked, then hissed at her, an ugly sound, a menacing 
sound. In the darkness of the stairwell, his painted grin became a 
threatening leer. 

In her fright, Kris squeezed the dummy’s shoulder, wrapping 
her fingers around the harsh fabric of his shirt. 

“This—this is impossible!” she whispered. 

He blinked again. He giggled. His mouth opened, making his 
grin grow wider. 

He tried to tug out of Kris’ grasp, but she hung on without 
even realizing she was holding him. 

“But—you’re a dummy!” she squealed. 

He giggled again. “So are you,” he replied. His voice was a 
deep growl, like the angry snarl of a large dog. 

“You can’t walk!” Kris cried, her voice trembling. 

The dummy giggled its ugly giggle again. 

“You can’t be alive!” Kris exclaimed. 

“Let go of me—now!” the dummy growled. 

Kris held on, tightening her grip. “I’m dreaming,” Kris told 
herself aloud. “I have to be dreaming.” 

“Pm not a dream. lm a nightmare!” the dummy exclaimed, 
and tossed back his wooden head, laughing. 

Still gripping the shoulder of the shirt, Kris stared through 
the darkness at the grinning face. The air seemed to grow heavy 
and hot. She felt as if she couldn’t breathe, as if she were 
suffocating. 

What was that sound? 

It took her a while to recognize the strained gasps of her own 
breathing. 

“Let go of me,” the dummy repeated. “Or I’ll throw you down 
the stairs.” He tried once again to tug out of her grasp. 

“No!” Kris insisted, holding tight. “I—I’m putting you back in 
the closet.” 

The dummy laughed, then pushed his painted face close to 
Kris’ face. “You can’t keep me there.” 

“Tm locking you in. I’m locking you in a box. In something!” 
Kris declared, panic clouding her thoughts. 

The darkness seemed to descend over her, choking her, 
weighing her down. 


“Let go of me.” The dummy pulled hard. 

Kris reached out her other hand and grabbed him around the 
waist. 

“Let go of me,” he snarled in his raspy, deep rumble of a 
voice. “I’m in charge now. You will listen to me. This is my house 
now.” 

He pulled hard. 

Kris encircled his waist. 

They both fell onto the stairs, rolling down a few steps. 

“Let go!” the dummy ordered. He rolled on top of her, his 
wild eyes glaring into hers. 

She pushed him off, tried to pin his arms behind his back. 

He was surprisingly strong. He pulled back one arm, then 
shoved a fist hard into the pit of her stomach. 

“Ohhh.” Kris groaned, feeling the breath knocked out of her. 

The dummy took advantage of her momentary weakness, and 
pulled free. Grasping the banister with one hand, he tried to pull 
himself past her and down the stairs. 

But Kris shot out a foot and tripped him. 

Still struggling to breathe, she pounced onto his back. Then 
she pulled him away from the banister and pushed him down 
hard onto a step. 

“Oh!” Kris gasped loudly as the overhead hall light flashed 
on. She closed her eyes against the sudden harsh intrusion. The 
dummy struggled to pull out from under her, but she pushed 
down on his back with all her weight. 

“Kris—what on earth—?!” Lindy’s startled voice called down 
from the top step. 

“It's Mr. Wood!” Kris managed to cry up to her. “He's... 
alive!” She pushed down hard, sprawled over the dummy, keeping 
him pinned beneath her. 

“Kris—what are you doing?” Lindy demanded. “Are you 
okay?” 

“No!” Kris exclaimed. “I’m not okay! Please—Lindy! Go get 
Mom and Dad! Mr. Wood—he’s alive!” 

“Its just a dummy!” Lindy called down, taking a few 
reluctant steps toward her sister. “Get up, Kris! Have you lost 
your mind?” 

“Listen to me!” Kris shrieked at the top of her lungs. “Get 
Mom and Dad! Before he escapes!” 

But Lindy didn’t move. She stared down at her sister, her 
long hair falling in tangles about her face, her features twisted in 
horror. “Get up, Kris,” she urged. “Please—get up. Let’s go back 


to bed.” 

“Tm telling you, he’s alive!” Kris cried desperately. “You've 
got to believe me, Lindy. You’ve got to!” 

The dummy lay lifelessly beneath her, his face buried in the 
carpet, his arms and legs sprawled out to the sides. 

“You had a nightmare,” Lindy insisted, climbing down step 
by step, holding her long nightshirt up above her ankles until she 
was standing right above Kris. “Come back to bed, Kris. It was 
just a nightmare. The horrible thing that happened at the concert 
—it gave you a nightmare, that’s all.” 

Gasping for breath, Kris lifted herself up and twisted her 
head to face her sister. Grabbing the banister with one hand, she 
raised herself a little. 

The instant she lightened up on him, the dummy grabbed the 
edge of the stair with both hands and pulled himself out from 
under her. Half-falling, half-crawling, he scrambled down the rest 
of the stairs. 

“No! No! I don’t believe it!” Lindy shrieked, seeing the 
dummy move. 

“Go get Mom and Dad!” Kris said. “Hurry!” 

Her mouth wide open in shocked disbelief, Lindy turned and 
headed back up the stairs, screaming for her parents. 

Kris dived off the step, thrusting her arms in front of her. 

She tackled Mr. Wood from behind, wrapping her arms 
around his waist. 

His head hit the carpet hard as they both crumpled to the 
floor. 

He uttered a low, throaty cry of pain. His eyes closed. He 
didn’t move. 

Dazed, her chest heaving, her entire body trembling, Kris 
slowly climbed to her feet. She quickly pressed a foot on the 
dummy’s back to hold him in place. 

“Mom and Dad—where are you?” she cried aloud. “Hurry.” 

The dummy raised its head. He let out an angry growl and 
started to thrash his arms and legs wildly. 

Kris pressed her foot hard against his back. 

“Let go!” he growled viciously. 

Kris heard voices upstairs. 

“Mom? Dad? Down here!” she called up to them. 

Both of her parents appeared at the upstairs landing, their 
faces filled with worry. 

“Look!” Kris cried, frantically pointing down to the dummy 
beneath her foot. 


20 


“Look at what?” Mr. Powell cried, adjusting his pajama top. 

Kris pointed down to the dummy under her foot. “He—he’s 
trying to get away,” she stammered. 

But Mr. Wood lay lifeless on his stomach. 

“Is this supposed to be a joke?” Mrs. Powell demanded 
angrily, hands at the waist of her cotton nightgown. 

“T don’t get it,” Mr. Powell said, shaking his head. 

“Mr. Wood—he ran down the stairs,” Kris said frantically. 
“He’s been doing everything. He—” 

“This isn’t funny,” Mrs. Powell said wearily, running a hand 
back through her blonde hair. “It isn’t funny at all, Kris. Waking 
everyone up in the middle of the night.” 

“I really think you've lost your mind. Fm very worried about 
you,” Mr. Powell added. “I mean, after what happened at school 
tonight—” 

“Listen to me!” Kris shrieked. She bent down and pulled Mr. 
Wood up from the floor. Holding him by the shoulders, she shook 
him hard. “He moves! He runs! He talks! He—he’s alive!” 

She stopped shaking the dummy and let go. He slumped 
lifelessly to the floor, falling in an unmoving heap at her feet. 

“I think maybe you need to see a doctor,” Mr. Powell said, 
his face tightening with concern. 

“No. I saw him, too!” Lindy said, coming to Kris’ aid. “Kris is 
right. The dummy did move.” But then she added, “I mean, I think 
it moved!” 

You're a big help, Lindy, Kris thought, suddenly feeling weak, 
drained. 

“Is this just another stupid prank?” Mrs. Powell asked 
angrily. “After what happened at school tonight, I'd think that 
would be enough.” 

“But, Mom—” Kris started, staring down at the lifeless heap 
at her feet. 

“Back to bed,” Mrs. Powell ordered. “There's no school 
tomorrow. We'll have plenty of time to discuss punishments for 
you two.” 

“Me?” Lindy cried, outraged. “What did I do?” 

“Mom, we’re telling the truth!” Kris insisted. 

“T still don’t get the joke,” Mr. Powell said, shaking his head. 


He turned to his wife. “Were we supposed to believe her or 
something?” 

“Get to bed. Both of you. Now!” their mother snapped. She 
and their father disappeared from the upstairs landing, heading 
angrily back down the hall to their room. 

Lindy remained, one hand on the top of the banister, staring 
down regretfully at Kris. 

“You believe me, don’t you?” Kris called up to her. 

“Yeah. I guess,” Lindy replied doubtfully, lowering her eyes 
to the dummy at Kris’ feet. 

Kris looked down, too. She saw Mr. Wood blink. He started 
to straighten up. 

“Whoa!” She uttered an alarmed cry and grabbed him by the 
neck. “Lindy—hurry!” she called. “He’s moving again!” 

“Wh-what should we do?” Lindy stammered, making her way 
hesitantly down the stairs. 

“T don’t know,” Kris replied as the dummy thrashed his arms 
and legs against the carpet, trying desperately to free himself 
from her two-handed grip on his neck. “We’ve got to—” 

“There’s nothing you can do,” Mr. Wood snarled. “You will be 
my slaves now. I’m alive once again! Alive!” 

“But—how?” Kris demanded, staring at him in disbelief. “I 
mean, you’re a dummy. How—?” 

The dummy snickered. “You brought me back to life,” he told 
her in his raspy voice. “You read the ancient words.” 

The ancient words? What was he talking about? 

And then Kris remembered. She had read the strange- 
sounding words from the sheet of paper in the dummy’s shirt 
pocket. 

“T am back, thanks to you,” the dummy growled. “And now 
you and your sister will serve me.” 

As she stared in horror at the grinning dummy, an idea 
popped into Kris’ mind. 

The paper. She had tucked it back into his pocket. 

If I read the words again, Kris thought, it will put him back 
to sleep. 

She reached out and grabbed him. He tried to jerk away, but 
she was too quick. 

The folded sheet of yellow paper was in her hand. 

“Give me that!” he cried. He swiped at it, but Kris swung it 
out of his reach. 

She unfolded it quickly. And before the dummy could grab 
the paper out of her hands, she read the strange words aloud: 


“Karru marri odonna loma molonu karrano.” 


21 


Both sisters stared at the dummy, waiting for him to collapse. 

But he gripped the banister and tossed his head back in an 
amused, scornful laugh. “Those are the words of the ancient 
sorcerer to bring me to life!” he proclaimed. “Those aren’t the 
words to kill me!” 

Kill him? 

Yes, Kris thought frantically. She tossed down the yellow 
paper disgustedly. 

We have no choice. 

“We have to kill him, Lindy.” 

“Huh?” Her sister’s face filled with surprise. 

Kris grabbed the dummy by the shoulders and held on 
tightly. “TII hold him. You pull his head off.” 

Lindy was beside her now. She had to duck away from Mr. 
Wood’s thrashing feet. 

“TII hold him still,” Kris repeated. “Grab his head. Pull it off.” 

“You—you’re sure?” Lindy hesitated, her features tight with 
fear. 

“Just do it!” Kris screamed. 

She let her hands slide down around Mr. Wood’s waist. 

Lindy grabbed his head in both hands. 

“Let go of me!” the dummy rasped. 

“Pull!” Kris cried to her terrified sister. 

Holding the dummy tightly around the waist, she leaned 
back, pulling him away from her sister. 

Lindy’s hands were wrapped tightly around the dummy’s 
head. With a loud groan, she pulled hard. 

The head didn’t come off. 

Mr. Wood uttered a high-pitched giggle. “Stop. You’re 
tickling me!” he rasped. 

“Pull harder!” Kris ordered her sister. 

Lindy’s face was bright red. She tightened her grip on the 
head and pulled again, tugging with all her strength. 

The dummy giggled his shrill, unpleasant giggle. 

“It—it won't come off,” Lindy said, sighing in defeat. 

“Twist it off!” Kris suggested frantically. 

The dummy thrashed out with his feet, kicking Kris in the 
stomach. But she held on. “Twist the head off!” she cried. 


Lindy tried to turn the head. 

The dummy giggled. 

“It won't twist!” Lindy cried in frustration. She let go of the 
head and took a step back. 

Mr. Wood raised his head, stared up at Lindy, and grinned. 
“You can’t kill me. I have powers.” 

“What do we do?” Lindy cried, raising her eyes to Kris. 

“This is my house now,” the dummy rasped, grinning at 
Lindy as it struggled to wriggle out of Kris’ arms. “You will do as I 
say now. Put me down.” 

“What do we do?” Lindy repeated. 

“Take him upstairs. We’ll cut his head off,” Kris replied. 

Mr. Wood swung his head around, his eyes stretched open in 
an evil glare. 

“Ow!” Kris cried out in surprise as the dummy snapped his 
jaws over her arm, biting her. She pulled her arm away and, 
without thinking, slapped the dummy’s wooden head with the 
palm of her hand. 

The dummy giggled in response. “Violence! Violence!” he 
said in a mock scolding tone. 

“Get those sharp scissors. In your drawer,” Kris instructed her 
sister. “TII carry him up to our room.” 

Her arm throbbed where he had bitten her. But she held onto 
him tightly and carried him up to their bedroom. 

Lindy had already pulled the long metal scissors from the 
drawer. Her hand trembled as she opened and closed the blades. 

“Below the neck,” Kris said, holding Mr. Wood tightly by the 
shoulders. 

He hissed furiously at her. She dodged as he tried to kick her 
with both sneakered feet. 

Holding the scissors with two hands, Lindy tried cutting the 
head off at the neck. The scissors didn’t cut, so she tried a sawing 
motion. 

Mr. Wood giggled. “I told you. You can’t kill me.” 

“It isn’t going to work,” Lindy cried, tears of frustration 
running down her cheeks. “Now what?” 

“We'll put him in the closet. Then we can think,” Kris replied. 

“You have no need to think. You are my slaves,” the dummy 
rasped. “You will do whatever I ask. I will be in charge from now 
on.” 

“No way,” Kris muttered, shaking her head. 

“What if we won’t help you?” Lindy demanded. 


The dummy turned to her, casting her a hard, angry stare. 
“Then [II start hurting the ones you love,” he said casually. “Your 
parents. Your friends. Or maybe that disgusting dog that's always 
yapping at me.” He tossed back his head and a dry, evil laugh 
escaped his wooden lips. 

“Lock him in the closet,” Lindy suggested. “Till we figure out 
how to get rid of him.” 

“You can't get rid of me,” Mr. Wood insisted. “Don't make me 
angry. I have powers. I’m warning you. I’m starting to get tired of 
your stupid attempts to harm me.” 

“The closet doesn’t lock—remember?” Kris cried, struggling 
to hold onto the wriggling dummy. 

“Oh. Wait. How about this?” Lindy hurried to the closet. She 
pulled out an old suitcase from the back. 

“Perfect,” Kris said. 

“Tm warning you—” Mr. Wood threatened. “You are 
becoming very tiresome.” 

With a hard tug, he pulled himself free of Kris. 

She dove to tackle him, but he darted out from under her. 
She fell facedown onto her bed. 

The dummy ran to the center of the room, then turned his 
eyes to the doorway, as if trying to decide where to go. “You must 
do as I tell you,” he said darkly, raising a wooden hand toward 
Lindy. “I will not run from you two. You are to be my slaves.” 

“No!” Kris cried, pushing herself up. 

She and her sister both dove at the dummy. Lindy grabbed 
his arms. Kris ducked to grab his ankles. 

Working together, they stuffed him into the open suitcase. 

“You will regret this,” he threatened, kicking his legs, 
struggling to hit them. “You will pay dearly for this. Now 
someone will die!” He continued screaming after Kris latched the 
suitcase and shoved it into the closet. She quickly closed the 
closet door, then leaned her back against it, sighing wearily. 

“Now what?” she asked Lindy. 


22 


“We'll bury him,” Kris said. 

“Huh?” Lindy stifled a yawn. 

They had been whispering together for what seemed like 
hours. As they tried to come up with a plan, they could hear the 
dummy's muffled cries from inside the closet. 

“We'll bury him. Under that huge mound of dirt,” Kris 
explained, her eyes going to the window. “You know. Next door, 
at the side of the new house.” 

“Yeah. Okay. I don’t know,” Lindy replied. “I’m so tired, I 
can’t think straight.” She glanced at the bed table clock. It was 
nearly three-thirty in the morning. “I still think we should wake 
up Mom and Dad,” Lindy said, fear reflected in her eyes. 

“We can’t,” Kris told her. “We've been over that a hundred 
times. They won't believe us. If we wake them up, we'll be in 
even bigger trouble.” 

“How could we be in bigger trouble?” Lindy demanded, 
gesturing with her head to the closet where Mr. Wood’s angry 
cries could still be heard. 

“Get dressed,” Kris said with renewed energy. “We'll bury 
him under all that dirt. Then we’ll never have to think about him 
again.” 

Lindy shuddered and turned her eyes to her dummy, folded 
up in the chair. “I can’t bear to look at Slappy anymore. I’m so 
sorry I got us interested in dummies.” 

“Ssshhh. Just get dressed,” Kris said impatiently. 


A few minutes later, the two girls crept down the stairs in the 
darkness. Kris carried the suitcase in both arms, trying to muffle 
the sound of Mr. Wood’s angry protests. 

They stopped at the bottom of the stairs and listened for any 
sign that they had awakened their parents. 

Silence. 

Lindy pulled open the front door and they slipped outside. 

The air was surprisingly cool and wet. A heavy dew had 
begun to fall, making the front lawn glisten under the light of a 
half-moon. Blades of wet grass clung to their sneakers as they 
made their way to the garage. 

As Kris held onto the suitcase, Lindy slowly, quietly, pulled 
open the garage door. When it was halfway up, she ducked and 


slipped inside. 

A few seconds later she emerged, carrying a large snow 
shovel. “This should do it,” she said, whispering even though no 
one was around. 

Kris glanced down the street as they headed across the yard 
to the lot next door. The heavy morning dew misted the glow of 
the streetlamps, making the pale light appear to bend and flicker 
like candles. Everything seemed to shimmer under the dark 
purple sky. 

Kris set the suitcase down beside the tall mound of dirt. 
“We'll dig right down here,” she said, pointing toward the bottom 
of the mound. “We’ll shove him in and cover him.” 

“Tm warning you,” Mr. Wood threatened, listening inside the 
suitcase. “Your plan won’t work. I have powers!” 

“You dig first,” Kris told her sister, ignoring the dummy’s 
threat. “Then [II take a turn.” 

Lindy dug into the pile and heaved up a shovelful of dirt. Kris 
shivered. The heavy dew felt cold and damp. A cloud floated over 
the moon, darkening the sky from purple to black. 

“Let me out!” Mr. Wood called. “Let me out now, and your 
punishment won’t be too severe.” 

“Dig faster,” Kris whispered impatiently. 

“Pm going as fast as I can,” Lindy replied. She had dug a 
pretty good-sized square-shaped hole at the base of the mound. 
“How much deeper, do you think?” 

“Deeper,” Kris said. “Here. Watch the suitcase. [II take a 
turn.” She changed places with Lindy and started to dig. 

Something scampered heavily near the low shrubs that 
separated the yards. Kris looked up, saw a moving shadow, and 
gasped. 

“Raccoon, I think,” Lindy said with a shudder. “Are we going 
to bury Mr. Wood in the suitcase, or are we going to take him 
out?” 

“Think Mom will notice the suitcase is gone?” Kris asked, 
tossing a shovelful of wet dirt to the side. 

Lindy shook her head. “We never use it.” 

“We'll bury him in the suitcase,” Kris said. “It’ll be easier.” 

“You'll be sorry,” the dummy rasped. The suitcase shook and 
nearly toppled onto its side. 


“Tm so sleepy,” Lindy moaned, tossing her socks onto the floor, 
then sliding her feet under the covers. 
“Tm wide awake,” Kris replied, sitting on the edge of her 


bed. “I guess it’s because I’m so happy. So happy we got rid of 
that awful creature.” 

“It's all so weird,” Lindy said, adjusting her pillow behind her 
head. “I don’t blame Mom or Dad for not believing it. I’m not sure 
I believe it, either.” 

“You put the shovel back where you found it?” Kris asked. 

Lindy nodded. “Yeah,” she said sleepily. 

“And you closed the garage door?” 

“Ssshhh. I’m asleep,” Lindy said. “At least there’s no school 
tomorrow. We can sleep late.” 

“T hope I can fall asleep,” Kris said doubtfully. “I’m just so 
pumped. It’s all like some kind of hideously gross nightmare. I just 
think... Lindy? Lindy—are you still awake?” 

No. Her sister had fallen asleep. 

Kris stared up at the ceiling. She pulled the blankets up to 
her chin. She still felt chilled. She couldn’t shake the cold 
dampness of the early morning air. 

After a short while, with thoughts of everything that had 
happened that night whirring crazily in her head, Kris fell asleep, 
too. 

The rumble of machines woke her up at eight-thirty the next 
morning. Stretching, trying to rub the sleep from her eyes, Kris 
stumbled to the window, leaned over the chair holding Slappy, 
and peered out. 

It was a gray, cloudy day. Two enormous yellow steamrollers 
were rolling over the lot next door behind the newly constructed 
house, flattening the land. 

I wonder if they’re going to flatten that big mound of dirt, 
Kris thought, staring down at them. That would really be 
excellent. 

Kris smiled. She hadn’t slept very long, but she felt refreshed. 

Lindy was still sound asleep. Kris tiptoed past her, pulled her 
robe on, and headed downstairs. 

“Morning, Mom,” she called brightly, tying the belt to her 
robe as she entered the kitchen. 

Mrs. Powell turned from the sink to face her. Kris was 
surprised to see an angry expression on her face. 

She followed her mother’s stare to the breakfast counter. 

“Oh!” Kris gasped when she saw Mr. Wood. He was seated at 
the counter, his hands in his lap. His hair was matted with red- 
brown dirt, and he had dirt smears on his cheeks and forehead. 

Kris raised her hands to her face in horror. 

“I thought you were told never to bring that thing down 


here!” Mrs. Powell scolded. “What do I have to do, Kris?” She 
turned angrily back to the sink. 
The dummy winked at Kris and flashed her a wide, evil grin. 


23 


As Kris stared in horror at the grinning dummy, Mr. Powell 
suddenly appeared in the kitchen doorway. “Ready?” he asked his 
wife. 

Mrs. Powell hung the dishtowel on the rack and turned 
around, brushing a lock of hair off her forehead. “Ready. III get 
my bag.” She brushed past him into the front hallway. 

“Where are you going?” Kris cried, her voice revealing her 
alarm. She kept her eyes on the dummy at the counter. 

“Just doing a little shopping at the garden store,” her father 
told her, stepping into the room, peering out the kitchen window. 
“Looks like rain.” 

“Don’t go!” Kris pleaded. 

“Huh?” He turned toward her. 

“Don’t go—please!” Kris cried. 

Her father’s eyes landed on the dummy. He walked over to 
him. “Hey—what’s the big idea?” her father asked angrily. 

“T thought you wanted to take him back to the pawn shop,” 
Kris replied, thinking quickly. 

“Not till Monday,” her father replied. “Today is Saturday, 
remember?” 

The dummy blinked. Mr. Powell didn’t notice. 

“Do you have to go shopping now?” Kris asked in a tiny 
voice. 

Before her father could answer, Mrs. Powell reappeared in 
the doorway. “Here. Catch,” she called, and tossed the car keys to 
him. “Let’s go before it pours.” 

Mr. Powell started to the door. “Why don’t you want us to 
go?” he asked. 

“The dummy—” Kris started. But she knew it was hopeless. 
They’d never listen. They’d never believe her. “Never mind,” she 
muttered. 

A few seconds later, she heard their car back down the 
driveway. They were gone. 

And she was alone in the kitchen with the grinning dummy. 

Mr. Wood turned toward her slowly, swiveling the tall 
counter stool. His big eyes locked angrily on Kris’. 

“T warned you,” he rasped. 

Barky came trotting into the kitchen, his toenails clicking 


loudly on the linoleum. He sniffed the floor as he ran, searching 
for breakfast scraps someone might have dropped. 

“Barky, where’ve you been?” Kris asked, glad to have 
company. 

The dog ignored her and sniffed under the stool Mr. Wood 
sat on. 

“He was upstairs, waking me up,” Lindy said, rubbing her 
eyes as she walked into the kitchen. She was wearing white tennis 
shorts and a sleeveless magenta T-shirt. “Stupid dog.” 

Barky licked at a spot on the linoleum. 

Lindy cried out as she spotted Mr. Wood. “Oh, no!” 

“Tm back,” the dummy rasped. “And I’m very unhappy with 
you two slaves.” 

Lindy turned to Kris, her mouth open in surprise and terror. 

Kris kept her eyes trained on the dummy. What does he plan 
to do? she wondered. How can I stop him? 

Burying him under all that dirt hadn’t kept him from 
returning. Somehow he had freed himself from the suitcase and 
pulled himself out. 

Wasn’t there any way to defeat him? Any way at all? 

Grinning his evil grin, Mr. Wood dropped down to the floor, 
his sneakers thudding hard on the floor. “I’m very unhappy with 
you two slaves,” he repeated in his growly voice. 

“What are you going to do?” Lindy cried in a shrill, 
frightened voice. 

“T have to punish you,” the dummy replied. “I have to prove 
to you that I am serious.” 

“Wait!” Kris cried. 

But the dummy moved quickly. He reached down and 
grabbed Barky by the neck with both hands. 

As the dummy tightened his grip, the frightened terrier began 
to howl in pain. 


24 


“T warned you,” Mr. Wood snarled over the howls of the little 
black terrier. “You will do as I say—or one by one, those you love 
will suffer!” 

“No!” Kris cried. 

Barky let out a high-pitched whelp, a bleat of pain that made 
Kris shudder. 

“Let go of Barky!” Kris screamed. 

The dummy giggled. 

Barky uttered a hoarse gasp. 

Kris couldn't stand it any longer. She and Lindy leapt at the 
dummy from two sides. Lindy tackled his legs. Kris grabbed Barky 
and tugged. 

Lindy dragged the dummy to the floor. But his wooden hands 
held a tight grip on the dog's throat. 

Barky's howls became a muffled whimper as he struggled to 
breathe. 

“Let go! Let go!” Kris shrieked. 

“T warned you!” the dummy snarled as Lindy held tight to his 
kicking legs. “The dog must die now!” 

“No!” Kris let go of the gasping dog. She slid her hands down 
to the dummy's wrists. Then with a fierce tug, she pulled the 
wooden hands apart. 

Barky dropped to the floor, wheezing. He scampered to the 
corner, his paws sliding frantically over the smooth floor. 

“You'll pay now!” Mr. Wood growled. Jerking free from Kris, 
he swung his wooden hand up, landing a hard blow on Kris’ 
forehead. 

She cried out in pain and raised her hands to her head. 

She heard Barky yipping loudly behind her. 

“Let go of me!” Mr. Wood demanded, turning back to Lindy, 
who still held onto his legs. 

“No way!” Lindy cried. “Kris—grab his arms again.” 

Her head still throbbing, Kris lunged forward to grab the 
dummy's arms. 

But he lowered his head as she approached and clamped his 
wooden jaws around her wrist. 

“Owww!” Kris howled in pain and pulled back. 

Lindy lifted the dummy up by the legs, then slammed his 


body hard against the floor. He uttered a furious growl and tried 
to kick free of her. 

Kris lunged again, and this time grabbed one arm, then the 
other. He lowered his head to bite once more, but she dodged 
away and pulled his arms tight behind his back. 

“Tm warning you!” he bellowed. “I’m warning you!” 

Barky yipped excitedly, hopping up on Kris. 

“What do we do with him?” Lindy cried, shouting over the 
dummy's angry threats. 

“Outside!” Kris yelled, pressing the arms more tightly behind 
Mr. Wood's back. 

She suddenly remembered the two steamrollers she had seen 
moving over the yard next door, flattening the ground. “Come 
on,” she urged her sister. “We’ll crush him!” 

“Tm warning you! I have powers!” the dummy screamed. 

Ignoring him, Kris pulled open the kitchen door and they 
carried their wriggling captive outside. 

The sky was charcoal-gray. A light rain had begun to fall. The 
grass was already wet. 

Over the low shrubs that separated the yards, the girls could 
see the two enormous yellow steamrollers, one in the back, one at 
the side of the next-door lot. They looked like huge, lumbering 
animals, their giant black rollers flattening everything in their 
path. 

“This way! Hurry!” Kris shouted to her sister, holding the 
dummy tightly as she ran. “Toss him under that one!” 

“Let me g0! Let me g0, slaves!” the dummy screamed. “This 
is your last chance!” He swung his head hard, trying to bite Kris” 
arm. 

Thunder rumbled, low in the distance. 

The girls ran at full speed, slipping on the wet grass as they 
hurried toward the fast-moving steamroller. 

They were just a few yards away from the enormous machine 
when they saw Barky. His tail wagging furiously, he scampered 
ahead of them. 

“Oh, no! How'd he get out?” Lindy cried. 

Gazing back at them, his tongue hanging out of his mouth, 
prancing happily in the wet grass, the dog was running right into 
the path of the rumbling steamroller. 

“No, Barky!” Kris shrieked in horror. “No! Barky—no!” 


25 


Letting go of Mr. Wood, both girls dove toward the dog. Hands 
outstretched, they slid on their stomachs on the wet grass. 

Unaware of any problem, enjoying the game of tag, Barky 
scampered away. 

Lindy and Kris rolled out of the path of the steamroller. 

“Hey—get away from there!” the angry operator shouted 
through the high window of the steamroller. “Are you girls 
crazy?” 

They leapt to their feet and turned back to Mr. Wood. 

The rain began to come down a little harder. A jagged streak 
of white lightning flashed high in the sky. 

“Tm free!” the dummy cried, hands raised victoriously above 
his head. “Now you will pay!” 

“Get him!” Kris shouted to her sister. 

The rain pelted their hair and shoulders. The two girls 
lowered their heads, leaned into the rain, and began to chase 
after the dummy. 

Mr. Wood turned and started to run. 

He never saw the other steamroller. 

The gigantic black wheel rolled right over him, pushing him 
onto his back, then crushing him with a loud crunch. 

A loud hiss rose up from under the machine, like air escaping 
from a large balloon. 

The steamroller appeared to rock back and forth. 

A strange green gas spurted up from beneath the wheel, into 
the air, spreading out in an eerie, mushroom-shaped cloud. 

Barky stopped scampering and stood frozen in place, his eyes 
following the green gas as it floated up against the nearly black 
sky. 

Lindy and Kris stared in open mouthed wonder. 

Pushed by the wind and the rain, the green gas floated over 
them. 

“Yuck! It stinks!” Lindy declared. 

It smelled like rotten eggs. 

Barky uttered a low whimper. 

The steamroller backed up. The driver jumped out and came 
running toward them. He was a short, stocky man with big, 
muscular arms bulging out from the sleeves of his T-shirt. His face 


was bright red under a short, blond flattop, his eyes wide with 
horror. 

“A kid?” he cried. “I—I ran over a kid?” 

“No. He was a dummy,” Kris told him. “He wasn’t alive.” 

He stopped. His face faded from red to flour-white. He 
uttered a loud, grateful sigh. “Oh, man,” he moaned. “Oh, man. I 
thought it was a kid.” 

He took a deep breath and let it out slowly. Then he bent to 
examine the area beneath his wheel. As the girls came near, they 
saw the remains of the dummy, crushed flat inside its jeans and 
flannel shirt. 

“Hey, I’m real sorry,” the man said, wiping his forehead with 
his T-shirt sleeve as he straightened up to face them. “I couldn’t 
stop in time.” 

“That’s okay,” Kris said, a wide smile forming on her face. 

“Yeah. Really. It’s okay,” Lindy quickly agreed. 

Barky moved close to sniff the crushed dummy. 

The man shook his head. “I’m so relieved. It looked like it 
was running. I really thought it was a kid. I was so scared.” 

“No. Just a dummy,” Kris told him. 

“Whew!” The man exhaled slowly. “Close one.” His 
expression changed. “What are you girls doing out in the rain, 
anyway?” 

Lindy shrugged. Kris shook her head. “Just walking the dog.” 

The man picked up the crushed dummy. The head crumbled 
to powder as he lifted it. “You want this thing?” 

“You can throw it in the trash,” Kris told him. 

“Better get out of the rain,” he told them. “And don’t scare 
me like that again.” 

The girls apologized, then headed back to the house. Kris cast 
a happy grin at her sister. Lindy grinned back. 

I may grin forever, Kris thought. I’m so happy. So relieved. 

They wiped their wet sneakers on the mat, then held the 
kitchen door open for Barky. “Wow. What a morning!” Lindy 
declared. 

They followed the dog into the kitchen. Outside, a flash of 
bright lightning was followed by a roar of thunder. 

“Tm drenched,” Kris said. “I’m going up to get changed.” 

“Me, too.” Lindy followed her up the stairs. 

They entered their bedroom to find the window wide open, 
the curtains slapping wildly, rain pouring in. “Oh, no!” Kris 
hurried across the room to shut the window. 


As she leaned over the chair to grab the window frame, 
Slappy reached up and grabbed her arm. 

“Hey, slave—is that other guy gone?” the dummy asked in a 
throaty growl. “I thought he'd never leave!” 


Scanning, formatting and basic 
proofing by Undead. 

Skip to main content
 
Texts
 
Video
 
Audio
 
Software
 
Images
My uploads
My loans
My favorites
My lists
My collections
My web archives
Account settings
Get help
Log out
 Search metadata
 Search text contents
 Search TV news captions
 Search radio transcripts
 Search archived web sites
Advanced Search
About Blog Projects Help Donate  Contact Jobs Volunteer People
Full text of "All 62 Goosebumps novels"
See other formats
THE WEREWOLF OF FEVER SWAMP 


THE WEREWOLF 
OF FEVER SWAMP 


Goosebumps - 14 
R.L. Stine 
(An Undead Scan v1.5) 


We moved to Florida during Christmas vacation. A week later, I 
heard the frightening howls in the swamp for the first time. 

Night after night, the howls made me sit up in bed. I would 
hold my breath and wrap my arms around myself to keep from 
shivering. 

I would stare out my bedroom window at the chalk-colored 
full moon. And I would listen. 

What kind of creature makes such a cry? I would ask myself. 

And how close is it? Why does it sound as if it’s right outside 
my window? 

The wails rose and fell like police car sirens. They weren’t 
sad or mournful. They were menacing. 

Angry. 

They sounded to me like a warning. Stay out of the swamp. 
You do not belong here. 

When my family first moved to Florida, to our new house at 
the edge of the swamp, I couldn’t wait to explore. I stood in the 
back yard with the binoculars my dad had given me for my 
twelfth birthday and gazed toward the swamp. 

Trees with slender, white trunks tilted over each other. Their 
flat, broad leaves appeared to form a roof, covering the swamp 
floor in blue shadow. 

Behind me, the deer paced uneasily in their wire-mesh pen. I 
could hear them pawing the soft, sandy ground, rubbing their 
antlers against the walls of their pen. 

Lowering my binoculars, I turned to look at them. The deer 
were the reason we had moved to Florida. 

You see, my dad, Michael F. Tucker, is a scientist. He works 
for the University of Vermont in Burlington, which, believe me, is 
a long way from the Florida swamps! 

Dad got these six deer from some country in South America. 
They’re called swamp deer. They’re not like regular deer. I mean, 
they don’t look like Bambi. For one thing, their fur is very red, 
not brown. And their hooves are really big and kind of webbed. 
For walking on wet, swampy ground, I guess. 

Dad wants to see if these South American swamp deer can 
survive in Florida. He plans to put little radio transmitters on 
them, and set them free in the swamp. Then he’ll study how they 
get along. 


When he told us back in Burlington that we were moving to 
Florida because of the deer, we all totally freaked. We didn’t want 
to move. 

My sister, Emily, cried for days. She’s sixteen, and she didn’t 
want to miss her senior year in high school. I didn’t want to leave 
my friends, either. 

But Dad quickly got Mom on his side. Mom is a scientist, too. 
She and Dad work together on a lot of projects. So, of course, she 
agreed with him. 

And the two of them tried to persuade Emily and me that this 
was the chance of a lifetime, that it was going to be really 
exciting. An adventure we’d never forget. 

So here we were, living in a little white house in a 
neighborhood of four or five other little white houses. We had six 
weird-looking red deer penned up behind the house. The hot 
Florida sun was beaming down. And an endless swamp stretched 
beyond our flat, grassy back yard. 

I turned away from the deer and raised the binoculars to my 
face. “Oh,” I cried out as two dark eyes seemed to be staring back 
at me. 

I pulled the binoculars away and squinted toward the swamp. 
In the near distance I saw a large white bird on two long, spindly 
legs. 

“Its a crane,” Emily said. I hadn’t realized Emily had stepped 
up beside me. She was wearing a sleeveless white T-shirt and 
short red denim shorts. My sister is tall and thin and very blonde. 
She looks a lot like a crane. 

The bird turned and began high-stepping toward the swamp. 

“Let’s follow it,” I said. 

Emily made her pouting face, an expression we’d all seen a 
lot of since moving down here. “No way. It’s too hot.” 

“Aw, come on.” I tugged her skinny arm. “Let’s do some 
exploring, check out the swamp.” 

She shook her head, her white-blonde ponytail swinging 
behind her. “I really don’t want to, Grady.” She adjusted her 
sunglasses on her nose. “I’m kind of waiting for the mail.” 

Since we’re so far from the nearest post office, we only get 
mail two times a week. Emily had been spending most of her time 
waiting for the mail. 

“Waiting for a love letter from Martin?” I asked with a grin. 
She hated when I teased her about Martin, her boyfriend back in 
Burlington. So I teased her as often as I could. 

“Maybe,” she said. She reached out with both hands and 


messed up my hair. She knows I hate to have my hair messed up. 

“Please?” I pleaded. “Come on, Emily. Just a short walk. Very 
short.” 

“Emily, take a short walk with Grady,” Dad’s voice broke in. 
We turned to see him inside the deer pen. He had a clipboard in 
one hand and was going from deer to deer, taking notes. “Go 
ahead,” he urged my sister. “You’re not doing anything else.” 

“But, Dad—” Emily could whine with the best of them when 
she wanted. 

“Go ahead, Em,” Dad insisted. “It will be interesting. More 
interesting than standing around in the heat arguing with him.” 

Emily pushed the sunglasses up again. They kept slipping 
down her nose. “Well...” 

“Great!” I cried. I was really excited. Pd never been in a real 
swamp before. “Let’s go!” I grabbed my sister’s hand and pulled. 

Emily reluctantly followed, a fretful expression on her face. “I 
have a bad feeling about this,” she muttered. 

My shadow slanting behind me, I hurried toward the low, 
tilting trees. “Emily, what could go wrong?” I asked. 


It was hot and wet under the trees. The air felt sticky against my 
face. The broad palm leaves were so low, I could almost reach up 
and touch them. They nearly blocked out the sun, but shafts of 
yellow light broke through, beaming down on the swamp floor 
like spotlights. 

Scratchy weeds and fern leaves brushed against my bare legs. 
I wished I’d worn jeans instead of shorts. I kept close to my sister 
as we made our way along a narrow, winding trail. The 
binoculars, strapped around my neck, began to feel heavy against 
my chest. I should’ve left them at home, I realized. 

“Its so noisy here,” Emily complained, stepping over a 
decaying log. 

She was right. The most surprising thing about the swamp 
was all the sounds. 

A bird trilled from somewhere above. Another bird replied 
with a shrill whistle. Insects chittered loudly all around us. I 
heard a steady tap-tap-tap, like someone hammering on wood. A 
woodpecker? Palm leaves crackled as they swayed. Slender tree 
trunks creaked. My sandals made thup thup sounds, sinking into 
the marshy ground as I walked. 

“Hey, look,” Emily said, pointing. She pulled off her dark 
glasses to see better. 

We had come to a small, oval-shaped pond. The water was 
dark green, half-hidden in shade. Floating on top were white 
water lilies, bending gracefully over flat, green lily pads. 

“Pretty,” Emily said, brushing a bug off her shoulder. “I’m 
going to come back here with my camera and take pictures of this 
pond. Look at the great light.” 

I followed her gaze. The near end of the pond was darkened 
by long shadows. But light slanted down through the trees at the 
other end, forming what looked like a bright curtain that spilled 
into the still pond water. 

“Tt is kind of cool,” I admitted. I wasn’t really into ponds. I 
was more interested in wildlife. 

I let Emily admire the pond and the water lilies a little 
longer. Then I headed around the pond and deeper into the 
swamp. 

My sandals slapped over the wet ground. Up ahead, a swarm 
of tiny gnats, thousands of them, danced silently in a shaft of 


sunlight. 

“Yuck,” Emily muttered. “I hate gnats. It makes me itchy just 
to look at them.” She scratched her arms. 

We turned away—and both saw something scamper behind a 
fallen, moss-covered log. 

“Hey—what was that?” Emily cried, grabbing my elbow. 

“An alligator!” I shouted. “A hungry alligator!” 

She uttered a short, frightened cry. 

I laughed. “What’s your problem, Em? It was just some kind 
of lizard.” 

She squeezed my arm hard, trying to make me flinch. “You’re 
a creep, Grady,” she muttered. She scratched her arms some 
more. “It’s too itchy in this swamp,” she complained. “Let’s head 
back.” 

“Just a little bit farther,” I pleaded. 

“No. Come on. I really want to get back.” She tried to pull 
me, but I backed out of her grasp. “Grady—” 

I turned and started walking away from her, deeper into the 
swamp. I heard the tap-tap-tap again, directly overhead. The low 
palm leaves scraped against each other, shifting in a soft, wet 
breeze. The shrill cluttering of the insects grew louder. 

“Tm going home and leaving you here,” Emily threatened. 

I ignored her and kept walking. I knew she was bluffing. 

My sandals crackled over dried, brown palm leaves. Without 
turning around, I could hear Emily a few steps behind me. 

Another little lizard scampered across the path, just in front 
of my sandals. It looked like a dark arrow, shooting into the 
underbrush. 

The ground suddenly sloped upward. We found ourselves 
climbing a low hill into bright sunlight. A clearing of some sort. 

Beads of sweat ran down my cheeks. The air was so wet, I 
felt as if I were swimming. 

At the top of the hill, we stopped to look around. “Hey— 
another pond!” I cried, running over fat, yellow swamp grass, 
hurrying up to the water’s edge. 

But this pond looked different. 

The dark green water wasn’t flat and smooth. Leaning over it, 
I could see that it was murky and thick, like split-pea soup. It 
made disgusting gurgling and plopping sounds as it churned. 

I leaned down closer to get a better look. 

“It’s quicksand!” I heard Emily cry in horror. 

And then two hands shoved me hard from behind. 


As I started to fall into the bubbling green stew, the same hands 
grabbed my waist and pulled me back. 

Emily giggled. “Gotcha!” she cried, holding on to me, 
keeping me from turning around and slugging her. 

“Hey—let go!” I cried angrily. “You almost pushed me into 
quicksand! That’s not funny!” 

She laughed some more, then let me go. “It isn’t quicksand, 
dork,” she muttered. “It’s a bog.” 

“Huh?” I turned to stare into the gloppy green water. 

“It’s a bog. A peat bog,” she repeated impatiently. “Don’t you 
know anything?” 

“What’s a peat bog?” I asked, ignoring her insults. Emily the 
Know-It-All. She’s always bragging about how she knows 
everything and I’m a stupid clod. But she gets B’s in school, and I 
get A’s. So who’s the smart one? 

“We learned about this last year when we studied the 
wetlands and rain forests,” she replied smugly. “The pond is thick 
because it has peat moss growing in it. The moss grows and 
grows. It absorbs twenty-five times its own weight in water.” 

“It’s gross-looking,” I said. 

“Why don’t you drink some and see how it tastes,” she urged. 

She tried to push me again, but I ducked and skirted away. 
“Tm not thirsty,” I muttered. I realize it wasn’t too clever, but it 
was the best reply I could think of. 

“Let’s get going,” she said, wiping sweat off her forehead 
with her hand. “I’m really hot.” 

“Yeah. Okay,” I reluctantly agreed. “This was a pretty neat 
walk.” 

We turned away from the peat bog and started back down 
the hill. “Hey, look!” I cried, pointing to two black shadows 
floating high above us under a white cloud. 

“Falcons,” Emily said, shielding her eyes with one hand as 
she gazed up. “I think they’re falcons. It’s hard to see. They sure 
are big.” 

We watched them soar out of sight. Then we continued down 
the hill, making our way carefully on the damp, sandy ground. 

At the bottom of the hill, back under the deep shade of the 
trees, we stopped to catch our breath. 


I was really sweating now. The back of my neck felt hot and 
itchy. I rubbed it with one hand, but it didn’t seem to help. 

The breeze had stopped. The air felt heavy. Nothing moved. 

Loud cawing sounds made me glance up. Two enormous 
blackbirds peered down at us from a low branch of a cypress tree. 
They cawed again, as if telling us to go away. 

“This way,” Emily said with a sigh. 

I followed her, feeling prickly and itchy all over. “I wish we 
had a swimming pool at our new house,” I said. “I’d jump right in 
with my clothes on!” 

We walked for several minutes. The trees grew thicker. The 
light grew dimmer. The path ended. We had to push our way 
through tall, leafy ferns. 

“I—I don’t think we’ve been here before,” I stammered. “I 
don’t think this is the right way.” 

We stared at each other, watching each other’s face fill with 
fright. 

We both realized we were lost. Completely lost. 


“T don’t believe this!” Emily shrieked. 

Her loud shout made the two blackbirds flutter off their tree 
limb. They soared away, cawing angrily. 

“What am I doing here?” she cried. Emily is not good in 
emergencies. When she got a flat tire during one of her first 
driving lessons back home in Burlington, she jumped out of the 
car and ran away! 

So I didn’t exactly expect her to be calm and cool now. Since 
we were totally lost in the middle of a dark, hot swamp, I 
expected her to panic. And she did. 

I’m the calm one in the family. I take after Dad. Cool and 
scientific. “Let’s just figure out the direction of the sun,” I said, 
ignoring the fluttering in my chest. 

“What sun?” Emily cried, throwing her hands up. 

It was really dark. The palm trees with their wide leaves 
formed a pretty solid roof above us. 

“Well, we could check out some moss,” I suggested. The 
fluttering in my chest was growing stronger. “Isn’t moss supposed 
to grow on the north side of trees?” 

“East side, I think,” Emily muttered. “Or is it the west?” 

“Tm pretty sure it’s the north,” I insisted, gazing around. 

“Pretty sure? What good is pretty sure?” Emily cried shrilly. 

“Forget the moss,” I said, rolling my eyes. “I’m not even sure 
what moss looks like.” 

We stared at each other for a long time. 

“Didn’t you used to carry a compass with you wherever you 
went?” Emily asked, sounding a little shaky. 

“Yeah. When I was four,” I replied. 

“T can’t believe we were so stupid,” Emily wailed. “We should 
have worn one of the radio transmitters. You know. For the deer. 
Then Dad could track us down.” 

“I should have worn jeans,” I muttered, noticing some tiny 
red bumps along my calf. Poison ivy? Some kind of rash? 

“What should we do?” Emily asked impatiently, wiping sweat 
off her forehead with her hand. 

“Go back up the hill, I guess,” I told her. “There were no 
trees there. It was sunny. Once we see where the sun is, we can 
figure out the direction to get back.” 


“But which way is the hill?” Emily demanded. 

I spun around. Was it behind us? To our right? A cold chill 
ran down my back as I realized I wasn’t sure. 

I shrugged. “We're really lost,” I murmured with a sigh. 

“Let’s go this way,” Emily said, starting to walk away. “I just 
have a feeling this is the way. If we come to that bog, we’ll know 
we're going right.” 

“And if we don’t?” I demanded. 

“We'll come to something else, maybe,” she replied. 

Brilliant. 

But I didn’t see any good in arguing with her. So I followed. 

We walked in silence, the shrill ringing of the insects on all 
sides, the calls of birds startling us from above. After a short 
while, we pushed our way through a clump of tall, stiff reeds. 

“Have we been here before?” Emily asked. 

I couldn’t remember. I pushed a reed away to step through 
and realized it had left something sticky on my hand. “Yuck!” 

“Hey, look!” Emily’s excited cry made me glance up from the 
sticky green gunk that clung to my hand. 

The bog! It was right in front of us. The same bog we had 
stopped at before. 

“Yay!” Emily cried. “I knew I was right. I just had a feeling.” 

The sight of the gurgling green pond cheered us both up. 
Once past it, we began to run. We knew we were on the right 
path, nearly home. 

“Way to go!” I cried happily, running past my sister. “Way to 
go!” 

I was feeling really good again. 

Then something reached up, grabbed my ankle, and pulled 
me down to the swampy ground. 


I hit the ground hard, landing on my elbows and knees. 

My heart leapt into my mouth. 

I tasted blood. 

“Get up! Get up!” Emily was screaming. 

“It—it’s got me!” I cried in a tight, trembling voice. 

The fluttering in my chest had become a pounding. Again, I 
tasted blood. 

I raised my eyes to see Emily laughing. 

Laughing? 

“It’s just a tree root,” she said, pointing. 

I followed the direction of her finger—and instantly realized I 
hadn’t been pulled down. I had tripped over one of the many 
upraised tree roots that arched over the ground. 

I stared at the bonelike root. It was bent in the middle and 
looked like a skinny, white leg. 

But what was the blood I tasted? 

I felt my aching lip. I had bitten it when I fell. 

With a loud groan, I pulled myself to my feet. My knees 
ached. My lip throbbed. Blood trickled down my chin. 

“That was pretty clumsy,” Emily said softly. And then she 
added, “Are you okay?” She brushed some dried leaves off the 
back of my T-shirt. 

“Yeah, I guess,” I replied, still feeling a little shaky. “I really 
thought something had grabbed me.” I forced a laugh. 

She rested a hand on my shoulder, and we started walking 
again, slower than before, side by side. 

Slender beams of light poked down through the thick tree 
leaves, dotting the ground in front of us. It all looked unreal, like 
something in a dream. 

Some creature scampered noisily behind the tangle of low 
shrubs at our right. Emily and I didn’t even turn to try to see it. 
We just wanted to get home. 

It didn’t take us long to realize we were headed in the wrong 
direction. 

We stopped at the edge of a small, round clearing. Birds 
chattered noisily above us. A light breeze made the palm leaves 
scrape and creak. 

“What are those huge gray things?” I asked, lingering behind 


my sister. 

“Mushrooms, I think,” she replied quietly. 

“Mushrooms as big as footballs,” I murmured. 

We both saw the small shack at the same time. 

It was hidden in the shadow of two low cypress trees beyond 
the field of giant mushrooms at the other side of the clearing. 

We both gaped at it in surprise, studying it in shocked 
silence. We took a few steps toward it. Then a few more. 

The shack was tiny, built low to the ground, not much taller 
than me. It had some kind of thatched roof, made of long reeds or 
dried grass. The walls were made of layers of dried palm leaves. 

The door, built of slender tree limbs bound together, was 
shut tight. There were no windows. 

A pile of gray ashes formed a circle a few yards from the 
door. Signs of a campfire. 

I saw a pair of battered, old workboots lying at the side of 
the shack. Beside them were several empty tin cans on their sides 
and a plastic water bottle, also empty, partly crumpled. 

I turned to Emily and whispered, “Do you think someone 
lives here? In the middle of the swamp?” 

She shrugged, her features tight with fear. 

“If someone lives here, maybe he can tell us which way to go 
to get home,” I suggested. 

“Maybe,” Emily murmured. Her eyes were straight ahead on 
the tiny shack covered in blue shadow. 

We took another couple of steps closer. 

Why would someone want to live in a tiny shack like this in 
the middle of a swamp? I wondered. 

An answer flashed into my mind: Because whoever it is wants 
to hide from the world. 

“Its a hideout,” I muttered, not realizing I was speaking out 
loud. “A criminal. A bank robber. Or a killer. He’s hiding here.” 

“Sshhh.” Emily put a finger on my mouth to silence me, 
hitting the cut on my lip. I pulled away. 

“Anyone home?” she called. Her voice came out low and 
shaky, so low I could barely hear her. “Anyone home?” she 
repeated, a little more forcefully. 

I decided to join in. We shouted together: “Anyone home? 
Anyone in there?” 

We listened. 

No reply. 

We stepped up to the low door. 


“Anyone in there?” I called one more time. 
Then I reached for the doorknob. 


Just as I was about to pull open the crude wooden door, it swung 
out, nearly hitting us both. We leapt back as a man burst out from 
the dark doorway of the hut. 

He glared at us with wild black eyes. He had long, gray-white 
hair, down past his shoulders, tied behind him in a loose ponytail. 

His face was bright red, sunburned, maybe. Or maybe red 
from anger. He stared at us with a menacing scowl, standing bent 
over, stooped from being inside the low hut. 

He wore a loose-fitting white T-shirt, dirt-stained and 
wrinkled, over heavy black trousers that bagged over his sandals. 

As he glared at us with those amazing black eyes, his mouth 
opened, revealing rows of jagged yellow teeth. 

Huddling close to my sister, I took a step back. 

I wanted to ask him who he was, why he lived in the swamp. 
I wanted to ask if he could help us find our way back home. 

A dozen questions flashed through my mind. 

But all I could utter was, “Uh... sorry.” 

Then I realized that Emily was already running away. Her 
ponytail flew behind her as she dived through the tall weeds. 

And a second later, I was running after her. My heart 
pounded. My sandals squished over the soft ground. 

“Hey, Emily—wait up! Wait up!” 

I ran over the rough carpet of dead leaves and twigs. 

As I struggled to catch up to her, I glanced behind me—and 
cried out in terror. “Emily—he’s chasing us!” 


Bent low to the ground, the man from the hut moved steadily 
after us, taking long strides. His hands bobbed at his sides. He 
was breathing hard, and his mouth was open, revealing the 
jagged teeth. 

“Run!” Emily cried. “Run, Grady!” 

We were following a narrow path between tall weeds. The 
trees thinned out. We ran through shadow and sunlight and back 
into shadow. 

“Emily—wait up!” I called breathlessly. But she didn’t slow 
down. 

A long, narrow pond appeared to our left. Strange trees lifted 
up from the middle of the water. The slender trunks were 
surrounded by a thicket of dark roots. Mangrove trees. 

I wanted to stop and look at the eerie-looking trees. But this 
wasn’t the time for sightseeing. 

We ran along the edge of the pond, our sandals sinking into 
the marshy ground. Then, my chest heaving, my throat choked 
and dry, I followed Emily as the path curved into the trees. 

A sharp pain in my side made me cry out. I stopped running. 
I gasped for breath. 

“Hey—he’s gone,” Emily said, swallowing hard. She stopped 
a few yards ahead of me and leaned against a tree trunk. “We lost 
him.” 

I bent over, trying to force away the pain in my side. After a 
short while, my breathing slowed to normal. “Weird,” I said. I 
couldn’t think of anything else. 

“Yeah. Weird,” Emily agreed. She walked back to me and 
pulled me up straight. “You okay?” 

“T guess.” At least the pain had faded away. I always get a 
pain in my right side when I run a long time. This one was worse 
than usual. I usually don’t have to run for my life! 

“Come on,” Emily said. She let go of me and started walking 
quickly, following the path. 

“Hey, this looks familiar,” I said. I began to feel a little 
better. I started to jog. We passed clusters of trees and ferns that 
looked familiar. I could see our footprints in the sandy ground, 
going the other way. 

A short while later, our back yard came into view. “Home 
sweet home!” I cried. 


Emily and I stepped out from the low trees and began 
running across the grass toward the back of the house. 

Mom and Dad were in the back yard setting up outdoor 
furniture. Dad was lowering an umbrella into the white umbrella 
table. Mom was washing off the white lawn chairs with the 
garden hose. 

“Hey—welcome back,” Dad said, smiling. 

“We thought you got lost,” Mom said. 

“We did!” I cried breathlessly. 

Mom turned off the nozzle, stopping the spray of water. “You 
what?” 

“A man chased us!” Emily exclaimed. “A strange man with 
long white hair.” 

“He lives in a hut. In the middle of the swamp,” I added, 
dropping down into one of the lawn chairs. It was wet, but I 
didn’t care. 

“Huh? He chased you?” Dad’s eyes narrowed in alarm. Then 
he said, “I heard in town there’s a swamp hermit out there.” 

“Yes, he chased us!” Emily repeated. Her normally pale face 
was bright red. Her hair had come loose and fell wildly around 
her face. “It—it was scary.” 

“A guy in the hardware store told me about him,” Dad said. 
“Said he was strange, but perfectly harmless. No one knows his 
name.” 

“Harmless?” Emily cried. “Then why did he chase us?” 

Dad shrugged. “I’m only repeating what I heard. Evidently 
he’s lived in the swamp most of his life. By himself. He never 
comes to town.” 

Mom dropped the hose and walked over to Emily. She placed 
a hand on Emily’s shoulder. In the bright sunlight, they looked 
like sisters. They’re both tall and thin, with long, straight blonde 
hair. I look more like my dad. Wavy brown hair. Dark eyes. A 
little chunky. 

“Maybe they shouldn’t go back in the swamp by themselves,” 
Mom said, biting her lower lip fretfully. She started to gather 
Emily’s hair back up into a ponytail. 

“The hermit is supposed to be completely harmless,” Dad 
repeated. He was still struggling to lower the umbrella into the 
concrete base. Every time he lowered it, he missed the opening. 

“Here, Dad. Pll help you.” I scooted under the table and 
guided the umbrella stem into the base. 

“Don’t worry,” Emily said. “You won’t catch me back in that 
swamp.” She scratched both shoulders. “I’m going to be itchy for 


the rest of my life!” she groaned. 

“We saw a lot of neat things,” I said, starting to feel normal 
again. “A peat bog and mangrove trees...” 

“T told you this was going to be an experience,” Dad said, 
arranging the white chairs around the table. 

“Some experience,” Emily grumbled, rolling her eyes. “I’m 
going in to take a shower. Maybe if I stay in it for an hour or so, 
I'll stop itching.” 

Mom shook her head, watching Emily stomp toward the back 
door. “This is going to be a hard year for Em,” she muttered. 

Dad wiped his dirty hands on the sides of his jeans. “Come 
with me, Grady,” he said, motioning for me to follow him. “Time 
to feed the deer.” 


We talked more about the swamp at dinner. Dad told us stories 
about how they hunted and trapped the swamp deer that he was 
using for his experiment. 

Dad and his helpers searched the South American jungles for 
weeks. They used tranquilizer guns to capture the deer. Then they 
had to bring in helicopters to pull the deer out, and the deer were 
not too happy about flying. 

“The swamp you two were exploring this afternoon,” he said, 
twirling his spaghetti. “Know what it’s called? Fever Swamp. 
That’s what the local people call it, anyway.” 

“Why?” Emily asked. “Because it’s so hot in there?” 

Dad chewed and swallowed a mouthful of spaghetti. He had 
orange splotches of tomato sauce on both sides of his mouth. “I 
don’t know why it’s called Fever Swamp. But I’m sure we’ll find 
out eventually.” 

“It was probably discovered by a guy named Mr. Fever,” 
Mom joked. 

“T want to go home to Vermont!” Emily wailed. 


After dinner, I found myself feeling a little homesick, too. I took a 
tennis ball out to the back of the house. I thought maybe I could 
bounce it off the wall and catch it the way I had done back home. 

But the deer pen was in the way. 

I thought about my two best friends back in Burlington, Ben 
and Adam. We had lived on the same block and used to hang out 
after dinner. We’d throw a ball around or walk down to the 
playground and just mess around. 

Staring at the deer, who milled silently at one end of the pen, 
I realized I really missed my friends. I wondered what they were 


doing right now. Probably hanging out in Ben’s back yard. 

Feeling glum, I was about to go back inside and see what was 
on TV—when a hand grabbed me from behind. 

The swamp hermit! 


He found me! 

The swamp hermit found me! And now he’s got me! 

Those are the thoughts that burst into my mind. 

I spun around—and uttered a startled cry when I saw that it 
wasn’t the swamp hermit. It was a boy. 

“Hi,” he said. “I thought you saw me. I didn’t mean to scare 
you.” He had a funny voice, gravelly and hoarse. 

“Oh. Uh... that’s okay,” I stammered. 

“I saw you in your yard,” he said. “I live over there.” He 
pointed to the house two doors down. “You just moved in?” 

I nodded. “Yeah. I’m Grady Tucker.” I slapped the tennis ball 
into my hand. “What’s your name?” 

“Will. Will Blake,” he said in his hoarse voice. He was about 
my height, but he was heavier, bigger somehow. His shoulders 
were broader. His neck was thicker. He reminded me of a football 
lineman. 

He had dark brown hair, cut very short. It stood straight up 
on top, like a flattop, and was swept back on the sides. He wore a 
blue-and-white-striped T-shirt and denim cutoffs. 

“How old are you?” he asked. 

“Twelve,” I answered. 

“Me, too,” he told me, glancing over my shoulder at the deer. 
“I thought maybe you were eleven. I mean, you look kind of 
young.” 

I was insulted by that remark, but I decided to ignore it. 
“How long have you lived here?” I asked, tossing the tennis ball 
from hand to hand. 

“A few months,” Will said. 

“Are there any other kids our age?” I asked, glancing down 
the row of six houses. 

“Yeah. One,” Will replied. “But she’s a girl. And she’s kind of 
weird.” 

In the distance, the sun was lowering itself behind the swamp 
trees. The sky was a dark scarlet. The air suddenly became cooler. 
Gazing high in the sky, I could see a pale moon, nearly full. 

Will headed over to the deer pen, and I followed him. He 
walked heavily, his big shoulders bobbing with each step. He 
poked his hand through the wire mesh and let a deer lick his 


palm. 

“Your father works for the Forest Service, too?” he asked, his 
eyes studying the deer. 

“No,” I told him. “My mom and dad are both scientists. 
They’re doing studies with these deer.” 

“Weird-looking deer,” Will said. He pulled his wet hand from 
the pen and held it up. “Yuck. Deer slime.” 

I laughed. “They’re called swamp deer,” I told him. I tossed 
him the tennis ball. We backed away from the deer pen and 
started to throw the ball back and forth. 

“Have you been in the swamp?” he asked. 

I missed the ball and had to chase it across the grass. “Yeah. 
This afternoon,” I told him. “My sister and I, we got lost.” 

He snickered. 

“Do you know why it’s called Fever Swamp?” I asked, tossing 
him a high one. 

It was getting pretty dark, harder to see. But he caught the 
ball one-handed. “Yeah. My dad told me the story,” Will said. “I 
think it was a hundred years ago. Maybe longer. Everyone in 
town came down with a strange fever.” 

“Everyone?” I asked. 

He nodded. “Everyone who had been in the swamp.” He held 
on to the ball and moved closer. “My dad said the fever lasted for 
weeks, sometimes even months. And lots of people died from it.” 

“That’s horrible,” I murmured, glancing across the back yard 
to the darkening trees at the swamp edge. 

“And those who didn’t die from the fever began acting very 
strange,” Will continued. He had small, round eyes. And as he 
told his story, his eyes gleamed. “They started talking crazy, not 
making any sense, just saying nonsense words. And they couldn’t 
walk very well. They’d fall down a lot or walk around in circles.” 

“Weird,” I said, my eyes still trained on the swamp. The sky 
darkened from scarlet to a deep purple. The nearly full moon 
seemed to glow brighter. 

“Ever since that time, they called it Fever Swamp,” Will said, 
finishing his story. He flipped the tennis ball to me. “I’d better get 
home.” 

“Did you ever see the swamp hermit?” I asked. 

He shook his head. “No. I heard about him, but I’ve never 
seen him.” 

“T did,” I told him. “My sister and I saw him this afternoon. 
We found his hut.” 

“That’s cool!” Will exclaimed. “Did you talk to him or 


anything?” 

“No way,” I replied. “He chased us.” 

“He did?” Will’s expression turned thoughtful. “Why?” 

“T don’t know. We were pretty scared,” I admitted. 

“lve got to go,” Will said. He started jogging toward his 
house. “Hey, maybe you and I can go exploring in the swamp 
together,” he called back. 

“Yeah. Great!” I replied. 

I felt a little cheered up. Pd made a new friend. Maybe it 
won't be so bad living here, I thought. 

I watched Will head around the side of his house two doors 
down. His house looked almost identical to ours, except there was 
no deer pen in back, of course. 

I saw a swing set with a small slide and seesaw in his back 
yard. I wondered if he had a little brother or sister. 

I thought about Emily as I headed to the house. I knew she’d 
be jealous that Pd made a friend. Poor Emily was really sad 
without that goon Martin hanging around her. 

I never liked Martin. He always called me “Kiddo”. 

I watched one of the deer lower itself to the ground, folding 
its legs gracefully. Another deer did the same. They were settling 
in for the night. 

I made my way inside and joined my family in the living 
room. They were watching a show about sharks on the Discovery 
Channel. My parents love the Discovery Channel. Big surprise, 
huh? 

I watched for a short while. Then I began to realize I wasn’t 
feeling very well. I had a headache, a sharp throbbing at my 
temples. And I had chills. 

I told Mom. She got up and walked over to my chair. “You 
look a little flushed,” she said, studying me with concern. She 
placed a cool hand on my forehead and left it there for a few 
seconds. 

“Grady, I think you have a little fever,” she said. 


A few nights later, I heard the strange, frightening howls for the 
first time. 

My fever had gone up to 101 degrees and stayed there for a 
day. Then it went away. Then it came back. 

“Tt’s the swamp fever!” I told my parents earlier that night. 
“Pretty soon I’m going to start acting crazy.” 

“You already act crazy,” Mom teased. She handed me a glass 
of orange juice. “Drink. Keep drinking.” 

“Drinking won’t help swamp fever,” I insisted glumly, taking 
the glass anyway. “There’s no cure for it.” 

Mom tsk-tsked. Dad continued to read his science magazine. 

I had strange dreams that night, disturbing dreams. I was 
back in Vermont, running through the snow. Something was 
chasing me. I thought maybe it was the swamp hermit. I kept 
running and running. I was very cold. I was shivering in the 
dream. 

I turned back to see who was chasing me. There wasn’t 
anyone there. And suddenly, I was in the swamp. I was sinking in 
a peat bog. It gurgled all around me, green and thick, making 
these sick sucking sounds. 

It was sucking me down. Down... 

The howls woke me up. 

I sat straight up in my bed and stared out the window at the 
nearly full moon. It floated right beyond the window, silvery and 
bright against the blue-black sky. 

Another long howl rose on the night air. 

I realized I was shaking all over. I was sweating. My pajama 
shirt stuck to my back. 

Gripping the covers with both hands, I listened hard. 

Another howl. The cry of an animal. 

From the swamp? 

The cries sounded so close. Right outside the window. Long, 
angry howls. 

I shoved down the covers and lowered my feet to the floor. I 
was still trembling, and my head throbbed as I stood up. I guessed 
I still had a fever. 

Another long howl. 

I made my way to the hall on shaky legs. I had to find out if 


my parents had heard the howls, too. 

Walking through the darkness, I bumped into a low table in 
the hall. I still wasn’t used to this new house. 

My feet were cold as ice, but my head felt burning hot, as if it 
were on fire. Rubbing the knee I had banged, I waited for my eyes 
to adjust to the darkness. Then I continued down the hall. 

My parents’ room was just past the kitchen in the back of the 
house. I was halfway across the kitchen when I stopped short. 

What was that sound? 

A scratching sound. 

My breath caught in my throat. I froze, my arms stiff at my 
sides. 

I listened. 

There it was again. 

Over the pounding of my heart, I heard it. 

Scratch scratch scratch. 

Someone—or something—scratching at the kitchen door. 

Then—another howl. So close. So terrifyingly close. 

Scratch scratch scratch. 

What could it be? Some kind of animal? Just outside the 
house? 

Some kind of swamp animal howling and scratching at the 
door? 

I realized I’d been holding my breath a long while. I let it out 
in a whoosh, then sucked in another breath. 

I listened hard, straining to hear over the pounding of my 
heart. 

The refrigerator clicked on. The loud click nearly made me 
jump out of my skin. I grabbed the countertop. My hands were as 
cold as my feet, cold and clammy. 

I listened. 

Scratch scratch scratch. 

I took a step toward the kitchen door. 

One step, then I stopped. 

A shudder of fear ran down my back. 

I realized I wasn’t alone. 

Someone was there, breathing beside me in the dark kitchen. 


10 


I gasped. I was gripping the countertop so hard, my hand ached. 

“Wh-who’s there?” I whispered. 

The kitchen light flashed on. 

“Emily!” I practically shouted her name, in surprise and 
relief. “Emily—” 

“Did you hear the howls?” she asked, speaking just above a 
whisper. Her blue eyes burned into mine. 

“Yes. They woke me up,” I said. “They sound so angry.” 

“Like a cry of attack,” Emily whispered. “Why do you look so 
weird, Grady?” 

“Huh?” Her question caught me off guard. 

“Your face is all red,” she said. “And look at you—you’re all 
shaky.” 

“T think my fever is back,” I told her. 

“Swamp fever,” she murmured, examining me with her eyes. 
“Maybe it’s the swamp fever you were telling me about.” 

I turned to the kitchen door. “Did you hear the scratching 
sounds?” I asked. “Something was scratching on the back door.” 

“Yes,” she whispered. She stared at the door. 

We both listened. 

Silence. 

“Do you think one of the deer escaped?” she asked, taking a 
few steps toward the door, her arms crossed in front of her pink- 
and-white robe. 

“Do you think a deer would scratch at the door?” I asked. 

It was such a silly question, we both burst out laughing. 

“Maybe it wanted a glass of water!” Emily exclaimed, and we 
both laughed some more. Giddy laughter. Nervous laughter. 

We both cut our laughter short at the same time, and 
listened. 

Another howl rose up outside like a police siren. 

I saw Emily’s eyes narrow in fear. “It’s a wolf!” she cried in a 
hushed whisper. She raised a hand to her mouth. “Only a wolf 
makes a sound like that, Grady.” 

“Emily, come on—” I started to protest. 

“No. I’m right,” she insisted. “It’s a wolf howl.” 

“Em, stop,” I said, sinking onto a kitchen stool. “There are no 
wolves in the Florida swamps. You can look in the guidebooks. Or 


better yet, ask Mom and Dad. Wolves don’t live in swamps.” 

She started to argue, but a scratching at the door made her 
stop. 

Scratch scratch scratch. 

We both heard it. We both reacted with sharp gasps. 

“What is that?” I whispered. And then, reading her 
expression, I quickly added, “Don’t say it’s a wolf.” 

“I—I don’t know,” she replied, both hands raised to her face. 
I recognized her look of panic. “Let’s get Mom and Dad.” 

I grabbed the door handle. “Let’s just take a look,” I said. 

I don’t know where my sudden courage came from. Maybe it 
was the fever. But, suddenly, I just wanted to solve the mystery. 

Who or what was scratching at the door? 

There was one good way to find out—open the door and look 
outside. 

“No, Grady—wait!” Emily pleaded. 

But I waved away her protests. 

Then I turned the doorknob and pulled open the kitchen 
door. 


11 


A gust of hot, wet air rushed in through the open door. The chirp 
of cicadas greeted my ears. 

Holding on to the door, I peered into the darkness of the back 
yard. 

Nothing. 

The nearly full moon, yellow as a lemon, floated high in the 
sky. Thin wisps of black clouds drifted over it. 

The cicadas stopped suddenly, and all was quiet. 

Too quiet. 

I squinted into the distance, toward the blackness of the 
swamp. 

Nothing moved. Nothing made a sound. 

I waited for my eyes to adjust to the darkness. The moonlight 
sent a pale glow over the grass. In the far distance, I could see the 
black outline of slanting trees where the swamp began. 

Who or what had scratched at the door? Were they hiding in 
the darkness now? 

Watching me? 

Waiting for me to close the door so they could begin their 
frightening howls again? 

“Grady—close the door.” 

I could hear my sister’s voice behind me. She sounded so 
frightened. 

“Grady—do you see something? Do you?” 

“No,” I told her. “Just the moon.” 

I ventured out onto the back stoop. The air was hot and 
steamy, like the air in the bathroom after you’ve taken a hot 
shower. 

“Grady—come back. Close the door.” Emily’s voice was shrill 
and trembly. 

I gazed toward the deer pen. I could see their shadowy forms, 
still and silent. The hot wind rustled the grass. The cicadas began 
chirping again. 

“Is anybody out here?” I called. I immediately felt foolish. 

There was no one out here. 

“Grady—shut the door. Now.” 

I felt Emily’s hand on my pajama sleeve. She tugged me back 
into the kitchen. I closed the door and locked it. 


My face felt wet from the damp night air. I had chills. My 
knees were shaking. 

“You look kind of sick,” Emily said. She glanced over my 
shoulder to the door. “Did you see anything?” 

“No,” I told her. “Nothing. It’s so dark in back, even with a 
full moon.” 

“What’s going on in here?” A stern voice interrupted us. Dad 
lumbered into the kitchen, adjusting the collar of the long 
nightshirt he always wore. “It’s past midnight.” He glanced from 
Emily to me, then back to Emily, looking for a clue. 

“We heard noises,” Emily said. “Howls outside.” 

“And then something was scratching on the door,” I added, 
trying to keep my knees from shaking. 

“Fever dreams,” Dad said to me. “Look at you. You’re red as 
a tomato. And you’re shaking. Let’s take your temperature. You 
must be burning up.” He started toward the bathroom to get the 
thermometer. 

“It wasn’t a dream,” Emily called after him. “I heard the 
noises, too.” 

Dad stopped in the doorway. “Did you check the deer?” 

“Yeah. They’re okay,” I said. 

“Then maybe it was just the wind. Or some creatures in the 
swamp. It’s hard to sleep in a new house. The sounds are all so 
new, so unfamiliar. But you’ll both get used to them after a 
while.” 

I'll never get used to those horrible howls, I thought 
stubbornly. But I headed back to my room. 

Dad took my temperature. It was just slightly above normal. 
“You should be fine by tomorrow,” he said, smoothing my blanket 
over me. “No more wandering around tonight, okay?” 

I murmured a reply and almost instantly drifted into a 
restless sleep. 

Again I had strange, troubling dreams. I dreamed I was 
walking in the swamp. I heard the howls. I could see the full 
moon between the slender tree trunks of the swamp. 

I started to run. And then suddenly I was up to my waist in a 
thick, green bog. And the howls continued, one after the other, 
echoing through the trees as I sank into the murky bog. 


When I awoke the next morning, the dream lingered in my mind. 

I wondered if the howls were real, or just part of the dream. 
Climbing out of bed, I realized I felt fine. Yellow morning 

sunlight poured in through the window. I could see a clear blue 


sky. The beautiful morning made me forget my nightmares. 

I wondered if Will was around this morning. Maybe he and I 
could go exploring in the swamp. 

I got dressed quickly, pulling on pale blue jeans and a black- 
and-silver Raiders T-shirt. (I’m not a Raiders fan. I just like their 
colors.) 

I gulped down a bowl of Frosted Flakes, allowed my mom to 
feel my head to make sure my fever was gone, and hurried to the 
back door. 

“Whoa. Hold on,” Mom called, setting down her coffee cup. 
“Where are you going so early?” 

“T want to see if Will is home,” I said. “Maybe we’ll hang out 
or something.” 

“Okay. Just don’t overdo it,” she warned. “Promise?” 

“Yeah. Promise,” I replied. 

I pulled open the kitchen door, stepped out into blinding 
sunlight—and screamed as an enormous, dark monster leapt onto 
my chest and heaved me to the ground. 


12 


“It—it’s got me!” I screamed as it pushed me to the ground and 
jumped on my chest. 

“Help! It—it’s licking my face!” 

I was so startled, it took me a long time to realize my 
attacker was a dog. 

By the time Mom and Dad came to my rescue and started to 
pull the big creature off my chest, I was laughing. “Hey—that 
tickles! Stop!” 

I wiped the dog spit off my face with my hands and 
scrambled to my feet. 

“Where’d you come from?” Mom asked the dog. She and Dad 
were holding on to the enormous beast. 

They both let go, and it stood wagging its tail excitedly, 
panting, its big red tongue hanging down practically to the 
ground. 

“He’s enormous!” Dad exclaimed. “He must be part 
shepherd.” 

I was still wiping the sticky saliva off my cheeks. 

“He scared me to death,” I confessed. “Didn’t you, fella?” I 
reached down and stroked the dark gray fur on the top of his 
head. His long tail started wagging faster. 

“He likes you,” Mom said. 

“He practically killed me!” I exclaimed. “Look at him. He 
must weigh more than a hundred pounds!” 

“Were you the one scratching at our door last night?” Emily 
appeared in the doorway, still in the long T-shirt she used as a 
nightshirt. “I think this clears up the mystery,” she said to me, 
yawning sleepily and pulling her blonde hair behind her 
shoulders with both hands. 

“T guess,” I muttered. I got down on my knees beside the big 
dog and stroked his back. He turned his head and licked my 
cheek again. “Yuck! Quit that!” I told him. 

“I wonder who he belongs to?” Mom said, staring at the dog 
thoughtfully. “Grady, check his collar. There’s probably an ID 
tag.” 

I reached up to the dog’s broad neck and felt around in his 
fur for a collar. “Nothing there,” I reported. 

“Maybe he’s a stray,” Emily said from inside the kitchen. 
“Maybe that’s why he was scratching the door last night.” 


“Yeah,” I said quickly. “He needs a place to live.” 

“Whoa,” Mom said, shaking her head. “I don’t think we need 
a dog right now, Grady. We just moved in, and—” 

“But I need a pet!” I insisted. “It’s so lonely here. A dog would 
be great, Mom. He could keep me company.” 

“You have the deer for pets,” Dad said, frowning. He turned 
to the deer pen. The six deer were all standing alertly at 
attention, staring warily at the dog. 

“You can’t walk a deer!” I protested. “Besides, you’re going to 
set the deer free, right?” 

“The dog probably belongs to someone,” Mom said. “You 
can’t just claim any dog that wanders by. Besides, he’s so big, 
Grady. He’s too big to—” 

“Aw, let him keep it,” Emily called from the house. 

I stared at her in shock. I couldn’t remember the last time 
Emily and I had been on the same side of a family argument. 

The discussion continued for several minutes more. Everyone 
agreed that he seemed like a sweet-tempered, gentle dog despite 
his huge size. And he certainly was affectionate. I couldn’t make 
him stop licking me. 

Glancing up, I saw Will come out of his house and head 
across the back lawns toward us. He was wearing a sleeveless 
blue T-shirt and blue Lycra bicycle shorts. “Hi! Look what we 
found!” I called. 

I introduced Will to my mom and dad. Emily had 
disappeared back to her room to get dressed. 

“Have you seen this dog before?” Dad asked Will. “Does he 
belong to someone in the neighborhood?” 

Will shook his head. “Nope. Never seen him.” He cautiously 
petted the dog’s head. 

“Where’d you come from, fella?” I asked, staring into the 
creature’s eyes. They were blue. Sky-blue. 

“He looks more like a wolf than a dog,” Will said. 

“Yeah. He really does,” I agreed. “Was that you howling like 
a wolf all last night?” I asked the dog. He tried to lick my nose, 
but I pulled my face back in time. 

I glanced up at Will. “Did you hear those howls last night? 
They were really weird.” 

“No. I didn’t hear anything,” Will replied. “I’m a very sound 
sleeper. My dad comes into my room and shouts through a 
megaphone to wake me up in the morning. Really!” 

We all laughed. 

“He really does look like a wolf,” Mom commented, staring at 


the dog’s blue eyes. 

“Wolves are skinnier,” Dad remarked. “Their snouts are 
narrower. He could be part wolf, I suppose. But it’s not very likely 
in this geographical area.” 

“Let’s call him Wolf,” I suggested enthusiastically. “It’s the 
perfect name for him.” I climbed to my feet. “Hi, Wolf,” I called 
to the dog. “Wolf! Hi, Wolf!” 

His ears perked straight up. 

“See? He likes the name!” I exclaimed. “Wolf! Wolf!” 

He barked at me, a single yip. 

“Can I keep him?” I asked. 

Mom and Dad exchanged long glances. “We’ll see,” Mom 
said. 


That afternoon, Will and I headed to the swamp to do some 
exploring. My nightmares about the swamp lingered in my mind. 
But I did my best to force them away. 

It was a blazing hot day. The sun burned down in a clear, 
cloudless sky. As we crossed my back yard, I hoped it would be 
cooler in the leafy shade of the swamp. 

I glanced back at Wolf. He was napping in the hot sunlight 
on his side, his four legs stretched straight out in front of him. 

We had fed him before lunch, some leftover roast beef scraps 
from our dinner the night before. He gobbled it up hungrily. 
Then, after slurping up an entire bowl of water, he dropped down 
in the grass in front of the back stoop to take his nap. 

Will and I followed the dirt path into the slanting trees. 
Black-and-orange monarch butterflies, four or five of them, 
fluttered over a bank of tall wildflowers. 

“Hey!” I cried out as my foot sank into a marshy spot in the 
dirt. When I pulled my sneaker out, it was covered with wet sand. 
“Have you seen the bog?” Will asked. “It’s kind of neat.” 

“Yeah. Let’s go there,” I said enthusiastically. “We can throw 
sticks in and stuff, and watch them sink.” 

“Do you think any people ever got sunk in the bog?” Will 
asked thoughtfully. He brushed a mosquito off his broad 
forehead, then scratched his short, dark brown hair. 

“Maybe,” I replied, following him as he turned off the path 
and headed through a wide patch of tall reeds. “Do you think it 
would really suck you down into it, like quicksand?” 

“My dad says there’s no such thing as quicksand,” Will said. 

“T bet there is,” I told him. “I bet people have fallen into the 
bog accidentally and gotten sucked down. If we brought a fishing 


rod, we could cast a line in and pull up their bones.” 

“Gross,” he said. 

We were walking over a carpet of dead brown leaves. Our 
sneakers crunched noisily as we made our way under tangled 
palm trees toward the bog. 

Suddenly, Will stopped. “Ssshhh.” He raised a finger to his 
lips. 

I heard it, too. 

Crunching behind us. 

Footsteps. 

We both froze in place, listening hard. The footsteps drew 
closer. 

Will’s dark eyes narrowed in fear. “Someone’s following us,” 
he murmured. “It’s the swamp hermit!” 


13 


“Quick—hide!” I cried. 

Will dived behind a thick clump of tall weeds. I tried to 
follow him, but there wasn’t room for both of us. 

Crawling on my hands and knees, I searched frantically for 
something to hide behind. 

The crackling of dead leaves became louder. The footsteps 
hurried closer. 

I scrambled toward a nest of brambles. No. They wouldn’t 
hide me. 

A clump of ferns across from me was too low. 

The footsteps crackled closer. 

Closer. 

“Hide! Hide!” Will urged. 

But I was trapped out in the open. Caught. 

I struggled to my feet just as our pursuer came into view. 

“Wolf!” I cried. 

The big dog’s tail began wagging furiously as soon as he saw 
me. He uttered a joyful bark—and jumped. 

“No!” I managed to cry. 

His front paws landed hard on my chest. I stumbled 
backwards into the tall weeds and fell onto Will. 

“Hey!” He cried out and scrambled to his feet. 

Wolf barked happily and practically smothered me, trying to 
lick my face. 

“Wolf—down! Down!” I shouted. I stood up and started 
brushing dead leaves off my T-shirt. “Wolf, you’ve got to stop 
doing that, boy,” I told him. “You’re not a little puppy, you 
know?” 

“How did he find us?” Will asked, pulling a burr off the seat 
of his blue Lycra shorts. 

“Good nose, I guess,” I replied, staring down at the happily 
panting dog. “Maybe he’s part hunting dog or something.” 

“Let’s get to the bog,” Will said impatiently. He began 
leading the way, but Wolf pushed past him, nearly bumping him 
over, and continued trotting toward the bog, his powerful legs 
taking long, steady strides. 

“Wolf acts as if he knows where we’re going,” I said, a little 
surprised. 


“Maybe he’s been here before,” Will replied. “Maybe he’s a 
swamp dog.” 

“Maybe,” I replied thoughtfully, staring down at Wolf. Where 
do you come from, dog? I wondered. He certainly did seem at 
home in the swamp. 

In a short while, we came to the edge of the peat bog. I 
wiped the sweat off my forehead with the back of my hand and 
stared across the oval-shaped pond. 

Shafts of sunlight made the green surface sparkle. Thousands 
of tiny white insects fluttered just above it, catching the light, 
glistening like little diamonds. 

Will picked up a small tree branch. He cracked it in half 
between his hands. Then he heaved one of the halves high into 
the air. 

It hit the surface of the bog with more of a thunk than a 
splash. And then it just lay there. It didn’t sink. 

“Weird,” I said. “Let’s try something heavier.” 

I started to search for something, but a low growl caught my 
attention. I turned toward the sound. To my surprise, it was 
coming from Wolf. 

The dog had lowered its big head. Its entire body stood 
tensed, as if in attack position. Its dark lips were pulled back, 
revealing two sharp rows of teeth. It uttered a low growl, then 
another. 

“T think he senses danger,” Will said softly. 


14 


Wolf uttered another menacing growl, baring his jagged teeth. 
The fur on his back stood up stiffly. His legs tensed as if preparing 
to attack. 

The sound of crackling twigs made me raise my eyes. I saw a 
gray figure darting behind tall weeds on the other side of the bog. 

“Who—who’s that?” Will whispered. 

I stared straight ahead, unable to speak. 

“Is that—” Will started. 

“Yes,” I managed to choke out. “It’s him. The swamp hermit.” 
I dropped quickly to my knees, hoping to keep out of view. 

But had he already seen us? 

Had he been there at the other side of the bog all along? 

Will must have been sharing my thoughts. “Has that weirdo 
been spying on us?” he demanded, huddling beside me. 

Wolf uttered a quiet growl, still frozen in place, ready to 
attack. 

Keeping low, I scooted closer to the dog. For protection, I 
guess. 

I watched the strange man as he made his way through the 
weeds. His long, gray-white hair was wild, standing straight out 
around his face. He kept glancing behind him as he walked, as if 
making sure he wasn’t being followed. 

He carried a brown sack over one shoulder. 

He turned his gaze in our direction. I dropped down lower, 
trying to hide behind Wolf, my heart pounding. 

Wolf hadn’t moved, but he was silent now. His ears were still 
pulled back, his lips still open in a soundless snarl. 

What were those dark stains on the front of the swamp 
hermit’s grimy shirt? 

Bloodstains? 

A shiver of fear ran down my back. 

Wolf stared straight ahead without blinking, without moving 
a muscle. 

The swamp hermit disappeared behind the tall weeds. We 
couldn’t see him, but we could still hear his footsteps crunching 
over dead leaves and fallen twigs. 

I glanced over at Wolf. The big dog shook himself, as if 
shaking the swamp hermit from his mind. His tail wagged slowly. 


His body relaxed. 

He uttered soft whimpers, as if telling me how scared he had 
been. 

“It’s okay, boy,” I said quietly, and rubbed the soft fur on top 
of the dog’s head. He stopped whimpering and licked at my wrist. 

“That guy is creepy!” Will exclaimed, climbing slowly to his 
feet. 

“He even scared the dog,” I said, petting Wolf some more. 
“What do you think he had in the sack?” 

“Probably someone’s head!” Will said, his dark eyes wide 
with horror. 

I laughed. But I stopped when I saw that Will wasn’t joking. 
“Everyone says he’s harmless,” I said. 

“He had blood all over the front of his shirt,” Will said with a 
shudder. He scratched his short, dark hair nervously. 

The sunlight faded quickly as clouds rolled over the sun. 
Long shadows crept over the bog. The stick Will had thrown had 
disappeared, sucked into the thick, murky water. 

“Let’s get home,” I suggested. 

“Yeah. Okay,” Will agreed quickly. 

I called to Wolf, who was exploring in the tall weeds. Then 
we turned and started to make our way back along the twisting 
dirt path. 

A soft breeze fluttered the trees, making the palm leaves 
scrape and clatter. Tall ferns shivered in the wind. The shadows 
grew deeper and darker. 

I could hear Wolf behind us. I could hear his body brushing 
through low shrubs and weeds. 

We were nearly to where the trees ended and the flat grass 
leading to our back yards began. We were nearly out of the 
swamp when Will stopped suddenly. 

I saw his mouth drop open in horror. 

I turned to follow his gaze. 

Then I uttered a shocked cry and covered my eyes to shut out 
the gruesome sight. 


15 


When I opened my eyes, the hideous pile of feathers and blood- 
covered flesh was still at my feet. 

“Wh-what is it?” Will stammered. 

It took me a long while to realize we were staring at a bird. A 
large heron. 

It was hard to recognize because it had been torn apart. 

Long, white feathers were scattered over the soft ground. The 
poor bird’s chest had been torn wide open. 

“The swamp hermit!” Will cried. 

“Huh?” I cried. I turned away from the hideous sight and 
tried to force the image from my mind. 

“That’s why he had blood all over his shirt!” Will declared. 

“But why would he rip a bird apart?” I asked weakly. 

“Because... because he’s a monster!” Will exclaimed. 

“He’s just a weird old guy who lives alone in the swamp,” I 
said. “He didn’t do this, Will. Some kind of animal did it. Look!” I 
pointed to the ground. 

There were paw prints in the soft ground. All around the 
dead bird. 

“They look like dog’s paws,” I said, thinking out loud. 

“Dogs don’t rip apart birds,” Will replied quietly. 

At that moment, Wolf came bounding up to us through the 
weeds. He came to a stop in front of the dead bird and started to 
sniff it. 

“Get away from there, Wolf,” I ordered. “Come on. Get 
away.” I tugged him back, pulling him with both hands around 
his thick neck. 

“Let’s get home,” Will said. “Let’s get away from this thing. 
I’m going to have bad dreams. I really will.” 

I pulled Wolf with both hands. We stepped carefully around 
the dead heron and then hurried toward the swamp edge. Neither 
of us said a word. I guess we were both still picturing what we 
had seen. 

As we reached the flat grass behind our houses, I said good- 
bye to Will. I watched him hurry to his house. Wolf scampered 
after him for part of the way. Then he turned and hurried back to 
me. 

The late afternoon sun burned its way through the clouds. I 


shielded my eyes from the sudden brightness, and saw my dad 
working in the deer pen behind the house. 

“Hey, Dad—” I ran toward him over the grass. 

He glanced up when I called to him. He was wearing denim 
cutoffs and a sleeveless yellow T-shirt. He had an Orlando Magic 
cap pulled down over his forehead. “What’s up, Grady?” 

“Will and I—we saw a dead heron,” I told him breathlessly. 

“Where? In the swamp?” he asked casually. He pulled off the 
cap, wiped his forehead with the back of his hand, and replaced 
the cap. 

“Dad, it—it was torn apart!” I cried. 

He didn’t react. “That’s part of life in the wild,” he said, 
pulling up one of the deer’s hooves to examine the bottom. “You 
know that, Grady. It can get pretty violent out there. We’ve talked 
about survival of the fittest and stuff like that.” 

“No, Dad. This is different,” I insisted. “The heron—it was 
ripped in two. I mean, like someone took it, and—” 

“Another bird, maybe,” Dad said, concentrating on the deer 
hoof. “A larger bird of prey. It could have been—” 

“We saw the swamp hermit,” I interrupted. “He had blood all 
over his shirt. Then we saw paw prints in the ground. All around 
the dead bird.” 

“Grady, calm down,” Dad said, setting down the deer’s leg. 
“If you go exploring in the swamp, you’re going to see a lot of 
frightening-looking things. But don’t let your imagination run 
away with you.” 

“Will said it was done by a monster!” I exclaimed. 

Dad frowned and scratched his head through the cap. “I see 
your new friend has a good imagination, too,” he said quietly. 


That night, I was glad my parents agreed to let Wolf sleep in my 
room. I felt a lot safer with the big dog curled up on the rug 
beside my bed. 

I hadn’t been able to shake the ugly picture of the dead heron 
from my mind. I watched some TV until dinnertime. Then after 
dinner, I played a long chess game with Emily. 

But no matter what I did, I kept seeing the white feathers 
scattered over the ground, the torn-apart bird lying crumpled on 
the path. 

So now I felt a little comforted with Wolf sleeping in the 
room. “You'll protect me, won’t you, boy?” I whispered from my 
bed. 

He uttered a low snort. Light from the full moon spilled over 


him through the window. I saw that he was sleeping with his 
head resting on his two front paws. 

Then I drifted into a dreamless sleep. 

I don’t know how long I slept. 

I was awakened some time later by a horrifying crash. 

I sat straight up with a startled gasp. 

The crash had come from the living room, I realized. 

Someone was breaking in! 


16 


Was it a burglar? 

I climbed out of bed, my heart pounding, and crept to the 
door. 

Another crash. A loud thump. 

Footsteps. 

“Who—who is it?” I cried. My voice came out in a choked 
whisper. 

Keeping against the wall, I made my way slowly toward the 
living room. “Who’s there?” I shouted. 

Mom and Dad and Emily met me in the dark hallway. Even 
in the darkness I could see the fear and confusion on their faces. 

I was the first to the living room. Pale yellow light from the 
full moon washed across the room. “Hey!” I called out. 

Wolf leaped against the big front window. His shoulders 
made a loud thud against the glass. 

“Wolf—stop!” I cried. 

In the pale light, I saw what had caused the loud crash. Wolf 
had knocked over the table and a lamp that had stood in front of 
the window. 

“He—he’s trying to get outside,” I stammered. 

I felt Dad’s hand on the shoulder of my pajama shirt. “What a 
mess he’s made,” he murmured. 

“Wolf—stop!” I called again. 

The big dog turned, breathing hard. His eyes glowed red in 
the moonlight through the window. 

“Why is he so desperate to get out?” Emily demanded. 

“We can’t have him in the house if he does this every night,” 
Mom said, her voice hoarse from sleep. 

The big dog lowered his head and let out an excited growl. 
His tail stood straight up behind him. 

“Open the front door. Let him out,” Mom said. “Before he 
wrecks the whole house.” 

Dad hurried across the room and pulled open the door. Wolf 
didn’t hesitate for a second. He bounded to the door and burst 
out. 

I ran to the window to watch him. But the big dog 
disappeared around the side of the house, running toward the 
back yard. 


“He’s heading to the swamp,” I guessed. 

“He tried to break right through the window,” Mom said. 

Emily clicked on a lamp. “He’s so strong, he probably could 
have broken the window,” she said quietly. 

Dad closed the front door. He yawned. Then he turned his 
gaze on me. “You know what this means, don’t you, Grady?” 

I was still staring out at the full moon. “No. What?” 

“Wolf will have to stay outdoors from now on,” Dad said. He 
stooped and began picking up pieces of the broken lamp. 

“But, Dad—” I started to protest. 

“He’s too big and too restless to stay in the house,” Dad 
continued. He handed the lamp pieces to Emily. Then he pulled 
the table rightside up and returned it to its place in front of the 
window. 

“Wolf didn’t mean to break the lamp,” I argued weakly. 

“He'll break everything we have,” Mom said quietly. 

“He’s just too big,” Dad added. “He’ll have to stay outside, 
Grady.” 

“Why did he want out so desperately?” Emily demanded. 

“He’s probably used to being outside,” Dad told her. “He’ll be 
happier out there,” he said, turning to me. 

“Yeah. Maybe,” I replied glumly. I liked having Wolf sleep 
beside me in my bedroom. But I knew there was no way I could 
convince my parents to give the dog a second chance. Their 
minds were made up. 

And at least they were letting me keep Wolf. 

I pulled the vacuum cleaner out of the closet and plugged it 
in. Dad took the nozzle and began vacuuming up the tiny pieces 
of glass from the carpet. 

That crazy dog, I thought, shaking my head unhappily. What 
is his problem, anyway? 

When Dad finished, I carried the vacuum cleaner back to the 
closet. 

“Now maybe we can all sleep in peace,” Mom said, yawning. 

She was wrong. 


17 


I heard the frightening howls again a short while later. 

At first I thought I was dreaming them. 

But when I opened my eyes and gazed around my dark 
bedroom, the howls continued. Still half asleep, I gripped the 
covers with both hands and pulled them up to my chin. 

The howls sounded so close, as if they were right outside my 
window. They didn’t seem like the cries of an animal. They were 
too angry, too deliberate. 

Too human. 

Stop trying to frighten yourself, I thought. It’s a wolf. It has 
to be some kind of swamp wolf. 

In the back of my mind, I knew it might be Wolf making 
those frightening sounds. But I kept pushing the thought away. 

Why would the dog howl like that? 

Dogs bark. They don’t howl unless they’re very sad or upset. 

I shut my eyes, wishing the frightening wails away. 

Suddenly, they stopped. Silence. 

Then I heard rapid thumps on the ground. Footsteps. 

Some kind of a struggle. 

I heard a short, terrifying cry. It cut off almost as soon as it 
began. 

It’s right in back of the house, I realized. 

Wide awake now, I jumped out of bed, dragging the covers 
with me. I stumbled to the bedroom window and grabbed the 
windowsill. 

The full moon had risen high in the night sky. The back yard 
stretched out silvery in the moonlight, the dewy grass shimmering 
in the bright light. 

Pressing my forehead against the windowpane, I peered out 
toward the dark swamp. I uttered a near-silent gasp when I saw 
the shadowy creature running toward the trees. 

A large creature, running on all fours. 

It was only a black outline fading into the darkness. But I 
could see how big it was, and I could see how fast it was running. 

And I heard its howls. Triumphant howls, I thought. 

Is it Wolf? I wondered. I peered out the window without 
moving, even though the darkness had swallowed the creature 
up. I could see only the outline of distant trees. 


But I could still hear the howls rising and falling on the 
heavy night air. 

Is it Wolf? 

It can’t be Wolf—can it? 

I lowered my gaze. My breath caught in my throat. I saw 
something. In the middle of the backyard. A few feet from the 
deer pen. 

At first I thought it was a pile of rags. 

My hands trembled as I pulled open my window. 

I had to get a better look. I had to see what that was in the 
back yard. 

I pulled up my pajama bottoms. Then, gripping the 
windowsill, I lowered myself out the window onto the grass. 

The wet grass felt cold under my bare feet. I turned to the 
deer pen. The six swamp deer were standing tensely, huddled 
together against the house. Their dark eyes followed me as I 
began to creep across the grass. 

What is that thing? I wondered, staring into the silvery light. 

Is it just a pile of old rags? 

No. 

What is it? 


18 


My bare feet felt cold and wet as I made my way slowly across 
the dew-covered grass. The night air was heavy and still, still as 
death. 

When I came close enough to see what was lying in a heap 
on the grass, I uttered a faint cry and started to gag. 

I pressed a hand against my mouth and swallowed hard. 

I realized I was staring down at a rabbit. Its small, black eyes 
were frozen open in terror. One of its ears had been pulled off. 

The rabbit had been ripped open, nearly torn in half. 

I forced myself to look away. 

My stomach still heaving, I hurried back over the wet grass 
to my open window and scrambled back in. 

As I struggled to pull the window shut, the howls rang out 
again, rising triumphantly from the nearby swamp. 


After breakfast the next morning, I led Dad out to the back yard 
to show him the murdered rabbit. It was a bright, hot day, and a 
red sun climbed a pale, clear sky. 

As soon as we stepped off the back stoop, Wolf appeared 
from around the side of his house. His tail began wagging 
furiously. He came running excitedly to greet me, as if he hadn’t 
seen me in years, leaping onto my chest, nearly knocking me 
over. 

“Down, Wolf! Down!” I cried, laughing as the dog stretched 
to lick my face. 

“Your dog is a killer,” a voice said behind me. I turned to see 
that Emily had followed us. She was wearing a red T-shirt over 
white tennis shorts. She had her arms crossed in front of her, and 
she was glaring disapprovingly at Wolf. “Look what he did to that 
poor bunny rabbit,” she said, shaking her head. 

“Whoa. Hold on,” I replied, petting Wolfs gray fur. “Who 
said Wolf did this?” 

“Who else would have done it?” Emily demanded. “He’s a 
killer.” 

“Oh, yeah? Look how gentle he is,” I insisted. I put my wrist 
in Wolf’s mouth. He clamped down gently on it, being careful not 
to hurt me. 

“Wolf may be a bit of a hunter,” Dad said thoughtfully. He 
had been staring down at the rabbit, but now he turned his glance 


to the deer pen. 

Huddled together at one end of the pen, the deer were all 
staring warily at Wolf. They had their heads lowered cautiously 
as they followed the dog’s every move. 

“Tm glad they’re safe inside that pen,” Dad said softly. 

“Dad, you have to get rid of this dog!” Emily said shrilly. 

“No way!” I cried. I turned angrily to my sister. “You have no 
proof that Wolf did anything wrong!” I shouted. “No proof at all!” 

“You have no proof that he didn’t do it!” Emily replied 
nastily. 

“Of course he didn’t!” I cried, feeling myself lose control. 
“Didn’t you hear the howls last night? Didn’t you hear those 
frightening howls? It wasn’t a dog howling like that. Dogs don’t 
howl like that!” 

“Then what was it?” Emily demanded. 

“I heard them, too,” Dad said, stepping between us. “They 
sounded more like wolf howls. Or maybe a coyote.” 

“See?” I told Emily. 

“But Pd be very surprised to find a wolf or coyote in this 
area,” Dad continued, gazing out toward the swamp. 

Emily still had her arms crossed tightly over her chest. She 
gazed down at Wolf and shuddered. “He’s dangerous, Dad. You 
really have to get rid of him.” 

Dad walked over and patted Wolf’s head. He scratched Wolf 
under the chin. Wolf licked Dad’s hand. 

“Let’s just be careful around him,” Dad said. “He seems very 
gentle. But we don’t really know anything about him—do we? So 
let’s be very careful, okay?” 

“Pm going to be careful,” Emily replied, narrowing her eyes 
at Wolf. “I’m going to stay as far away from that monster as I 
can.” She turned and stormed back to the house. 

Dad made his way to the shed to get a shovel and box to 
carry away the dead rabbit in. 

I dropped to my knees and hugged Wolf’s broad neck. “You 
aren’t a monster, are you, boy?” I asked. “Emily is crazy, isn’t 
she? You’re not a monster. That wasn’t you I saw running toward 
the swamp last night, was it?” 

Wolf raised his deep blue eyes to mine. He stared hard at me. 

He seemed to be trying to tell me something. 

But I had no idea what it could be. 


19 


That night I didn’t hear the howls. 

I woke up in the middle of the night and stared out the 
window. Wolf was gone, probably exploring the swamp. In the 
morning, I knew he’d come running back to greet me as if I were 
a long lost friend. 

The next morning Will showed up just as I was giving Wolf 
his breakfast, a big bowl of crunchy, dry dog food. “Hey, what’s 
up?” Will asked, his usual greeting. 

“Nothing much,” I said. I rolled up the top of the big bag of 
dog food and dragged it back into the kitchen. Wolf stood over 
his bowl, his head lowered, chewing noisily away. 

I pushed open the screen door and returned to Will. He was 
wearing a dark blue muscle shirt and black Lycra bike shorts. He 
had a green-and-yellow Forest Service cap pulled down over his 
dark hair. 

“Want to go exploring?” he asked in his hoarse voice, 
watching Wolf hungrily gobble down his breakfast. “You know. In 
the swamp?” 

“Yeah. Sure,” I said. I called inside to tell my parents where I 
was going. Then I followed Will across the back lawn toward the 
swamp. 

Wolf came scampering after us. He’d run past us, then let us 
catch up. Then he’d run in crazy zigzags in front of us, behind us, 
romping happily under the hot morning sun. 

“Did you hear about Mr. Warner?” Will asked. He stopped to 
pick up a long blade of grass and put it between his teeth. 

“Who?” 

“Ed Warner,” Will replied. “I guess you haven’t met the 
Warners yet. They live in the very last house.” He turned and 
pointed behind us to the last white house at the end of the row of 
white houses. 

“What about him?” I asked, nearly tripping over Wolf, who 
had come rumbling past my feet. 

“He’s missing,” Will replied, chewing on the grass blade. “He 
didn’t come home last night.” 

“Huh? From where?” I asked, turning to stare at the Warners’ 
house. Heat waves shimmered up from the grass, making the 
house appear to bend and quiver. 

“From the swamp,” Will replied darkly. “Mrs. Warner called 


my mom this morning. She said Mr. Warner went hunting 
yesterday afternoon. He likes to hunt wild turkeys. He took me 
with him a couple times. He’s real good at chasing them down. 
When he kills one, he hangs its feet up on his den wall.” 

“He does?” I cried. It sounded pretty gross to me. 

“Yeah. You know. Like a trophy,” Will continued. “Anyway, 
he went hunting wild turkeys in the swamp yesterday afternoon, 
and he hasn’t come home.” 

“Weird,” I said, watching Wolf stop at the edge of the trees. 
“Maybe he got lost.” 

“No way,” Will insisted, shaking his head. “Not Mr. Warner. 
He’s lived here a long time. He was the first one to move here. 
Mr. Warner wouldn’t get lost.” 

“Then maybe the werewolf got him!” called a strange voice 
behind us. 


20 


Startled, we both spun around to see a girl about our age. She had 
rust-colored red hair tied in a ponytail on one side. She had 
catlike green eyes, and a short stub of a nose, and freckles all over 
her face. She was wearing faded red denim jeans and a T-shirt 
with a grinning green alligator on the front. 

“Cassie, what are you doing here?” Will demanded. 

“Following you,” she replied, making a face at him. She 
turned to me. “You’re the new kid, Grady, right? Will told me 
about you.” 

“Hi,” I said awkwardly. “He told me a girl lived in the 
neighborhood. But he didn’t tell me much about you.” 

“What’s to tell?” Will teased. 

“Pm Cassie O’Rourke,” she said. She shot up her hand and 
pulled the blade of grass from Will’s mouth. 

“Hey!” He playfully tried to slug her, but missed. 

“What did you say about a werewolf?” I asked. 

“Don’t start with that stuff again,” Will grumbled to Cassie. 
“Tt’s so stupid.” 

“You're just afraid,” Cassie accused. 

“No, I’m not. It’s too stupid,” Will insisted. 

We stepped into the shade of the trees at the swamp edge. A 
funnel cloud of white gnats whirred crazily in a shaft of light 
between the trees. 

“There’s a werewolf in the swamp,” Cassie said, lowering her 
voice as we ducked past the gnats and moved deeper into the 
shade. 

“And I’m going to flap my wings and fly to Mars,” Will said 
sarcastically. 

“Shut up, Will,” Cassie snapped. “Grady doesn’t think it’s 
stupid—do you?” 

I shrugged. “I don’t know,” I said. “I don’t think I believe in 
werewolves.” 

Will laughed. “Cassie believes in the Easter Bunny, too,” he 
said. 

Cassie socked him hard in the chest. 

“Hey!” Will cried out angrily as he staggered back. “What’s 
your problem?” 

“Mosquito,” she said, pointing. “A big one. I got him.” 


Scowling, Will glanced down. “I don’t see any mosquito. Give 
me a break, Cassie.” 

We made our way along the winding path. It had rained the 
day before. The ground was marshier than usual. We kept 
slipping in the soft mud. 

“Do you hear the howling sounds at night?” I asked Cassie. 

“That’s the werewolf,” she replied softly. Her green cat-eyes 
burned into mine. “I’m not kidding around, Grady. I’m serious. 
Those howls aren’t human. Those howls come from a werewolf 
who has just killed.” 

Will snickered. “You’ve got a good imagination, Cassie. I 
guess you watch a lot of scary movies on TV, huh?” 

“Real life is scarier than the movies,” she said, lowering her 
voice to a whisper. 

“Ooh, stop. You’re making me shake all over!” Will 
exclaimed sarcastically. 

She didn’t reply. She was still staring at me as we walked. 
“You believe me, don’t you?” 

“I don’t know,” I said. 

The bog came into view. The air became heavier, wetter. The 
tall weeds on the other side stood straight up. The bog gurgled 
quietly. Two big flies danced over the dark green surface. 

“There’s no such thing as werewolves, Cassie,” Will muttered, 
searching for something to throw into the bog. He grinned at her. 
“Unless maybe you’re one!” 

She rolled her eyes. “Very funny.” She made biting motions 
with her teeth as if she were going to bite him. 

I heard a rustling sound across the oval-shaped bog. The tall 
weeds suddenly parted, and Wolf appeared at the edge of the 
water. 

“What does the werewolf look like?” Will asked sarcastically. 
“Does it have red hair and freckles?” 

Cassie didn’t reply. 

I turned to see a look of terror freeze on her face. Her green 
eyes grew wide, and her freckles seemed to fade. “Th-there’s the 
werewolf!” she stammered in a choked whisper. She pointed. 

Feeling a chill of fear, I turned to see where she was pointing. 

To my horror, she was pointing right at Wolf! 


21 


“No!” I started to protest. 

But then I saw that I had misunderstood. Cassie wasn’t 
pointing at Wolf. She was pointing to the figure moving through 
the tall weeds behind the dog. 

The swamp hermit! 

I saw him walking quickly behind the weeds, his shoulders 
bent, his mangy head bobbing with each step. 

As he moved into a small break in the weeds, I could see why 
he was leaning forward. He carried something over one shoulder. 
A bag of some sort. 

Wolf started to growl. 

The hermit stopped walking. 

It wasn’t a bag slung over his shoulder, I saw. It was a turkey. 
A wild turkey. 

A chilling thought burst into my mind: Had he taken it from 
Mr. Warner? 

Was Cassie right about the swamp hermit? Was he a 
werewolf? Had he done something horrible to Mr. Warner and 
claimed the wild turkey as his prize? 

I tried to dismiss these horrible thoughts. They were crazy. 
Impossible. 

But Cassie looked so frightened, staring across the gurgling 
green bog at the wild-eyed hermit. And the howls at night, the 
howls had been so frightening, so human. 

And the dead animals I’d seen, torn so brutally apart, as if... 
as if by a werewolf! 

Wolf uttered another warning growl. He stared at the hermit, 
his tail standing stiffly behind him, his fur rising up on his back. 

The hermit moved quickly. I saw his dark eyes flash just 
before he disappeared behind the weeds. 

“Its him!” Cassie cried, still pointing. “It’s the werewolf!” 

“Cassie—shut up!” Will warned. “He’ll hear you!” 

I swallowed hard, frozen in place by my fear. I saw the weeds 
tremble across the bog. I heard rustling sounds growing closer. 

“Run!” Will cried, his hoarse voice shrill and frightened. 
“Come on—run!” 

Too late. 

The swamp hermit burst out of the weeds right behind us. 


“Im the werewolf!” he shrieked. His eyes were wild, excited. His 
face, surrounded by his long, tangled hair, was bright red. “I’m 
the werewolf!” 

He had heard Cassie! 

Laughing at the top of his lungs, he tossed up both hands, 
then began to swing the turkey in a wide circle over his head. 
“Tm the werewolf!” he cried. 

Cassie, Will, and I all cried out at the same time. 

Then we started to run. 

Out of the corner of my eye, I could see Wolf. He hadn’t 
moved from his spot across the bog. But now, as I started to run, 
he came bounding toward us, barking excitedly. 

“Pm the werewolf!” the hermit shrieked. He howled with 
laughter, still swinging the turkey as he chased after us. 

“Leave us alone!” Cassie cried, running beside Will a few 
steps ahead of me. “Do you hear me? Leave us alone!” 

Her pleas made the hermit howl again. 

My shoes slipped in the muddy ground. 

I turned back. He was gaining on me. Right behind me. 

Gasping for breath, I struggled to run faster. Sharp vines and 
heavy leaves slapped at my face and arms as I plunged forward. 

It was all a blur now. A blur of light and shade, trees and 
vines, tall weeds and sharp brambles. 

“Pm the werewolf! I’m the werewolf!” 

The crazed hermit’s high-pitched wails of laughter echoed 
through the swamp. 

Keep going, Grady, I urged myself. Keep going. 

Then, with a terrified cry, I felt my feet slide out from under 
me. 

I fell face forward into the mud, landing hard on my hands 
and knees. 

He’s got me, I realized. 

The werewolf has got me. 


22 


I tried frantically to scramble up from the mud. But I slipped 
again and tumbled forward with a splat. 

He’s got me now, I thought. 

The werewolf has got me now. I cannot escape. 

My muscles all froze in panic. I struggled to crawl away. 

I turned back, expecting the hermit to grab me. 

But he had stopped several yards away. The turkey dangled 
to the ground as he stared down at me, a strange grin on his 
weathered face. 

Where was Wolf? I wondered. 

Wolf had been growling furiously at the swamp hermit. Why 
hadn’t Wolf attacked? 

“Help! Will! Cassie!” I called desperately. 

Silence. 

They were gone. They were both probably out of the swamp 
by now, running for home. 

I was alone. Alone to face the hermit. 

I stumbled to my feet, my eyes locked on his. Why was he 
grinning at me like that? 

“Go on. Go,” he murmured, gesturing with his free hand. 
“Just teasing you.” 

“What?” My voice came out tiny and frightened. 

“Go. I’m not going to bite you,” he said. His grin faded. The 
light seemed to dim in his shiny black eyes. 

Wolf appeared behind him. The dog gazed up at the hermit, 
then lowered his eyes to the dead turkey. He barked once, a shrill 
yip. But I could see that Wolf had relaxed. He had no intention of 
attacking the hermit. 

“This dog yours?” the hermit asked, eyeing Wolf warily. 

“Yeah,” I replied, still breathing hard. “I... found him.” 

“Watch out for him,” the hermit said sharply. Then he turned 
and, hoisting the large bird on his shoulder, headed back into the 
weeds. 

“W-watch out for him?” I stammered. “What do you mean?” 

But the hermit didn’t reply. I could hear him brushing the tall 
weeds away as he disappeared back into the swamp. 

“What do you mean?” I called after him. 

But he was gone. The swamp was silent now except for the 


chirping and clicking of insects and the dry sound of palm leaves 
brushing against each other. 

I stared straight ahead at the tall weeds. I guess I expected 
the swamp hermit to return, to burst back into view, to attack 
again. 

Two white moths fluttered together over the weeds. Nothing 
else moved. 

He was teasing us, he had said. 

That’s all it was, just teasing. 

I swallowed hard. Then I forced myself to breathe normally 
again. 

After a while, I lowered my gaze to Wolf. The dog was busily 
sniffing the ground where the hermit had stood. 

“Wolf—why didn’t you protect me?” I scolded. 

The dog glanced up, then returned to his sniffing. 

“Hey, dog—are you a big coward?” I asked, brushing at the 
wet dirt on the knees of my jeans. “Is that your problem? You 
sound real tough, but you’re actually a big chicken?” 

Wolf ignored me. 

I turned and headed home, thinking about the hermit’s 
warning. As I made my way along the narrow path, I could hear 
Wolf running through the weeds and tall grass, following close 
behind. 

“Watch out for him,” the hermit had said. 

Was he teasing about that, too? Was he just trying to scare 
me? 

The strange man saw that Will, Cassie, and I were afraid of 
him. So he decided to have some fun with us. 

That’s all it was, I decided. 

He heard Cassie call him a werewolf. So he decided to give 
us a real scare. 

As I walked along the marshy ground under the shade of the 
tilted palm trees, my mind spun with thoughts about Cassie and 
Will and Wolf and werewolves. 

I didn’t see the snake until I stepped on it. 

I glanced down in time to see its bright green head shoot 
forward. 

I felt a sharp stab of pain as its fangs dug into my ankle. 

The pain jolted up my leg. 

I uttered a choked gasp before I crumpled to the ground. 


23 


I hit the ground and curled into a tight ball as the pain throbbed 
through my body. 

Red dots formed in my eyes. The dots grew larger and larger 
until I saw only red. The color shimmered in rhythm to the 
throbbing pain. 

Through the curtain of red, I saw the snake slither into the 
bushes. 

I grabbed my ankle, trying to force the pain down. 

Slowly, the red faded, then vanished, leaving only the pain. 

My hand suddenly felt wet. 

Blood? 

I glanced down to see Wolf licking my hand. Fierce licking, 
as if trying to cure me, trying to make everything okay again. 

Despite the pain, I laughed. “It’s okay, boy,” I said. “I’m 
okay.” 

He kept licking my hand until I climbed to my feet. I felt a 
little dizzy. My legs were shaky. 

I tried putting weight on the foot that had been bitten. 

It felt a little better. 

I took a step, limping. Then another. 

“Let’s go, Wolf,” I said. He gazed up at me sympathetically. 

I knew I had to get home quickly. If the snake was poisonous, 
I was in big trouble. I had no way of knowing how much time I 
had before the venom would paralyze me completely—or worse. 

Wolf stayed by my side as I limped over the soft ground 
toward home. I was gasping for breath. My chest felt tight. The 
ground swayed beneath me. 

Was it because of the snake venom? Or was it just because I 
was so frightened? 

Pain shot up my side with every step I took. 

But I kept pulling myself along, talking to Wolf all the while, 
ignoring the throbbing ache of my ankle. 

“We’re almost there, Wolf,” I said, panting loudly. “Almost 
there, boy.” 

The dog sensed that something was seriously wrong. He 
stayed by my side instead of running his usual zigzag patterns in 
front of me and behind me. 

The end of the trees came into view. I could see bright 


sunlight just beyond the swamp. 

“Hey—” a voice called to me. I saw Will and Cassie waiting 
for me on the flat grass. 

They began running toward me. “Are you okay?” Cassie 
called. 

“No. I... I got bit!” I managed to choke out. “Please—go get 
my dad!” 

They both took off, running full speed to my house. I 
dropped down on the grass, spreading my legs straight out, and 
waited. 

I tried to stay calm, but it was impossible. 

Was the snake poisonous? Was the venom heading straight to 
my heart? Was I about to die any second? 

I reached down with both hands and carefully, carefully, 
pulled off my mud-covered sneaker. Then, moving it a tiny bit at 
a time, I lowered my white sock down over the ankle and off my 
foot. 

The ankle was a little swollen. The skin was red except for a 
white, puckered spot around the bite. Inside that spot, I saw two 
small puncture marks, bright red droplets of blood oozing from 
each hole. 

When I raised my eyes from the wound, I saw my dad, 
dressed in brown shorts and a white T-shirt, hurrying along the 
flat grass toward me, followed closely by Will and Cassie. 

“What happened?” I heard my dad ask them. “What 
happened to Grady?” 

“He was bitten by a werewolf!” I heard Cassie reply. 


KRR 


“Keep the ice pack on it,” Dad instructed. “The swelling will go 
down.” 

I groaned and held the ice pack against my ankle. 

Mom tsk-tsked from the kitchen table. She had a newspaper 
spread out in front of her. I couldn’t tell if she was tsk-tsking over 
me or over the day’s news. 

Outside the screen door I could see Wolf, on his side on the 
grass just past the back stoop, sound asleep. Emily was in the 
front room, watching some soap on TV. 

“How does it feel?” Mom asked. 

“A lot better,” I told her. “I think I was mainly scared.” 

“Green snakes aren’t poisonous,” Dad reminded me for the 
tenth time. “But I took every precaution, just in case. We’ll wrap 


it up really good when you’re through putting ice on it.” 

“What was all that talk about werewolves?” Mom asked. 

“Cassie has werewolves on the brain,” I said. “She thinks the 
swamp hermit is a werewolf.” 

“She seems like a sweet girl,” Mom said quietly. “I had a nice 
talk with her while your father was taking care of your bite. 
Yow’re lucky, Grady, to find two kids your age out here on the 
edge of a swamp.” 

“Yeah, I guess,” I replied, shifting the ice pack on the ankle. 
“But she was driving Will and me nuts with all her werewolf 
talk.” 

Dad was washing his hands in the kitchen sink. He dried 
them on a dish towel, then turned to me. “That old swamp hermit 
is supposed to be harmless,” he said. “At least, that’s what 
everyone says.” 

“Well, he gave us a real scare,” I told him. “He chased us 
through the swamp, shouting, ‘I’m the werewolf!” 

“Weird,” Dad replied thoughtfully. He tossed the dish towel 
onto the counter. 

“You should stay away from him,” Mom said, looking up 
from the newspaper. 

“Do you believe in werewolves?” I asked. 

Dad snickered. “Your mom and I are scientists, Grady. We’re 
not supposed to believe in supernatural things like werewolves.” 

“Your father is a werewolf,” Mom joked. “I have to shave his 
back every morning so he’ll look human.” 

“Ha-ha,” I said sarcastically. “I’m serious. I mean, haven’t you 
heard the weird howls at night?” 

“Lots of creatures howl,” Mom replied. “I'll bet you howled 
when that snake bit your ankle!” 

“Can’t you be serious?” I cried shrilly. “You know, the howls 
didn’t start until it was a full moon.” 

“T remember. The howls didn’t start until that dog showed 
up!” Emily called from the front room. 

“Emily, give me a break!” I shouted. 

“Your dog is a werewolf!” Emily called. 

“Enough werewolf talk,” Mom muttered. “Look. I’ve got hair 
growing on my palms!” She held up her hands. 

“That’s just ink off the newspaper,” Dad said. He turned to 
me. “See? There’s a scientific explanation for everything.” 

“T really would like to be taken seriously,” I said through 
clenched teeth. 

“Well...” Dad glanced outside. Wolf had rolled onto his back 


and was sleeping with all four legs up in the air. “The moon will 
look full for only two more nights,” Dad told me. “Tonight and 
tomorrow night. If the howls stop after tomorrow night, we’ll 
know it was a werewolf, howling at the full moon.” 

Dad chuckled. He thought it was all a big joke. 

We had no idea that something was about to happen that 
night that might change his opinion about werewolves—forever. 


24 


Will and Cassie came over after dinner. Mom and Dad were still 
loading dishes into the dishwasher and cleaning up. Emily had 
hurried into town to go to the only movie playing. 

I was walking around pretty well. The ankle barely hurt at 
all. Dad’s a pretty good doctor, I guess. 

The three of us settled in the front room, and we instantly got 
into an argument about werewolves. 

Cassie insisted that the swamp hermit wasn’t kidding, that he 
really was a werewolf. 

Will told her she was a complete jerk. “He only chased us 
because he heard you call him a werewolf,” he told Cassie 
angrily. 

“Why do you think he lives by himself way deep in the 
swamp?” Cassie demanded of Will. “Because he knows what 
happens to him when the moon is full, and he doesn’t want 
anyone else to know it!” 

“Then why did he scream to us that he was a werewolf this 
afternoon?” Will asked impatiently. “Because he was just joking, 
that’s why.” 

“Come on, guys. Let’s change the subject,” I said. “My 
parents are both scientists, and they say there’s no proof that 
werewolves exist.” 

“That’s what scientists always say,” Cassie insisted. 

“They’re right,” Will said. “There are no werewolves except 
in movies. You’re a real jerk, Cassie.” 

“You're a jerk!” Cassie shouted back. 

I could see they’d had fights like this before. “Let’s play a 
game or something,” I suggested. “Want to play some Nintendo? 
It’s in my room.” 

“Mr. Warner still hasn’t shown up,” Cassie told Will, ignoring 
me. She tugged at her red ponytail, then tossed it behind her 
head. “You know why? Because he was murdered by the 
werewolf!” 

“Don’t be stupid,” Will said. “How do you know?” 

“Maybe you’re the werewolf!” I told Cassie. 

Will laughed. “Yeah. That’s why you’re such an expert, 
Cassie.” 

“Oh, shut up,” Cassie grumbled. “You look more like a 
werewolf than me, Will!” 


“You look like a vampire!” he told her. 

“Well, you look like King Kong!” she cried. 

“What are you kids talking about?” Mom interrupted, poking 
her head into the room. 

“Just talking about movies and things,” I replied quickly. 


I couldn’t get to sleep that night. I kept rolling onto one side, then 
the other. I couldn’t get comfortable. 

I kept listening for the howls. 

A strong wind had come up from the Gulf. I could hear it 
rushing past our small house. It rattled the wire mesh of the deer 
pen out back. It made a constant ssshhhhhh sound, and I strained 
to hear the familiar howls. 

I had just about drifted off to sleep when the howls began. 

Instantly alert, I jumped to my feet. My left ankle ached as I 
stepped down on it. 

Another howl. Far off. Barely carrying over the steady rush of 
the wind. 

I limped to my bedroom window. The ankle had stiffened up 
a bit while I was lying in bed. I pressed my face against the glass 
and peered out. 

The full moon, gray as a skull, hovered low in the charcoal 
sky. The dewy grass gleamed under its blanket of pale light. 

A burst of wind rattled my window. 

Startled, I pulled back. And listened. 

Another howl. Closer. 

This one sent a cold shudder down my back. 

It sounded really close. Or was the wind carrying it from the 
swamp? 

I squinted out the window. Swirls of wind made the grass 
sway from one side to the other. The ground appeared to be 
spinning, glowing in the pale moonlight as it twirled. 

Another howl. Even closer. 

I couldn’t see anything. I had to know who or what was 
making that terrifying sound. 

I pulled my jeans on over my pajama bottoms. Struggling in 
the dark, I managed to slide my feet into a pair of flip-flops. 

I started out of my room, but stopped short when I heard a 
banging. A loud crash. A pounding. A harsh thud. 

Right outside. 

Right outside my house. 

My heart pounding, I ran through the dark hallway. My ankle 


ached, but I ignored it. 

I hurried through the kitchen, unlocked the back door, and 
pulled it open. A strong gust of wind pushed me back as I opened 
the screen door. 

The wind was hot and wet. Another strong gust pushed me 
back. 

The wind is trying to keep me inside, I thought. Trying to 
keep me from solving the mystery of the terrifying howls. 

I lowered my head against the driving gusts and leapt down 
off the stoop. 

“Ow!” I cried out as pain shot up my leg. 

Waiting for my eyes to adjust to the dim light, I listened 
hard. 

No howls now. Just the shrill, steady rush of wind, pushing, 
pushing me back against the house. 

The back yard glowed in the moonlight. Everything was 
silver and gray. 

And silent. 

I searched the back yard, my eyes sweeping slowly across the 
shifting grass. Empty. 

But what had caused all the commotion ld heard in my 
room? The banging? The loud thuds? The rattling sounds? 

Why had the howls stopped when I came outside? 

What a mystery, I thought. What a strange mystery. 

The wind swirled around me. My face was dripping wet from 
the heavy dampness of the air. 

Feeling defeated, I turned back toward the house. 

And uttered a shocked cry when I saw that the werewolf had 
murdered again. 


25 


I took a step through the swirling wind toward the deer pen. 

“Dad!” I called. But my voice came out a hushed whisper. 
“Dad!” I tried to shout, but my throat was too dry and choked 
with fear. 

Staring straight ahead, I took another step. I could see it all 
clearly now. A scene of death. Pale light and shadows. The only 
sounds were the pounding of my heart, the swell of the wind, and 
the rattling of the wire mesh of the pen. 

I took another step closer. “Dad? Dad?” I cried out without 
thinking, without hearing myself, knowing he couldn’t hear. 

But I wanted him to be there. I wanted someone to be there 
with me. I didn’t want to be all alone out there in the back yard. 

I didn’t want to be staring at the hole that had been ripped in 
the side of the pen. I didn’t want to see the murdered deer lying 
so pitifully on its side. 

The five remaining deer huddled together at the other end of 
the pen. Their eyes were on me. Frightened eyes. 

The wind swept around me, hot and wet. But I felt cold all 
over. A cold shudder of terror ran down my body. I swallowed 
hard. Once. Twice. Trying to choke down the heavy lump in my 
throat. 

Then, before I even realized what I was doing, I began 
running to the house, screaming, “Dad! Mom! Dad! Mom!” at the 
top of my lungs. 

My cries rose on the gusting wind like the terrifying howls I’d 
heard just a few moments before. 


His pajama shirt flapping over the jeans he had pulled on, Dad 
dragged the dead deer to the back of the yard. Then, as I watched 
from the kitchen window, he patched the deer pen with a large 
sheet of box cardboard. 

As he tried to return to the house, the strong winds nearly 
blew the screen door off its hinges. Dad jerked the door shut, then 
locked it. 

His face was dripping with perspiration. He had mud down 
the side of one pajama sleeve. 

Mom poured him a glass of water from the sink, and he 
drank it down without taking a breath. Then he wiped the sweat 
from his forehead with a dish towel. 


“Pm afraid your dog is a killer,” he said softly to me. He 
tossed the towel back onto the counter. 

“Tt wasn’t Wolf!” I cried. “It wasn’t!” 

Dad didn’t reply. He took a deep breath, then let it out 
slowly. Mom and Emily watched silently from in front of the sink. 

“What makes you think it was Wolf?” I demanded. 

“T saw the prints on the ground,” he replied, frowning. “Paw 
prints.” 

“It wasn’t Wolf,” I insisted. 

“Pm going to have to take him to the pound in the morning,” 
Dad said. “The one over in the next county.” 

“But they’ll kill him!” I cried. 

“The dog is a killer,” Dad insisted softly. “I know how you 
feel, Grady. I know. But the dog is a killer.” 

“It wasn’t Wolf,” I cried. “Dad, I know it wasn’t Wolf. I heard 
the howls, Dad. It was a wolf.” 

“Grady, please—” he started wearily. 

Then the words just burst out of me. I lost all control of 
them. They just poured out in a flood. “It was a werewolf, Dad. 
There’s a werewolf in the swamp. Cassie is right. It wasn’t a dog, 
and it wasn’t a wolf. It’s a werewolf who’s been killing animals, 
who killed your deer.” 

“Grady, stop—” Dad pleaded impatiently. 

But I couldn’t stop. “I know I’m right, Dad,” I cried in a shrill 
voice that didn’t sound like me. 

“Tt’s been a full moon this week, right? And that’s when the 
howls began. It’s a werewolf, Dad. The swamp hermit. That crazy 
guy who lives in the shack in the swamp. He’s a werewolf. He 
told us he is. He chased us and he told us he’s a werewolf. He did 
it, Dad. Not Wolf. He killed the deer tonight. I heard him howling 
outside, and then—then—” 

My voice caught in my throat. I started to choke. 

Dad filled the glass with water and handed it to me. I gulped 
it down thirstily. 

He put a hand on my shoulder. “Grady, let’s talk about it in 
the morning, okay? We’re both too tired to think straight now. 
What do you say?” 

“Tt wasn’t Wolf!” I cried stubbornly. “I know it wasn’t.” 

“In the morning,” Dad repeated, his hand still on my 
shoulder. He held it there to comfort me, to steady me. 

I felt shaky. I was panting. My heart pounded. 

“Yeah. Okay,” I agreed finally. “In the morning.” 

I made my way slowly to my room, but I knew I wouldn’t 


sleep. 


The next morning, Dad was gone when I got up. “He went to the 
lumber yard,” Mom told me, “to get wire mesh to repair the pen.” 

I yawned and stretched. I had fallen into a restless sleep at 
about two-thirty. But I still felt tired and nervous. 

“Is Wolf out there?” I asked anxiously. I ran to the kitchen 
window before she could reply. 

I could see Wolf at the head of the driveway. He had a blue 
rubber ball between his front paws, and he was chewing at it 
furiously. 

“Bet he’s hungry for breakfast,” I muttered. 

I heard the crunch of gravel, and Dad’s car pulled up the 
drive. The trunk was opened partway, a roll of wire mesh bulging 
inside. 

“Morning,” Dad said as he came into the kitchen. His 
expression was grim. 

“Are you going to take Wolf?” I demanded immediately. My 
eyes were on the dog, chewing on the rubber ball outside. He 
looked so cute. 

“People in town are upset,” Dad replied, pouring himself a 
cup of coffee from the coffeemaker. “A lot of animals have been 
killed this week. And a guy who lives down the way, Ed Warner, 
has disappeared in the swamp. People are very worried. They’ve 
heard the howls, too.” 

“Are you taking Wolf away?” I repeated shrilly, my voice 
trembling. 

Dad nodded. His expression remained grim. He took a long 
sip of coffee. “Go look at the paw prints outside the pen, Grady,” 
he said, locking his eyes on mine. “Go ahead. Take a look.” 

“I don’t care about prints,” I moaned. “I just know—” 

“T can’t take any more chances,” Dad said. 

“T don’t care! He’s my dog!” I screamed. 

“Grady—” Dad set down the cup and started toward me. 

But I burst past him and ran to the door. Pushing open the 
screen door, I leapt off the back stoop. 

Wolf stood up as soon as he saw me. His tail started to wag. 
Leaving the blue rubber ball behind, he began loping toward me 
eagerly. 

Dad was right behind me. “I’m going to take the dog away 
now, Grady,” he said. “Do you want to come along?” 

“No!” I cried. 

“T have no choice,” Dad said, his voice just above a whisper. 


He stepped forward and reached for Wolf. 
“No!” I shouted. “No! Run, Wolf! Run!” 
I gave the dog a shove. Wolf turned to me uncertainly. 
“Run!” I screamed. “Run! Run!” 


26 


I gave Wolf another hard shove. “Run! Run, boy! Go!” 

Dad had his hands around Wolf’s shoulders, but he didn’t 
have a good grip. 

Wolf broke free and started to run toward the swamp. 

“Hey—!” Dad called angrily. He chased Wolf to the end of 
the back yard. But the big dog was too fast for him. 

I stood behind the house, breathing hard, and watched Wolf 
until he disappeared into the low trees at the edge of the swamp. 

Dad turned back toward me, an angry expression on his face. 
“That was dumb, Grady,” he muttered. 

I didn’t say anything. 

“Wolf will come back later,” Dad said. “When he does, I'll 
have to take him away.” 

“But, Dad—” I started. 

“No more discussion,” he said sternly. “As soon as the dog 
returns, I’m taking him to the pound.” 

“You can’t!” I screamed. 

“The dog is a killer, Grady. I have no choice.” Dad headed 
toward the car. “Come help me unload this wire mesh. Pll need 
your help getting the pen patched up.” 

I gazed toward the swamp as I followed Dad to the car. Don’t 
come back, Wolf, I pleaded silently. Please, don’t come back. 


All day long, I watched the swamp. I felt nervous, shaky. I had no 
appetite at all. After I helped Dad repair the deer pen, I stayed in 
my room. I tried to read a book, but the words were just a blur. 

By evening, Wolf hadn’t returned. 

You're safe, Wolf, I thought. At least for today. 

My whole family was tense. At dinner, we hardly spoke. 
Emily talked about the movie she had seen the night before, but 
no one joined in with any comments. 

I went to bed early. I was really tired. From tension, I guess. 
And from being up most of the night before. 

My room was darker than usual. It was the last night of the 
full moon, but heavy blankets of clouds covered the moonlight. 

I settled my head onto my pillow and tried to get to sleep. 
But I kept thinking about Wolf. 

The howls started a short while later. 


I crept out of bed and hurried to the window. I squinted out 
into the darkness. Heavy, black clouds still covered the moon. 
The air was still. Nothing moved. 

I heard a low growl, and Wolf came into focus. 

He was standing stiffly in the middle of the back yard, his 
head tilted up to the sky, uttering low growls. As I stared out the 
window at him, the big dog began to pace, back and forth from 
one side of the yard to the other. 

He’s pacing like a caged animal, I thought. Pacing and 
growling, as if something is really troubling him. 

Or scaring him. 

As he paced, he kept raising his head toward the full moon 
behind the clouds and growling. 

What is going on? I wondered. I had to find out. 

I got dressed quickly in the darkness, pulling on the jeans and 
T-shirt I had worn all day. 

I fumbled into my sneakers. At first I had the left one on the 
right foot. It was so dark in my room without the moonlight 
pouring in! 

As soon as my sneakers were tied, I hurried back to the 
window. Wolf was leaving the back yard, I saw. He was 
lumbering slowly in the direction of the swamp. 

I’m going to follow Wolf, I decided. I’m going to prove once 
and for all that he isn’t a killer—or a werewolf. 

I was afraid my parents might hear me if I went to the 
kitchen door. So I crawled out my window. 

The grass was wet from a heavy dew. The air was wet, too, 
and nearly as hot as during the day. My sneakers squeaked and 
slid on the damp grass as I hurried to follow Wolf. 

I stopped at the end of the back yard. Pd lost him. 

I could still hear him somewhere up ahead. I could hear the 
soft thud of his paws on the marshy ground. 

But it was too dark to see him. 

I followed the sound of his footsteps, gazing up at the 
shifting, shadowy clouds. 

I was nearly to the swamp when I heard footsteps behind me. 

With a gasp of fright, I stopped and listened hard. 

Yes. Footsteps. 

Moving rapidly toward me. 


27 


“Hey!” 

I let out a choked cry and spun around. 

At first, all I could see was blackness. “Hey—who’s there?” 
My voice came out in a hushed whisper. 

Will stepped out from the darkness. “Grady—it’s you!” he 
cried. He came closer. He was wearing a dark sweatshirt over 
black jeans. 

“Will—what are you doing out here?” I asked breathlessly. 

“T heard the howls,” he replied. “I decided to investigate.” 

“Me, too. I’m so glad to see you!” I exclaimed. “We can 
explore together.” 

“Pm glad to see you, too,” he said. “It was so dark, I—I didn’t 
know it was you. I thought—” 

“Pm following Wolf,” I told him. I led the way into the 
swamp. It grew even darker as we made our way under the low 
trees. 

As we walked, I told Will about the night before, about the 
murdered deer, the paw prints around the deer pen. I told him 
about how people in town were talking. And about how my dad 
planned to take Wolf away to the pound. 

“I know Wolf isn’t the killer,” I told him. “I just know it. But 
Cassie got me so scared with all her werewolf stories, and—” 

“Cassie is a jerk,” Will muttered. He pointed into the weeds. 
“Look—there’s Wolf!” 

I could see his black outline moving steadily through the 
heavy darkness. “I was so stupid. I should have brought a 
flashlight,” I murmured. 

Wolf disappeared behind the weeds. Will and I followed the 
sound of his footsteps. We walked for several minutes. Suddenly, I 
realized I could no longer hear the dog. 

“Where’s Wolf?” I whispered, my eyes searching the dark 
bushes and low trees. “I don’t want to lose him.” 

“He went this way,” Will called back to me. “Follow me.” 

Our sneakers slid over the damp, marshy ground. I slapped at 
a mosquito on the back of my neck. Too late. I could feel warm 
blood. 

Deeper into the swamp. Past the bog, eerily silent now. 

“Hey, Will?” 


I stopped—and searched. “Oh.” A soft cry escaped my lips as 
I realized I had lost him. 

Somehow we had gotten separated. 

I heard rustling up ahead. The crack of twigs. The whispering 
brush of weeds being stepped on and pushed out of the way. 

“Will? Is that you?” 

Or was it Wolf? 

“Will?” 

“Where are you?” 

Pale light suddenly washed over me, washed slowly over the 
ground. Glancing up, I saw the heavy clouds pull away. The 
yellow full moon hovered high in the sky. 

As the light slowly swept over the swamp, a low structure 
came into view straight ahead of me. 

At first, I couldn’t figure out what it was. Some kind of 
gigantic plant? 

No. 

As the moonlight shone down, I realized I was staring at the 
swamp hermit’s shack. 

I stopped, frozen in sudden fear. 

And then the howls began. 

The frightening sound tore through the heavy silence. A 
horrifying wail, so loud, so nearby, rose on the still air, rose and 
then fell. 

The sound was so terrifying, I raised my hands to cover my 
ears. 

The swamp hermit! I thought. He is a werewolf! 

I knew he was the werewolf. 

I’ve got to get away from here, I realized. I’ve got to get 
home. 

I turned away from the small shack. 

My legs were trembling so hard, I didn’t know if I could 
walk. 

Got to go! Got to go! Got to go! The words repeated in my 
mind. 

But before I could move, the werewolf burst out from behind 
a tree—and, howling its hideous howl, leapt onto my shoulders 
and shoved me to the ground. 


28 


As the yellow light of the full moon shone down, I gazed into the 
face of the werewolf as it pinned me to the ground. 

Its dark eyes glared out at me from a human face, a human 
face covered in wolf fur. It howled its rage, its animal snout 
opening wide to reveal two gleaming rows of wolf fangs. 

It’s a human wolf! I realized to my terror. A werewolf! 

“Get off!” I shrieked. “Will—get off me!” 

It was Will. The werewolf was Will. 

Even through the thick, matted wolf fur, I could recognize his 
dark features, his small, black eyes, his thick, stubby neck. 

“Will—!” I screamed. 

I struggled to push him away, to squirm out from under. 

But he was too powerful. I couldn’t move. 

“Will—get off!” 

He raised his fur-covered face to the moon and uttered an 
animal howl. Then, snarling out his rage, he lowered his beastly 
head and dug his fangs into my shoulder. 

I let out a shriek of pain. 

Blinding flashes of red filled my eyes. 

I thrust out my hands, kicked my legs—struggled blindly to 
free myself. 

But he had animal strength. He was much too strong for 
me... too strong... . 

The flashing red faded, turned to black. Everything was 
fading to black. I could feel myself sinking, sinking down a black 
tunnel, sinking forever into deep, deep, endlessly deep darkness. 


A loud growl brought me back. 

Bewildered, I gazed up to see Wolf leap onto Will. 

Will uttered a shrill howl of anger and turned to wrestle with 
the snarling dog. 

I watched in stunned disbelief as they scrabbled over the 
ground, biting and clawing, raging at each other, growling and 
grunting. 

“Will... Will, it was you... it was you all along....” I 
murmured, struggling to my feet. 

I gripped a tree trunk. The ground appeared to be sliding 
beneath me. 


The two creatures continued to battle, grunting and growling 
as they clawed at each other, wrestling over the wet ground. 

“I knew it wasn’t Wolf,” I muttered aloud. “I knew...” 

And then a deafening high-pitched shriek startled me, and I 
tumbled to my knees. 

I looked up in time to see Will running away, fleeing on all 
fours through the tall weeds. Wolf followed close behind, 
snapping at Will’s ankles, jumping on him, biting and clawing 
him as they ran. 

Then, I heard Will utter another cry of pain, a wail of defeat. 

As the anguished sound faded, I sank down, down, down into 
the blue-black darkness. 


29 


“You have a slight fever,” Mom said. “But you’ll be okay.” 

“Swamp fever,” I murmured weakly. I gazed up at her, trying 
to focus. Her face was blurred, hovering over me in the soft light. 

It took me a long while to realize I was in my own bedroom. 
“How—how did I get here?” I stammered. 

“The swamp hermit—he found you in the swamp and carried 
you home,” Mom said. 

“He did?” I tried to sit up, but my shoulder ached. To my 
surprise, it was tightly bandaged. “The—the werewolf—Will—he 
bit me,” I said, swallowing hard. 

Dad’s face, hovered beside Mom’s. “What are you saying, 
Grady? Why do you keep muttering about a werewolf?” 

I pulled myself up a little and told them the whole story. 
They listened in silence, glancing at each other from time to time 
as I talked. 

“Will is a werewolf,” I concluded. “He changed. Under the 
full moon. He changed into a wolf, and—” 

“Pm going to check this out right now,” Dad said, staring 
intently down at me. “Your story is crazy, Grady. Just crazy. 
Maybe it’s the fever. I don’t know. But I’m going right over to 
your friend’s house and see what’s what.” 

“Dad—be careful,” I called after him. “Be careful.” 


Dad returned a short while later, a bewildered look on his face. I 
was sitting in the living room, feeling a lot better, a big bowl of 
popcorn in my lap. 

“There’s no one there,” Dad said, scratching his head. 

“Huh? What do you mean?” Mom asked. 

“The house is empty,” Dad told us. “Deserted. It doesn’t look 
like anyone has lived there in months!” 

“Wow, Grady. You certainly have strange friends!” Emily 
exclaimed, rolling her eyes. 

“T don’t get it,” Dad said, shaking his head. 

I didn’t, either. But I didn’t care. Will was gone. The 
werewolf was gone for good. 

“So can I keep Wolf?” I asked Dad, climbing up from the 
chair and crossing the room to him. “Wolf saved my life. Can I 
keep him?” 


Dad stared back at me thoughtfully, but didn’t reply. 

“The swamp hermit told us he saw the dog chase some kind 
of animal away from Grady,” Mom said. 

“Probably a squirrel,” Emily joked. 

“Emily, give me a break,” I groaned. “Wolf really saved my 
life,” I told them. 

“T guess you can keep him,” Dad said reluctantly. 

“YAY!” I thanked him and eagerly made my way to the back 
yard to give Wolf a happy hug. 


That all happened nearly a month ago. 

Since then, Wolf and I have had a wonderful time exploring 
the swamp. I’ve gotten to know just about every inch of Fever 
Swamp. It’s like my second home. 

Sometimes Wolf and I let Cassie come along exploring with 
us. She’s kind of fun, even though she’s always on the lookout for 
werewolves. I really wish she’d just drop the subject. 

I’m standing at my bedroom window now, watching the full 
moon rising over the distant trees. This first full moon in a month 
makes me think of Will. 

Will may be gone, but he changed my life. I know Pll never 
forget him. 

I can feel the fur sprouting on my face. My snout is 
expanding, and my fangs are sliding out between my dark lips. 

Yes, when he bit me, Will passed the curse on to me. 

But I don’t mind. I’m not upset. 

I mean, with Will out of the way, the swamp is now mine! All 
mine! 

I’m climbing out of my window now. There’s Wolf waiting 
for me, eager to do some night exploring. 

I drop easily to the ground on all fours. I raise my fur- 
covered face to the moon and utter a long, joyful howl. 

Let’s go, Wolf. Let’s hurry to Fever Swamp. 

I’m ready to hunt. 


Scanning, formatting and basic 
proofing by Undead. 

Skip to main content
 
Texts
 
Video
 
Audio
 
Software
 
Images
My uploads
My loans
My favorites
My lists
My collections
My web archives
Account settings
Get help
Log out
 Search metadata
 Search text contents
 Search TV news captions
 Search radio transcripts
 Search archived web sites
Advanced Search
About Blog Projects Help Donate  Contact Jobs Volunteer People
Full text of "All 62 Goosebumps novels"
See other formats
A — aa Sa 
py] rn 7 Y | e 
| € SS NE 
_ ¡Mo ho A EEE SE 
A + y 
A - = y 
d f ~ Ad a EN ko, Á LD le < F Y 
Y f f y R 


S i ; eS y) 
] ) \ D A Y g EMA i ) 
y {> d y y NY | 3 Pr e o 3 \ ~ 
A d e Oe ee G Y | y os 
Set AAA. JESICA y N $ 
e. = PPP e e 


> 4 


A PAN ES, 


WHY I'M AFRAID OF BEES 


SCHOLASTIC 


WHY PM AFRAID 
OF BEES 


Goosebumps - 17 
R.L. Stine 
(An Undead Scan v1.5) 


If you’re afraid of bees, I have to warn you—there are a lot of bees in 
this story. In fact, there are hundreds. 

Up until last month, I was afraid of bees. And when you read this 
story, you'll see why. 

It all started in July when I heard a frightening buzz, the buzz of a 
bee. 

I sat up straight and searched all around. But I couldn’t see any 
bees anywhere. The scary buzzing sound just wouldn’t stop. In fact, it 
seemed to be getting louder. 

“It’s probably Andretti again,” I told myself. “Ruining my day, as 
usual.” 

Pd been reading a stack of comic books under the big maple tree 
in my back yard. Other kids might have better things to do on a hot, 
sticky summer afternoon—like maybe going to the pool with their 
friends. 

But not me. My name is Gary Lutz, and I have to be honest. I 
don’t have many real close friends. Even my nine-year-old sister, 
Krissy, doesn’t like me very much. My life is the pits. 

“Why is that?” I constantly ask myself. “What exactly is wrong 
with me? Why do all the kids call me names like Lutz the Klutz? Why 
does everybody always make fun of me?” 

Sometimes I think it might be because of the way I look. That 
morning, Pd spent a long time studying myself in the mirror. Pd stared 
at myself for at least half an hour. 

I saw a long, skinny face, a medium-sized nose, and straight blond 
hair. Not exactly handsome, but not terrible. 

Bzzzzzz. 

I can’t stand that sound! And it was coming even closer. 

I flopped over on my stomach. Then I peered around the side of 
the maple tree. I wanted to get a better view of my neighbor’s yard. 

Oh, no, I thought. I was right. The buzzing sound was coming 
from Mr. Andretti’s bees. My neighbor was at it again. He was always 
hanging out in the back by his garage, messing with those bees of his. 

How could he handle them every day without worrying about 
getting stung? I asked myself. Didn’t they give him the creeps? 

I climbed to my knees and edged a few inches forward. Even 
though I wanted to get a better look at Mr. Andretti, I didn’t want him 
to see me. 


The last time he caught me watching him, he made a big deal out 
of it. He acted as if there were some kind of law against sitting outside 
in your own back yard! 

“What’s this?” he bellowed at the top of his lungs. “Did someone 
start a neighborhood watch committee without informing me? Or is 
the FBI recruiting ten-year-old spies these days?” 

This last remark really steamed me, because Mr. Andretti knows 
perfectly well that I’m twelve years old. After all, my family has lived 
next door to him for my entire life. Which is bad luck for me. Mainly 
since I’m afraid of bees. 

I might as well confess it right away. Pm scared of a few other 
things, too, such as: dogs, big mean kids, the dark, loud noises, and 
swimming in the ocean. I’m even scared of Claus. That’s Krissy’s dumb 
cat. 

But, most of all, Pm scared of bees. Unfortunately, with a 
beekeeper for a neighbor, there are always bees around. Hairy, crawly, 
buzzing, stinging bees. 

“Meow!” 

I jumped up as Claus the cat came creeping up behind me. “Why 
do you have to stalk me like that?” I cried. 

As I spoke, Claus moved forward and wrapped himself around my 
leg. Then he dug his long, needle-sharp claws into my skin. 

“Ouch!” I screamed. “Get away from me!” I cannot understand 
how Krissy can love that creature so much. She says he only jumps on 
me because he “likes” me. Well, all I can say is that I don’t like him! 
And I wish he would keep away from me! 

When I finally managed to chase Claus away, I went back to 
studying my neighbor. Yes, I’m scared of bees. And I’m fascinated by 
them, too. 

I can’t seem to stop watching Mr. Andretti all the time. At least he 
keeps his hives in a screened-in area behind his garage. That makes 
me feel pretty safe. And he acts as if he knows what he’s doing. In 
fact, he acts as if he’s the world’s greatest living expert on bees! 

Today, Mr. Andretti was wearing his usual bee outfit. It’s a white 
suit, and a hat with a wire-screen veil hanging down to protect his 
face. His clothes are tied with string at the wrists and ankles. He looks 
just like some kind of alien creature out of a horror movie. 

As my neighbor carefully opened and closed the drawerlike 
sections of his hanging hives, I noticed he wasn’t wearing any gloves. 

Once, when I was with my dad, Mr. Andretti had explained this to 
us. “It’s like this, Lutz,” he said. Lutz is my father, Ken Lutz. Naturally, 
during this entire conversation, Mr. Andretti had acted as if I wasn’t 
even there. 


“Your average beekeepers usually wear gloves,” he explained. “A 
lot of the brave ones use gloves with no fingers and thumbs so they 
can work with the bees more easily.” 

Mr. Andretti thumped himself on the chest and went on. “But 
your truly outstanding beekeeper—such as myself—likes to work with 
his bare hands. My bees trust me. You know, Lutz, bees are really a lot 
smarter than most people realize.” 

Oh, sure, I said to myself at the time. If they’re really so smart, 
why do they keep coming back to your hive and letting you steal all 
their honey from them? 

Bzzzzzz. 

The humming from Mr. Andretti’s hives suddenly grew louder 
and more threatening. I stood up and walked over to the fence 
between our two back yards. I gazed into the screened-in area to see 
what was going on. 

Then I gasped out loud. 

Mr. Andretti’s white suit didn’t appear white anymore. It had 
become black! 

Why? Because he was totally covered with bees! 

As I stared, more and more of the insects oozed out of their hives. 
They crawled all over Mr. Andretti’s arms and chest, and even on his 
head. 

I was so grossed out, I thought I might puke! 

Mr. Andretti’s hat and veil shimmered and bulged as if they were 
alive! 

Wasn’t he scared of all those stingers? 

As I leaned over the fence, Andretti suddenly yelled at me: “Gary 
—look out!” 

I froze. “Huh?” 

“The bees!” Mr. Andretti screamed. “They’re out of control! Run!” 


I never ran so fast in my life! I charged across the yard and stumbled 
up the back steps of my house. 

I flung open the screen door and almost fell into the house. Then I 
stopped and leaned against the kitchen table, gasping for air. 

When I finally caught my breath, I listened hard. I could still hear 
the angry buzzing of the bees from the next yard. Then I heard 
something else. 

“Haw haw haw!” 

Somebody was laughing out there. And it sounded suspiciously 
like Mr. Andretti. 

Slowly, I turned around and peered out through the screen door. 
My neighbor was standing at the bottom of the back steps. He’d taken 
off his bee veil, and I could see that he had a huge grin on his face. 

“Haw haw! You should have seen the expression on your face, 
Gary. You never would believe how funny you looked! And the way 
you ran! 

I stared at him. “You mean your bees weren’t escaping?” 

Mr. Andretti slapped his knee. “Of course they weren’t! I have 
complete control of those bees at all times. They come and go, 
bringing nectar and pollen back from the flowers.” 

He paused to wipe some sweat off his forehead. “Of course, 
sometimes I have to go out and recapture a few lost bees with my net. 
But most of them know my hives are really the best home they can 
possibly have!” 

“So this was all a joke, Mr. Andretti?” I tried to sound angry. But 
that’s hard to do when your voice is shaking even harder than your 
knees! “It was supposed to be funny?” 

“I guess that'll teach you to get a life and stop staring at me all 
day!” he replied. Then he turned and walked away. 

I was so angry! What a mean trick! 

It was bad enough having kids my age pick on me all the time. 
But now the grown-ups were starting in! 

I pounded my fist on the kitchen table just as my mother walked 
into the room. “Hi, Gary,” she said, frowning. “Try not to destroy the 
furniture, okay? I was just about to make myself a sandwich. Would 
you like one?” 

“I guess so,” I muttered, sitting down at the table. 

“Would you like the usual?” 


I nodded. “The usual” was peanut butter and jelly, which I never 
get tired of. For a snack, I usually like taco chips, the spicier the 
better. As I waited for my sandwich, I ripped open a new bag of chips 
and started chewing away. 

“Uh-oh.” Mom was rummaging through the refrigerator. “I’m 
afraid we’re out of jelly. Guess we’ll have to use something else.” 

She pulled out a small glass jar. “How about this with your 
peanut butter?” 

“What is it?” I asked. 

“Honey.” 

“Honey!” I shrieked. “No way!” 


Later, I was feeling lonely. I wandered over to the school playground. 
As I walked by the swing set, I saw a bunch of kids I knew from 
school. 

They were standing around on the softball diamond, choosing up 
sides for a game. I joined them. Maybe, just maybe, they’d let me play. 

“Gail and I are captains,” a boy named Louie was saying. 

I walked over and stood at the edge of the group. I was just in 
time. 

One by one, Louie and Gail picked players for their teams. Every 
kid was chosen. Every kid except one, that is. I was left standing by 
myself next to home plate. 

As I slumped my shoulders and stared down at the ground, the 
captains starting fighting over me. “You take him, Gail,” Louie said. 

“No. You take him.” 

“No fair. I always get stuck with Lutz!” 

As the two captains argued over who was going to be stuck with 
me, I could feel my face getting redder and redder. I wanted to leave. 
But then they all would have said I was a quitter. 

Finally, Gail sighed and rolled her eyes. “Oh, all right,” she said. 
“We'll take him. But remember the special Lutz rule. He gets four 
strikes before he's out!” 

I swallowed hard and followed my teammates out onto the 
diamond. At that point, luck was with me. Gail sent me to the 
outfield. 

“Go way out in right, Lutz,” Gail ordered. “By the back fence. 
Nobody ever hits it out there.” 

Some kids might be angry about being stuck so far away from the 
action. But I was grateful. If no balls were hit to me, I wouldn't have a 
chance to drop them the way I always did. 

As I watched the game, my stomach slowly tied itself into a tight 
knot. I was last in the batting order. But when my turn at the plate 


finally came around, the bases were loaded. 

I picked up the bat and wandered out toward the plate. A groan 
rose up from my teammates. “Lutz is up?” somebody cried in disbelief. 

“Easy out!” yelled the girl playing first base. “No batter, no batter, 
no batter!” Everyone on the other team hooted and laughed. Out of 
the corner of my eye I saw Gail put her face in her hands. 

I ground my teeth together and started praying. Please let me get 
a walk. Please let me get a walk. I knew I could never hit the ball. So 
a walk was my one and only hope. 

Of course I struck out. 

Four straight strikes. 

“Lutz the Klutz!” I heard someone cry. Then a lot of kids laughed. 

Without looking back, I marched off the baseball diamond and 
away from the playground. I was heading home toward the peace and 
quiet of my own room. It might not be perfect, I thought. But at least 
at home no one teased me about being a klutz. 

“Hey, look, guys!” a voice shouted as I turned onto my street. 

“Hey—wow-— it’s Lutz the Klutz!” someone else answered. 

“Lookin’ good, dude!” 

I couldn’t believe my bad luck. The three voices belonged to the 
biggest, meanest, toughest creeps in the entire neighborhood—Barry, 
Marv, and Karl. They’re my age, but at least five times as big! 

These guys are gorillas! I mean, their knuckles drag on the 
sidewalk! 

And when they’re not swinging back and forth on a tire swing in 
their gorilla cage, what’s their favorite activity? 

You guessed it. Beating me up! 

“Give me a break, guys,” I pleaded. “I’m having a bad day.” 

They laughed. 

“You want a break, Lutz?” one of them shouted menacingly. 
“Here!” 

I only had time to blink as I watched a huge, mean-looking fist 
heading right for my nose. 


A long, painful ten minutes later, I walked through the back door of 
my house. Fortunately, my mom was somewhere upstairs. She didn’t 
see my bloody nose, scratched, bruised arms, and torn shirt. 

All I needed was for her to start fussing over me and threatening 
to call the other boys’ parents. If that happened, Barry, Marv, and Karl 
really would kill me the next time they saw me. 

As I crept up the stairs, Claus the cat came leaping out at me. 

“Yowl!” 

“Whoooooa!” I was so shocked, I almost fell back down the stairs. 
“Get away from me, you monster!” 

I pushed the cat away and hurried down the hall to the bathroom. 
I gazed into the mirror and almost heaved. I looked like road kill! 

I rinsed off my nose with ice-cold water. Then I cleaned off all the 
blood and staggered to my room. 

I took off my ripped-up T-shirt and hid it behind my bed. Then I 
put on a winter shirt with long sleeves. It would be hot, but it would 
hide my scratched arms. 

Downstairs in the kitchen, I found Mom and Krissy. Mom was 
getting out mixing bowls and eggs, and Krissy was tying a big apron 
around her waist. As usual, Claus was purring and wrapping himself 
around Krissy’s legs. Why did he act like such an innocent little kitten 
around her, and such a monster around me? 

“Hi, Gary,” my mom said to me. “You want to help us make 
peanut butter cookies?” 

“No, thanks,” I said. “But Pl lick the bowl for you later.” I walked 
over to the table and picked up the bag of taco chips I’d left there 
before. 

“Well, at least you can help by getting that new jar of peanut 
butter out of the cupboard and opening it for me,” Mom said. “This 
recipe calls for a lot of peanut butter.” 

“Sounds good,” I said. “Just so long as it doesn’t have any honey 
in it.” 

I opened the cupboard door and took out the peanut butter. I 
tried to twist off the cap. I twisted as hard as I could, but the top just 
wouldn’t move. I banged the jar on the countertop and tried again. 
Still no luck. 

“Do you have a wrench or something around, Mom?” I asked. 
“This thing just won’t budge.” 

“Maybe if you ran hot water on it,” my mother began. 


“Oh, puh-lease!” Krissy said with a snort. Wiping her hands on 
her apron, she crossed the room and grabbed the jar away from me. 

With two fingers, she twisted off the cap. 

Then she started laughing her head off. My mom started laughing, 
too. 

Can you believe it? My own mother was laughing at me! 

“I guess you forgot to eat your oat bran this morning,” Mom said. 

“Tm leaving,” I muttered to Mom and Krissy. “Forever.” 

The two of them were laughing together. I don’t think they even 
heard me. 

Totally miserable, I stepped out the front door and slammed it 
hard behind me. I decided to ride my bike around the block a few 
times. When I went around to the side of the house and got it out of 
the garage, I started to cheer up a little bit. 

My bike is really awesome. It’s a new, blue, twenty-one speed, 
and it’s real sleek and cool. My dad gave it to me for my twelfth 
birthday. 

I jumped on my bike and headed down the driveway. As I turned 
onto the street, I saw some girls walking down the sidewalk. Out of 
the corner of my eye, I recognized them. 

Wow! I thought. It’s Judy Donner and Kaitlyn Davis! 

Both Judy and Kaitlyn go to my school. They’re really pretty and 
very popular. 

To be honest, I’ve had a major crush on Judy since the fourth 
grade. And once, at the fifth-grade picnic, she actually smiled at me. 
At least, I think it was at me. 

So when I saw those girls walking down the street, I decided it 
was a good time to try to be really cool. 

I flipped my baseball cap around so the brim was at the back of 
my head. Then I folded my arms across my chest and started pedaling 
no-handed. 

As I passed them, I glanced over my shoulder and flashed my 
most glamorous smile at Judy and Kaitlyn. 

Before my beautiful smile faded, I felt a tug at my sneaker. I 
realized instantly that my shoelace was caught in the chain! 

A horrible grinding sound filled the air. The bike jerked and 
lurched from side to side—and I lost control! 

“Gary—!” I heard Judy shriek. “Gary—look out for that car!” 


CRAAAAAAACK. 

I didn’t see the lamppost until I hit it. 

As I toppled off my bike and shot sideways through the air, I 
heard the sound of metal crumpling, ripping, and shredding. 

I landed on my face in a deep, warm puddle of mud. 

I heard the car rumble past me. 

Slowly, I pulled my face out of the mud. 

Guess I didn’t look too cool, I thought bitterly. Maybe at least PI 
get a little sympathy. 

No way. 

I could hear Judy and Kaitlyn laughing behind me on the 
sidewalk. “Nice bike, Gary!” one of them called. They hurried away. 

I had never been so humiliated in all my life. If I could have, I 
would have put down roots in that mud puddle and turned myself into 
a tree. It might not be the most exciting life in the world. But at least 
no one laughs at a tree. 

I’m serious. At that moment, I would have happily traded lives 
with a tree. Or a bird. Or a bug. Or just about any other living object 
on the planet. 

With that sad thought, I decided to get myself up and out of there 
before anyone else came along. It took all my strength to peel my 
wrecked bicycle off the lamppost. Luckily, I didn’t have far to drag it. 

For the second time in the same afternoon, I crept into my house 
and up the stairs so I could get cleaned up before anyone saw me. 
Now, as I studied my reflection in the bathroom mirror, I saw there 
was no way I could hide all my cuts and scrapes from my mom. 

“Oh, who cares?” I moaned as I washed the mud off my face and 
hands. “Who cares if Mom sees them? I’ll be doing her a favor by 
giving her something else to laugh at. It’ll really make her day!” 

I went back into my room and changed into my last clean shirt. 
Then I glanced around, trying to find something to do. 

I decided to boot up my computer. Playing with my computer is 
one of the few things I really like. When I’m lost in the world of a 
computer game, sometimes I can actually forget I’m a total jerk named 
Gary Lutz. Nobody in a computer game ever calls me Lutz the Klutz. 

I turned on the computer and decided to have another try at the 
Planet Monstro Fantasy game I’d been stuck on for two days. Monstro is 
a really cool game. 


When you play it, you’re a character named The Warrior, and 
you’re trapped on the planet Monstro. You have to get yourself out of 
all kinds of scary situations. 

Before I started to play, I thought Pd check Computa Note, one of 
the electronic bulletin boards Im connected to on the computer. 

Pd left a message there on Monday, asking if anyone knew how to 
defeat the two-headed dragon that kept eating me on the thirteenth 
moon of Monstro. Sometimes other people in the country who are 
playing the same game will send each other hints. 

When I accessed Computa Note, I saw the following computer- 
game-related messages on the screen: 


To Arnold in Milwaukee: Have you tried rubbing smashed-up 
eucalyptus leaves all over yourself in the rain forest game? It’s an 
ecologically correct way of repelling the poisonous ants in EcoScare 
95. From Lisa in San Francisco 


To R from Sacramento: The only way to escape from the flood on your 
spaceship in SpaceQuest 20 is to inflate your suit and float away. From 
L in St. Louis 


To Gary in Millville: Try stabbing the dragon between the eyes. It 
worked for me. From Ted in Ithaca 


Oh, terrific, I thought. Pd been trying to stab the dragon between the 
eyes. But the creature always ate me before I could do it! What was 
“Ted in Ithaca” doing that I wasn’t? 

I decided to leave another electronic note, asking Ted to explain 
what he meant. But, as I started typing, I noticed another message at 
the very bottom of the computer screen. 

I read it. Then I read it again very carefully: 


TAKE A VACATION FROM YOURSELF. 
Change places with someone for a week! 


What could that mean? 

I pressed the Enter button so I could read what was next. I 
desperately wanted more information about the message. This is what 
I saw: 


TAKE A VACATION FROM YOURSELF. 
Change places with someone for a week! 


PERSON-TO-PERSON VACATIONS 
113 Roach Street, Suite 2-B 
or call 1-800-555-SWAP 


How could it possibly work? I asked myself. How could two people 
change lives without getting into all kinds of trouble? 

I had to admit it sounded totally crazy. 

Crazy, but interesting. 

I yawned and scratched the back of my head. 

“Ouch!” My hand grazed one of the painful bumps Pd gotten from 
Barry, Marv, and Karl. 

It really hurt. But the stab of pain helped me make up my mind. I 
was definitely ready for some changes in my life. 

“I don't want to spend the rest of my life getting beat up!” I told 
myself. “Or crashing into lampposts, either! Or being the last person 
chosen for the team!” 

I took out a piece of paper and copied the address from the 
screen. As I did, I realized it was only a few blocks from my school. I 
knew just where it was. I could stop by the Person-to-Person office the 
next day. 

I’m really going to check it out, I decided. 

Making up my mind like that improved my mood a lot. I was 
beginning to feel almost cheerful when I went back downstairs. But 
not for long. When my family sat down in the dining room for dinner, 
my father noticed my banged-up face. 

“Gary!” he exclaimed. “What in the world happened to you?” 

“Er,” I said. “I had a little accident on my bike.” I winced as I said 
the word “bike”. I was thinking about the mangled wreck in the 
corner of the garage. 

“I don't believe that for a minute,” Mom said. “I’m sure you've 


been fighting with those big kids in the neighborhood again. Why in 
the world can’t you children learn to settle your disagreements 
peacefully?” 

Krissy started laughing so hard, she almost choked on her tuna 
casserole. “Gary doesn’t have any disagreements with those guys, 
Mom!” she said. “They just like to beat him up!” 

My mother shook her head angrily. “Well, I think that’s just 
outrageous!” she said. “I have a good mind to call those boys’ parents 
up right now and give them a piece of my mind!” 

I groaned loudly. “I’m telling you, Mom, I really had an accident 
with my bike. If you don’t believe me, go check it out in the garage.” 

Then my father did believe me. He started lecturing me about 
bike safety and why I should have been wearing my helmet and how I 
was going to have to pay to have the bike fixed with my own money. 

After a while, I stopped paying much attention. As I pushed my 
casserole around on my plate, all I could think about was my plan for 
changing my life with Person-to-Person Vacations. 

The sooner the better, I thought. The sooner I get out of this life, 
the better off I’ll be. 

We finished dinner, and I went upstairs to play on my computer 
again. I spent the rest of the evening with my Planet Monstro game. 

I kept trying to stab the dragon between the eyes. But even 
though I followed Ted from Ithaca’s advice, I couldn’t do it. The 
dragon ate me twenty-three times. 

Finally, I gave up and crawled into bed. I was so wiped out, I 
started drifting off to sleep almost right away. I turned over and 
pulled the blanket up under my chin. I curled up into a ball. The toes 
on my right foot touched something. 

“Huh?” I said out loud. “What is that down there?” 

My heart pounded in my chest. 

Slowly, I moved my toes again. 

“Ohhhhhh.” My blood turned into ice. 

I jumped out of bed and let out a bloodcurdling scream. 


Frantically, I ripped the blankets off my bed. In the dim light coming 
in through the window, I could see the rat—fat and hairy, its red eyes 
gleaming at me. 

I screamed again. 

Then I heard laughter down the hall. Krissy’s laughter. 

My stomach sank. I made my way to the switch and turned on the 
light. 

Sure enough. The rat still stared at me from my bed. But now I 
recognized it. A gray rubber rat. One of Claus’ favorite toys. 

In her room down the hall, Krissy squealed with laughter. 

‘Tm going to get you, you little brat!” I screamed. I thought about 
going down the hall and really thumping her. But I quickly decided 
against it. 

Even though Krissy is only nine, she happens to be pretty strong. 
There was an excellent chance she could beat me up. 

With an angry growl, I grabbed the rat off my bed and heaved it 
into the corner of my room. Then, my heart still pounding with rage, I 
turned off the light and climbed back under the covers. 

“Tomorrow,” I promised myself in the dark room. “Tomorrow, 
you, Gary Lutz, are going to check out that ad and find out if you can 
change your life. Even if it’s only for a week, it has to be better than 
this miserable life you have now!” 


The next day I kept my promise to myself. After breakfast, I walked 
the six blocks to Roach Street and started reading the street numbers, 
trying to find number 113. 

I guess I was looking for some kind of big, glass office building. 
But when I finally found number 113, it was on a small, gray building 
that looked something like my dentist’s office. A little sign on the 
outside read: 


PERSON-TO-PERSON VACATIONS, 
Suite 2-B 


I opened the door and walked up a flight of steps. At the top, I opened 
another door and went into a kind of waiting room with beige 
carpeting and tan leather chairs. 

A dark-haired woman sat behind a big glass window. She smiled 
at me when I came in, and I walked over to talk to her. 


“Good afternoon,” she said into a microphone. 

I jumped. Even though the woman was right in front of me, her 
voice came out through a speaker on the wall. 

“Uh... um,” I stammered nervously. “I came about the message on 
the electronic bulletin board?” 

“Oh, yes,” the woman replied with another smile. “A lot of people 
learn about us from their computers. Pardon me for staying behind 
this glass shield. But the equipment behind me is so delicate, we have 
to be very careful about protecting it.” 

I peered over the woman’s shoulder. I could see gleaming metal 
counters and a wall of electronic equipment, including what appeared 
to be heart monitors, video screens, X-ray machines, and cameras. It 
looked like something right out of Star Trek! 

I suddenly had a heavy feeling in my stomach. Maybe this is a 
bad idea, I thought. “Y-you probably don’t like kids hanging around in 
here,” I stammered. I started backing away toward the door. 

“Not true,” she said. “Many of our customers are young people 
such as you. A lot of kids are interested in changing places with 
someone else for a week. What did you say your name was?” 

“Gary. Gary Lutz.” 

“Nice to meet you, Gary. My name is Ms. Karmen. How old are 
you. About twelve?” 

I nodded. 

“Come over here for a minute,” Ms. Karmen said, motioning with 
her hand. 

Cautiously, I walked back over to the glass booth. She opened a 
little slot at the bottom of her window and pushed out a book. I 
picked it up and saw that it was a photo album, like the one my 
parents have from their wedding. 

I opened it and started looking through it. “It’s kids!” I exclaimed. 
“All about my age.” 

“Correct,” said Ms. Karmen. “They’re all interested in switching 
lives with someone else for a week.” 

“Wow.” I studied the album. 

A lot of the kids in the pictures looked big and strong. And cool. 
Kids like that wouldn’t be afraid of anything, I told myself. I wondered 
what it would be like to be one of them. 

“You can pick a boy—or even a girl, for that matter—to trade 
places with for a week,” Ms. Karmen was saying. 

“But how does it work?” I asked. “Do I just go take over 
somebody’s room and live in his house for a week? Go to his school? 
Wear his clothes?” 

The woman laughed. “It’s far more interesting than that, Gary. 


With our getaway vacations, you actually become the other person for 
a week.” 

“Huh?” 

“What we have,” the woman explained, “is a safe, painless way to 
switch one person’s mind into another person's body. So, while you'll 
know you're really you, no one else will recognize you. Not even the 
other boy’s parents!” 

I was still confused. “But... what about my body? Does it get 
stored here?” 

“No, no. We here at Person-to-Person will find someone else to 
take over your body for the week. Your parents will never even know 
you're gone!” 

I looked down at my skinny body and wondered who could 
possibly want to borrow it for a week. Ms. Karmen leaned forward in 
her chair. “So what do you say? Are you interested, Gary?” 

I stared into her dark brown eyes and swallowed hard. I broke 
into a cold sweat. This whole thing was really weird—and scary! “Uh,” 
I said. “I don’t know. I mean I’m just not sure.” 

“Don’t feel bad,” Ms. Karmen said. “Many people take some time 
to get used to the idea of a body switch. You can think it over for as 
long as you wish.” 

She took out a small camera. “But in the meantime, would you 
mind if I took your picture? That way, we can find out if anyone is 
interested in being in your body for a week.” 

“Well, I guess it’s okay,” I replied. 

She snapped the picture, and the flash went off in front of my 
eyes. “But I’m still not sure I want to go through with it.” 

“There’s no obligation,” Ms. Karmen said. “Why don’t we leave it 
this way? You fill out a form describing yourself. Then Pll put your 
picture into our display album. And, when we find someone to take 
your place, I’ll call you to see if you've made up your mind.” 

“Okay,” I replied. What harm could that do? I asked myself. There 
was no way she would ever find anybody who’d want my body for a 
week! 

I spent a few minutes filling out the form. I had to write down my 
name and address. Then I had to tell all about my hobbies, and how 
well I did in school, and things like that. When I was finished, I 
handed it to Ms. Karmen, said good-bye, and headed out the door. 

I made it most of the way home without getting into trouble. A 
block and a half from my house, I ran into my three most unfavorite 
people in the world—Barry, Marv, and Karl. 

“Hey, guys!” Barry cried with an ugly smile. “The Klutz is up and 
walking around. That must mean we didn’t do a very good job of 


pounding him yesterday.” 

“No,” I insisted. “You did a good job. You did a very good job, 
guys!” 

I guess they didn’t believe me. They all jumped me at once. 

When they were finally finished—about five minutes later—I lay 
on the ground and watched them walk away through one swollen 
black eye. 

“Have a nice day!” Marv called back to me. All three of them 
roared with laughter. 

I sat up and pounded the ground with my fist. 

“I'm sick of this!” I wailed. “I want to be somebody else—anybody 
else!” 

Slowly and painfully, I dragged myself to my feet. “I’m doing it,” I 
decided. “And nobody’s going to stop me. Tomorrow I’m going to call 
Person-to-Person Vacations. I want them to put me into somebody 
else’s body. As soon as they can!” 


I spent the next few days changing my Band-Aids and hoping the 
woman from Person-to-Person Vacations would call me. 

At first, I ran to answer the phone every time it rang. But of 
course it was never for me. Usually, it was one of Krissy’s dumb 
friends, wanting to giggle and gossip. 

One afternoon, I was reading a science-fiction book in my usual 
spot behind the big maple tree. I heard a sound, and peered around 
from behind the tree. 

Sure enough, there was Mr. Andretti walking across the lawn. He 
was dressed in his beekeeping outfit. As I watched, Mr. Andretti went 
to the screened-in area off the garage and started opening up the little 
doors to his beehives. 

Bzzzzzz. 

I covered my ears, but I couldn’t shut out the loud, droning hum. 
How I hated that sound! It was just so frightening. 

I shivered and decided it was time to go back inside. 

As I climbed to my feet, a bullet-sized object shot right by my 
nose. A bee! 

Were the bees escaping for real this time? 

I gasped and stared over at Andretti’s house. Then I almost 
choked. There was a big hole in the screen around the beekeeping 
area. 

A lot of bees were flying out! 

“Ow!” I cried out as a bee landed on the side of my head and 
buzzed loudly into my ear. 

Frantically, I batted it away. Then I ran toward the house. For one 
wild moment, I thought about calling the police or maybe the 
paramedics. 

But, as I slammed the back door, I heard an all-too-familiar 
sound. “Haw haw haw!” 

Once again, Mr. Andretti was laughing at me. 

I pounded my fist into my other hand. Oh, how I’d like to sock 
that guy in the nose! I thought. 

I was interrupted by the sound of the phone ringing. 

“Give me a break!” I cried as I stomped off to answer it. “Don’t 
Krissy’s moron friends have anything better to do than talk on the 
phone all day long?” 

“Whaddya want?” I snarled into the mouthpiece. 


“Is this Gary?” a woman’s voice asked. “Gary Lutz?” 

“Uh... yes,” I answered in surprise. “I’m Gary.” 

“Hi, Gary. This is Ms. Karmen. From Person-to-Person Vacations? 
Remember me?” 

My heart started thumping in my chest. “Yes. I remember,” I 
answered. 

“Well, if you’re still interested, we’ve found a match for you!” 

“A match?” 

“Correct,” said Ms. Karmen. “We’ve found a boy who wants to 
switch bodies with you for a week. Are you interested?” 

I hesitated for a few seconds. But, then, as I gazed out the back 
door of the kitchen, I saw a big, fat bee throwing itself against the 
outside of our screen door. “Haw haw!” Mr. Andretti’s scornful 
laughter boomed across the back yard. 

My mouth tightened into a thin line. “Yes,” I said firmly. “I’m 
really interested. When can we make the switch?” 

“Why, we could do it now,” said Ms. Karmen. “If that’s all right 
with you.” 

My pulse raced as I thought. My parents were both out for the 
afternoon, and Krissy was playing at a friend’s house. The timing was 
perfect. I’d never get another chance like this! 

“Now is great!” I exclaimed. 

“Terrific, Gary. It will take me about twenty minutes to get to 
your house.” 

“PIL be waiting.” 


The next twenty minutes seemed to take forever. While I waited, I 
paced back and forth in the living room, wondering what my new 
body would be like. 

What would my new parents be like? My house? My clothes? 
Would I actually have some friends this time around? 

By the time Ms. Karmen arrived, I was a wreck. When the 
doorbell rang, my hand was sweating so much, I could barely turn the 
doorknob to let her in. 

“Let’s go in the kitchen,” Ms. Karmen suggested. “I like to set up 
my equipment on a table.” She opened a small case and took out some 
black boxes with monitors on them. 

I showed her the way to the kitchen. “So who’s this kid who 
wants to switch places with me?” I asked. 

“His name is Dirk Davis.” 

Dirk Davis! I thought excitedly. Even his name sounded cool. 
“What does he look like?” 

Ms. Karmen opened up a white photo album. “Here’s his picture,” 


she said, passing it to me. 

I looked down at a picture of a tall, athletic-looking blond boy in 
black Lycra bike shorts and a blue muscle shirt. I blinked in surprise. 

“He looks like a surfer or something!” I cried. “Why in the world 
does he want to switch bodies with me? Is this some kind of trick?” 

Ms. Karmen smiled. “Well, to be honest, it’s not exactly your body 
he’s interested in, Gary. He wants your mind. You see, Dirk needs 
someone who is good in math. He has some very hard math tests 
coming up in summer school. He wants you to take them for him.” 

“Oh,” I said. I felt relieved. “Well, I usually do pretty well on 
math tests.” 

“We know that, Gary. Person-to-Person does its homework. You’re 
very good at math. Dirk’s good at skateboarding.” 

I sat down at the table. 

Bzzzzzz. 

A bee buzzed right under my nose. “Hey!” I yelled, jumping back 
up. “How’d that bee get in here?” 

Ms. Karmen glanced up from her equipment. “Your back door is 
open just a bit. Now please sit down and try to relax. I need to fasten 
this strap around your wrist.” 

With a nervous glance at the back door, I sat back down. Ms. 
Karmen strapped a black band around my wrist. Then she started 
fiddling with some wires attached to one of her machines. 

Bzzzzzz. 

Another bee flew in front of me, and I wiggled around in my 
chair. 

“Please sit still, Gary. Otherwise the equipment won’t work.” 

“Who can sit still with all these bees buzzing around in here?” I 
asked. I lowered my eyes and saw three fat bees walking across the 
table. 

Bzzzzzz. 

Another bee flew past my right eye. 

“What’s up with these bees?” I was starting to panic. 

“Don’t pay any attention to them,” Ms. Karmen said, “and they 
won't bother you.” She made one more adjustment to her machine. 
“Besides, Dirk Davis isn’t afraid of bees. And, as soon as I flip this 
switch, you won’t be, either!” 

“But...!” 

ZZAAAAPPPP! 

A blinding white light flashed in front of my eyes. 

I tried to cry out. 

But my breath caught in my throat. 


The light grew brighter, brighter. 
And then I sank into a deep pool of blackness. 


Something was wrong. 

Colors returned. But they were a total blur. 

I struggled to make everything come clear. But I couldn’t seem to 
focus on anything. 

My new body didn’t feel right, either. I was lying on my back, and 
I felt light as a feather, light enough to float away. 

Could this be Dirk Davis’ tall, muscular body? It certainly didn’t 
feel like it! 

Was this some kind of trick? I asked myself. Was the picture of 
Dirk Davis a phony? Was he really a lot smaller than he looked in the 
photo album? 

I reached out one of my hands and tried to touch my stomach. 
But my hand felt really weird, too. It was small, and my arm seemed 
to be bending in several places at once! 

What’s going on? I wondered, trembling with fright. 

Why do I feel so weird? 

“Whooooa!” I cried out as I finally managed to touch my body. 
“Yuck.” My skin was soft. And it was covered with a fine layer of fuzz. 

“Help! Ms. Karmen! Help! Something’s wrong!” I tried to shout. 

But there was something wrong with my voice. It came out all 
tiny and squeaky. Little mouse squeaks. 

I rolled over onto my stomach and tried to get up. I spread my 
arms to balance myself. 

I gasped as I realized my feet weren’t even touching the ground! 

I was flying! 

“What’s happening to me?” I cried in my squeaky little voice. I 
floated forward and crashed into a kitchen cupboard. 

“Ow! Help me!” 

I moved my strange new arms and realized I had some control 
over which way I flew. I felt some weird muscles in my back going 
into action. Testing my new muscles, I flew over to the kitchen 
window. 

Exhausted, I landed on the sill. I turned my head to one side. 
Then I gasped in fright. 

A hideous monster was reflected in the window glass! 

The creature had two huge glaring eyes. And it was staring right 
at me. 

I tried to scream. But I was too terrified to utter a sound. 


I—I have to get away! I decided. 

I moved my feet and started to run. The monster in the glass ran, 
too. 

I stopped and stared at the window glass. The monster stopped 
and stared back at me. 

“Oh, no! Please—no!” I cried. “Please don’t let it be true!” I 
reached up and tried to cover my eyes. The creature in the window 
did the same thing. 

And suddenly I knew the hideous truth. The monster in the mirror 
—it was me. 

Ms. Karmen had messed up. Totally. 

And now I was trapped inside the body of a bee! 


I don’t know how long I stood there. 

I couldn’t stop staring at my reflection. 

I kept waiting to come out of this nightmare. I kept waiting to 
blink my eyes and find myself in Dirk Davis’ big, muscular body. 

But I didn’t look at all like Dirk Davis. 

I had two giant eyes—one on either side of my head—and two 
skinny little antennas sticking out of my forehead. 

My mouth was truly disgusting. I had some kind of long tongue, 
which I soon discovered I could move all around and make longer and 
shorter if I wanted. Which I didn’t. 

My body was covered with thick, black hair. I had three legs on 
either side of my body. And let’s not forget the wings sticking out of 
my shoulders! 

“This is the pits!” I cried. “Pm a bug! Pm a disgusting, hairy bug! 
Ms. Karmen—something went wrong! Help me!” 

Creeeeak. 

Slam! 

What was that? 

Oh, no! I realized that Ms. Karmen had just gone out the kitchen 
door. 

“No—wait! Wait!” I squeaked. She was my only hope! 

I had to catch her. I had to tell her what had happened! 

“Ms. Karmen!” I squeaked. “Ms. Karmen!” 

Frantically, I flew out of the kitchen into the living room. Out the 
window, I could see her car still parked out in front of the house. 

But the front door to the outside was shut. And bees can’t open 
doors. I was trapped inside my own house! 

The back door! I remembered. Ms. Karmen had said it was open 
just a bit. 

Yes! That was how all those bees got into the house in the first 
place! 

I fluttered my new wings and flew back into the kitchen. As I 
soared, I realized I was getting more and more control over my flight 
pattern. 

But I didn’t care about that right now. All I knew was that I had 
to get to Ms. Karmen before she drove away. 

I darted out the tiny opening in the back door. “Ms. Karmen!” I 
shouted as I flew around the side of the house. “Ms. Karmen! Help me! 


You messed up! I’m a bee! Help me!” 

My voice was so tiny, she couldn’t hear me. She opened her car 
door and started to climb behind the wheel. My only chance for a 
normal life was about to drive away! 

What could I do? How could I get her attention? 

Thinking quickly, I flew right toward her head. “Ms. Karmen!” I 
shouted in her ear. “It’s me. Gary!” 

Ms. Karmen uttered a startled cry. Then she drew back her hand 
and swatted me. Hard. 

“Ow!” My entire body vibrated with pain. The force of her swat 
sent me falling to the street. I hit the pavement with a painful splat. 

I shook my head, trying to clear my eyes. That’s when I realized I 
had an extra set of tiny eyes arranged in a kind of triangle on the top 
of my head. I used them to gaze straight up. 

And then I screamed in terror. 

I saw the tire rolling toward me. 

Ms. Karmen was about to drive right over me. I was about to be 
squashed like the bug that I was! 


10 


“Oh!” I froze in panic. 

Even with my blurred bee vision, I could see the deep treads in 
the tire as it rolled steadily toward me. 

Closer. Closer. 

I have to move! I told myself. 

Fly away! Fly away! 

But in my panic, I forgot how to use my new muscles. 

I—I’m going to be squashed! I realized. 

I uttered a final, weak cry. 

And the car stopped. 

“Huh?” My entire body was trembling. But somehow I managed 
to pull myself up. Up into the air. 

Yes. I was flying now. 

I could see Ms. Karmen inside the car. She was fastening her seat 
belt. She had stopped the car to put on her seat belt! 

“Hey, seat belts really do save lives!” I told myself. 

I called out to her. But of course she couldn’t hear me. I watched 
the car roll away until it was a blur of color. 

Then, exhausted and terrified, I buzzed over to a nearby lilac 
bush and dropped onto a leaf. “That was too close!” I told myself, in 
between gasps for air. “I’m going to get killed out here!” 

A green caterpillar inched its way up onto a nearby stem and 
started chewing noisily on the leaf I was resting on. I’d never really 
examined a caterpillar before. Up close, they’re real ugly. They look a 
little bit like dragons. Only scarier. 

“Keep away from me!” I yelled in my tiny voice. The caterpillar 
didn’t even turn its head. Maybe it didn’t hear me. 

I forgot all about the caterpillar when I heard footsteps coming up 
the front walk. I turned my head and used my sideways eye to see 
who it was. 

“Mom!” I screamed. “Mom! Over here!” 

She couldn’t hear me. She hurried up the steps and into the 
house. 

Suddenly, I was overcome by a wave of sadness. My own mother 
didn’t recognize me! 

Desperately, I fluttered my wings and flew away from the leaf. I 
made my way to the front of the house, and started buzzing around 
the front windows. 


I had my wings under complete control by now. But the scene I 
saw inside the house was enough to make me fall down onto the 
ground again. 

My mother stood in the living room talking to me! Or at least, 
that’s what she thought. Only I knew it couldn’t be me. I was stuck 
outside. But who was in there with my mom? Had Dirk Davis 
managed to get inside my body? 

I landed on the ledge and stared into the house. My mom was 
talking. The boy was nodding and laughing. He said something to her. 
If I stared closely, I could read his lips. 

“Hey, did you buy taco chips? I’m really starving, Mom.” 

That had to be Dirk talking inside my body. 

My mom smiled at him and patted him on the arm. I read his lips 
and saw that he was calling her “Mom” again. How could he do that? 
How could he call my mother “Mom”? 

If bees could cry—which I now know they can’t—I would have 
started bawling right then and there. Who did that boy think he was? 
For that matter, what kind of mom did I have, who couldn’t even tell 
that a total stranger was living inside her son’s body? 

As I watched “myself” and my mom chatting in the living room, I 
totally lost it. Like a crazed maniac, I started bashing my insect body 
into the window. 

“Buzz!” I cried. “Buzz! Buzz! Buzz! It’s me, Gary. Look out here! 
Help me!” 

Again and again, I smashed myself up against the glass. But no 
one inside the house noticed. 

After a few minutes, Mom brought the new me a bag of taco 
chips. I watched “Gary” rip the bag open and take out a handful of 
chips. Crumbs fell on the living room carpet as he crunched the spicy 
chips. 

I realized I was starving. 

But what do bees eat? I asked myself. Desperately, I tried to 
remember everything I’d ever read about the creatures. 

I thought of the hungry caterpillar, crunching away on the leaf. 
But I was almost positive bees didn’t eat leaves. 

But what did they eat? Other bugs? Ugh! The thought made me 
shudder. I’d die before I’d eat a bug! 

I buzzed around the yard, hoping to see something—anything—I 
could use for food. As I flew, I found that I was getting used to my 
strange new vision and learning how to work my different sets of eyes. 

I remembered something I’d once read in an old picture book 
called The Big Book of Bees. It said that bee eyes each have thousands 
of tiny lenses crowded together. But, because they don’t have pupils, 


they can’t really focus their eyes. 

Interesting, I thought. But not very helpful. If I could remember 
about bees’ eyesight, why couldn’t I remember what they ate? 

I settled onto another bush to think. And suddenly, I became 
aware of a wonderful odor nearby. I turned my head and saw a 
beautiful yellow flower. 

Then I remembered something else Pd read. “Pollen,” I said out 
loud. “Bees eat pollen. And they get it from flowers!” 

Excitedly, I flew up into the air and started hovering over the 
yellow blossom. I tried to open my mouth—before I remembered I 
didn’t have that kind of mouth anymore! 

Instead, I had my long, weird tongue. But how was I supposed to 
use it to get the stuff out of the flower? 

I didn’t have a clue! 

As I hummed around in the air, I realized I was becoming more 
and more exhausted. If I didn’t get something to eat soon, I was going 
to faint. 

I started to feel dizzy. I hardly knew where I was. 

I became more and more confused. My brain got so fuzzy, I even 
began to wonder if I’d ever actually been a boy at all. Maybe Pd really 
been a bee for my entire life, and I’d just dreamed about being a boy. 

Slam! 

Somebody closed a car door nearby, and I was startled out of my 
mental fog. I swiveled my head to look. 

Dad! 

He was closing the garage door. Now he was walking across the 
driveway and heading toward the back door of the house. 

“Dad!” I screamed. “Dad. It’s me. Gary! Help me!” 

“Hi, Gary,” Dad said. 


11 


“Dad! You can hear me!” I cried joyfully. “Dad—you’ve got to help 
me!” 

My heart sank when Dad walked right past me and started talking 
to the fake Gary. 

Desperately, I started buzzing round and round their heads. 

“Looks like Andretti’s lost one of his workers,” my dad laughed. 
He swatted at me with his rolled-up newspaper. 

A near miss. I darted away. 

“Uh, right,” the fake Gary laughed, pretending he knew what Dad 
was talking about. “Andretti.” 

“Let’s help get dinner on,” my dad said. He put a friendly hand on 
my former shoulder. “Okay, son?” 

“Sure thing, Dad.” 

Like best pals, my dad and his phony son crossed the lawn and 
opened the screen door. 

“Wait!” I shouted. “Wait!” 

Like a space rocket, I shot through the air after them. If I really 
put the speed on, I thought I could make it through the door before it 
closed. Fast, faster, and... 

BLAM! 

The screen door banged shut, right on top of my tiny bee body. 
Once again, I sank into a deep pool of blackness. 

“Ohhhhhh. Where am I? What happened? Am I still a bee?” 

Dazed, I fought my way back to the real world. When I was able 
to get my eyes open, I realized I was still a bee—a small, frail, slightly 
damaged bee—who’d just narrowly missed being scrunched by a 
screen door. 

Now I was lying on my back on the grass in our yard. My six legs 
were thrashing the air. 

“I was a klutz as a human—and I’m a klutz as a bee!” I wailed. I 
tried to flip myself over. “I’ve only been a bee for an hour, and I’ve 
almost been killed. Twice!” 

I suddenly knew what I had to do. I had to get to Ms. Karmen’s 
office and tell her what had happened. 

I didn’t know if I could do it. But I knew I had to try. 

I let out a small grunt, and with a huge effort, flipped over onto 
my stomach. Using all five of my eyes, I checked myself out. Both sets 
of wings seemed to be working. And all my six legs were still there. 


“Okay,” I told myself. “You can do it. Just fly to the Person-to- 
Person office and go inside.” 

I flapped my wings and started to take off into the air. But I’d 
only risen about an inch up off the ground when I heard a sound that 
made my blood run cold. 

It was Claus the cat. With his long, sharp claws extended, he 
leaped through the air. 

I let out a squeal as he pounced on me, grabbed me in one paw, 
and began to tighten his claws around my body. 


12 


As the cat’s claws closed around me, I saw his hideous mouth gape 
open. 

Sting him! Sting him! 

The thought burned into my mind. 

But something held me back. Something told me not to use my 
stinger. 

I suddenly remembered something else Pd read in The Big Book of 
Bees. Honeybees die once they use their stingers! 

No way! I thought. 

I was still hoping to come out of this alive. And back in my old 
body. 

So, if using my stinger was out, Pd have to use my wits instead. 

With a loud gnashing of his teeth, Claus snapped his huge mouth 
shut. He lowered his head, preparing to snap up his furry prize—me. 

At just the right moment, I burst out of his claws and ducked out 
from under his gnashing teeth. 

I tried to shoot off through the air. But the cat whipped out his 
paw and batted me down. 

Claus was playing with me as if I were one of the chewed-up 
catnip mouse toys Krissy always gives him for Christmas. 

With my last burst of strength, I spread my wings, shot up 
through the air, and flew as fast as I could. A backwards look out of 
one of my eyes told me that I’d left the surprised cat sitting in the 
grass. 

For one second, I experienced a wonderful sensation of triumph. 
“You did it, Gary!” I crowed to myself. “You, a tiny little bee, 
managed to fight off a great big vicious cat!” 

I was so pleased with myself, I decided to take a little victory lap. 
I spread my wings out wide and began a big, slow circle in the air. 

Whap! 

Oh, no! Now what? 

Pd crashed right into something! But what was it? It wasn’t hard, 
like a wall or a tree. Instead, it was soft and clinging, like cloth. And 
my feet were all tangled up in it. 

I struggled to squirm free. I wiggled and pushed. But my legs 
were caught. 

I was trapped. 

“Haw haw haw!” 


The booming laughter made my entire body shake. 

I suddenly realized where I was. 

I was caught in Andretti’s net. 

A wave of despair made me slump against the white netting. 
I knew exactly what would happen next. 

He would put me in his hives—and I would never get away. 


13 


“Time to go back home now, my little buzzing babies,” Mr. Andretti 
sang. “Time to get back to work, my honeys.” He started to laugh at 
his stupid pun. “My honeys! Haw haw! Oh, my, wasn’t that a good 
one?” 

Bzzzzz. B2222222. 

From the loud humming sounds in my ears, I knew I wasn’t the 
only bee Andretti had caught in his net. In fact, out of my right eye, I 
could see another bee who looked just like me. He loomed right in 
front of me, and wiggled his antennas in my face. 

Whooa! What a monster! 

My wiry legs began trembling with fright. I twisted myself around 
and around, struggling to get away from him. 

I finally got myself turned the other way. But then I saw I was 
facing another bee. And another. Each one looked scarier than the 
last. 

They all had big, bulging eyes and creepy antennas! And they all 
buzzed menacingly at me. 

The frightening hum grew louder and louder as Mr. Andretti 
caught more bees in the net. Suddenly, the net began to shake. Up and 
down, up and down—like a violent earthquake—until I couldn't even 
think straight! 

As the net shook, I lost my footing and fell into a big, squirming 
cluster of bees at the bottom of the net. 

Whooooa! I stumbled over the pile of wriggling, hairy bees. And 
as I staggered in terror, bees fell on top of me. 

A crawling, buzzing nightmare! 

I’ve never been so terrified. I screamed in my tiny voice. I tried to 
climb up the side of the net, but my feet were stuck under another 
bee’s body. How I hated the feel of his disgusting fuzz! 

In my terror, I knew I had to escape. I had to get away from here. 
I had to get to Ms. Karmen’s office and beg her to help me. 

Then I had the most terrifying thought of all. If I couldn’t escape, 
I suddenly realized, I would remain a bee for the rest of my life! 

As Mr. Andretti carried me and the other bees across his back 
yard, I started buzzing and shivering with panic. How could this have 
happened to me? I asked myself. How could I ever have been so stupid 
as to try to change bodies with somebody else? Why wasn’t I happy 
with the perfectly good body I’d already had? 

Mr. Andretti opened the door to the screened-in area off the side 


of his garage. “We’re back now, my little honeys,” he cooed. 

The net started to shake, and I figured out that Mr. Andretti was 
slowly turning it inside out. One by one, he started plucking us—his 
prisoners—off the side of the mesh cloth and plopping each one back 
inside his hanging drawer hives. 

As Andretti reached for the bees, they started buzzing louder than 
ever. Finally, it was my turn to be plucked out of the net. 

When I saw the ends of Andretti’s grasping fingers reaching for 
me, I hung back, clinging to the net. I suddenly remembered his 
bragging speech about how he never used gloves because his bees 
“trusted” him. 

I watched his fingers stretch toward me. 

It would be so cool to plunge my stinger into his soft, plump skin, 
I thought. 

Should I do it? 

Should I sting him? 

Should 1? 


14 


I didn’t sting him. 

I really didn’t want to die. 

Sure, things really looked terrible for me right now. But I was still 
clinging to a shred of hope. 

Maybe, somehow, I’d find my way out of this bee prison and back 
into my own body. It didn’t seem very likely. But I was determined to 
keep on trying. 

“In you go, my fuzzy little friend,” Mr. Andretti said. He opened 
up one of the removable drawerlike parts of his hive and dropped me 
in. 

“Ohhhh,” I moaned. It was so dark inside the hive. And so 
confusing. 

Where should I go? What should I do? 

The air was hot and wet. Everywhere I turned, I was surrounded 
by a deafening, droning hum. 

“I— can’t stand it!” I cried. I could feel myself totally losing it! 

All around me, bees scurried around in the darkness. I stayed 
where I was, too frightened to move. 

I suddenly realized I was still very hungry. If I didn’t get 
something to eat, I knew I’d never be able to find a way out of here! 

I spun around and started trying to explore. 

Out of my left eye, I saw another bee glaring at me. I froze in my 
tracks. Did bees attack each other inside their hives? I wondered. 

I didn’t remember reading anything about that in my bee book. 
But this bee really looked ready for a fight. 

“Please leave me alone,” I begged in my tiny voice. “Please give 
me a break.” 

The bee glared back at me. I’ve never seen such big, angry- 
looking eyes! 

Slowly, I started backing away from him. “Uh...” I squeaked 
nervously. “I’ve got to be going now. I... um... I have to get to work.” 

The bee bulged his eyes and waved his antennas in a threatening 
way. I was sure he planned to sting me. I turned and flew away as fast 
as I could. I tried to hide. 

I was so frightened, I couldn’t even make myself move. What if I 
bumped into another bee? I couldn’t even stand to think about what 
might happen if I did. 

I realized I had to move. I had to find something to eat. 


Shaking with fear, I tiptoed out into the open. I took a nervous 
look around. 

On the far wall, I could see a large cluster of bees, busily building 
something. A honeycomb! 

And where there was a honeycomb, I told myself, there was 
honey. 

I’ve always hated the sweet, sticky goo. But I knew I had to eat 
some. Right away! 

As quietly as I could, I crept over and joined the bee workers. Out 
of the corner of my eye, I saw them doing really gross things with 
their mouths. 

First, they used their legs to pick little flakes of waxy-looking stuff 
off their abdomens. Then they crammed the wax into their mouths 
and started working their jaws up and down like little chewing 
machines. Finally, they spit out the wax and used it to build part of 
the honeycomb they were working on. 

“Yuck!” It looked so disgusting. It made me sick! 

But what choice did I have? I had to eat some honey—even if it 
was covered with bee spit. 

I turned my head and practiced sucking my tongue up and down. 
Then I slurped up a big puddle of honey. 

Amazing! For the first time in my life, I actually liked that stuff. 
Soon, I was sucking it down as if it were chocolate milk. 

After a while, I got quite good with my tongue, which was 
actually more of a bendable tube than a tongue. It was really the 
perfect tool for guzzling honey. 

If I ever made it back to the outside world, I thought I’d now be 
pretty good at using it for gathering nectar and pollen. Why, I might 
turn out to be the best worker in the whole hive! 

I tried to smile, and then I almost gagged on my honey. 

What was happening to me? 

What was I thinking? I was actually starting to feel like a bee! 

I had to get out of this place. Before it was too late! 

I wanted to start searching for an escape route right away. But I 
suddenly felt so tired. So completely worn out... 

Was it the honey? Or was it the strain of so much fear? 

I could barely keep my eyes open. The droning hum grew louder. 

With a weary sigh, I sank against a clump of hairy bodies. 

I sank into the warm darkness of the hive, surrounded by the 
steady buzz. Breathing the sweet aroma of the honey, I sank beside 
my furry brothers and sisters. 

Pm one of them now, I told myself weakly. Pm not a boy 
anymore. I’m a bee. A buzzzzzzzzzing bee. A bee sinking into the 


warm, dark hive. My home. 
Sinking... sinking... 


15 


I woke up with a start and tried to brush a bee away from my face. It 
took me a few moments to remember. I wasn’t lying in my back yard 
anymore, trying to keep the bees away from me. I was a bee—a bee 
trapped inside a hive! 

I jumped up, took a step, and immediately came face to face with 
another bee! I couldn’t tell if he was the same one I’d seen the night 
before. But he looked just as angry. His big eyes were bulging with 
rage. And he was moving deliberately toward me. 

As fast as I could, I spun around and flew away. Of course, I had 
no idea where I was going. 

The hive seemed to be made up of a lot of long, dark hallways. 
All around me, groups of bees were building honeycombs. As they 
worked, they kept up a steady buzz. The sound was really driving me 
off the wall! 

I began searching for a way out. I wandered in and out, in and 
out throughout the dark, sticky honeycombs. 

From time to time, I shot out my tongue and lapped up some 
honey. I was getting a little tired of the sweet stuff. But I knew I had 
to keep up my strength if I wanted to try to break out of the hive. 

As I searched for a way to escape, I noticed that every single bee 
seemed to have an assigned job, either building honeycombs, caring 
for the babies of the queen or whatever. And the little bugs never 
stopped working! They were “busy as bees” from morning till night. 

Darting through the tangled darkness, I began to lose hope. 

There’s no way out, I decided. No way out. 

I sank unhappily to the sticky hive floor. And as I dropped, three 
large bees moved in front of me. 

They buzzed angrily, bumping up against me with their hairy, 
damp bodies. It was easy to tell these bees were angry with me. 

Maybe it was because I wasn’t doing my “job.” But what was my 
job? How could I tell the bees I didn’t know what I was supposed to be 
doing? 

I tried to slip past them, but they moved to block my path. 

Three tough bees. They made me think of Barry, Marv, and Karl. 

I shrank back as one of them pointed his stinger at me. 

He was getting ready to kill me! And I didn’t even know what I’d 
done! 

I screamed and whirled around. As fast as my six legs would carry 
me, I darted back down the narrow passageway and turned another 


corner. 

“Oh!” I bumped hard into another bee. Luckily, he was hurrying 
off somewhere, and barely seemed to notice me. 

I gasped with relief. And then an idea came to me. Where was 
that bee going in such a hurry? Was he taking something somewhere? 
Could he be going to an area I hadn’t searched yet? 

I decided to follow him and find out. I needed to learn everything 
I could about the hive. Maybe, just maybe, it would help me escape. 

I hurried after the bee. I thought Pd find him quickly. But he was 
already long gone. 

I searched in and out among the different honeycombs, but I 
couldn’t find him anywhere. After a while, I gave up. 

Way to go, Lutz the Klutz, I scolded myself. I felt worse than ever. 

I shot out my tongue and slurped up a big helping of honey to 
keep myself going. Then I began my endless searching again. 

“Whoooa!” I stopped when I reached an area that looked familiar. 
I was pretty sure it was the place where Andretti had dropped me 
when he first put me into the hive. 

All at once, a large group of angrily buzzing bees crowded against 
me. 

“Hey—!” I protested as they shoved me forward. 

They replied with a sharp, rising buzz. 

What were they doing? Were they attacking me? Were they all 
going to sting me at once? 

They had me surrounded. I couldn’t run away. 

But how could I possibly fight off all these bees? I was doomed, I 
realized. Finished. Sighing in defeat, I closed my eyes and started to 
shake. 

And waited for them to swarm over me. 


16 


I waited to be crushed. 

And waited some more. 

When I opened my eyes, the angry bees had moved to the side of 
the hive. They weren’t paying any attention to me. 

I saw a single bee, standing in the center of the hive floor. He was 
performing a kind of jumping, twisting, hip-hop dance. 

How weird! I thought. The other bees were watching intently, as 
if this were the most interesting thing in the world. 

“Those bees didn’t care about me,” I told myself. “They were 
trying to get me out of the way so this bee could do his dance.” 

I realized I’d wasted a lot of time. I had to keep searching for an 
escape route. 

I tried to push myself away from the group of bees, but the hive 
floor had become too crowded to move. 

The bee danced faster and faster. He moved his body toward the 
right. All the other bees stared intently at him. 

What was going on? 

At that moment, something from my old Big Book of Bees came 
back to me. I remembered that bees send out scouts to find their food. 
Then the scouts “dance” to tell the other bees where to go get it! 

If the scout was reporting on where to get food, it meant he’d just 
been out of the hive. That meant there had to be a way out of this 
place! 

I was so excited, I almost started dancing! 

But I didn’t have a chance because, suddenly, all the bees in the 
hive rose up like a dark cloud. I spread my wings and flew up with 
them. 

As I followed, the bees formed a single, orderly line and shot out 
through a tiny hole in a far, upper corner of the hive. 

I buzzed around until I found the end of the line. Then I got ready 
to escape. 

Would I make it? 

The very last bee in line, I shot out of the tiny hole into open 
space. For a few seconds, I watched the other bees floating away, 
busily hunting for nectar and pollen. 

I knew I looked just like them. The difference was that they 
would willingly return to Andretti’s hive. But I never, ever would. At 
least, not if I could help it. 


“Pm out!” I cried joyfully in my tiny voice. “I’m out! I’m free!” 

Dazzled by the sudden bright light of the outer world, I flew 
around and around in the beekeeping area. Then I headed for the hole 
Pd seen in the screen when I was still in my own body. 

I knew it was on the wall that faced my family’s yard. But when I 
flew over to it, I stopped and gasped in disappointment. 

The hole had been patched up. Mr. Andretti had fixed it! 

“Oh, no!” I wailed. “I can’t be trapped! I can’t be!” 

My heart started thumping crazily. My whole body was vibrating. 

I forced myself to calm down and look around. 

None of the other bees were in the screened-in area anymore. 
They’d already gone outside to collect pollen. And that meant there 
had to be another way out. 

I wasn’t thinking clearly because I was exhausted, worn out from 
all my flying around. I sat down on top of the hive to rest. 

At that instant, the door between the beekeeping area and the 
garage opened. “Good morning, my little bee friend,” Mr. Andretti’s 
voice boomed. “What are you doing, lying around on top of the hive? 
Why aren’t you busy inside making me some honey? Are you sick? 
You know we can’t have any sick bees around here.” 

As I gazed up weakly, Mr. Andretti moved closer. His huge, dark 
shadow fell over me. 

I tried to curl up into a ball and disappear. But it was no use. His 
large fingers were stretching right toward me! 

I yelled in terror. But of course, he couldn’t hear me. What is he 
going to do to me? I asked myself. What does he do with sick bees? 


17 


What does he do with sick bees? I wondered again, quivering in 
terror. 

He probably throws them in the garbage, I thought. Or even 
worse—he feeds them to his pet bird or frog. 

Despite my weariness, I knew I couldn’t wait around to find out. I 
had to get out of there! 

Just as Mr. Andretti’s fingers were about to fold around me, I shot 
up into the air and buzzed around his head. At the same instant, I saw 
some other bees flying in through a tiny hole in the screen. It was in 
the corner, near the ceiling. 

I buzzed Mr. Andretti’s face one more time. Then I raced toward 
the hole. As I tried to squeeze myself out the exit hole, I crashed right 
into another bee who was flying in. He glared at me and gave me an 
angry buzz. 

Frightened, I backed off and clung to the screen. I had to wait for 
a long fine of bees to come back inside. It seemed to take them 
forever. 

When I was finally sure the last bee had come in, I leaped forward 
and shot out of the hole. I was out in the open sky! 

“This time I really am free!” I screamed in celebration, forgetting 
my weariness. “And Andretti’s never going to catch this bee again!” 

I landed on a leaf and let the morning sun warm my back and 
wings. It was a beautiful day—a beautiful day for finding somebody 
who could help me get back into my human body! 

Like a rocket, I shot straight up into the air and gazed around. I 
recognized the familiar creak of my father opening the back door of 
my house. 

Panting hard, I raced forward. 

My father called, “Good-bye, hon! Tell the kids T'll see them 
tonight!” over his shoulder and let go of the door. 

I darted into the house. The door slammed hard. Another near 
miss. 

I hummed with happiness. It felt so good to be back in my own 
house and out of that dark, sticky hive! I landed on the counter and 
gazed around at the old, familiar walls. 

Why hadn’t I ever realized how nice my house was before? 

Step, step, step. 

Someone was coming into the kitchen! I flew up onto the 
windowsill for a better look. 


Krissy! 

Maybe I could get her to listen to me. 

“Krissy! Krissy!” I buzzed. “Over here by the window. It’s me, 
Gary!” 

To my delight, she turned and stared in my direction. 

“Yes!” I cried excitedly. “Yes—it’s me! It’s me!” 

“Oh, terrific,” Krissy groaned. “One of Andretti’s dumb bees got in 
here again.” 

Okay, so it wasn’t exactly the reaction I’d been hoping for. But 
she’d still noticed me! Maybe, I thought, if I flew right onto her 
shoulder and spoke into her ear, she’d be able to understand me! 

My heart vibrating my entire body, I lifted myself up off the 
windowsill and soared toward my sister. “Krissy!” I buzzed as I 
approached her shoulder. “You have to listen to me!” 

“Aaaaiii!” 

Krissy screeched so loud, I was afraid the glass in the windows 
would shatter. “Get away from me, bee!” 

She started thrashing her hands in the air, trying to bat me away. 

“Ow!” I cried out as she slapped me. Stung with pain, I lost 
control and landed with a thud on the tiled countertop. 

I raised my eyes in time to see Krissy grab a flyswatter from out 
of the broom closet. 

“No, Krissy, no!” I screamed. “Not that! You don't want to do that 
to your own brother!” 

My sister lifted up the flyswatter and thwacked it down right next 
to me. I could feel the rush of air from it. And I felt the entire counter 
shake. 

I screamed and quickly rolled to one side. 

Krissy, I knew, was a menace with a flyswatter. 

She was the champion in our family. She never missed. 

The eyes on top of my head spun in terror. And in the gray blur, I 
could see the shape of the flyswatter, rising up to slap me again. And 
again. 


18 


“Stop, Krissy!” I screamed. “Stop! You’re squashing me!” 

With a strangled gasp, I toppled off the counter. I hit the floor 
hard and struggled dizzily to my feet. 

Now I started to get angry. Why did Krissy have to be so 
bloodthirsty? Couldn’t she just open a window and shoo me out? 

Buzzing weakly, I floated up off the floor. Regaining my strength, 
I began darting wildly around the room, crashing into the walls and 
cupboards to show Krissy how upset I was. Then I shot out of the 
kitchen. 

In a rage, I headed up the stairs to my room. If my sister wouldn’t 
help me, Pd get someone else to help. Namely, the new Gary! 

The morning sun was high in the sky. But “Gary” was still sound 
asleep in my bed. 

Seeing him lying there so peacefully, so completely at home, 
made me even angrier. 

“Wake up, you slug!” I buzzed at him. He didn’t move. His mouth 
hung open as he slept, making him look like a real jerk. 

“Yuck! What a creep!” I was sure my mouth never hung open 
when J slept! 

I decided to take action. I landed on “Gary’s” head and started 
walking around on his face. I was sure my little insect legs would 
tickle him and wake him up. 

Nothing. He didn’t move. 

Even when I stuck a leg up his nose, “Gary” slept without stirring. 

“Why is he so wrecked?” I wondered. “Has he been wearing out 
my body?” 

Furious, I ran across “Gary’s” face and climbed down through his 
hair. Then I crawled onto his ear. “BUZZ!” I shouted as loudly as I 
could. “BUZZ! BUZZ! BUZZ!” 

Incredible as it seems, the new “Gary” didn’t even budge. 

Just my luck. Dirk Davis was turning out to be the world’s 
soundest sleeper! 

I sighed and gave up. I crawled off “Gary’s” ear and flew around 
my old room, gazing down at my bed, my dresser, and my computer. 

“My computer!” I cried excitedly. “Maybe I can put a message on 
the screen! Maybe I can tell my parents what has happened to me!” 

I swooped down to the computer, buzzing eagerly. 

Yes! The computer had been left on. 


What luck! I knew I wasn’t heavy enough to push the Power 
button. 

Would I be strong enough to type? 

A clear blue screen greeted me on the monitor. My heart 
pounding, I lowered myself to the keyboard and started hopping 
around on the letters. 

Yes! I was heavy enough to make the keys go up and down. 

I paused, resting on the Enter key. 

What should I type? What message should I put on the screen? 

What? What? What? 

As I frantically thought, I heard “Gary” stir behind me on the bed. 
He let out a groan. He was waking up. 

Quick! I told myself. Type something! Type anything! 

He’ll see it as soon as he gets out of bed. 

I hopped over to the letters and began to jump up and down, 
spelling out my desperate message. 

It was hard work. My bee eyes weren’t made for reading letters. 
And I kept leaping up and falling in the cracks between the keys. 

After eight or nine jumps, I was gasping for air. 

But I finished my message just as “Gary” sat up in bed and 
stretched. 

Floating up in front of the monitor, I struggled to read what I had 
typed: 


I AM NOT BEE. I AM GARY. HELO ME. 


Through my blurred vision, I saw that I missed the P in HELP and hit 
the O instead. I wanted to go back and fix it. But I was totally wiped 
out. I could barely buzz. 

Would they understand? 

Would they read the message and see me standing on top of the 
monitor and understand? 

“Gary” would understand. I knew he would. Dirk Davis would 
figure it out. 

I climbed wearily to the top of the monitor and watched him 
climb out of bed. 

Here he comes, I saw eagerly. He brushed his hair out of his eyes. 
He yawned. He stretched again. 

Over here! I urged. 

Dirk—please—check out the computer monitor! 

Dirk—over here! 

He picked up a crumpled pair of jeans off the floor and pulled 


them on. Then he found a wrinkled T-shirt to go with it. 
Come on, Dirk! 1 pleaded, hopping up and down on top of the 
monitor. Read the screen—please? 


19 


Would he read it? 

Yes! Rubbing his eyes, “Gary” shuffled over to the computer. 

Yes! Yes! 

I nearly burst for joy as I watched him squint at the screen. “Go 
ahead, Gary! Read it! Read it!” I squeaked. 

He squinted at the screen some more, frowning. “Did I leave that 
thing on overnight?” he muttered, shaking his head. “Wow. I must be 
losing it.” 

He reached down and clicked off the power. Then he turned and 
made his way out of the room. 

Stunned, I toppled off the monitor, landing hard on the desk 
beside the keyboard. All that work for nothing. 

What was “Gary’s” problem, anyway? Doesn’t he know how to 
read? 

I’ve got to talk to him, I told myself, pulling myself together. I’ve 
got to communicate with him somehow. 

I lifted my wings and floated up after him. I followed him through 
the kitchen, and then slipped through the back door with him. 

As he strode across the grass, I started buzzing around his head. 
But he didn’t pay any attention to me. 

He crossed the yard and opened our garage door. Then he went 
inside and brought out my old skateboard. 

I hadn’t used that skateboard in at least two years. My uncle had 
given it to me for my tenth birthday, and I almost broke my leg trying 
to ride it. After that, I put it away and refused to touch it again. 

“Don’t get on that thing!” I yelled at “Gary”. “It’s dangerous. You 
might hurt my body. And I want it back in one piece!” 

Of course “Gary” didn’t even notice me. Instead, he carried the 
skateboard out in front of the house and put it down on the ground. 

A short while later, Kaitlyn and Judy walked up the sidewalk. I 
waited for them to start giggling and making fun of the new me. 

“Hi, Gary,” Kaitlyn said. She brushed some curly hair off her 
forehead and smiled. “Are we late for our skateboarding lesson?” 

“Gary” flashed her a big smile. “No way, Kaitlyn,” he answered in 
my voice. “Want to head over to the playground like we did 
yesterday?” 

I couldn’t believe my ears. Skateboarding lesson? Head over to 
the playground like we did yesterday? What was going on around here? 


“I hope you don’t mind, Gary,” Judy said. “We told some of the 
other kids—like Gail and Louie—how good you are. They all said they 
can’t wait to take a lesson from you, too. Is that okay? Because if it 
isn’t, we can call them, and—” 

“No problem, Jude,” “Gary” broke in. “Let’s get going, okay?” The 
new “me” hopped onto his skateboard and smoothly rolled his way 
down the sidewalk. Judy and Kaitlyn hurried after him. 

For a second, I was too shocked to move. But then I decided to 
follow them. 

As I swooped after them, I kept muttering to myself, “I can’t 
believe it! Lutz the Klutz is giving skateboard lessons at the 
playground? Everybody’s waiting for him to show up? What is going 
on?” 

A few minutes later, the four of us had reached the playground. 
Sure enough, a whole gang of kids was waiting there for “Gary”. He 
put down his skateboard and started giving everybody pointers on 
“boarding”, as he called it. 

I buzzed over to him and started shouting in his ear again. “Dirk!” 
I shouted. “Dirk Davis! It’s me. The real Gary Lutz!” 

Very casually, he swatted me away. 

I tried to speak to him again. This time he swatted me really hard, 
sending me spinning to the ground. 

Trying to shake off the pain, I gave up. Dirk isn’t going to help 
me, I realized. 

Ms. Karmen is my only hope. After all, she was the one with all 
the equipment. She was the only person who could reverse what she 
had done. 

I flew onto a tree and tried to figure out which way to fly. When 
you’re an insect, everything looks different to you. Things that seem 
small to a person appear huge to a bee. So I wanted to be sure I didn’t 
get myself mixed up and fly off in the wrong direction. 

Standing on a big leaf, I gazed up and down the block until I was 
sure I knew which way to go. As I got ready to take off, a large 
shadow suddenly loomed over my head. At first, I thought it was a 
small bird. But then I realized it was a dragonfly. 

“Stay calm,” I told myself. “A dragonfly is an insect, isn’t it? And 
insects don’t eat each other, right?” 

I guess no one had told the dragonfly. 

Before I could move, it zoomed down, wrapped its teeth around 
my middle, and bit me in two. 


20 


I uttered a last gasp and waited for everything to go dark. 

It took me a few seconds to realize that the dragonfly had turned 
and buzzed off in the other direction. 

My imagination was running away with me. That’s what always 
happened when I got overtired. 

I took a deep breath, grateful to still be in one piece. I decided I 
had to use my remaining strength to get to Ms. Karmen at the Person- 
to-Person Vacations office. 

I rose up into the air, looked both ways for oncoming dragonfly 
traffic, then fluttered away. 

After a long, tiring trip, I floated past a street sign that told me I'd 
made it to the right block. Roach Street. 

I buzzed along the sidewalk until I came to the Person-to-Person 
building. Then I sat down on the stoop and tried to figure out how I 
was going to get inside. 

Luckily, as I rested on the warm cement, I saw a mailman 
marching up the street, stopping at each house along his route. 
Quickly, I flew over to the Person-to-Person entrance and checked it 
out. Just as Pd hoped, there was a mail slot in the middle of the door. 

I buzzed over to the doorknob, and waited for my chance. Slowly, 
the mailman trudged up to the building. 

“Hurry up!” I screamed at him. “Do you think I have all day 
here?” Of course he couldn’t hear me. 

He fumbled around in his bag and pulled out a bundle of letters. 
Then, slowly, he reached out and pushed open the mail slot. 

Before the mailman had a chance to react, I swooped down in 
front of his nose and buzzed right through the mail slot. As I zipped 
along, I heard him gasp, and I knew he’d seen me. But for once, luck 
was with me. I moved so quickly, there hadn’t been any time for the 
mailman to try to swat me. 

My luck held when I flew up the stairs. 

Pd just reached the top when the door to Person-to-Person 
Vacations opened, and a girl about my age came out. She had long, 
curly red hair and had a serious, thoughtful expression on her face. 
Was she thinking of trading places with someone? 

“Go home!” I shouted at her. “And don’t come back. Stay away 
from this place! Just look what happened to me!” 

Even though I was screaming, the girl didn’t even turn her head. 
But she left the door open just long enough for me to buzz into the 


Person-to-Person office. 

I flew across the waiting room and saw Ms. Karmen, sitting in the 
same chair she’d been in when I first met her. 

I shot right toward her—and smacked into something hard. 

Pain roared through my body. I dropped to the floor, dizzy and 
confused. 

As my head began to clear, I remembered the glass wall 
separating Ms. Karmen from the waiting area. Like some kind of 
brainless June bug, I’d crashed right into it! 

I shook myself to clear my mind. “Ms. Karmen!” I yelled. “Ms. 
Karmen. It’s me—Gary Lutz. Look what happened! Can you help me? 
Can you?” 


21 


Ms. Karmen didn’t even glance up from her paperwork. Once again, I 
realized no one could hear my squeaky insect voice. 

With a defeated moan, I sank down onto the seat of the chair and 
curled up into a tiny ball. Pd come all this way for nothing, I realized. 
Pd found the one person in the world who might be able to help me. 
And she couldn’t even hear me! 

“I give up,” I whispered sadly. “It’s hopeless. I have to get used to 
the idea of being a bee forever! There's no way I’ll ever get my old 
body back.” 

I had never been so miserable in all my life. I wished someone 
would come along, drop into the chair, and sit on me! 

A strange sound startled me from my unhappy thoughts. I sat up 
straight and listened hard. 

“Whoo-ah. Whoo-ah.” It almost sounded like someone breathing. 
But how could that be? It was so loud! 

I floated up off the chair and buzzed around the room, trying to 
find out where the sound was coming from. I had circled the room 
twice before I figured it out. 

Ms. Karmen was bending over to pick up something she’d 
dropped on the floor. Her nose and mouth were only inches from the 
top of her desk. And the microphone she used to talk to people had 
picked up the sounds of her breathing! 

Suddenly, I had a brilliant idea. If I could get to the other side of 
the glass, I could use the microphone to make Ms. Karmen hear me. 

I swooped over to the wall and flew straight up to the ceiling. No 
luck there. The sheet of glass went all the way up. There was no space 
for me to wedge myself through to the other side. 

I buzzed down to the place where the glass met the top of Ms. 
Karmen’s desk. Yes! There was a small slot in the glass. I remembered 
how she had passed through the book of photographs on my first visit 
to the office. 

The slot wasn’t very large. But it was plenty big enough for my 
round little bee body. 

I shot through the hole and jumped up on top of the microphone. 

“Ms. Karmen!” I shouted, putting my mouth next to the hard 
metal. “Ms. Karmen!” 

Her eyes opened wide. Her mouth dropped open in confusion. She 
stared out into the waiting room, searching for the person speaking. 

“It’s Gary Lutz!” I called out. “And Pm down here on your 


microphone.” 

Ms. Karmen stared down at the microphone. Then her eyes 
narrowed in fear. “What’s going on? Who’s doing this? Is this a joke?” 

“No!” I cried. “It’s no joke at all. It’s really me—Gary Lutz!” 

“But—but—” she stammered, but no other words came out. 
“What’s the joke? How are you doing that?” 

Her voice was so loud, the sound waves nearly blasted me off the 
microphone. 

“You don’t have to yell!” I cried. “I can hear you.” 

“I don't believe this!” she exclaimed in a trembling voice. She 
stared down at me. 

“Its all your fault!” I shouted angrily. “You messed up the 
transfer operation. When you made the switch, one of my neighbor’s 
bees must have gotten into the machine. So, instead of putting me into 
Dirk Davis’ body, you put me into a bee!” 

Ms. Karmen blinked. Then she slapped her forehead. “Well that 
explains it!” she cried. “That explains why Dirk Davis’ body has been 
behaving so strangely.” 

She picked up some papers on her desk and started putting them 
into her briefcase. “I really must apologize,” she said. “I feel really 
bad, Gary. We’ve never had a mix-up like this before. I hope... I hope 
it’s at least been interesting for you.” 

“Interesting?” I shrieked. “It’s been a nightmare! You wouldn’t 
believe what I’ve been through. I’ve been attacked by screen doors, 
cats, flyswatters—you name it! You yourself almost ran me over with 
your car!” 

All the color drained from her face. “Oh, no,” she cried, her voice 
a whisper. “I’m so sorry. I—I didn’t know.” 

“Well, what about it?” I asked her impatiently. 

“What about what?” 

“What about getting me back into my body! Can you do it right 
away?” 

Ms. Karmen cleared her throat. “Well, I could,” she replied slowly. 
“Normally, I could transfer you right back. But there’s a slight 
problem in your case.” 

“What kind of problem?” I demanded. 

“It's Dirk Davis,” Ms. Karmen replied. “It seems he’s become very 
attached to your old body. He likes your house and your parents, too. 
In fact, he even likes your sister, Krissy!” 

“So?” I cried. “So what’s that supposed to mean?” 

Ms. Karmen stood up and pushed in her desk chair. “It means,” 
she said, “that Dirk Davis is refusing to give up your old body. He says 
he absolutely won’t go back to his old life. He plans to keep your body 


forever.” 


22 


“WHAT?” I screamed, hopping up and down angrily on the 
microphone. 

“Just what I said,” Ms. Karmen said. “Dirk Davis wants to keep 
your body for the rest of his life.” 

“But he can’t do that, can he?” 

“It is very upsetting,” she replied, biting her lower lip. “It wasn’t 
what he said in our original agreement. But if he refuses to get out of 
your body and your life, there’s really nothing I can do.” 

Ms. Karmen gazed down at me sympathetically. “Pm so sorry 
about this, Gary,” she said softly. “I guess Pll have to be more careful 
in the future.” 

“What about my future? What am I supposed to do now?” I 
wailed. 

Ms. Karmen shrugged. “I don’t know. Maybe you could go back, 
wait in the hive—and maybe Dirk Davis will change his mind.” 

“Back to the hive?!” My antennas stood straight on end, quivering 
with rage. “Do you have any idea what it’s like in there? Cramped 
together with those hairy bees in the darkness? Listening to that 
deafening buzz day and night?” 

“It’s a way of staying alive,” Ms. Karmen replied bluntly. 

“JI—I don’t care!” I stammered. “I’m never going back there! 
Never!” 

“This is tragic. Tragic!” Ms. Karmen cried. “Pll give your case 
some thought tonight, Gary. I promise. Maybe I can come up with a 
way of getting your body away from Dirk.” 

She crossed the room and opened the office door. “I’m so upset. 
So upset,” she murmured. Then she disappeared out the door, 
slamming it behind her. 

Trembling with anger at Dirk Davis, I hopped down to the desk. 
“Hey, wait!” I called after her. “You’ve locked me in!” 

Ms. Karmen was so upset, she forgot about me! 

I rose up into the air and started after her. But, then, I happened 
to glance back down at her desk. Dirk Davis’ questionnaire was right 
on top of a pile of papers. His address was next to his name. He lived 
at 203 Eastwood Avenue. 

Eastwood Avenue was near the computer store, so I knew where 
it was. “Maybe the old Dirk Davis will know how to get my body 
back!” I told myself. 

It was worth a try. I ducked through the slot in the glass and flew 


around the waiting room. 

No exit. No open window. No crack in the door. 

Once again, I was trapped. 

Frantically, I buzzed all around the waiting room. Then I went 
back through the slot in the glass. I checked out the whole equipment 
room. Every window was closed tight. 

I flew past a calendar and happened to see the date. “Oh, no!” I 
cried. “It’s Friday! It’s the weekend. Ms. Karmen might not come back 
to work for two whole days.” 

In two days, I realized, I would starve to death! 

I had to get out! I went over to the far wall and noticed another 
door I hadn’t seen before. I zipped through it. 

The room turned out to be a tiny bathroom. With one small 
window. Which was open just a crack. It was all I needed. 

“Hurray!” I yelled. I shot out through the window and sailed into 
the open air. Then I turned right and headed for Eastwood Avenue. 
Luckily, it wasn’t very far away. All this flying around was really 
beginning to wear me out. 

I found Dirk Davis’ house without any trouble. When I got there, I 
saw “Dirk” himself—or whoever he was now—standing in the front 
yard. I recognized him from the picture Pd seen in the Person-to- 
Person album. 

“Hey!” I yelled to him. “Hey, er... Dirk!” 

The tall, good-looking boy turned around and stared at me. His 
mouth moved, and it looked as if he was saying something. 

But I couldn’t understand any words. All I heard was a humming 
sound. 

“Pm Gary Lutz!” I cried in my little voice. “Can you help me get 
Dirk Davis out of my body?” 

The boy stared at me. Then he grinned. 

I was confused. What was he grinning about? 

“Hey, you can hear me!” I cried. 

Now “Dirk” motioned with his hand. 

“You want me to follow you?” I asked. I felt excited. “Are you 
taking me someplace where we can get help?” 

“Dirk” grinned again. Then he turned and walked around the 
corner of the house. I didn’t know where we were going. But I knew I 
had to follow him. 

I found “Dirk” in the back yard. “Hum,” he said to me. “Hum.” He 
pointed to a big rosebush and grinned. Then he stuck his nose deep 
inside one of the blossoms. “Hummmmmmmmm,” he said. 
“Yummmmmm.” 

I gaped at him in shock. “Of course!” I cried. 


“You got the bee’s mind when I got the bee’s body!” 

“Dirk” didn’t say anything. But when he pulled his face out of the 
rose, the end of his nose was covered with yellow pollen. 

“Dirk” looked a little surprised. And disappointed. I guess he 
missed his long, sucking tongue—the tongue that was now hanging off 
the front of my face. 

“You can’t help me,” I muttered to him. “You’re in worse shape 
than I am!” 

“Hum?” he replied. “Hum?” 

He looked kind of silly with that yellow nose. But I felt sorry for 
him. He and I had the wrong brains in the wrong bodies. I knew 
exactly how he felt. 

“I’m going to go get help for both of us,” I told him. “If I get my 
body back, maybe you'll get yours, too.” 

With a loud buzz, I flew out of the Davises’ yard. As I left, I 
thought I heard “Dirk” buzz back at me. I glanced over my wing and 
saw him sticking his face into another rose. Maybe this time he’d have 
better luck getting the pollen out. 

I headed toward my own house. This time I planned to make Dirk 
Davis give me my body back. Or else. 

As I turned up my street, I suddenly heard a familiar voice 
coming from behind a tree. 

“Don’t mess with me! Don’t mess with me, man!” 

I couldn’t believe it. The voice belonged to Marv. But who was he 
talking to? 

I shot around the tree to find out. To my surprise, I saw that Marv 
was talking to me—or, Dirk Davis, in my body. Barry and Karl were 
right beside him. 

Look out, Dirk! I thought. Run! Run! 

Please don’t let them wreck my body! 

But I was too late. 

Barry, Marv, and Karl were closing in on him, about to give him 
the pounding of his life. 


23 


I flew closer. 

“Look out, Dirk! Look out!” I squeaked. 

But to my surprise, the three hulking creeps weren’t moving in on 
“Gary”—they were backing away from him! 

“Don’t mess with me!” Marv cried. “I said I was sorry.” 

“We apologized,” Barry whined. “Don’t hit us again, Gary! 
Please!” 

Karl whimpered behind him, nursing a bloody nose. 

“You guys are losers,” I heard “Gary” tell them. “Take a hike. Go 
get a life.” 

“Okay! Okay!” Marv cried. “Just no more rough stuff, okay, 
Gary?” 

“Gary” shook his head and walked away. 

I don’t believe this! I thought gleefully. Barry, Marv, and Karl were 
afraid of me! 

I decided I’d have some fun with them, too. 

I swooped down and landed on Barry’s nose, buzzing as loudly 
and menacingly as I could. 

“Yowwwww!” he shrieked in surprise—and swatted himself on 
the nose. 

I was too fast for him. I was already on Karl’s ear. 

Karl cried out and toppled backwards into a thorny rosebush. 

Then I buzzed round and around Marv. 

“Get away!” he shouted angrily. 

And I flew right into his mouth. 

His scream nearly deafened me. But it was worth it. 

Marv started spitting and choking and gagging. 

I flew up into the air, laughing so hard, I nearly popped my 
antennas. That was the most fun I’d had since becoming a bee! 

I watched the three gorillas run away. Then I flew up the block to 
my house. 

“Gary” had left the window open, and I was able to shoot in. He 
was lying on my bed, reading one of my comic books and eating 
crackers with honey on them. 

The honey smelled really good, and I realized I was hungry again. 
I reminded myself to stop by a flower and get a snack the next time I 
went outside. 

But, meanwhile, I had work to do. I flew over and landed on 


Gary’s earlobe. 

“Hey, you! Dirk Davis!” I yelled at the top of my little voice. “I 
need to talk to you!” 

He reached a hand up and flicked me off his face. I fell down and 
landed with a bounce on the bed. 

I buzzed angrily and shot right back up to his earlobe. “Hey, you! 
I want my body back! You have to get out of it. Now!” 

“Gary” folded up his comic book and swung it at me. I buzzed 
with rage and frustration. I wasn’t going to give up this time. No way! 
I had to make him hear me. 

I rocketed up in the air and landed on the top of his head. Then I 
climbed down to his other earlobe and tried one more time. “I’m not 
leaving you alone till you get out of my body!” I screeched. “Do you 
hear me?” 

He sighed and shrugged his shoulders. “Will you please quit 
bothering me?” he asked. “Can’t you see I’m trying to relax?” 

“You can hear me?” 

“Yeah. Sure,” he muttered. “I can hear you okay.” 

“You can?” I was so surprised, I almost fell off his ear. 

“Yes, I can hear you perfectly. Weird, huh? I’m not sure why. But 
I think some bee cells got mixed up with my human cells during our 
electronic transfer. I can hear all kinds of little bug noises now.” 

“Your human cells? Those are my human cells!” I cried. 

Dirk shrugged. 

“Enough chitchat,” I told him. “When do you plan to get out of 
my body?” 

“Never,” he replied. He picked up his comic book and started 
reading it again. “I like your body. I can’t understand why you gave it 
up to go become a bee.” 

“That wasn’t my idea!” I screamed. 

“You’ve got a good life here,” he continued. “I mean, you have 
great parents. Krissy is an okay sister. And Claus is an awesome cat. 
Too bad you didn’t know all that when you were in your body. Which 
is now my body!” 

“It’s not your body! It’s mine! Give it back!” I started to buzz 
furiously all around his head, swooping down in front of his nose, 
crashing into his ears, batting my wings in his eyes. 

Dirk Davis didn’t even flinch. 

“What’s the matter with you, anyway?” I yelled. “You’re me now. 
You're supposed to be scared of bees!” 

“Gary” laughed. “You’ve forgotten something,” he said. “I’m not 
you. I’m just inside your body. I’m still me inside. And I’m not the 
least bit afraid of bees!” 


“And, now,” he went on, “take a hike, okay? Buzz off. I’m busy.” 

Frozen with anger and disappointment, I slumped on the 
bedspread without moving. “Gary” raised the comic book up into the 
air. “Pd hate to swat you,” he said. “But I will if I have to!” 

I dodged away just as the comic book slapped down on the 
bedspread. Then I shot back out the window. 

For a few minutes, I flew aimlessly around, lost in my sad 
thoughts. Finally, I remembered how hungry I was. I perched on top 
of a big, orange lily blossom and started sucking up some nectar. 

Not bad, I told myself as I drank. But honey on crackers would be 
much better. 

“What am I supposed to do now?” I asked myself. “Am I really 
doomed to be a bee for the rest of my life?” I pulled my head out of 
the orange blossom and looked around. “And how long is the rest of 
my life anyway?” 

I remembered a page from The Big Book of Bees. 

“The life of the average bee is not very long. While the queen can 
live through as many as five winters, the workers and drones die off in 
the fall.” 

In the fall? 

It was already nearly August! 

If I stayed in this bee body, I had only a month or two at most! 

I gazed sadly up at my house. “Gary” had turned the light on in 
my room, and it twinkled in the early evening dusk. 

How I wished I could be up there! Why, why had I ever been 
stupid enough to think I’d be better off in someone else’s body? 

Then I heard a buzz. I peered over the blossom. Sure enough, I 
saw a bee. 

He hopped up onto the flower. Two other bees quickly joined 
him. Then three more. They buzzed angrily. 

“Go away!” I cried. 

I tried to fly away. 

But before I could lift off, they all swarmed over me. 

I couldn’t move. The bees had taken me prisoner. 

“Don’t take me back to the hive!” I shrieked. “Don’t take me 
back!” 

But to my horror, they started to drag me away. 


24 


I struggled to squirm away. But they turned their stingers on me. 

Were they some kind of bee police? Did they think I was trying to 
escape the hive? 

I didn’t have a chance to discuss it with them. They lifted me up 
into the air. There were bees in front of me, bees behind, and bees on 
all sides. 

We flew past my bedroom window. “Help!” I called. 

“Gary” glanced up from his plate of crackers and honey. He 
smiled and waved at me. 

I was so angry, I thought I might explode. 

But then an idea came to me. A crazy idea. A desperate idea. 

I buzzed as loudly as I could. Then I darted out of line and shot 
into the open bedroom window. 

Were the others following me? Were they? 

Yes! 

They didn’t want to let me escape. 

“Gary” sat up when he saw me and my buzzing followers. He 
rolled up his comic book, preparing to swat us. 

I circled the room, and the other bees followed. 

“Get out! Get out!” “Gary” screamed. 

There weren’t enough of us, I decided. I needed a huge swarm. 

I flew back out the window. The others buzzed after me. 

Now I was the head bee. As fast as I could, I led my group back to 
Mr. Andretti’s garage, and in through the hole in the screen. 

I hesitated at the hive entrance. I took a deep breath. 

Was I really going to go back inside? 

I knew I had no choice. “Go for it, Lutz!” I shouted to myself. 

I shot in through the entrance hole. 

Then I began flying crazily through the hive, buzzing angrily, 
bumping the walls, bumping other bees. 

The hive stirred to life. 

The buzzing grew to a dull roar. Then a loud roar. Then a 
deafening roar! 

Round and round I raged, flying faster, faster, throwing myself 
frantically against the sticky hive walls, tumbling, darting, buzzing 
furiously. 

The entire hive was in an uproar now. 

I had turned the bees into an angry swarm. 


Out of the hive I flew. Out into the darkening evening. Out 
through the hole in the screen, up, up, and away. 

And the bees swarmed after me, like a black cloud against the 
gray-blue sky. 

Up we soared. Up, up. 

A buzzing, swarming funnel cloud. 

Up, up. 

I led them up to the bedroom window. 

Tumbling over each other, raging through the air, we swarmed 
into “Gary’s” room. 

“Huh?” He jumped off the bed. 

He didn’t have time to say a word. 

I landed in his hair. The raging swarm followed, buzzing angrily, 
surrounding him, covering his head, his face, his shoulders. 

“H-help!” His weak cry was drowned out by the roar of the bees. 
“Help me!” 

I dropped down onto the tip of Gary’s nose. “Have you had 
enough?” I demanded. “Are you ready to give me back my body?” 

“Never!” he cried. “I don’t care what you do to me! You'll never 
get your body back! It’s mine, and I’m keeping it forever!” 

Whoooa! I could not believe my ears. 

I mean, he was covered in bees! And still he wouldn’t listen to 
reason! 

I didn’t know what to do. 

The other bees were starting to lose interest. 

Some of them drifted to the plate of honey. Most of them floated 
back out the open window. 

“You can’t get away with this, Dirk!” I screamed. 

With a furious wail, I whirled around. Then I stabbed my razor- 
sharp stinger deep into the side of “Gary’s” nose. 

“Owwwwwww!” He let out a high-pitched shriek and grabbed at 
his nose. 

Then he staggered backwards and fell over onto the bed. 

“Yaaaaay!” I cried out in celebration. 

For one instant, I felt triumphant. 

A tiny bee had defeated a huge enemy! I was victorious! I had 
won a fight against a giant! 

My celebration didn’t last very long. 

I suddenly realized what I had done. And I remembered what 
happens to a honeybee after it stings someone. 

“I'm going to die,” I murmured weakly. “I stung someone, and 
now I’m going to die!” 


25 


Weaker. 

I felt the strength drain from me. 

Weaker and weaker. 

“What have I done?” I asked myself. “I gave up my life for the 
chance to sting Dirk Davis! Why was I such a jerk?” 

I struggled to keep my wings moving, struggled to stay in the air. 

I knew I was doomed. But I wanted to stay alive as long as I 
could. Maybe, I thought, as I felt my strength fading, maybe P'll have a 
chance to tell my family good-bye. 

“Mom! Dad! Krissy!” I buzzed faintly. “Where are you?” 

It was hard to breathe. I felt so tired, so weak. 

I floated out the window and sank to the grass below. 

I thought I recognized the shape of the old maple tree where I 
used to read books and spy on Mr. Andretti. But my sight was so bad, 
it was hard to be sure about anything. The whole world swirled in 
gray shadow. 

I could no longer hold up my head. The gray shadows grew 
darker and darker. 

Until the world faded completely from view. 


I sat up slowly. The ground spun beneath me. 

Where was I? 

My back yard? 

I blinked, struggling to bring it all into focus, waiting for my eyes 
to clear. 

“There’s the old maple tree!” I cried. “And there’s my house! And 
there’s Mr. Andretti’s house!” 

Was I alive? 

Was I really alive, sitting in my back yard, seeing all the familiar 
places? 

Did I have my strength back? 

I decided to test it. I tried to spread my wings and fly up into the 
air. 

But for some reason, my wings didn’t seem to be working. My 
body felt heavy and strange. 

I frowned and looked down, inspecting myself to see what was 
wrong. “Whoooa!” I cried out in surprise. Instead of six legs, I saw two 
arms and two legs and my skinny old body. 


Breathlessly, I reached up to touch my face. My extra eyes were 
gone—and so were my antennas, and my layer of feathery fuzz. 
Instead, I felt hair! And smooth, human skin! 

I jumped up and shouted for joy. “Pm a person again! I’m me! Pm 
me!” 

I threw my arms around my chest and gave myself a hug. Then I 
danced around the back yard, testing my arms and legs. 

They worked! They all worked! 

I couldn’t get over how wonderful it was to be human again! 

“But how did it happen?” I asked myself. “What happened to Dirk 
Davis?” 

For a chilling instant, I wondered if Dirk had been forced into a 
bee’s body the way I had. 

Probably not, I decided. 

But what had happened? 

How did I get my body back? 

Was it the bee sting? Did the shock of the sting send us all back to 
the bodies we belonged in? 

“Pve got to call Ms. Karmen and find out!” I realized. 

But for now, all I wanted to do was see my family. 

I hurried up the back steps and into the house. As I ran through 
the kitchen, I crashed right into Krissy. As usual, she was carrying 
Claus under one arm. 

“Watch where you’re going!” Krissy snapped at me. 

She probably expected me to snap back at her and try to push her 
out of my way. But instead I grabbed her shoulders and gave her a big 
hug. Then I planted a kiss on her cheek. 

“Yuck! Gross!” she cried and wiped the cheek with her hand. 

I laughed happily. 

“Don’t give me your cooties, creep!” Krissy cried. 

“You're a creep!” I replied. 

“No, you’re a creep!” she repeated. 

“You're a jerk!” I shouted. 

It felt so good to be calling her names again! 

I gleefully called her a few more things. Then I hurried upstairs to 
see my parents. 

I met them as they were coming out of my room. 

“Mom! Dad!” I cried. I hurried to them, planning to throw my 
arms around them. 

But they thought I was just trying to get into my room. “Don’t go 
in there, Gary,” warned my dad. “You left your window open again, 
and a swarm of bees got in there.” 


“You'd better go next door,” Mom said. “Get Mr. Andretti. He’ll 
know how to get them out.” 

I couldn’t hold back any longer. I threw my arms around my 
mother’s neck and gave her a big kiss. “Mom, I missed you so much!” 

My mother hugged me back, but I saw her exchange a curious 
look with my dad. “Gary?” she asked. “Are you okay? How could you 
miss me when you've been right here in this house?” 

“Well...” I thought fast. “I meant that I missed spending time with 
you. We really need to do more things together.” 

My mother spread one hand over my forehead. “No. No 
temperature,” she told my father. 

“Gary,” Dad said impatiently. “Would you mind running over and 
getting Mr. Andretti? If we don’t get those bees out of your room, 
you'll never be able to go to sleep tonight!” 

“Bees?” I said casually. “Hey, no problem. I’ll take care of them.” 

I reached out and started to open my door. Before I could, Dad 
grabbed my arm. “Gary!” he cried in alarm. “What’s the matter with 
you? There are bees in your room! B-E-E-S. Don’t you remember— 
you're scared of bees!” 

I stared back at him and thought about what he’d said. To my 
surprise, I realized I was no longer the slightest bit scared of bees! In 
fact, I was actually looking forward to seeing them again. 

“No problem, Dad,” I told him. “I guess I must have outgrown 
that, or something.” 

I opened the door and went into my room. Sure enough, there 
was the old swarm, buzzing away over the plate of honey and crackers 
on the bed. 

“Hi, guys!” I said cheerfully. “Time to leave now!” 

I walked over to the bed and waved my hands at them, trying to 
shoo them back out the window. A few of them buzzed angrily at me. 

I laughed to myself. Then I picked up the plate of crackers and 
honey and dumped it out the window. “Go get it!” I told them. 

I shooed them gently out the window. 

“Good-bye!” I called to them as they left. “Thanks! Take good 
care of the honeycombs! Ill try to come visit as soon as I can!” 

When the last bee was gone, I turned around and saw my parents. 
They were standing absolutely motionless in the doorway, staring at 
me, frozen with shock. 

“Dad?” I said. “Mom?” 

My dad blinked and seemed to come back to life. He crossed the 
room and put a hand on my shoulder. “Gary? Are you feeling all 
right?” 

“Just fine,” I replied, grinning happily. “Just fine.” 


26 


That whole crazy adventure happened about a month ago. 

Now it’s nearly fall. I’m sitting in my favorite place under the 
maple tree in the back yard, reading a book and chomping down taco 
chips. 

I just love coming out here. All the fall flowering plants are in 
bloom, and the yard is really pretty. 

I’ve been spending the last few days of my summer vacation 
relaxing back here. Of course, I also go to the playground a lot. 

The other day I ran into that girl with the red hair I saw coming 
out of the Person-to-Person office. We started talking, and I didn’t trip 
over my own feet or anything. She seems very nice. I hope she doesn’t 
plan to switch lives with anybody else! 

That conversation and a lot of things have made me realize that 
my short life as a bee really changed me. 

First of all, it taught me to appreciate my family for the first time 
ever. My parents are pretty nice. And my sister is okay. For a sister. 

And now, I’m not scared of any of the things I used to be scared 
of. Yesterday, I walked right by Marv, Barry, and Karl, and I didn’t bat 
an eye. 

In fact, when I remembered how I buzzed them, I almost burst 
out laughing. 

I’m not at all scared of them anymore. And I’m different in other 
ways, too. 

Pm a lot better at sports and bike riding and things. And I’m a 
great skateboarder now. In fact, I still give lessons. Judy and Kaitlyn 
hang around me all the time. And Gail and Louie, too. 

The other day, I actually ran into Dirk Davis at the playground. At 
first, I didn’t want to talk to him. But then he turned out to be pretty 
nice. 

He apologized to me. “I’m sorry I tried to steal your body,” he 
said. “But things didn’t turn out so well for me, either. That bee 
flunked all my math tests in summer school!” 

We both had a good laugh about that. And now Dirk and I are 
friends. 

So all in all, my life is back to normal. 

I feel terrific, totally normal. 

In fact, I feel much better than normal. 

It’s so great to sit here in the back yard, reading and relaxing, 


smelling the fresh fall air, enjoying the flowers. 

Mmmmmm. 

Those hollyhocks are really awesome. 

Excuse me a moment while I get up and take a closer look. 

That blossom down near the ground is so perfect. 

I think Pll get down on my knees to take a quick taste. 

Do you know how to suck the pollen out? 

I’ve figured out the best way. It’s not as hard as it looks. 

You just pucker your lips and stick your tongue way out like this, 
see? 

Then you dip your face down into the blossom and suck up all the 
pollen you want. 

Try it. 

Go ahead. 

Mmmmmmmm. 

Go ahead. It’s easy. Really! 


Scanning, formatting and 
proofing by Undead. 

Skip to main content
 
Texts
 
Video
 
Audio
 
Software
 
Images
My uploads
My loans
My favorites
My lists
My collections
My web archives
Account settings
Get help
Log out
 Search metadata
 Search text contents
 Search TV news captions
 Search radio transcripts
 Search archived web sites
Advanced Search
About Blog Projects Help Donate  Contact Jobs Volunteer People
Full text of "All 62 Goosebumps novels"
See other formats
4 
J 
x 
T 


EA 
= 
7 


Wa 
e 
> 


Se, 
nn 


ba) 

se i 

ji 
E 4 
ao A 
JL 


ZI 
ee 
A i 


2 
Ce 
AS 


ERA 4 


bS 


9 | 
Ta 


— 
~ = 


>F IC 


< 


A 


eS CHO! 


MONSTER BLOOD I 


MONSTER BLOOD II 


Goosebumps - 18 
R.L. Stine 
(An Undead Scan v1.5) 


Evan Ross backed into the corner of the den as he stared at his dog 
Trigger. 

The tan cocker spaniel lowered his head and stared back at Evan 
with wet, brown eyes. The old dog’s tail began to wag excitedly. 

“Trigger—” Evan cried angrily. “Did you eat Monster Blood 
again?” 

The dog’s tail began wagging faster. Trigger let out a low bark 
that rumbled like thunder. 

Evan’s back pressed against the dark-paneled den wall. 

Trigger took a few heavy steps toward him, panting hard. His 
huge pink tongue, as big as a salami, hung out of his enormous mouth. 

“Did you?” Evan demanded. “Did you eat more Monster Blood?” 

The answer to Evan’s question was obvious. 

Trigger had been normal cocker spaniel size that morning. Now 
the dog stared down at Evan, as big as a pony. 

Trigger’s furry paws, the size of elephant hooves, thudded on the 
den carpet. His enormous tail pounded louder than a bass drum 
against the side of a leather couch. 

Evan covered his ears as Trigger let out an excited, high-pitched 
bark that shook the den walls. “Stay! Stay!” Evan shouted. 

The enormous dog panted hard, his tail wagging furiously. 

Oh, no! Evan thought in horror. He wants to play! 

“Sit!” Evan screamed. “Sit!” 

But Trigger didn’t know how to sit. For ten years—seventy dog 
years!—Evan had tried to teach Trigger to sit on command. 

But Trigger just didn’t get it. 

“Where did you find the Monster Blood?” Evan demanded. “We 
all saw it disappear into thin air. Gone. It was just gone. You know 
that stuff makes you grow. And grow and grow and grow. Where did 
you find it?” 

Trigger tilted his big head at an angle, as if trying to understand 
Evan’s words. Then, wagging his huge tail excitedly, he started to run 
to Evan. 

No! Evan thought. He’s going to jump on me! He’s going to jump! 
If he jumps, he’ll crush me! 

An enormous glob of drool escaped Trigger’s open mouth and hit 
the carpet with a loud smack. 

“Sit!” Evan cried, his voice choked with panic. “Sit, boy! Sit!” 


Trigger hesitated, staring down at Evan. To Evan's horror, the dog 
was growing even bigger. Trigger was now as tall as a horse! 

Where did he find the container of Monster Blood? Evan 
wondered, his back pressed against the wall. Where? 

The dog's brown eyes gaped at Evan like shimmering, dark pools. 
Trigger uttered another deafening bark that shook the whole house. 

“Yuck!” Evan cried, squeezing his nose with two fingers. The 
dog’s breath rushed at him like a strong wind. And it smelled as sour 
as a dead mouse. 

“Back! Get back, Trigger!” Evan pleaded. 

But Trigger had never learned that command, either. 

Without warning, the giant dog leaped at Evan. 

“Down! Down!” Evan shrieked. 

Trigger’s mouth gaped open. The dog’s huge tongue licked the 
side of Evan’s face. The tongue felt scratchy and hot. Evan’s carrot- 
colored hair was matted down with sticky dog saliva. 

“No—please!” Evan screamed. “I’m only twelve! I’m too young to 
die!” 

He started to scream again. But Trigger’s big teeth clamped 
around his waist, cutting off his breath. 

“Trigger—put me down! Put me down!” Evan choked out. 

The dog’s wagging tail sent a lamp crashing to the floor. 

The teeth held Evan gently but firmly. He felt himself being lifted 
off the floor. 

“Put me down! Put me down!” 

Why wouldn’t the stupid dog listen? 

Evan thrashed his arms and legs frantically, trying to squirm free. 
But Trigger held on tightly. 

The dog’s enormous paws pounded on the carpet. He carried Evan 
through the hall and across the kitchen. Then he lowered his head and 
butted the kitchen screen door open. 

The door slammed hard behind them. Trigger began trotting over 
the grass. 

“Bad dog! Bad dog!” Evan cried. His voice came out in a tiny 
squeak. 

Had Trigger grown even bigger? 

Evan was at least three feet off the ground now! 

“Put me down! Down!” he cried. 

Evan watched the green grass of the back yard bounce beneath 
him. Trigger was panting as he walked. The panting sounds made 
Evan’s whole body vibrate. He realized his jeans and T-shirt were 
soaked from dog saliva. Trigger doesn’t mean to hurt me, Evan told 


himself. He's just being playful. Thank goodness he's such an old dog. 
His teeth aren’t very sharp. 

The dog stopped at the edge of the flower garden in the back of 
the yard. He lowered Evan nearly to the ground, but didn’t let go. 

His paws began to churn up the soft dirt. 

“Let me down!” Evan shrieked. “Trigger—listen to me!” 

Breathing hard, his hot, sour breath pouring over Evan, the big 
dog continued to dig. 

A wave of horror swept over Evan as he realized what Trigger 
was doing. “No!” Evan shrieked. “Don’t bury me, Trigger!” 

The dog dug faster, its front paws churning furiously. The soft dirt 
flew past Evan’s face. 

“Tm not a bone!” Evan cried frantically. “Trigger—I’m not a 
bone! Don’t bury me, Trigger! Please—don’t bury me!” 


“Don't bury me. Please don't bury me!” Evan murmured. 

He heard laughter. 

He raised his head and glanced around—and realized that he 
wasn’t home in his back yard. He was sitting in his assigned seat in 
the third row near the window in Mr. Murphy’s science class. 

And Mr. Murphy was standing right at Evan’s side, his enormous, 
round body blocking the sunlight from the window. “Earth calling 
Evan! Earth calling Evan!” Mr. Murphy called, cupping his chubby 
pink hands over his mouth to make a megaphone. 

The kids all laughed. 

Evan could feel his face growing hot. “S-sorry,” he stammered. 

“You seem to have been somewhere in Daydream Land,” Mr. 
Murphy said, his tiny black eyes twinkling merrily. 

“Yes,” Evan replied solemnly. “I was dreaming about Monster 
Blood. I—I can’t stop thinking about it.” 

Ever since his frightening adventure the past summer with the 
green, sticky stuff, Evan had been dreaming and daydreaming about 
it. 

“Evan, please,” Mr. Murphy said softly. He shook his round, pink 
head and made a “tsk-tsk” sound. 

“Monster Blood is real!” Evan blurted out angrily. 

The kids laughed again. 

Mr. Murphy’s expression grew stern. His tiny eyes locked onto 
Evan’s. “Evan, I am a science teacher. You don’t expect a science 
teacher to believe that you found a can of sticky green gunk in a toy 
store that makes things grow and grow.” 

“Y-yes, I do,” Evan insisted. 

“Maybe a science-fiction teacher would believe it,” Mr. Murphy 
replied, grinning at his own joke. “Not a science teacher.” 

“Well, yowre dumb!” Evan cried. 

He didn’t mean to say it. He knew immediately that he had just 
made a major mistake. 

He heard gasps all around the big classroom. 

Mr. Murphy’s pink face darkened until it looked like a red 
balloon. But he didn’t lose his temper. He clasped his chubby hands 
over the big stomach of his green sportshirt, and Evan could see him 
silently counting to ten. 

“Evan, you’re a new student here, isn’t that right?” he asked 


finally. His face slowly returned to its normal pink color. 

“Yes,” Evan replied, his voice just above a whisper. “My family 
just moved to Atlanta this fall.” 

“Well, perhaps you’re not familiar with the way things work here. 
Perhaps at your old school the teachers liked it when you called them 
dumb. Perhaps you called your teachers ugly names all day long. 
Perhaps—” 

“No, sir,” Evan interrupted, lowering his head. “It just slipped 
out.” 

Laughter rang through the classroom. Mr. Murphy glared sternly 
at Evan, his face twisted in an angry frown. 

Give me a break, Evan thought unhappily. Glancing quickly 
around the room, Evan saw a sea of grinning faces. 

I think I’m in trouble again, Evan thought glumly. Why can’t I 
keep my big mouth shut? 

Mr. Murphy glanced up at the wall clock. “School is nearly over,” 
he said. “Why don’t you do us all a little favor, Evan, to make up for 
the time you made us waste today?” 

Uh oh, Evan thought darkly. Here it comes. 

“When the bell rings, go put your books away in your locker,” Mr. 
Murphy instructed. “Then come back here and clean Cuddles’ cage.” 

Evan groaned. 

His eyes darted to the hamster cage against the wall. Cuddles was 
scratching around in the wood shavings on the cage floor. 

Not the hamster! Evan thought unhappily. 

Evan hated Cuddles. And Mr. Murphy knew it. This was the third 
time Mr. Murphy had made Evan stay after school and clean out the 
gross, disgusting cage. 

“Perhaps while you clean the hamster cage,” Mr. Murphy said, 
returning to his desk, “you can think about how to do better in science 
class, Evan.” 

Evan jumped to his feet. “I won’t do it!” he cried. 

He heard shocked gasps all around him. 

“T hate Cuddles!” Evan screamed. “I hate that stupid, fat hamster!” 

As everyone stared in amazed horror, Evan ran over to the cage, 
pulled open the door, and grabbed Cuddles up in one hand. 

Then, with an easy, graceful motion, he flung the hamster across 
the room—and out the open window. 


Evan knew he was having another daydream. 

He didn't jump up screaming and throw the hamster out the 
window. 

He only thought about it. Everyone thinks about doing crazy, wild 
things once in a while. 

But Evan would never do anything that crazy. 

Instead, he said, “Okay, Mr. Murphy.” Then he sat quietly in his 
seat, staring out the window at the puffy white clouds in the bright 
blue sky. 

He could see his own reflection staring back at him in the glass. 
His curly, carrot-colored hair looked darker in the reflection. So did 
the freckles that dotted his cheeks. 

His expression was mournful. He hated being made fun of in front 
of the entire class. 

Why am I always getting myself into trouble? he wondered. Why 
can’t Mr. Murphy ever give me a break? Didn’t the teacher realize 
how hard it was to be the new kid in school? How am I supposed to 
make new friends if Murphy is always making me look like a total jerk 
in class? 

Bad enough that no one believed him about the Monster Blood. 

Evan had eagerly told the kids in his new school about it. How he 
had stayed with his great-aunt the past summer. How he and a girl he 
met named Andy had found the blue container of Monster Blood in a 
creepy, old toy store. 

And how the green, yucky Monster Blood had started to grow and 
grow. How it had bubbled out of its container, outgrown a bucket, 
outgrown a bath tub! And just kept growing and growing as if it were 
alive! 

And Evan had told kids how Trigger had eaten just a little of the 
Monster Blood—and had grown nearly as big as a house! 

It was such a frightening, amazing story. Evan was sure his new 
friends would find it really cool. 

But, instead, they just thought he was weird. 

No one believed him. They laughed at him and told him he had a 
sick imagination. 

Evan became known around his new school as the kid who made 
up stupid stories. 

If only I could prove to them that the story is true, Evan often 
thought sadly. If only I could show them the Monster Blood. 


But the mysterious green gunk had vanished from sight before 
Evan left his great-aunt’s house. Not a trace of it had been left. Not a 
trace. 

The bell rang. Everyone jumped up and headed for the door, 
talking and laughing. 

Evan knew that a lot of his classmates were laughing at him. 
Ignoring them, Evan picked up his backpack and started to the door. 

“Hurry back, Evan,” Mr. Murphy called from behind his desk. 
“Cuddles is waiting!” 

Evan growled under his breath and stepped out into the crowded 
hallway. If Murphy loves that stupid hamster so much, why doesn't he 
ever clean out the cage? he wondered bitterly. 

A group of kids laughed loudly as Evan passed by. Were they 
laughing at him? Evan couldn’t tell. 

He started jogging to his locker—when something hit his leg just 
above the ankle. His feet flew out from under him, and he toppled 
face down onto the hard tile floor. 

“Hey—!” Evan cried angrily. 

He stared up at a big, tough-looking kid from his class named 
Conan Barber. All the kids called him Conan the Barbarian. For good 
reason. 

Conan was twelve, but he looked about twenty years older! He 
was taller and wider and stronger and meaner than any kid in the 
school. 

He wasn’t a bad-looking guy, Evan grudgingly admitted. He had 
wavy, blond hair, blue eyes, and a handsome face. He was very 
athletic-looking, and played all the sports at school. 

He was an okay guy, Evan thought wistfully. 

Except that he had one very bad habit. Conan loved to live up to 
his nickname. 

He loved being Conan the Barbarian. 

He loved strutting around, pounding kids who weren’t his size— 
which included everyone! 

Evan had not hit it off with Conan. 

He met Conan on the playground a few weeks after moving to 
Atlanta. Eager to make a good impression, Evan told him the whole 
Monster Blood story. 

Conan didn’t like the story. He stared back at Evan with his cold, 
blue eyes for a long, long time. Then his expression hardened, and he 
murmured through clenched teeth: “We don’t like wise guys down 
here in Atlanta.” 

He gave Evan a pretty good pounding that day. 

Evan had tried to stay away from Conan ever since. But it wasn’t 


easy. 

Now he gazed up at Conan from his position on the floor. “Hey— 
why’d you trip me?” Evan demanded shrilly. 

Conan grinned down at him and shrugged. “It was an accident.” 

Evan tried to decide whether it was safer to stand up or to stay 
down on the floor. If I stand up, he’ll punch me, he thought. If I stay 
down here, he'll step on me. 

Tough choice. 

He didn’t get to make it. Conan reached down and, with one 
hand, pulled Evan to his feet. 

“Give me a break, Conan!” Evan pleaded. “Why can’t you leave 
me alone?” 

Conan shrugged again. It was one of his favorite replies. His blue 
eyes twinkled merrily. “You’re right, Evan,” he said, his grin fading. “I 
shouldn’t have tripped you.” 

“Yeah,” Evan agreed, straightening his T-shirt. 

“So you can pay me back,” Conan offered. 

“Huh?” Evan gaped at him. 

Conan stuck out his massive chest. “Go ahead. Hit me in the 
stomach. Pl let you.” 

“Whoa. No way,” Evan replied, trying to back up. He stumbled 
into a group of kids. 

“Go ahead,” Conan urged, following after him. “Hit me in the 
stomach. As hard as you can. It’s only fair.” 

Evan studied his expression. “You really mean it?” 

Conan nodded, tight-lipped. He stuck out his chest. “As hard as 
you can. Go ahead. I won't hit back. I promise.” 

Evan hesitated. Should he go ahead and do it? 

I may never get a chance like this again, he thought. 

A lot of kids were watching, Evan realized. 

If I hit him really hard, if I hurt him, if I make him cry out—then 
maybe kids around here will have a little respect for me. 

I'll be Evan the Giant Killer. The guy who pounded Conan the 
Barbarian. 

He balled his hand into a tight fist and raised it. 

“Is that your fist?” Conan cried, laughing. 

Evan nodded. 

“Oooh—this is going to hurt!” Conan cried sarcastically. He made 
his knees tremble. 

Everyone laughed. 

I may surprise him, Evan thought angrily. 

“Go ahead. As hard as you can,” Conan urged. He sucked in a 


deep breath and held it. 

Evan pulled his arm back and swung his fist as hard as he could. 

The fist made a solid thud as it hit Conan's stomach. 

It felt like hitting a concrete wall. 

Evan's hand throbbed with pain. 

“Hey—!” a man’s voice called angrily. 

Startled, Evan spun around—to see Mr. Murphy glaring at him. 

“No fighting!” Mr. Murphy yelled at Evan. 

The teacher came bouncing up to them and stepped between the 
two boys. Huffing for breath, he turned to Conan. “Why did Evan hit 
you?” he demanded. 


Conan shrugged. His blue eyes went wide and innocent. “I don't know, 
Mr. Murphy,” he replied in a tiny, forlorn voice. “Evan just walked up 
and hit me as hard as he could.” 

Conan rubbed his stomach and uttered a short whimper. “Ow. He 
really hurt me.” 

Mr. Murphy narrowed his beady black eyes at Evan. His chubby 
face turned bright red again. “Evan, I saw the whole thing. I really 
don’t understand you,” he said softly. 

“But Mr. Murphy—” Evan started. 

The teacher raised a hand to silence him. “If you were angry 
about what happened in class,” Mr. Murphy said, “you shouldn’t take 
it out on other kids.” 

Conan rubbed his stomach tenderly. “I hope Evan didn't break 
anything!” he murmured. 

“Do you want to see the nurse?” Mr. Murphy asked. 

Conan shook his head. Evan could see he was having trouble 
keeping a straight face. “Pll be okay,” he said, and staggered away. 

What a phony! Evan thought bitterly. 

Did Conan know the whole time that Murphy was standing there? 
Probably. 

“Go take care of Cuddles,” Mr. Murphy told Evan, frowning. “And 
try to shape up, Evan. I’m going to be watching you.” 

Evan muttered a reply and trudged back into the classroom. 
Sunlight streamed in through the wall of windows. A strong breeze 
made the window shade flap over the open window near the teacher's 
desk. 

Feeling angry and upset, his stomach churning, Evan made his 
way through the empty room to the hamster cage. Cuddles wrinkled 
his nose in greeting. The hamster knew the routine by now. 

Evan gazed into the metal cage at the brown-and-white creature. 
Why do people think hamsters are cute? he wondered. 

Because they wrinkle their noses? Because they run around and 
around on wheels like total jerks? Because of their cute little buck 
teeth? 

Cuddles stared up at him with his little black eyes. 

He has Mr. Murphy’s eyes, Evan thought, chuckling to himself. 
Maybe that’s why Murphy likes him so much. 

“Okay, okay. So you’re kind of cute,” Evan told the hamster. “But 


I know your secret. You’re just a big fat rat in disguise!” 

Cuddles wrinkled his nose again in reply. 

With a loud sigh, Evan went to work. Holding his breath because 
he hated the smell, he pulled out the bottom tray. 

“You’re a messy little guy,” he told the hamster. “When are you 
going to learn to clean up your own room?” 

Still holding his breath, he dumped out the old newspaper 
shavings and replaced them with fresh shavings from the box in the 
supply closet. 

He returned the bottom tray to its place as Cuddles watched with 
great interest. Then he poured fresh water into the water bottle. 

“How about some sunflower seeds?” Evan asked. He began to feel 
a little more cheerful, knowing his job was almost finished. 

He removed the seed cup from the cage and made his way across 
the room to the supply closet to get fresh sunflower seeds. 

“Okay, Cuddles,” he called, “these look yummy!” 

He started to carry the seeds back to the cage. Halfway across the 
room, Evan stopped and uttered a startled gasp. 

The cage door hung wide open. 

The hamster was gone. 


A choking sound escaped Evan's lips as he stared at the empty cage. 

His eyes darted frantically around the room. “Cuddles? Cuddles?” 
he called in a frightened voice. 

Why am I yelling? he asked himself, spinning around in a total 
panic. The dumb hamster doesn't know its name! 

He heard footsteps out in the hall. 

Mr. Murphy? 

No, please—no! Evan pleaded silently. 

Don't let it be Mr. Murphy. Don’t let him return until I have 
Cuddles safely back in his cage. 

Cuddles was Mr. Murphy's most precious possession. He had told 
this to the class time and again. 

Evan knew that if anything happened to Cuddles, Mr. Murphy 
would be on Evan's case for the rest of the year. No—for the rest of 
his life! 

Evan froze in the center of the room, listening hard. 

The footsteps passed by the room. 

Evan started breathing again. 

“Cuddles? Where are you, Cuddles?” he called in a trembling 
voice. “I have some delicious sunflower seeds for you.” 

He spotted the furry, brown-and-white creature on the chalk tray 
under the front chalkboard. 

“There you are! I see you!” Evan whispered, tiptoeing toward it. 

Cuddles was busily chewing on something. A small piece of white 
chalk. 

Evan tiptoed closer. “I have seeds for you, Cuddles,” he 
whispered. “Much tastier than chalk.” 

Cuddles held the stick of chalk in his front paws, turning it as he 
chewed. 

Evan crept closer. Closer. 

“Look. Seeds.” He held the plastic seed cup toward the hamster. 

Cuddles didn’t look up. 

Evan crept up closer. Closer. 

Close enough to dive forward— 

—and miss! 

The hamster dropped the chalk and scampered down the chalk 
tray. 

Evan made another frantic grab—and came up with nothing but 


air. 

Letting out a frustrated groan, Evan saw the hamster dive to the 
floor and scamper behind Mr. Murphy's desk. The hamster's feet 
skidded and slid on the linoleum floor, its toenails clicking loudly. 

“You can’t get away! You're too fat!” Evan cried. He dropped to 
his knees and peered under the desk. 

He could see Cuddles staring back at him from the darkness. The 
animal was breathing rapidly, its sides swelling with each breath. 

“Don’t be scared,” Evan whispered soothingly. “I’m going to put 
you back in your nice, safe cage.” 

He crawled quickly to the desk. 

The hamster stared back at him, breathing hard. It didn’t move— 
until Evan reached for him. Then Cuddles scampered away, his tiny 
paws sliding on the floor. 

Evan jumped angrily to his feet. “Cuddles—what’s your 
problem?” he demanded loudly. “This isn’t a stupid game!” 

It wasn’t a game at all, Evan knew. 

If he didn’t get the hamster back in the cage, Mr. Murphy would 
flunk him for sure. Or suspend him from school. Or get his family 
kicked out of Atlanta! 

Calm down, Evan urged himself. Don’t panic. 

He took a deep breath and held it. 

Then he saw the hamster on the window ledge just inside the 
open window. 

Okay, Evan—go ahead and panic! he told himself. 

This was definitely panic time. 

He tried to call to the hamster. But his voice came out a choked 
whisper. 

Swallowing hard, Evan edged slowly toward the window ledge. 

“Come here, Cuddles,” he whispered. “Please, Cuddles—come 
here.” 

Closer, closer. 

Almost close enough to reach the hamster. 

Almost close enough. 

“Don’t move, Cuddles. Don’t move.” 

He reached out his hand slowly. Slowly. 

Cuddles glanced back at him with his soft black eyes. 

Then the hamster jumped out the window. 


Evan hung back for only a second. 

Then he jumped out the window after the hamster. 

Luckily, the science classroom was on the ground floor. Evan 
landed face down in a low evergreen hedge. Struggling and squirming, 
it took him a while to climb to his feet. 

He took several steps over the grass, then turned and stared back 
along the bottom of the long hedge. “Cuddles—are you under there?” 

Evan squatted down to get a better view. The hedge stretched the 
entire length of the school building. Cuddles could hide under there 
forever. 

And if I don’t find him, Evan told himself bitterly, Pd better hide 
under there forever, too! 

To the right, Evan could hear voices from the playground. Happy, 
shouting voices. Carefree voices. 

Still squatting, he turned toward the happy voices—and saw a fat 
brown ball wobbling over the grass toward the playground. 

No. Not a ball. “Cuddles!” 

That fat hamster isn’t getting away this time! Evan decided, 
jumping up and starting to chase after the creature. Pll catch him if I 
have to sit on him! 

A picture flashed into Evan’s mind of Cuddles, flat as a pancake 
after Evan had sat upon him. A little, round, furry hamster rug. 

Despite his panic, the thought of Cuddles as a rug brought a smile 
to Evan’s perspiring face. 

As he ran, he kept his eyes on Cuddles. The hamster was 
wobbling rapidly over the grass toward the playground. 

“Oh, no!” Evan cried out in horror as Cuddles darted in front of 
two girls speeding across the grass on bikes. 

Laughing together, they didn’t even see the hamster. 

Cuddles is about to be road kill! Evan thought, shrinking back. He 
shut his eyes and waited for the squish. 

But the bikes rolled smoothly on. And when they had passed, 
Evan spotted Cuddles continuing his journey to the playground 
unharmed. 

“Cuddles—come back here!” he shouted furiously. 

The hamster appeared to speed up. He tumbled onto the baseball 
diamond, all four paws scurrying over the dirt of the third-base line. 

Several kids stopped their game to stare. 


“Stop him! Grab the hamster!” Evan shouted desperately. 

But the kids only laughed. 

“Know how to catch him?” a joker named Robbie Greene called 
to Evan. “Make a sound like a sunflower seed!” 

“That's an old joke!” a girl called to Robbie. 

“Thanks for your help!” Evan shouted sarcastically. He ran over 
the pitching mound and had crossed second base when he realized he 
had lost sight of Cuddles. 

He stopped and spun around, his heart thudding wildly in his 
chest. He searched the grass of the infield. “Where—where is he?” he 
stammered. “Do you see him?” 

But the kids had returned to their softball game. 

I can’t lose him now! Evan told himself, choked with panic. I 
can’t! 

Sweat poured down Evan’s forehead. He mopped it with one 
hand, brushing back his curly, red hair. His T-shirt clung wetly to his 
back. His mouth felt dry as cotton. 

Jogging into the outfield, he searched the grass. 

“Cuddles?” 

No sign of him. 

A round, brownish lump in the grass turned out to be someone’s 
baseball glove. 

“Cuddles?” 

A kickball game was underway on the opposite diamond. Kids 
were shouting and cheering. Evan saw Bree Douglas, a girl from his 
class, slide hard into second base just before the ball. 

“Has—has anyone seen Cuddles?” Evan gasped, trotting onto the 
diamond. 

Kids turned to gawk at him. 

“Out here?” Bree called, brushing off the knees of her jeans. 
“Evan, did you take the hamster out for a walk?” 

Everyone laughed. Scornful laughter. 

“He—he got away,” Evan replied, panting. 

“Is this what you’re looking for?” a familiar voice called. 

Evan turned to see Conan Barber, a pleased smile on his 
handsome face, his blue eyes gleaming. 

Gripping it by its furry back, Conan held the hamster up in one 
hand. Cuddles’ four legs scurried in midair. 

“You—you caught him!” Evan cried gratefully. He let out a long 
sigh of relief. “He jumped out the window.” 

Evan reached out both hands for the hamster, but Conan jerked 
Cuddles out of his reach. “Prove it’s yours,” Conan said, grinning. 


“Huh?” 

“Can you identify it?” Conan demanded, his eyes burning into 
Evan’s, challenging Evan. “Prove this hamster is yours.” 

Evan swallowed hard and glanced around. 

Kids from the kickball game were huddling near. They were all 
grinning, delighted with Conan’s mean joke. 

Evan sighed wearily and reached again for the hamster. 

But Conan was at least a foot taller than Evan. He lifted the 
hamster high above Evan’s head, out of Evan’s reach. 

“Prove it’s yours,” he repeated, flashing the others a grin. 

“Give me a break, Conan,” Evan pleaded. “I’ve been chasing this 
stupid hamster for hours. I just want to get him back in his cage 
before Mr. Murphy—” 

“Do you have a license for him?” Conan demanded, still holding 
the squirming hamster above Evan’s head. “Show me the license.” 

Evan jumped and stretched both hands up, trying to grab Cuddles 
away. 

But Conan was too fast for him. He dodged away. Evan grabbed 
air. 

Some kids laughed. 

“Give him the hamster, Conan,” Bree called. She hadn’t moved 
from second base. 

Conan’s cold blue eyes sparkled excitedly. “Pll tell you how you 
can get the hamster back,” he told Evan. 

“Huh?” Evan glared at him. He was getting really tired of Conan’s 
game. 

“Here’s how to get old Cuddles back,” Conan continued, holding 
the hamster tightly against his chest in one hand and petting its back 
with the other. “Sing a song for it.” 

“Hey—no way!” Evan snapped. “Give it to me, Conan!” 

Evan could feel his face growing even hotter. His knees started to 
tremble. He hoped no one could see it. 

“Sing ‘Row, Row, Row Your Boat’, and Pll give you Cuddles. 
Promise,” Conan said, smirking. 

Some kids laughed. They moved closer, eager to see what Evan 
would do. 

Evan shook his head. “No way.” 

“Come on,” Conan urged softly, stroking the hamster’s brown fur. 
“Row, Row, Row Your Boat.’ Just a few choruses. You know how it 
goes, don’t you?” 

More cruel laughter from the others. 

Conan’s grin grew wider. “Come on, Evan. You like to sing, don’t 


you?” 

“No, I hate singing,” Evan muttered, his eyes on Cuddles. 

“Hey, don’t be modest,” Conan insisted. “Pll bet you’re a great 
singer. Are you a soprano or an alto?” 

Loud laughter. 

Evan’s hands tightened into hard fists at his sides. He wanted to 
punch Conan, and punch him and punch him. He wanted to wipe the 
grin off Conan’s handsome face with his fists. 

But he remembered what it had felt like to punch Conan. It had 
felt like hitting the side of a truck. 

He took a deep breath. “If I sing the stupid song, will you really 
give me back the hamster?” 

Conan didn’t reply. 

Evan suddenly realized that Conan wasn’t looking at him 
anymore. No one was. They had all raised their eyes over Evan’s 
shoulder. 

Confused, Evan spun around—to face Mr. Murphy. 

“What is going on here?” the teacher demanded, his tiny black 
eyes moving from Evan to Conan, then back to Evan. 

Before Evan could reply, Conan held up the hamster. “Here’s 
Cuddles, Mr. Murphy,” Conan said. “Evan let him get away. But I 
rescued Cuddles just as he was going to get run over.” 

Mr. Murphy let out a horrified gasp. “Run over?” he cried. 
“Cuddles? Run over?” 

The teacher reached out his chubby pink hands and took the 
hamster from Conan. He held the hamster against his bulging shirt 
and petted it, making soothing sounds to it. 

“Thank you, Conan,” Mr. Murphy said after calming Cuddles. He 
glared at Evan. “I’m very disappointed in you, Evan.” 

Evan started to defend himself. But Mr. Murphy raised a hand to 
silence him. “We’ll talk about it tomorrow. Right now I must get poor 
Cuddles back into his cage.” 

Evan slumped to the ground. He watched Mr. Murphy carry the 
hamster back to the school building. Mr. Murphy waddles just like the 
hamster, Evan realized. 

Normally, that thought would have cheered him up. 

But Evan was far too unhappy to be cheered up by anything. 

Conan had embarrassed him in front of all the others. And the 
big, grinning hulk had managed to get Evan in trouble with Mr. 
Murphy twice in one afternoon! 

The kickball game had started up again. Evan climbed slowly to 
his feet and began trudging to the school building to get his backpack. 

He couldn’t decide who he hated more—Cuddles or Conan. 


He had a sudden picture of Cuddles stuffed inside a muffin tin, 
being baked in an oven. 

Even that lovely thought didn’t cheer Evan up. 

He pulled his backpack out of the locker and slung it over his 
shoulder. Then he slammed the locker shut, the sound clanging down 
the empty hallway. 

He pushed open the front door and headed for home, walking 
slowly, lost in his unhappy thoughts. 

What a horrible day, he told himself. At least nothing worse could 
happen to me today. 

He had just crossed the street and was making his way on the 
sidewalk in front of a tall hedge—when someone leaped out at him, 
grabbed his shoulders hard from behind, and pulled him roughly to 
the ground. 

Evan let out a frightened cry and gazed into his attacker's face. 
“You!” he cried. 


“Here’s a little advice, Evan,” Andy said, grinning down at him. “Don’t 
go out for the wrestling team.” 

“Andy!” Evan cried, staring up at her in surprise. “What are you 
doing here?” 

She reached out both hands and helped tug him to his feet. Then 
she tossed back her short, brown hair with a flick of her head. Her 
brown eyes flashed excitedly. 

“Didn’t you read any of my letters?” she demanded. 

Evan had met Andy the past summer, when he’d stayed with his 
great-aunt for a few weeks. He and Andy had become good friends. 

She was with him when he bought the container of Monster 
Blood. She shared the whole frightening Monster Blood adventure 
with him. 

Evan liked Andy because she was funny, and fearless, and kind of 
crazy. He never could predict what she would do next! 

She didn’t even dress like other girls Evan knew. Andy loved 
bright colors. Right now she was wearing a sleeveless magenta T-shirt 
over bright yellow shorts, which matched her yellow sneakers. 

“I told you in my last letter that my parents were sent overseas for 
a year,” Andy said, giving Evan a playful shove. “I told you they were 
sending me to Atlanta to live with my aunt and uncle. I told you I’d be 
living just three blocks away from you!” 

“I know. I know,” Evan replied, rolling his eyes. “I just didn’t 
expect to see you jump out of the hedge at me.” 

“Why not?” Andy demanded, her dark eyes exploring his. 

Evan didn’t know how to answer that question. 

“Glad to see me?” Andy asked. 

“No,” he joked. 

She pulled up a thick blade of grass and stuck it in the corner of 
her mouth. They began walking toward Evan’s house. 

‘Tm starting at your school on Monday,” she told him, chewing 
on the blade of grass. 

“Thrills and chills,” he replied, snickering. 

She shoved him off the sidewalk. “I thought people were 
supposed to be polite in the South.” 

“Tm new here,” Evan replied. 

“How’s Trigger?” she asked, kicking a pebble across the sidewalk. 

“Good,” Evan told her. 


“Like to talk a lot?” she asked sarcastically. 

“Pm in a bad mood,” he confessed. “It hasn't been the greatest 
day.” 

“It couldn’t be as bad as the day the Monster Blood went berserk!” 
Andy exclaimed. 

Evan groaned. “Don't mention Monster Blood to me. Please!” 

She studied him. Her expression turned serious. “What's wrong, 
Evan? You look really upset,” she said. “Don't you like it here?” 

He shook his head. “Not much.” 

As they walked, he told her about all the trouble he was having in 
his new school. He told her about Mr. Murphy and Cuddles, and how 
the teacher was always on his case. 

And he told her about Conan the Barbarian, and how Conan was 
always picking on him, always getting him into trouble, always 
playing tricks on him and making him look bad. 

“And no one will believe me about the Monster Blood,” Evan 
added. 

They were standing at the bottom of his driveway. They glanced 
up at Evan's new house, a two-story red brick house with a sloping red 
tile roof. The late afternoon sun dipped behind a large puff of cloud, 
and a broad shadow rolled across the lawn. 

Andy's mouth dropped open. The blade of grass fell out. “You told 
kids about the Monster Blood?” she asked in surprise. 

Evan nodded. “Yeah, why not? It's a cool story, isn’t it?” 

“And you expected kids to believe you?” Andy cried, slapping her 
forehead. “Didn’t they just think you were weird?” 

“Yeah,” Evan replied bitterly. “They all think I’m weird.” 

Andy laughed. “Well, you are weird!” 

“Thanks a bunch, Annnndrea!” Evan muttered. He knew she 
hated to be called by her real name. 

“Don’t call me Andrea,” she replied sharply. She raised a fist. “T’ll 
pound you.” 

“Annnnnndrea,” he repeated. He ducked away as she swung her 
fist. “You punch like a girl!” he exclaimed. 

“You'll bleed like a boy!” she threatened, laughing. 

He stopped. He suddenly had an idea. “Hey—you can tell 
everyone I’m not weird!” 

“Huh? Why would I do that?” Andy demanded. 

“No. Really,” Evan said excitedly. “You can tell everyone at 
school that the Monster Blood was real. That you were there. That you 
saw it.” 

Andy’s expression suddenly changed. Her dark eyes lit up, and a 
sly grin crossed her face. “I can do better than that,” she said 


mysteriously. 

Evan grabbed her shoulder. “Huh? What do you mean? What do 
you mean you can do better?” 
“You'll see,” she replied, teasing him. “I brought something with 
me.” 

“What? What is it? What do you mean?” Evan demanded. 

“Meet me tomorrow after school,” she told him. “At that little 
park over there.” 

She pointed to the next block. A narrow park, only a few blocks 
long, ran along the bank of a shallow creek. 

“But what is it?” Evan cried. 

She laughed. “I love torturing you!” she declared. “But it’s a little 
too easy.” 

Then she turned and headed down the street, running at full 
speed. 

“Andy—wait!” Evan called. “What have you got? What did you 
bring?” 

She didn’t even turn around. 


Evan dreamed about Monster Blood that night. 

He dreamed about it nearly every night. 

Tonight he dreamed that his dad had eaten a glob of it. Now Mr. 
Ross wanted to go to his office, but he had grown too big to fit 
through the door. 

“You're in trouble now, Evan!” Mr. Ross bellowed, making the 
whole house shake. “Big trouble!” 

Big trouble. 

The words stuck in Evan’s mind as he sat up in bed and tried to 
shake away the dream. 

The curtains flapped silently in front of his open bedroom 
window. Pale yellow stars dotted the charcoal sky. Staring hard, Evan 
could see the Big Dipper. Or was it the Little Dipper? He never could 
remember. 

Shutting his eyes and settling back on the pillow, Evan thought 
about Andy. He was glad she had come to stay in Atlanta for a while. 
She could be a real pain. But she was also a lot of fun. 

What did she want to show him in the park after school? 

Probably nothing, Evan guessed. It was probably just a dumb 
joke. Andy loved dumb jokes. 

How can I get her to tell the kids at school about Monster Blood? 
he wondered. How can I get Andy to tell everyone that I didn’t make 
it up, that it’s true? 

He was still thinking about this problem as he fell back into a 
restless sleep. 


The next day at school wasn’t much better than the last. 

Somehow during free reading period, Conan had crept under the 
table and tied Evan’s sneaker laces together. When Evan got up to go 
to the water fountain, he fell flat on his face. He scraped a knee, but 
no one cared. The kids laughed for hours. 

“Evan’s mommy tied his shoes funny this morning!” Conan told 
everyone. And they laughed even harder. 

In science class, Mr. Murphy called Evan over to the hamster 
cage. “Look at poor Cuddles,” the teacher said, shaking his round head 
solemnly. 

Evan peered down into the metal cage. Cuddles was curled up in 
a corner under a pile of shavings. The hamster was trembling and 
breathing in short gasps. 


“Poor Cuddles has been like that ever since yesterday,” Mr. 
Murphy told Evan with an accusing frown. “Cuddles is sick because of 
your carelessness.” 

“J—I’m sorry,” Evan stammered. He stared hard at the quivering 
hamster. You’re faking—aren’t you, Cuddles? Evan thought. You're 
faking just to get me in trouble! 

The hamster twitched and stared up at him with mournful, black 
eyes. 

When Evan sat back down in his seat, he felt cold water seep 
through the back of his jeans. With a startled cry, he jumped right 
back up. Someone—probably Conan—had poured a cup of water on 
his chair. 

That had the class laughing for at least ten minutes. They stopped 
only when Mr. Murphy threatened to keep everyone after school. 

“Sit down, Evan,” the teacher ordered. 

“But, Mr. Murphy—” Evan started. 

“Sit down—now!” Mr. Murphy insisted. 

Evan dropped back down into the wet chair. What choice did he 
have? 


Andy was waiting for Evan by the trickling brown creek that rolled 
through the tiny park. The old sassafras trees bent and whispered in a 
hot breeze. A tall Georgia pine leaned over the water as if trying to 
reach across the creek. 

Andy was wearing a bright blue T-shirt over lime-green short- 
shorts. She had been staring at her reflection in the muddy creek 
water. She spun around smiling as Evan called to her. 

“Hey, how’s it going?” he called. He stepped up beside her and 
dropped his backpack to the ground. 

“How was school?” Andy asked. 

“Same as always,” Evan replied, sighing. Then his expression 
brightened. “What did you bring?” he asked eagerly. 

“You'll see.” She clasped a hand over his eyes. “Shut your eyes, 
Evan. And don’t open them until I say.” 

He obediently shut his eyes. But when she pulled her hand away, 
he opened them a tiny crack, just enough to see. He watched her go 
behind the pine tree and pick up a small brown paper bag. 

She carried the bag over to him. “You’re peeking—aren’t you?” 
she accused him. 

“Maybe,” he confessed, grinning. 

She punched him playfully in the stomach. He cried out and his 
eyes shot open. “What’s in the bag?” 

Grinning, Andy handed the bag to him. 


He pulled it open, peered inside—and his mouth dropped open in 
shock. 

The familiar blue can, about the size of a can of soup. 

“Andy—you—you—” Evan stammered, still staring wide-eyed 
into the bag. 

He reached in and pulled out the plastic can. 

He read the faded label: MONSTER BLOOD. 

Then he read the words in tiny type below it: SURPRISING 
MIRACLE SUBSTANCE. 

“I saved it,” Andy said, beaming proudly. 

Evan couldn’t get over his shock. “You brought Monster Blood! I 
don’t believe it! You brought Monster Blood!” 

“No.” She shook her head. “It’s empty, Evan. The can is empty.” 

His face fell. He sighed in total disappointment. 

“But you can show the can to everyone,” Andy insisted. “That will 
prove you didn’t make it up. It will prove that Monster Blood really 
exists.” 

Evan sighed again. “What good is an empty can?” he groaned. 

He pulled off the top, peered inside—and screamed. 


With a trembling hand, Evan tilted the can so that Andy could see 
inside. 

“Oh, no!” she shrieked, pulling her hands to her cheeks. 

The can was half full. 

Inside, a green glob of gooey Monster Blood shimmered in the 
sunlight like lime jell-o. 

“But it was empty!” Andy protested, staring into the can. “I know 
it was!” 

Evan shook the can. The green glob inside quivered. 

“There must have been a tiny speck in there,” Evan guessed. 
“Down at the bottom of the can. And now it's growing and growing 
again.” 

“Great!” Andy declared. She slapped him on the back so hard, he 
nearly dropped the blue can. 

“Great? What's so great?” he demanded shakily. 

“Now you can show this to the kids at your school,” she replied. 
“Now they’ll have to believe you.” 

“I guess,” Evan replied in a low voice. 

“Oh! I have a better idea!” she exclaimed, her dark eyes lighting 
up mischievously. 

“Uh-oh,” Evan moaned. 

“Slip a little glob of it in that guy Conan’s lunch tomorrow. When 
he starts to grow as big as a hippo, everyone will see that the Monster 
Blood is real.” 

“No way!” Evan cried. He cupped the blue can in both hands, as if 
protecting it from Andy. “Conan is already big enough!” he told her, 
taking a step back. “I don’t want him to grow another inch. Do you 
know what he could do to me if he became a giant?” 

Andy laughed and shrugged. “It was just an idea.” 

“A bad idea,” Evan said sharply. “A really bad idea.” 

“You're no fun,” she teased. She leaped forward and tried to 
wrestle the can from his hands. 

He spun around, turning his back to her, and hunched over, 
protecting the can. 

“Give it to me!” she cried, laughing. She started tickling his sides. 
“Give it! Give it!” 

“No!” he protested, breaking free. He ran to the safety of a tall 
evergreen shrub. 


“Its mine!” Andy declared, coming after him, hands at her waist. 
“If you’re not going to use it, hand it back.” 

Evan stood his ground. His expression turned serious. “Andy, 
don't you remember?” he demanded shrilly. “Don't you remember 
how scary this stuff was? Don't you remember how dangerous it was? 
All the trouble it caused?” 

“So?” she replied, her eyes on the blue can. 

“We have to get rid of it,” Evan told her firmly. “We can’t let it 
out of the can. It will grow and grow and never stop.” 

“But I thought you wanted to show it to the kids to prove that it’s 
real.” 

“No,” Evan interrupted. “I changed my mind. This stuff is too 
dangerous. We have to get rid of it.” He locked his eyes on hers, his 
features tight with fear. “Andy, I’ve had nightmares every night 
because of this stuff. I don’t want any new nightmares.” 

“Okay, okay,” she muttered. She kicked at an upraised tree root. 
Then she handed him the brown paper bag. 

Evan clicked the top back on the can of Monster Blood. Then he 
shoved the can into the bag. “Now how do we get rid of it?” he 
wondered out loud. 

“I know. Dump it in the creek,” Andy suggested. 

Evan shook his head. “No good. What if it gets out and pollutes 
the creek?” 

“This creek is already polluted!” Andy exclaimed. “It’s just a big 
mud puddle!” 

“It isn’t deep enough,” Evan insisted. “Someone will find the can 
and pull it out. We can’t take a chance.” 

“Then how do we get rid of it?” Andy asked, twisting her face in 
concentration. “Hmmmm. We could eat it ourselves. That would get 
rid of it!” 

“Very funny,” Evan muttered, rolling his eyes. 

“Just trying to be helpful,” Andy said. 

“Yow’re about as helpful as a toothache!” Evan shot back. 

“Ha-ha. Remind me to laugh at that sometime,” she replied, 
sticking her tongue out at him. 

“How can we get rid of it?” Evan repeated, gripping the bag in 
both hands. “How?” 

“I know!” a boy’s voice called, startling them both. 

Conan Barber stepped out from behind a tall shrub. 

“You can give it to me!” he declared. He reached out a big, 
powerful-looking hand to grab the bag. 


10 


Evan swung the paper bag behind his back. 

Conan lumbered toward them over the tall grass. His eyes were 
narrowed menacingly at Evan. 

How long has he been hiding there? Evan wondered. Did he hear 
us talk about the Monster Blood? Is that why he wants the bag? 

“Hi, ’m Andy,” Andy chirped brightly. She stepped in between 
the two boys and flashed Conan a smile. 

“Andy is a boy’s name,” Conan said, making a disgusted face. He 
turned his hard stare on her, challenging her. 

“And what kind of a name is Conan?” Andy shot back, returning 
his stare. 

“You know me?” Conan asked, sounding surprised. 

“You’re famous,” Andy replied dryly. 

Conan suddenly remembered Evan. He stuck out his big paw. “PI 
take the bag now.” 

“Why should I give it to you?” Evan demanded, trying to keep his 
voice calm and steady. 

“Because it’s mine,” Conan lied. “I dropped it here.” 

“You dropped an empty bag here?” Evan asked. 

Conan swatted a fly from his blond hair. “It isn’t empty. I saw you 
put something in it. Hand it over. Now.” 

“Well... okay.” Evan handed him the paper bag. Conan eagerly 
reached inside. 

His hand came out empty. 

He peered inside the bag. Empty. 

He stared hard at Andy, then at Evan. 

“I told you it was empty,” Evan said. 

“Guess I made a mistake,” Conan muttered. “Hey, no hard 
feelings. Shake.” Conan reached out his big right hand to Evan. 

Evan reluctantly stuck out his hand. 

Conan slid his hand over Evan’s and began to tighten his grip. 
Harder. Harder. 

Evan’s fingers cracked so loudly, they sounded like a tree falling! 

Conan squeezed Evan’s hand harder and harder until Evan 
screamed in pain. When Conan finally let go, the hand looked like a 
slab of raw hamburger. 

“Nice handshake you got there!” Conan exclaimed, grinning. 

He snapped his finger against Andy’s nose, then headed off 


quickly toward the street, taking long strides, laughing to himself. 

“Great guy,” Andy muttered, rubbing her nose. 

Evan blew on his hand, as if trying to put out a fire. “Maybe I can 
learn to be left-handed,” he murmured. 

“Hey—where’s the Monster Blood?” Andy demanded. 

“I—I dropped it,” Evan replied, still examining his hand. 

“Huh?” She kicked away a clump of weeds and stepped over to 
him. 

“I thought I could shove the can into my back jeans pocket while 
Conan was talking to you,” Evan explained. “But it slipped out of my 
hand. I dropped it.” 

He turned, bent over, and picked it up from the tall grass. “Good 
thing it didn’t roll or anything. Conan would have seen it.” 

“He wouldn’t know what to do with it if he had it,” Andy said. 

“What are we going to do with it?” Evan demanded. “It’s already 
caused us trouble. We’ve got to hide it, or throw it away, or—or—” 

He pulled open the lid. “Oh, wow! Look!” He held the can up to 
Andy’s face. The green goo had grown nearly to the top of the can. 
“It's starting to grow a lot faster. I guess because we exposed it to the 
air.” 

Evan slammed the lid on tight. 

“Let's bury it,” Andy suggested. “Here. Right under this tree. We’ll 
dig a deep hole and bury it.” 

Evan liked the idea. It was simple and quick. 

They squatted down and began digging with their hands. The dirt 
beneath the tree was soft. The hole grew deep before they had worked 
up a sweat. 

Evan dropped the blue can of Monster Blood into the hole. Then 
they quickly covered it with dirt, smoothing it out until it was 
impossible to tell a hole had been dug. 

“This was a good plan,” Andy said, climbing to her feet, playfully 
wiping the dirt off her hands on the back of Evan’s T-shirt. “If we need 
it, we’ll know where it is.” 

Evan’s red hair was matted to his forehead with sweat. He had a 
wide smear of dirt across his freckled forehead. “Huh? Why would we 
need it?” he demanded. 

Andy shrugged. “You never know.” 

“We won't need it,” Evan told her firmly. “We won't.” 

He was very, very wrong. 


11 


“Hey, Dad, what's up?” Evan stepped into the garage. 

Mr. Ross stopped hammering and turned around. He smiled at 
Evan. “Want to see my newest work?” 

“Yeah. Sure,” Evan replied. Every weekend, his father spent hour 
after hour in his garage workshop, banging away on large sheets of 
metal, making what he called his “works”. 

He chiseled and hammered and sawed, and put a lot of effort into 
his sculptures. But to Evan, they all looked like banged-up sheets of 
metal when they were finished. 

Mr. Ross took a few steps back to admire his current project. He 
lowered his heavy mallet in one hand and pointed with the chisel he 
held in his other hand. “I used brass for this one,” he told Evan. “I call 
it ‘Autumn Leaf’.” 

Evan studied it thoughtfully. “It looks like a leaf,” he lied. It looks 
like Dad ruined a perfectly good piece of brass, he thought, trying to 
keep a straight face. 

“It’s not supposed to look like a leaf,” Mr. Ross corrected Evan. 
“Tt’s supposed to look like my impression of a leaf.” 

“Oh.” Evan scratched his curly, red hair as he studied it some 
more. “Neat, Dad,” he said. “I see what you mean.” 

Then something else caught his eye. “Hey—what’s this?” 

Evan carefully stepped over several jagged, bent shards of metal. 
He made his way to another metal sculpture and ran his hand over the 
smooth, shiny surface. It was an enormous aluminum cylinder that 
rested above a flat wooden base. 

“Go ahead. Spin it,” Mr. Ross instructed, smiling proudly. 

Evan pushed the cylinder with both hands. It spun slowly over the 
wooden base. 

“T call it ‘The Wheel’,” his father told him. 

Evan laughed. “That’s cool, Dad. You invented the wheel!” 

“Don’t laugh!” Mr. Ross replied, grinning. “That sculpture was 
accepted at the annual arts competition at your school. I have to take 
it to the auditorium later this week.” 

Evan gave “The Wheel” another spin. “Pll bet no one else made a 
wheel that really spins,” he told his father. “You can’t lose with this, 
Dad,” he teased. 

“Sarcasm is the lowest form of humor,” Mr. Ross muttered with a 
frown. 


Evan said good-bye and made his way out of the garage, stepping 
carefully over the jagged pieces of brass and tin. As he headed to the 
house, he could hear the clang clang clang as his dad hammered away 
on his impression of a leaf. 


In the halls after school on Monday, Evan hurried around a corner and 
bumped right into Andy. “I can’t talk now,” he told her breathlessly. 
“Tm late for basketball tryouts.” 

He glanced down the long hall. It was nearly empty. The gym 
door opened, and he could hear the thump of basketballs against the 
floor. 

“How come you're late?” Andy demanded, blocking his path. 

“Murphy kept me after class,” Evan told her with a groan. “He 
put me on permanent hamster duty. I have to take care of Cuddles 
every afternoon for the rest of my life.” 

“Bad news,” Andy murmured. 

“No. That’s the good news,” Evan replied bitterly. 

“What’s the bad news?” 

“The bad news is that Mr. Murphy is also the basketball coach!” 

“Well, good luck,” she said. “Hope you make the team.” 

Evan ran past her, his heart pounding. 

Mr. Murphy is such a rat, he thought unhappily. He’ll probably 
keep me off the team because I’m late to practice—even though it’s his 
fault I’m late! 

Evan took a deep breath. No. Stop thinking like that, he scolded 
himself. 

Think positive. I’ve got to think positive. 

Sure, I’m not as tall as the other guys. Maybe I’m not as big or as 
strong. But I’m a good basketball player. And I can make this team. 

I can make this team. I know I can! 

Having finished his pep talk to himself, Evan pulled open the 
double gym doors and stepped into the huge, brightly lit gym. 

“Think fast!” a voice called. 

Evan felt his face explode with pain. 

Then everything went black. 


12 


When Evan opened his eyes, he found himself staring up at about 
twenty guys and Mr. Murphy. 

He was stretched out fiat on his back on the gym floor. His face 
still hurt. A lot. 

He reached a hand up and touched his nose. To his dismay, it felt 
like a wilted leaf of lettuce. 

“You okay, Evan?” Mr. Murphy asked quietly. As the teacher 
leaned over Evan, the whistle that was on a string around his neck 
bumped against Evan's chest. 

“Did my face explode?” Evan asked weakly. 

Some of the guys snickered. Mr. Murphy glowered at them 
angrily. Then he turned back to Evan. “Conan hit you in the face with 
the basketball,” he reported. 

“He's got bad reflexes, Coach,” Evan heard Conan say from 
somewhere above him. “He should’ve caught the ball. I really thought 
he’d catch it. But he’s got bad reflexes.” 

“I saw the whole thing,” Conan’s friend, a huge hulk of a kid 
named Biggie Malick, chimed in. “It wasn’t Conan’s fault. Evan 
should’ve caught the ball. It was a perfect pass.” 

Perfect, Evan thought with a sigh. He touched his nose again. This 
time, it felt like a lump of mashed potatoes. At least it isn’t broken, he 
thought glumly. 

Evan’s basketball tryout went downhill from there. 

Mr. Murphy helped him to his feet. “You sure you want to try 
out?” he asked. 

Thanks for the support, Evan thought bitterly. 

“T think I can make the team,” he said. 

But Conan, Biggie, and the other guys had other ideas. 

During the ball-handling tryout, Evan confidently began dribbling 
across the floor. Halfway to the basket, Biggie bumped him hard—and 
Conan stole the ball away. 

They blocked Evan’s shots. They stole his passes. 

They bumped him every time he moved, sending him sprawling 
to the hardwood floor again and again. 

A fast pass from Conan caught Evan in the mouth. 

“Oops! Sorry!” Conan yelled. 

Biggie laughed like a hyena. 

“Defense! I want to see defense!” Mr. Murphy shouted from the 


sidelines. 

Evan lowered himself into a defensive stance. As Conan dribbled 
the ball toward him, Evan prepared to defend the basket. 

Conan drove closer. Closer. 

Evan raised both hands to block Conan's shot. 

But to Evan's surprise, Conan let the ball bounce away. In one 
swift motion, he grabbed Evan by the waist, leaped high in the air, 
and stuffed Evan into the basket. 

“Three points!” Conan shouted in triumph. 

Biggie and the other guys rushed to congratulate Conan, laughing 
and cheering. 

Mr. Murphy had to get a stepladder to help Evan down. 

His hand on Evan's shoulder, the teacher led him to the side. 
“Yow're just not tall enough, Evan,” he said, rubbing his pink chins. 
“Don’t take it personally. Maybe you’ll grow. But for now, you’re just 
not tall enough.” 

Evan didn’t say a word. He lowered his head and sadly slumped 
out of the gym. 

Conan came running up to him at the door. “Hey, Evan, no hard 
feelings,” he said. He stuck out his big, sweaty hand. “Shake.” 


Evan held up his hand to show Andy. “It looks like a wilted petunia,” 
she said. “I can’t believe I fell for Conan’s stupid handshake trick 
twice!” Evan wailed. It was the next afternoon. Evan and Andy had 
walked from school to the small park near their houses. Evan had 
complained about Mr. Murphy and Conan and the other basketball 
players the whole way. 

The late afternoon sun beamed down on them as they walked. 
Andy stopped to watch two monarch butterflies, their black-and-gold 
wings fluttering majestically as they hovered over a patch of blue and 
yellow wildflowers along the creekbed. 

Even the trickling brown creek looked pretty on this bright day. 
Tiny white gnats sparkled like diamonds in the sunlight over the 
shimmering water. 

Evan kicked at a fallen tree branch. Everything looked dark to 
him today. 

Dark and ugly. 

“It just wasn’t fair,” he grumbled, kicking the branch again. “It 
wasn’t a fair tryout. Mr. Murphy should have given me a better 
chance.” 

Andy tsk-tsked, her eyes on the sparkling creek. 

“Someone should teach Mr. Murphy a lesson,” Evan said. “I wish I 
could think of some way of paying him back. I really do.” 


Andy turned to him. A devilish grin crossed her face. “I have a 
plan,” she said softly. “A really neat plan.” 
“What is it?” Evan demanded. 


13 


“What's your idea?” Evan demanded again. 

Andy grinned at him. She was wearing a long, lime-green T-shirt 
over a Day-Glo orange T-shirt, pulled down over baggy blue shorts. 
The sunlight made all the colors so bright, Evan felt like shielding his 
eyes. 

“You might not like it,” Andy said coyly. 

“Try me,” Evan replied. “Come on. Don’t keep me in suspense.” 

“Well...” Her eyes wandered over to the tree where they had 
buried the Monster Blood. “It has to do with the Monster Blood,” she 
said reluctantly. 

He swallowed hard. “That’s okay. Go on.” 

“Well, it’s a pretty simple plan. First, we dig up the Monster 
Blood,” Andy said, watching his reaction. 

“Yeah?” 

“Then we take some to school,” she continued. 

“Yeah?” 

“Then we feed it to Cuddles.” 

Evan’s mouth dropped open. 

“Just a little bit!” Andy quickly explained. “We feed Cuddles a 
tiny glob of it. Just enough to make him the size of a dog.” 

Evan laughed. It was a terrible idea, a truly evil idea—but he 
loved it! 

He slapped Andy on the back. “You’re bad, Andy!” he cried. 
“You're really bad!” 

Andy grinned proudly. “I know.” 

Evan laughed again. “Can you see the look on Murphy’s face 
when he comes in and sees his precious little hamster has grown as 
big as a cocker spaniel? What a riot!” 

“So you'll do it?” Andy asked. 

Evan’s smile faded. “I guess,” he replied thoughtfully. “If you 
promise we’ll only use a tiny bit. And we’ll bury the rest right away.” 

“Promise,” Andy said. “Just enough to play our little joke on Mr. 
Murphy. Then we'll never use the stuff again.” 

“Okay,” Evan agreed. 

They shook hands solemnly. 

Then they hurried to the tree. Evan searched the entire park, 
squinting against the bright sunlight. He wanted to make sure no one 
was spying on them this time. 


When he was sure the park was empty, he and Andy dropped to 
their knees under the tree and began scooping the dirt off the hole 
with their hands. 

They had dug nearly two feet down when they realized the hole 
was empty. 

“The Monster Blood!” Evan cried. “It—it’s gone!” 


14 


“We must be digging under the wrong tree,” Evan said, sweat pouring 
down his freckled forehead. 

Andy pushed a wet strand of brown hair off her face with a dirt- 
covered finger. “No way.” She shook her head. “This is the right tree. 
And the right hole.” 

“Then where is the Monster Blood?” Evan demanded shrilly. 

They both came up with the answer to his question at the same 
time: “Conan!” 

“He must have watched us bury it,” Evan said, his eyes darting 
around the park as if he expected to see Conan jump out from behind 
a bush. “I thought he hurried away awfully fast that afternoon. He 
knew the paper bag wasn't empty.” 

Andy agreed. “He hid and watched us bury it. Then he waited till 
we were gone, and dug it up.” 

They both stared into the empty hole in horrified silence. 

Andy broke the silence. “What is Conan going to do with it?” she 
asked, her voice just above a whisper. 

“Probably eat it so he can grow bigger and pound me harder,” 
Evan replied bitterly. 

“But he doesn’t know what Monster Blood does,” Andy said. “He 
doesn’t know how dangerous it is.” 

“Of course he does. I told him all about it,” Evan replied. He 
slammed his hand against the tree trunk. “We have to get it back!” 


Before science class the next afternoon, Evan found Conan in the hall. 
He and Biggie were standing next to Evan’s locker. They were 
laughing loudly about something, slapping each other high-fives. 

Conan wore a tight blue muscle shirt and baggy faded denim 
jeans with enormous holes at the knees. Biggie had wavy brown hair 
down to his shoulders. He wore a sleeveless white T-shirt and tight- 
fitting black denims. 

They look like a couple of tag-team wrestlers! Evan thought as he 
stepped between them. 

“Hey, look—it’s Air Evan!” Conan joked. “King of the slam dunk!” 

He and Biggie guffawed loudly. Conan gave Evan a slap on the 
back that sent him sprawling into Biggie. 

“Uh... Conan? Did you find something in the park?” Evan asked, 
struggling to regain his balance. 


Conan narrowed his eyes at Evan and didn't reply. 

“Did you find something that belongs to Andy and me?” Evan 
repeated. 

“You mean like your brains?” Conan exclaimed. He and his tag- 
team partner roared with laughter over that gem. 

“Why don't we dribble him to class?” Biggie asked Conan. “Coach 
Murphy would like to see us get in some extra practice.” 

Conan laughed gleefully at that idea. 

“Ha-ha. Very funny,” Evan said sarcastically. “Look, Conan—that 
stuff you took. It's really dangerous. You have to give it back.” 

Conan opened his eyes in wide-eyed innocence. “I really don’t 
know what you're talking about, Evan. Did you lose something?” 

“You know I lost something,” Evan replied sharply. “And I want it 
back.” 

Conan flashed a sly grin at Biggie. Then he turned back to Evan, 
his expression hardening. “I don’t know what you mean, Evan,” he 
said. “Really. I don’t know what you and that girl lost. But tell you 
what. I’m a nice guy. Vll help you look for it.” 

He grabbed Evan around the waist with both hands. Biggie pulled 
Evan’s locker door open. 

“Tl help you look for it in your locker,” Conan said. 

He shoved Evan inside the locker and slammed the door shut. 

Evan started pounding on the metal door, shouting for help. 

But the bell had rung. Evan knew the hall was empty. There was 
no one to hear his cries. 

He decided to try fiddling with the latch. But it was too dark to 
see anything. And he was so jammed in, he couldn’t raise his arms. 

Finally, two girls happened to walk by, and they pulled open the 
locker door. 

Evan came bursting out, red-faced, gasping for air. 

The girls’ laughter followed him all the way to Mr. Murphy’s 
class. “You’re late,” the teacher said sternly, glancing up at the wall 
clock as Evan staggered in. 

Evan tried to explain why. But all that escaped his lips was a 
whistling wheeze. 

“Tm really tired of you disrupting my class, Evan,” Mr. Murphy 
said, rubbing his nearly bald head. “I’m afraid Vll be seeing you after 
school again. You can give Cuddles’ cage a double cleaning. And while 
yow’re at it, you can scrub the chalkboards and clean out all the test 
tubes, too.” 


“It's so dark,” Evan whispered. 

“It usually gets dark at night,” Andy replied, rolling her eyes. 

“The streetlight is out,” Evan said, pointing. “And there’s no 
moon tonight. That’s why it’s so dark.” 

“Hide!” Andy whispered. 

They ducked behind the hedge as a car rolled slowly past. Evan 
shut his eyes as the white headlights moved over him. When the car 
turned the corner, they climbed to their feet. 

It was a little after eight o’clock. They were standing in the street 
in front of Conan’s house. Leaning against the low hedge, they stared 
across the sloping front lawn into the large picture window in the 
front of the house. 

The lamp in the living room was lit, casting a dim rectangle of 
orange light that spilled onto the front yard. The old trees at the sides 
of the small brick house whispered in a hot breeze. 

“Are we really doing this?” Evan asked, huddling close to Andy. 
“Are we really going to break into Conan’s house?” 

“We’re not going to break in,” Andy whispered. “We’re going to 
sneak in.” 

“But what if the Monster Blood isn’t there?” Evan asked, hoping 
she couldn’t see his knees trembling. 

“We have to look, don’t we?” Andy shot back. 

She turned to study his face. He saw that she was frightened, too. 
“The Monster Blood will be there,” she told him. “It's got to be.” 

Bending low, she started to creep across the dark yard to the 
house. 

Evan hung back. “You checked it out?” he called to her. 
“Everyone is really gone?” 

“His parents left right after dinner,” Andy told him. “Then I saw 
Conan go out about ten minutes ago,” 

“Where?” Evan demanded. 

“How should I know?” she asked sharply, putting her hands on 
her waist. “He left. The house is empty.” She came back and tugged 
Evan’s arm. “Come on. Let’s sneak into Conan’s room, get the Monster 
Blood, and get out of here!” 

“T can’t believe we’re doing this,” Evan said, sighing. “We—we 
could be arrested!” 

“It was your idea!” Andy reminded him. 

“Oh. Yeah. Right.” He took a deep breath and held it, hoping it 
would help calm him down. “If we don’t find it right away, we get out 
of there—right?” 

“Right,” Andy agreed. “Now come on.” She gave him a little 
shove toward the house. 


They took a few steps over the dew-wet grass. 

They both stopped when they heard the low barking. 

Andy grabbed Evan's arm. 

The barking grew louder. They could hear the dog’s heavy paws 
pounding the ground, approaching fast. 

Two angry eyes. A loud warning bark. Another. 

The dog attacked at full speed. 

“Run!” Evan cried. “Conan has a guard dog!” 

“Too late to run!” Andy shrieked. 


15 


The dog barked again. 

Evan cried out and threw up his hands as the dog leaped for his 
throat. 

The dog wasn't as big as Evan had thought—but it was strong. 

It licked his face, pressing its wet snout into his cheek. 

It licked his chin. And then his lips. 

“Yuck!” Evan cried, laughing. “Trigger—how did you get here?” 

Evan pulled the cocker spaniel off him and lowered it to the 
ground. Its stubby tail wagging furiously, Trigger started jumping on 
Andy. 

“Your dumb dog scared me to death,” she moaned. 

“Me, too,” Evan admitted. “I didn't hear him following us, did 
you?” 

Andy squatted down and gave Trigger a few quick pats. Then she 
glanced down the street. 

“Let’s get inside,” she said. “Conan or his parents could be back 
any minute.” 

Trigger pranced along as they made their way over the grass to 
the front door. The house loomed much bigger and darker as they 
crept onto the stoop. 

“Down, Trigger. Stay down,” Evan whispered. “You can’t come in 
with us.” 

Andy tried the front door. “Locked.” 

Evan groaned. “Now what?” 

“We try the back door, of course,” Andy replied. She had already 
jumped down off the stoop and was heading around the side of the 
house. 

“You’ve done this before—haven’t you?” Evan demanded, 
following her. 

“Maybe,” she replied, grinning at him in the dark. 

A loud howl somewhere nearby made them both stop. 

“What was that?” Evan cried. 

“A werewolf,” Andy told him calmly. “Or maybe a cat.” 

They both laughed. Nervous laughter. 

The back door was locked, too. But the kitchen window was open 
a crack. Evan pushed it open wider, and they crept into the dark 
kitchen. 

Holding his breath, Evan could hear every sound. Their sneakers 


scraped noisily against the linoleum. The refrigerator hummed. Water 
swirled in the dishwasher. 

I can even hear the pounding of my heart, Evan thought. What 
am I doing? Have I really broken into Conan's house? 

“This way,” Andy whispered. “His room is probably upstairs.” 

Evan kept against the wall as he followed Andy to the front stairs. 
They passed the small living room, bathed in orange light. The 
floorboards creaked under their shoes. Evan stumbled over a pile of 
old newspapers stacked in the narrow hallway. 

Up the wooden stairs. The banister squeaked under Evan's hand. 
A Venetian blind rattled against an open window, startling him. 

“Sure is dark,” Andy muttered as they reached the top of the 
stairs. 

Evan tried to reply, but his breath caught in his throat. 

Holding onto the wall, he followed Andy to the first bedroom. She 
fumbled until she found a light switch, then clicked it on. The ceiling 
light revealed that they had found Conan's room. 

They both stood in the doorway, waiting for their eyes to adjust 
to the light. Then they quickly glanced around. 

The walls of the small, square room were filled with posters of 
sports stars. The biggest poster, above Conan's bed, showed Michael 
Jordan jumping about ten feet in the air as he slam-dunked a 
basketball. A bookshelf against one wall held very few books—but 
was loaded with sports trophies that Conan had won on various teams. 

Suddenly, Andy started to laugh. 

Evan turned to her, startled. “What's so funny?” 

She pointed to Conan’s bed. “Look—he still has a teddy bear!” 

Evan turned his eyes to the bed, where a forlorn-looking, nearly 
flat, one-eyed teddy bear rested on the pillow. “Conan the Barbarian?” 
he cried, laughing. “He sleeps with a teddy bear?” 

A loud creak made them cut their laughter short. 

They listened hard, their eyes wide with fear. “Just the house,” 
Evan whispered. 

Andy shivered. “Enough fooling around. Let’s find the Monster 
Blood and get out of here.” 

They moved into the center of the room. “Where do you think he 
hid it?” Evan asked, pulling open the closet door. 

“He didn’t,” Andy replied. 

“Huh?” Evan spun around. 

Andy had the blue can of Monster Blood in her hand. Grinning, 
she held it up to show Evan. 

Evan let out a surprised cry. “You found it? Where?” 

“Right on this shelf,” she replied, pointing. “He put it next to his 


tennis trophies.” 

Evan hurried over to her and took the blue can from her hand. As 
he held it up to examine it, the lid popped off. 

The green Monster Blood began bubbling over the top of the can. 

“It’s growing fast!” Evan declared. 

Andy stooped down and picked up the lid. She handed it to Evan. 
“Put it back on. Hurry.” 

Evan tried pushing the lid back on. It kept slipping off. 

“Hurry up,” Andy urged. “We’ve got to go.” 

“The Monster Blood—it’s up over the top,” Evan cried. 

“Shove it down,” Andy instructed. 

Evan tried pushing the green gunk down into the can, pressing 
against it with the palm of his hand. Then he tried pushing it with 
three fingers. 

He gasped as he felt the green goo tighten around his fingers and 
start to pull them down. 

“It—it’s got me!” Evan stammered. 

Andy’s mouth dropped open. “Huh?” 

“It’s got my fingers!” Evan cried shrilly. “It won't let go!” 

As Andy hurried to help him, they both heard the front door slam. 

“Someone’s home!” Evan whispered, tugging to pull his fingers 
free. “We’re caught!” 


16 


Andy froze in the center of the room, her eyes wide with horror. 

Evan nearly dropped the can of Monster Blood. The sticky green 
substance tightened its grip on his fingers, making loud sucking 
sounds. 

But Evan only cared about the sounds coming from downstairs. 

‘Tm home!” he heard Conan shout. 

“We're home, too!” It was a woman's voice, probably Conan's 
mother. 

“They’re all home,” Evan whispered. 

“We're dead meat!” Andy murmured. 

“I’m going upstairs,” Conan called to his parents. 

Evan let out a terrified cry as he heard Conan’s heavy footsteps on 
the stairs. “Andy—wh-what do we do?” he stammered. 

“The window!” she replied. 

They both lunged toward the open window and peered out. A 
narrow concrete ledge stretched just beneath the window. 

Without hesitating, Andy raised a leg over the windowsill and 
climbed out onto the ledge. “Evan—hurry!” she whispered, gesturing 
frantically. 

Evan was still desperately trying to pull his fingers from the 
bubbling green goo. Andy reached in through the window and 
grabbed him by the shoulder. “Evan—!” 

He heard Conan’s footsteps in the upstairs hall just outside the 
bedroom. 

Using his free hand for support, Evan scrambled out the window 
and joined Andy on the narrow ledge. 

“D-don’t look down,” Andy instructed in a trembling whisper. 

Evan didn’t obey. He glanced down. The ground seemed very far 
below. 

They each stood on a side of the window—Andy to the left, Evan 
the right. They pressed their bodies against the brick wall—and 
listened. 

They heard Conan step into the room. 

Did he notice that the light had been turned on? 

No way to tell. 

Loud rap music suddenly jarred the silence. Conan had turned on 
his boom box. He started chanting off-key along with the music. 

Evan pressed as tightly against the side of the house as he could. 


Go back downstairs, Conan, he pleaded silently. Please—go back 
downstairs! 

How will Andy and I ever get away from here? he wondered, 
feeling all of his muscles tighten in panic. 

Despite the hot night air, a cold chill ran down Evan’s back. He 
shuddered so hard, he nearly toppled off the ledge. 

The blue can stuck to his hand. The Monster Blood sucked at his 
fingers. But he couldn’t worry about that now. 

He could hear Conan moving around inside the room. Was he 
dancing to the loud music? 

Evan glanced across the window at Andy. Her eyes were shut. Her 
face was clenched in a tight frown. 

“Andy—!” Evan whispered. He knew that Conan couldn’t hear a 
whisper over the booming music. “Andy—it’ll be okay. As soon as he 
leaves, we’ll jump inside and sneak down the stairs.” 

Andy nodded without opening her eyes. “Did I ever tell you I’m 
afraid of heights?” she whispered. 

“No,” Evan replied. 

“Well, remind me to tell you!” 

“We'll be okay,” he murmured. 

Clinging to the side of the house, Evan kept repeating those words 
to himself. “We’ll be okay. We’ll be okay. We’ll be okay.” 

Then Trigger started to bark. 

A low bark of surprise at first. And then a louder series of barks, 
insistent barks, excited barks. 

Evan swallowed hard. He glanced down to the ground. 

Trigger was peering up at him, jumping against the side of the 
house, as if trying to reach the ledge. The dog barked louder with each 
jump. 

“Trigger—no!” Evan called down in a frantic whisper. 

That only made the dog bark more furiously. 

Did Conan hear it? Could he hear Trigger’s ferocious barks over 
the music? 

“Trigger—stop! Go home! Go home!” 

Suddenly the music stopped. 

Trigger’s excited barks rose up even louder against the new 
silence. 

Conan must hear them now, Evan realized. 

The cocker spaniel threw himself wildly against the side of the 
house, trying to get up to Evan and Andy. Despite Evan’s frantic 
signals to be quiet, the dumb dog barked his head off. 

Evan’s breath caught in his throat as he heard Conan making his 


way to the window. 

A second later, Conan stuck his head out. “What's going on?” he 
shouted. 

Evan's knees buckled. He started to fall. 


17 


Evan clung to the brick wall and stopped his fall. 

He stared at Conan's blond hair poking out the window. Evan was 
close enough to reach out and touch it. 

“Shut up down there!” Conan shouted. 

That made Trigger bark even louder. 

He's going to see us, Evan thought, trembling all over. 

There's no way Conan won't see us. 

“Conan—come downstairs!” Mrs. Barber's voice floated up from 
downstairs. “Conan—come down and have your cake and ice cream. 
You said you were dying for dessert!” she called. 

Conan's head disappeared back into the bedroom. “There's some 
stupid dog barking down there,” he called to his mother. 

Clinging to the side of the house, struggling to keep his quivering 
knees from buckling again, Evan shut his eyes and listened. 

He heard Conan's footsteps cross the room. The bedroom light 
went out. 

Silence. 

“He—left,” Evan choked out. 

Andy let out a long breath. “I can’t believe he didn’t see us out 
here.” 

Evan glanced down to the ground. Trigger had finally stopped 
barking. But he continued to stand and stare up at them, his front 
paws against the side of the house, his stubby tail spinning like a 
propeller. 

“Dumb dog,” Evan muttered. 

“Let’s go,” Andy urged. She didn’t wait for Evan. She practically 
did a swan dive into the house. 

It took Evan a few moments to get his legs to work. Then he 
ducked his head and climbed through the window after Andy. 

Holding his breath, he led the way on tiptoe to the bedroom door. 
He stopped and listened. 

Silence. No one in the dark hallway. 

He could hear the Barbers’ voices downstairs in the kitchen. 

He and Andy made their way to the top of the stairs. Then, 
holding tightly to the banister, they crept halfway down. 

Evan stopped to listen again. Andy bumped right into him, nearly 
sending him sailing down the stairs. “Shhh!” she cried. 

They could hear Conan talking to his parents in the kitchen. He 


was complaining about the other guys on the basketball team. 
“They’re all wimps,” Evan heard Conan say. 

“Well, that’ll make you look even better,” Mr. Barber replied. 

Evan took another deep breath and held it. Then he made his way 
down to the bottom of the stairs. 

Almost out, he thought, his entire body shaking. Almost out of 
here. 

He reached for the front doorknob. 

“Conan, go upstairs and get your math book,” he heard Mr. 
Barber say. “I want to see the homework you had trouble with.” 

“Okay,” Conan replied. His chair scraped against the floor. 

Andy grabbed Evan’s shoulder. 

They stared in frozen horror at each other—one foot away from 
escape—and waited to be caught. 


18 


“Conan—don’t go now. Get the book later,” Mrs. Barber chimed in. 
Then they heard her scold Conan’s father: “Let the boy have his cake 
and ice cream.” 

“Fine, fine,” Mr. Barber replied. “He can show me the book later.” 

Conan’s chair scraped back into place under the table. 

Evan didn’t wait another second. 

He jerked open the front door, pushed open the screen door, and 
burst out of the house like a rocket. 

He could hear Andy gasping as she ran behind him. And then he 
could hear Trigger’s shrill yips as the dog followed, too. 

Down the Barbers’ front lawn, into the street. Their sneakers 
slapped the pavement as they ran full speed through the darkness. 

They didn’t stop until they reached Evan’s driveway. 

Evan leaned against his family’s mailbox and struggled to catch 
his breath. He raised his hand to wipe the sweat off his forehead—and 
saw the blue can still stuck there. 

“Help me,” he pleaded. He reached out his hand to Andy. 

She was breathing hard, too. Her eyes kept darting back down the 
street, as if she expected Conan to be chasing after them. 

“Close one,” she murmured. She turned to Evan. Her eyes glowed 
excitedly in the light from the streetlamp. “That was fun!” 

Evan didn’t agree. In his opinion, it was far too scary to be fun. 
And here he was, still stuck to the can of Monster Blood. 

He pushed his hand toward Andy. “Pull it off,” he told her. “I 
think you need both hands. I can’t do it.” 

She grabbed the can in both hands. The green gunk bubbled over 
the sides, making loud sucking sounds. 

Andy tugged. Then tugged harder. Then she took a deep breath, 
leaned back, and tugged with all her might. 

The Monster Blood finally let go of its grip on Evan’s fingers. The 
can slid off with a loud pop. Andy went tumbling back onto the 
pavement. 

“Ow!” Evan held up his three fingers and tried to examine them 
under the streetlight. They were all wrinkled and pruney, the way 
they looked when he had been swimming for an hour or two. 

“Yuck! That stuff is so gross!” he cried. 

Andy climbed slowly to her feet. She still cradled the Monster 
Blood can in both hands. “At least we got it back,” she murmured. 


“Yeah. Now we can bury it again,” Evan said, still examining his 
fingers. 

“Huh? Bury it?” Andy pulled the can away, as if protecting it 
from Evan. 

“You heard me,” Evan said firmly. “It's just too dangerous to mess 
with, Andy. Take it home and bury it in your back yard, okay?” 

Andy stared down at the can. She didn’t reply. 

“Bury it,” Evan repeated. “Take it home and bury it. Promise?” 

“Well...” Andy hesitated. Then she said, “Okay. Promise.” 


Evan woke up with a bad sore throat the next morning. 

His mother worried that he might be coming down with the flu. 
So she kept him home from school. Evan spent the day reading comic 
books and watching MTV. His sore throat disappeared by 
midafternoon. 

He returned to school the next day, feeling refreshed and ready to 
see everyone. 

The good feeling lasted until he stepped into Mr. Murphy’s 
science class near the end of the day. Evan had to walk past the 
hamster cage to get to his seat. 

As he neared the cage, he peered in. 

That’s weird, he thought. Where’s Cuddles? 

When did Mr. Murphy get a rabbit? 

A rabbit?! 

He stopped and leaned closer to the cage. 

Familiar black eyes stared up at him. A familiar pink nose 
twitched at him. 

It was Cuddles, Evan realized. 

Cuddles had grown as big as a rabbit! 


19 


Evan leaned over the hamster cage, staring at the giant-sized Cuddles, 
as the bell rang. He turned to see that the other kids had all taken 
their seats. 

“Evan, I see you're examining your victim,” Mr. Murphy said from 
the front of the room. 

“I—uh—” Evan couldn’t think of a reply. “Victim?” 

Mr. Murphy angrily narrowed his beady black eyes at Evan. 
“You’ve been overfeeding Cuddles, Evan. Look how fat he has 
become.” 

Almost as fat as you! Evan wanted to say. 

Evan knew that Cuddles’ weight problem wasn’t his fault. 

And it had nothing to do with overeating. 

Cuddles had grown to triple-hamster size because of Monster 
Blood. 

“When I find Andy, I’ll strangle her!” Evan muttered. 

“What did you say, Evan?” Mr. Murphy demanded. 

Evan could feel his face turning bright red. He hadn’t meant to 
talk out loud. 

“Uh... nothing,” he replied, totally embarrassed. He slunk to his 
seat. 

Andy has gone too far this time, he thought bitterly. She promised 
she’d bury the Monster Blood. She promised! 

And now she’s turned Cuddles into a fat freak! And Murphy 
thinks it’s all my fault! 

“Please stay after school,” Mr. Murphy told Evan, “so we can 
discuss Cuddles’ diet.” 

Evan heard some kids snickering. He knew they were laughing at 
him. 

He saw Conan and Biggie at their seats in the back. Conan was 
twitching his nose, puffing out his cheeks, pretending to be a fat 
hamster. Biggie was laughing his head off. 

Evan stared at the hamster all through class. Cuddles appeared to 
grow right before Evan’s eyes. With each breath, the hamster seemed 
to puff up wider and taller. 

Its black eyes were as big as marbles now. They stared back at 
Evan, as if accusing him. 

When the hamster moved to its water tube, the entire cage rattled 
and shook. 


Please don't grow anymore! Evan pleaded silently, staring at the 
shaking cage. Please stop right now, Cuddles. Okay? 

The hamster breathed noisily. Wheezing gasps. Evan could hear 
Cuddles panting all the way across the room. 

The cage shook again as Cuddles turned around. Evan watched in 
horror as the cage nearly toppled off its table. 

Il kill Andy! Evan thought bitterly. How could she do this to me? 

When the bell rang, the other kids all gathered up their books and 
headed out the door. Evan stood up and walked over to Cuddles’ cage. 

Panting loudly, Cuddles stared up at him. He’s too big to fit on his 
wheel, Evan realized. If he grows any more, he’ll burst out of the cage! 

How much Monster Blood did Andy feed him? Evan wondered. 
He had to find out. 

He turned to Mr. Murphy, who was reading over some papers at 
his desk. “I’ve got to find someone,” Evan called up to him. “Pll be 
right back.” 

“Don’t take too long,” the teacher replied without looking up. 

Evan hurried from the room—and ran into Conan. “Hey, I was 
looking for you,” Conan said, sidestepping to the right, then the left, 
and stretching out both arms to keep Evan from getting away. 

“No time now,” Evan said sharply. But Conan wouldn’t let him 
pass. “I'm kind of in a hurry,” Evan told him. “I don’t have time to be 
stuffed into my locker right now.” 

A big grin crossed Conan’s handsome face. “Hey, I’m sorry about 
that,” he said, his blue eyes twinkling. 

“Huh? Yow're sorry?” Evan’s mouth dropped open in shock. 

“Yeah. No hard feelings,” Conan said, lowering his eyes. “Shake.” 

Evan stuck out his hand. Then remembered Conan’s crushing 
handshake. He tried to pull back his hand. 

Too late. 

Conan gripped it tightly and began to squeeze. As he squeezed 
Evan’s hand, his grin grew wider and wider. 

Down the hall, Evan saw Andy heading out the door. He tried to 
call to her. But all that came out of his mouth was a squeak of pain. 

Andy disappeared out the front door of the school. 

The bones in Evan’s hand cracked and crunched. 

When Conan finally let go, the hand looked like a sad lump of soft 
red clay. 

“Wow! That’s some handshake you’ve got!” Conan cried, 
laughing. He pretended his hand hurt. He shook it hard and blew on 
it. “You killed me that time! You been working out or something?” 

Conan headed off to basketball practice, laughing and shaking his 
hand. 


He really cracks himself up, Evan thought. An angry cry burst 
from his throat. He slammed his good hand into a locker. He was so 
furious, he thought he could feel steam pouring out his ears. 

“Evan—you’re keeping me waiting!” Mr. Murphy called in a 
singsong from the classroom doorway. 

“Coming,” Evan muttered miserably, and slunk back into the 
room. 


He tried calling Andy for hours that night. But there was no one 
home. 

In his sleep, he dreamed that Trigger ate a big glob of Monster 
Blood and grew to giant size. Evan tried to stop him. But the 
enormous dog took off after the mailman. 

It wasn’t much of a chase. Trigger caught the mailman easily. The 
mailman was the size of a hamster. 

Evan woke up drenched with sweat. He glanced at his bedtable 
clock. Only six in the morning. He normally didn’t get up until seven. 

He climbed out of bed, anyway, feeling shaky and scared. 

He decided he had to get to school before everyone else. He had 
to see if Cuddles had grown any bigger. 

“Evan—where are you going?” his mother called sleepily as Evan 
headed out the front door. 

“Uh—school,” Evan replied. He had hoped to sneak out before 
she woke up. 

“So early?” She padded into the room, struggling with the belt to 
her blue cotton robe. 

“Well... I have a science project I need to work on,” Evan told 
her. It was almost the truth. 

“A science project?” She eyed him suspiciously. 

“Yeah. It’s... big!” Evan replied, thinking quickly. “It’s really big! 
So I couldn’t bring it home.” 

“You’re going without any breakfast?” Mrs. Ross demanded, 
yawning. 

“Pll grab something at school,” he said. “Later, Mom.” He 
disappeared out the door before she could ask any more questions. 

A red sun was just climbing over the trees in a gray sky. The air 
still carried the chill of the night. The lawns Evan passed shimmered 
wetly with morning dew. 

He jogged the whole way, his backpack flopping heavily on his 
shoulder. There were no other kids on the playground or on the walk 
heading into the building. 

He crept into the school and made his way down the silent, empty 
hall. His sneakers echoed loudly as he trotted toward the science 


classroom. 

Maybe Cuddles didn’t grow overnight, Evan told himself. 

Maybe he didn’t grow at all. Maybe he shrank. Maybe he shrank back 
to his old size. 

It was possible. 

It was possible that Andy had fed the hamster only a teeny tiny 
speck of Monster Blood. Just enough for Cuddles to swell up to the 
size of a fat rabbit—then shrink right back down to cute, cuddly 
hamster size. 

It was possible—wasn’t it? 

Yes! Yes! Evan crossed his fingers on both hands. He wished he 
could cross his toes. 

By the time he reached the classroom, he was breathless. His 
heart thudded loudly in his chest. 

He hesitated at the door. 

Please, Cuddles—be small. Be small! 

Then Evan took a deep breath, held it—and stepped inside. 


20 


Evan stepped into the room, staring at the cage against the far wall. At 
first, he didn't see Cuddles. 

Had Cuddles shrunk? Had he? 

Sometimes prayers are answered, Evan told himself. Sometimes 
good things happen. 

Evan took a few hesitant steps closer. Then a few more steps. 

Every muscle in his body had tensed. He was so frightened, it was 
actually hard to walk. 

He could feel the blood throbbing at his temples. He mopped the 
cold beads of sweat off his forehead. 

He still couldn't see Cuddles. Where was he? 

Where? 

Gray morning light filtered in through the windows. The floor 
creaked under Evan's sneakers. 

Evan took another hesitant step toward the cage. 

Another step. 

Then he cried out in horror. 

Evan hadn't seen Cuddles at first—because Cuddles was too big! 

Cuddles filled the entire cage. 

Evan held back, gaping in disbelief. 

The hamster groaned noisily with every loud breath. It let out 
several disgusting grunts as its body pressed against the wire cage. 

Its big, furry head pushed up against the top of the cage. Evan 
could see one enormous black eye, the size of a jar lid, staring out at 
him. 

“No!” Evan cried out loud, feeling his knees begin to tremble. 
“This is impossible!” 

The hamster uttered a few more low grunts. 

The cage shook on its table. 

The big black eye glared out at Evan. 

And then as Evan stared in horrified disbelief, the hamster 
reached up its two pink paws. The toes slipped around the wires of the 
cage. 

Cuddles let out an ugly groan. 

Evan saw its spongy pink nose twitch. He saw a flash of big white 
teeth. 

Another groan. 

The two front paws pushed against the cage wires. 


The wires bent away. 

Cuddles grunted again, wheezing loudly, excitedly. 

He pushed the cage wires aside. Then he started to squeeze his 
big, fur-covered body through the opening. What do I do? Evan 
frantically asked himself. What do I do now? Cuddles is escaping! 


21 


“So what did you do?” Andy asked. 

They were sitting together in the tall grass of the tiny park, 
watching the brown creek trickle past. The late afternoon sun felt 
warm on their backs. Crickets chirped in the trees behind them. 

Three boys rolled past on bikes on the other side of the creek, 
heading home from school. One of them waved to Evan. He didn't 
wave back. 

Andy wore a bright red sleeveless T-shirt over white denim jeans. 
She had slipped off her yellow sneakers and was digging her bare feet 
into the soft ground. 

“So what did you do?” she repeated. 

Evan picked up a hard clump of dirt and tossed it into the creek. 
Then he leaned back, his hands planted firmly behind him on the 
ground. 

“I got a dog leash,” he told Andy. “In the supply closet.” 

Andy’s eyes widened in surprise. “Murphy keeps a dog leash? 
What for?” 

Evan shrugged. “He has all kinds of junk back there.” 

“So you put the leash on Cuddles?” 

“Yeah,” Evan told her. “He was just the right size. As big as a dog. 
Maybe a little bigger.” 

“As big as Trigger?” Andy demanded. 

Evan nodded. “Then I tied the other end to the leg of Murphy’s 
desk—and I ran out of there as fast as I could.” 

Andy laughed. But she cut it short when she caught Evan’s angry 
glare. “What happened when you went to science class?” she asked, 
turning back to the creek. 

“T didn’t,” Evan muttered. 

“Huh?” 

“I didn’t go,” Evan said softly. “I was afraid to go. I didn’t want 
Murphy to start blaming me in front of everyone.” 

“So you cut class?” Andy asked, startled. 

Evan nodded. 

“So what did you do?” Andy asked. She pulled up a handful of the 
tall grass and let it sift through her fingers. 

“I sneaked out and came here,” Evan replied, frowning. 

“Everyone was talking about Cuddles all day,” Andy reported. Her 
dark eyes flashed. She couldn’t keep an amused grin off her face. 


“Everyone had to go in and see him. The stupid hamster practically 
caused a riot!” 

“It isn’t funny,” Evan murmured. 

“It’s kind of funny!” Andy insisted. “Mr. Murphy was bragging 
that Cuddles could beat up any other hamster in the country. He said 
he was going to try to get Cuddles on TV!” 

“Huh?” Evan jumped to his feet. “You mean Mr. Murphy wasn’t 
upset?” 

“I heard that he was at first,” Andy replied thoughtfully. “But 
then I guess he got used to Cuddles being so big. And he was acting 
kind of proud. You know. Like he had the biggest pumpkin at the fair 
or something. A blue-ribbon winner!” Andy snickered. 

Evan kicked at the grass. “I know he’s going to blame me. I know 
it!” 

“Everyone was feeding Cuddles carrots all day,” Andy said, not 
seeming to hear Evan’s unhappy wails. “The hamster ate the carrots 
whole. One big chomp. Then it made this really gross swallowing 
sound. It was a riot.” 

“I can’t believe this!” Evan groaned. He lowered his eyes angrily 
to Andy. “Why did you do it? Why?” 

Andy gazed up at him innocently. “I wanted to give you a laugh,” 
she replied. 

“Huh? A laugh?” he shrieked. 

“You were looking pretty down. I thought it might cheer you up.” 

Evan let out an angry cry. 

“I guess it didn’t cheer you up,” Andy muttered. 

She pulled up another handful of grass and let the blades fall over 
the legs of her white jeans. 

Evan stomped over to the edge of the creek. He kicked a rock into 
the water. 

“Come on, Evan,” Andy called. “You have to admit it’s a little 
funny.” 

He spun around to face her. “It’s not,” he insisted. “Not funny at 
all. What if Cuddles just keeps growing and growing? Then what?” 

“We could put a saddle on his back and give everyone hamster 
rides!” She giggled. 

Evan scowled and kicked another rock into the creek. “You know 
how dangerous that Monster Blood is,” he scolded. “What are we 
going to do? How are we going to get Cuddles back to hamster size?” 

Andy shrugged. She pulled up another handful of grass. 

The sun sank lower behind the trees. A shadow rolled over them. 
Two little kids chased a white-and-red soccer ball on the other side of 
the creek. Their mother shouted to them not to get wet. 


“Where's the Monster Blood can?” Evan demanded, standing over 
Andy. “Maybe it tells the antidote on the can. Maybe it tells how to 
reverse the whole thing.” 

Andy shook her head. “Evan, you know it doesn't say anything on 
the can. No instructions. No ingredients. Nothing.” She climbed to her 
feet and brushed off the legs of her jeans. “I’ve got to get home. My 
aunt doesn’t know where I am. She’s probably having a cow.” 

Evan followed her toward the street, shaking his head. “How 
big?” he muttered. 

She glanced back at him. “What did you say?” 

“How big will Cuddles be tomorrow?” Evan asked in a trembling 
voice. “How big?” 


22 


“Andy—will you hurry up?” 

Evan had agreed to meet Andy at her aunt's house the next 
morning so they could go to school early. But Andy had found a spot 
on her jeans and had gone back up to her room to change. 

And now they were no longer early. 

“Sorry,” she said, hurtling down the stairs two steps at a time. She 
had changed her entire outfit. Now she had on a red-and-black-striped 
vest over a yellow T-shirt, pulled down over pale blue shorts. 

“Didn’t you leave out a color?” Evan demanded sarcastically, 
grabbing Andy’s backpack for her and hurrying to the front door. 

She made a face at him. “I like bright colors. It suits my 
personality.” 

“Your personality is late!” he declared. 

She followed him out the door and down the front lawn to the 
sidewalk. “At least I have a personality!” she cried. “What’s your 
hurry, anyway?” 

Evan didn’t answer. He adjusted his backpack on his shoulder, 
then began running toward school. 

“Hey—wait up!” Andy called, running after him. 

“How much Monster Blood did you give Cuddles, anyway?” Evan 
demanded without slowing his pace. “The whole can?” 

“No way!” Andy called breathlessly. “Just a spoonful. He seemed 
to like it.” 

“I guess he liked being as big as a dog, too,” Evan said, turning 
the corner. The tall, redbrick school building came into view. 

“Maybe he’s back to normal today,” Andy said. 

But as they came near the building, it was easy to tell that things 
were not normal. 

Evan heard a loud crash from the side of the building. It sounded 
like glass shattering. 

Then he heard excited shouts. Loud kids’ voices filled with alarm. 

“What’s going on?” Andy cried. 

They dove up the stairs and burst into the building. Running full 
speed, they turned the corner and made their way to the science 
classroom. 

Evan reached it a few steps ahead of Andy. Hearing excited 
shouts and cries, he lurched into the room—and then stopped with a 
startled cry. 


“No! Oh, please—no!” 

“Stand back! Everyone stand back!” a red-faced Mr. Murphy was 
screaming. 

Cuddles uttered a loud grunt and flailed his giant legs wildly in 
the air. 

“He—he’s ten feet tall!” Evan heard Andy scream at his side. 

“Al-almost!” Evan stammered. 

The grunting, groaning hamster towered over Mr. Murphy. Its 
pink paws batted the air. Its monstrous mouth opened wide, revealing 
two enormous, sharp white teeth. 

“Back! Everyone back!” Mr. Murphy shrieked. 

The terrified kids in the classroom pressed back against the walls. 

Mr. Murphy picked up a wooden chair in one hand, the torn dog 
leash in the other. Holding the chair by the back, he came at the 
grunting monster like a lion tamer. 

“Down, Cuddles! Get down! Sit! Sit!” 

He poked the wooden chair up at the giant hamster and snapped 
the dog leash like a whip. 

Cuddles’ watery black eyes, as big as soccer balls, glared down at 
the red-faced teacher. The hamster didn’t seem terribly impressed 
with Mr. Murphy’s lion-tamer act. 

“Down, Cuddles! Get down!” The teacher’s chins quivered, and 
his big belly bounced up and down beneath his tight gray knit polo 
shirt. 

Cuddles pulled back his huge lips and bared his white teeth. He 
let out a growl that made the light fixtures shake. 

Terrified cries rang out through the room. Evan glanced back to 
see a horrified crowd of teachers and students jammed in the 
doorway. 

“Down, Cuddles!” 

Mr. Murphy shoved the wooden chair up at the raging hamster. 
He cracked the dog-leash whip near the hamster’s throbbing, fur- 
covered belly. 

The huge black eyes stared down angrily at Mr. Murphy. The pink 
hamster paws clawed in the air. 

Andy grabbed Evan’s shoulder and held on tight. “This is 
terrible!” she cried. “Terrible!” 

Evan started to reply—but frightened shrieks drowned out his 
words. 

Cuddles grabbed the chair with both paws. 

“Drop! Drop!” Mr. Murphy screamed. He struggled to hold on to 
the chair. 

Cuddles pulled the chair. Mr. Murphy desperately held tight. He 


let the leash fall so he could hold on to the chair with both hands. 

The teacher and Cuddles had a short tug-of-war. 

Cuddles won easily. The hamster pulled the chair up, nearly 
jerking Mr. Murphy's arms out of their sockets. 

With a loud groan, the teacher toppled heavily to the floor. 

Kids screamed. 

Two teachers rushed forward to help the gasping Mr. Murphy to 
his feet. 

Evan stared up as the hamster raised the wooden chair to its 
mouth. The enormous white teeth opened quickly. The pink nose 
twitched. The watery black eyes blinked. 

Then Cuddles chewed the wooden chair to pieces. 

Splinters rained down on the floor. 

The chomping teeth sounded like a lumberjack’s ax biting into a 
tree. 

Evan froze in horror along with everyone else in the room. 

Andy was squeezing his shoulder so hard, it hurt. “This is our 
fault,” she murmured. 

“Our fault?” Evan cried. “Our fault?” 

She ignored his sarcasm. He saw the fear in her eyes as she stared 
up at the hamster. Cuddles had turned the chair into toothpicks! 

“We've got to do something, Evan,” she whispered, huddled close 
to him. 

“But what?” Evan replied in a trembling voice. “What can we 
do?” 

Then, suddenly, he had an idea. 


23 


“Come with me!” Evan cried, tugging Andy's arm. 

She hesitated, staring up at the giant hamster. “Where?” 

“I have an idea,” Evan told her. “But we have to hurry!” 

Cuddles lumbered over to Mr. Murphy's desk. The hamster's 
heavy footsteps made the floor sag. 

“Here, fella! Here!” Mr. Murphy was tossing handfuls of 
sunflower seeds up to Cuddles. Cuddles glared down at him. The seeds 
were too small to bother with. 

“Hurry!” Evan pleaded. He pulled Andy through the frightened 
crowd of kids and teachers at the door. Then he began running full 
speed toward the auditorium. 

“We can't just run away! We have to do something!” Andy cried. 

“We're not running away,” Evan called back to her, turning a 
corner. “My father's sculpture—it's in the auditorium.” 

“Huh?” Andy's eyes narrowed in confusion. “Evan—have you 
totally lost it? Why do you want to look at your father's sculpture 
now?” 

He burst through the auditorium doors and ran past the dark rows 
of seats toward the stage. Several pieces of sculpture had been set up 
there. 

“Evan—I don’t get it!” Andy cried, right behind him. 

“Look,” Evan said breathlessly. He pointed to his father’s work 
near the back of the stage. “My dad’s sculpture. It’s just like a hamster 
wheel—see?” 

Her mouth dropped open as she stared at it. 

“It’s a big metal wheel and it spins,” Evan explained as they 
pulled themselves up onto the stage. “Come on. Help me drag it back 
to Murphy’s room. It’s big enough for Cuddles.” 

“Whoa!” Andy cried. “You want to bring Cuddles a wheel? What 
for?” 

“To distract him,” Evan replied, grabbing one side of the big 
sculpture. “If we can get Cuddles running on this wheel, it will give us 
time to figure out where to keep him. And it will stop him from 
chewing the whole school to pieces.” 

Andy grabbed hold of the other side, one hand on the wheel, one 
hand on the platform. “Maybe Cuddles will run so hard, he’ll lose 
weight. Maybe he’ll shrink back to his normal size,” she said. 

Luckily, the platform was on wheels. They rolled the sculpture 


toward the stage door at the side. “I just want to distract him,” Evan 
said, tugging hard. “I just want to give us time to think, to make a 
plan.” 

“Wow! This is heavy!” Andy cried. They rolled it into the hall. 
“Heavy enough for Cuddles, I guess.” 

“I hope,” Evan replied solemnly. 

By the time they rolled the sculpture to the classroom, the crowd 
of frightened kids and teachers had grown even bigger. “Make way! 
Make way!” they both shouted, pushing their way through the crowd. 

They set the wheel down in the center of the floor and gazed over 
at Cuddles. The hamster had two teachers cornered, their backs 
pressed against the chalkboard. It was gnashing its huge teeth at them, 
slapping its pink paws together as if eager to fight them. 

Evan gasped when he saw Mr. Murphy’s desk, crushed flat on the 
floor. 

“I— called the police!” Mr. Murphy cried, his face beaded with 
large drops of sweat. “I begged them to come. But when I said it was a 
giant hamster, they didn’t believe me! They thought it was a practical 
joke!” 

“Stand back, everyone!” Evan cried shrilly. “Stand back—please! 
Let Cuddles see the wheel!” 

The giant hamster turned suddenly. The two teachers scrambled 
away from the wall. Kids and teachers screamed and hurried toward 
the door. 

“Maybe he’ll run on the wheel for a while,” Andy explained to 
Mr. Murphy. “Then we can figure out what to do with him!” 

“He—he sees it!” Mr. Murphy cried breathlessly, all of his chins 
quivering at once. 

Cuddles stared down at the wheel. His stub of a tail thudded 
loudly against the chalkboard. He dropped heavily to all fours and 
took a lumbering step toward the wheel. 

“He sees it. He’s going to it,” Evan murmured softly. 

A hush fell over the room as everyone stared at the hamster. 

Will Cuddles climb inside? Evan wondered, holding his breath. 

Will he run on the wheel? 

Will my plan work? 


24 


The hamster sniffed the wheel. Its pink nose twitched. It uttered a low 
grunt. 

Then it raised itself back onto its hind legs. The hamster's massive 
shadow fell over the room. 

With another disgusting grunt, it picked the sculpture up in its 
front paws and raised it to its face. 

“No!” Evan cried. “Cuddles—no!” 

The metal clanged as Cuddles bit into the wheel. Evan saw deep 
tooth marks in the aluminum. Cuddles bit down again. Then, seeing 
that he couldn’t chew the wheel up, he pulled it apart, holding the 
sculpture in his paws and twisting it furiously with his teeth. 

Then he tossed the mangled wheel away. It slammed into a 
window, shattering it into a thousand pieces. 

“Back to the drawing board,” Andy muttered to Evan. 

Evan shook his head glumly. That plan was a bust, he told 
himself. Now what? 

He didn’t have time to think about it. 

He heard shrill cries and shrieks of terror. 

“Put him down! Cuddles—put him down!” Mr. Murphy was 
screaming. 

Evan turned and saw that the giant hamster had picked up a kid. 

Conan! 

Cuddles held Conan in both paws and was raising him toward his 
gaping mouth. 

“Drop! Drop!” Mr. Murphy was shouting. 

Conan thrashed his arms and legs. “Help me! Ohhh, hellllp me!” 
he shrieked. He started to cry. Gasping sobs. Tears rolled down his red 
cheeks. 

“Helllllp! Mommmmmy! Mommmmmy! Hellllp me!” 

Normally Evan would have enjoyed watching Conan cry like a 
baby. But this was too serious. Cuddles could chew Conan in half! 
Evan realized. 

He grabbed Andy. “Where’s the Monster Blood?” 

“Huh? In my locker. I hid it under a bunch of stuff in my locker. 
Why?” 

“T need it,” Evan said. “Come on. I have another idea.” 

“I hope it’s better than the last one,” Andy muttered. 

They hurried to the door, then glanced back. 


Cuddles was playing with Conan, tossing him from paw to paw, 
licking him with his huge, pink tongue. Conan was wailing his head 
off. 

Evan led the way to Andy's locker. “I'm going to eat some 
Monster Blood,” he told her, thinking out loud. “T’ll eat a lot. PI grow 
bigger than Cuddles.” 

“I get it,” Andy said, running beside him. “You'll turn yourself 
into a giant. You'll make yourself as big as Cuddles.” 

“No,” Evan replied. “Bigger. Much bigger. I’ll make myself so big 
that Cuddles will look hamster size. Then Ill stuff him in the supply 
closet and lock the door.” 

“Its a stupid plan,” Andy said. 

“I know,” Evan agreed. 

“But it’s worth a try,” Andy added. 

Evan swallowed hard and didn’t reply. He was staring across the 
hall at Andy’s locker. 

“Oh, no!” Andy cried out when she saw what Evan was gaping at. 

The locker door bulged as if about to burst open. And green goo 
poured out from the sides and the bottom. 

“The Monster Blood—it outgrew my locker!” Andy cried. 

Evan ran up to it and grabbed the door handle. He started to tug. 
“Ts it locked?” 

“No,” Andy replied, hanging back. 

Evan tugged. He tugged harder. With a loud groan, he tugged 
with both hands. “It won’t open!” he cried. 

“Let me try it,” Andy said. 

But before she could step forward, the locker door burst open 
with a loud whoooosh. 

Sticky, green gunk splashed over Evan. 

He didn’t have a chance to cry out. 

It poured over him like a tall, cresting ocean wave. 

An ocean wave of Monster Blood. 

It’s burying me! Evan realized. 

The huge, sticky glob splashed out of the locker, plopped over 
him, smothering him, choking him. 

It’s sucking me in! I can’t move! 

I can’t move! 


25 


Evan shut his eyes as the heavy, green gunk rolled over his head. He 
shot his arms out, trying to push it away. 

As it swept over him, he fell to his knees. Kicking and thrashing, 
it forced him down to the floor. 

I’m stuck inside, he thought. Stuck inside... 

He felt hands grab his ankles. 

The hands tugged hard. 

He began to slide. Over the floor. Over the thick layer of Monster 
Blood. 

“T’ve got you!” he heard Andy cry. “I’ve got you out!” 

He opened his eyes. He saw her pulling him, tugging him out of 
the thick green gunk by the ankles. 

It clung to his clothes and his skin. But he was out. 

“Thanks,” he murmured weakly. He climbed shakily to his feet. 

He could hear Conan screaming and crying back in the classroom. 
There was still time to save him, Evan realized. 

He pulled a hunk of Monster Blood off the quivering green mound 
—and jammed it into his mouth. 

“I’m going to be sick,” Andy groaned, holding her stomach. 

Evan swallowed and reached for another mouthful. “It doesn’t 
taste bad,” he told her. “A little lemony.” 

“Don’t eat too much!” she cried, half-covering her eyes as she 
watched him swallow another mouthful. 

“I have to grow big enough so that Cuddles is hamster size 
compared to me,” Evan said. He grabbed another hunk. 

He could already feel himself start to grow. His head was already 
over the tops of the lockers. 

Back in the classroom, Conan let out another terrified wail. 

“Let’s go!” Evan boomed. His voice thundered deeply in his new, 
larger body. He could feel himself growing taller. Taller. 

He had to lower his head to get through the classroom door. 

Kids and teachers moved out of his way, crying out their surprise 
and alarm. 

He crossed the room, passed Mr. Murphy, and stepped up to the 
giant hamster. “I’m as big as Cuddles!” Evan called down to Andy. 

He reached out and lifted Conan from Cuddles’ paws. Cuddles 
reached out to take Conan back. But Evan lowered him gently to the 
floor. 


“Hellllp me! Helllp me!” Conan ran bawling from the room. 

Evan turned to face the hamster. They stared at each other eye to 
eye. 

Cuddles’ huge pink nose twitched. He sniffed Evan, inhaling so 
hard that Evan was nearly sucked forward. 

Evan took a step back. 

Keep growing! he urged himself. I’ve got to keep growing! 

Cuddles eyed him warily, still sniffing. His watery black eyes 
stared hard as if trying to figure out if Evan was friend or foe. 

“Don't you remember me, Cuddles?” Evan said softly. 
“Remember, I’m the one who fed you after school every day?” 

Keep growing! he silently urged himself. 

Why aren’t I growing any taller? 

Down below, he could see Andy, Mr. Murphy, and the others 
huddled against the far wall, staring up at the two giants in hushed 
terror. 

Keep growing! Keep growing! 

There was no way he could pick Cuddles up now, Evan realized. 
They were exactly the same height. And Cuddles outweighed him by 
at least a ton! 

Keep growing! 

“What’s wrong, Andy?” Evan called down to her in a trembling 
voice. “I ate tons of the stuff. Why did I stop growing?” 

“I don’t know!” she called up to him. Her voice sounded as tiny as 
a mouse’s squeak. 

He saw that she had the blue can in her hand. She was turning it 
over, reading the label. “I don’t know, Evan!” she shouted. “I don’t 
know why you're not growing!” 

Then, as Evan turned back to face Cuddles, the hamster reached 
out and grabbed his waist with both front paws. 

“Ow!” Evan cried as the hamster tried to lift him off the floor. 

Gazing up, he saw the gaping hamster mouth open, the sharp 
white teeth emerge. 

Evan squirmed desperately, pulling himself loose. Then he 
wrapped both arms around the hamster’s middle. 

They started to wrestle. Evan fought hard, but the hamster 
overpowered him. Cuddles rolled Evan onto his back on the floor. 

Evan spun quickly away, climbed to his feet, and pulled the 
hamster down. 

The two giants wrestled over the floor, surrounded by the shrill 
screams of teachers and kids. 

Grow bigger! Grow bigger—now! Evan pleaded. 


But it was too late, he saw. 

The hamster lowered its hot, furry body over him. Evan could feel 
the creature's booming heartbeat as it pressed him to the floor. 

Then its teeth rose up over Evan's head. 

The hamster's mouth opened wide. 

The teeth swung down. 

A wave of hot, sour hamster breath blew down over Evan. 

He shut his eyes. 

“Sorry,” he murmured to Andy. 

He held his breath and waited for the teeth to clamp down. 


26 


Evan heard a pop, like the sound of a cork flying off a bottle. 

Still sprawled on his back on the floor, Evan opened his eyes. 

“Huh?” Cuddles had disappeared. Vanished. 

Evan stared up at the startled faces of kids and teachers against 
the wall. “Wh-where’s Cuddles?” he stammered. 

Andy stood frozen like a statue, her mouth open. 

Evan slowly realized that she was nearly as big as he was. In fact, 
everyone was about his size. 

He pulled himself up to a sitting position. “Hey—I’m back to my 
normal size!” he cried. He shook his head hard as if trying to shake 
away his close call with the giant hamster. 

“There’s Cuddles!” Andy cried, pointing. 

Evan turned to see Cuddles huddled against the wall. “He’s a little 
hamster again!” Evan exclaimed happily. He took three quick steps, 
bent down, and grabbed Cuddles between his hands. “Gotcha!” 

Holding the hamster in front of him, he turned back to Andy and 
the others. “What happened? Why did we shrink back?” 

Andy was studying the blue Monster Blood can. Suddenly she 
tossed back her dark hair, her brown eyes lit up, and she started to 
laugh. “It’s the expiration date!” she cried happily. “The expiration 
date on the can—it’s today! The Monster Blood stops working today! 
The magic has worn out!” 

Evan let out a whoop of joy. 

Mr. Murphy, a wide grin on his round face, hurried over and put 
his arm around Evan’s shoulders. “Fine job, Evan! Fine job!” he 
exclaimed. “You saved the school. I’m proud of you!” 

“Thanks, Mr. Murphy,” Evan replied awkwardly. 

“You'll never make a basketball player now that you’re short 
again,” Mr. Murphy said, smiling. “But that was quite a good match 
with Cuddles. Have you ever thought of trying out for the wrestling 
team?” 


Andy came to Evan’s house for dinner that night. He greeted her at 
the door, eager to tell her how all the kids had apologized for not 
believing him about the Monster Blood. 

But before he could say anything, she held up a large brown 
envelope and grinned at him. 

“What’s that?” he asked, following her into the living room. 


“It’s a present my parents sent me from Europe,” she replied, her 
grin growing wider. “You won't believe what it is.” 

She started to pull open the envelope. But the front doorbell rang. 

Evan hurried to see who it was. 

“Mr. Murphy!” he cried in surprise. 

“Hi, Evan,” the teacher said, his round body nearly filling the 
entire front stoop. “Hope I’m not interrupting your dinner.” 

“No,” Evan replied. “Want to come in?” 

“No thanks,” Mr. Murphy replied. His expression turned solemn. 
“I came by because I thought you should have some sort of reward, 
Evan. You were a real hero at school today.” 

“Aw, not really,” Evan said awkwardly. He could feel his face 
growing hot and knew he was blushing. 

What kind of reward? Evan wondered, staring back at the 
teacher. A cash reward? 

Mr. Murphy raised the hamster cage into Evan’s view. “I’ve 
decided to reward you with Cuddles,” the teacher said. “I know how 
fond of him you are.” 

“No, please!” Evan started to plead. 

“Its a small token,” Mr. Murphy said. “To show how grateful I 
am. How grateful we all are.” 

“Please—no—!” 

But before Evan realized it, the hamster cage was in his hand, and 
Mr. Murphy was waddling back down the driveway to his car. 

“He gave you Cuddles?” Andy asked as Evan returned to the 
living room carrying the cage. He set it down on the coffee table. 

“Its my reward,” Evan told her, rolling his eyes. “Do you believe 
it?” 

“Well, you won't believe this!” Andy declared. “Look what my 
parents found in Europe!” 

She reached into the envelope and pulled out a blue plastic can. 
“Tt’s Monster Blood!” 

“Oh, no!” Evan wailed. 

“They wrote that they remembered how much fun I had with the 
old can,” Andy said, holding up the blue container. “So when they saw 
this can in a toy store in Germany, they decided to send me a new 
one.” 

Evan’s eyes went wide with fear. “You—you’re not going to open 
it?” he demanded warily. 

“Already did,” Andy replied. “Just to take a look. But I’m not 
going to use it. Really. I promise.” 

Evan started to say something—but he was interrupted by his 
mother’s call from the kitchen. “Dinnertime, you two! Wash your 


hands and come to the table!” 

Andy set the can of Monster Blood down on the desk in the 
corner. They obediently hurried to wash their hands. 

They had a lively dinner. There was lots to talk about. They 
laughed and joked about all that had happened at school. It was easy 
to laugh about it now that it was all over. 

After dinner, Evan and Andy returned to the living room. 

Andy was the first to see that the door to the hamster cage was 
wide open. The cage was empty. 

Evan was the one who spotted Cuddles on the desk. 

“Cuddles—what are you eating?” he cried. “What are you 
eating?” 


Scanning, formatting and 
proofing by Undead. 

Skip to main content
 
Texts
 
Video
 
Audio
 
Software
 
Images
My uploads
My loans
My favorites
My lists
My collections
My web archives
Account settings
Get help
Log out
 Search metadata
 Search text contents
 Search TV news captions
 Search radio transcripts
 Search archived web sites
Advanced Search
About Blog Projects Help Donate  Contact Jobs Volunteer People
Full text of "All 62 Goosebumps novels"
See other formats
Swi 
won't t 


MSAHOLASTIC 


DEEP TROUBLE 


Goosebumps - 19 
R.L. Stine 
(An Undead Scan v1.5) 


There I was, two hundred feet under the sea. 

I was on the hunt of my life. The hunt for the Great White 
Stingray. 

That’s what they called him at Coast Guard Headquarters. But, 
me, I called him Joe. 

The giant stingray had already stung ten swimmers. People were 
afraid to step into the water. Panic spread all up and down the coast. 

That’s why they sent for me. 

William Deep, Jr., of Baltimore, Maryland. 

Yes, William Deep, Jr., world-famous twelve-year-old undersea 
explorer. Solver of scary ocean problems. 

I captured the Great White Shark that terrorized Myrtle Beach. I 
proved he wasn’t so great! 

I fought the giant octopus that ate the entire California 
Championship Surfing Team. 

I unplugged the electric eel that sent shock waves all over Miami. 

But now I faced the fight of my life. Joe, the Great White 
Stingray. 

Somewhere down deep under the sea, he lurked. 

I had everything I needed: scuba suit, flippers, mask, oxygen tank, 
and poison-dart gun. 

Wait—did something move? Just behind that giant clam? 

I raised my dart gun and waited for an attack. 

Then, suddenly, my mask clouded. I couldn’t breathe. 

I strained for breath. No air came. 

My oxygen tank! Someone must have tampered with it! 

There was no time to lose. Two hundred feet down—and no air! I 
had to surface—fast! 

I kicked my legs, desperately trying to pull myself to the surface. 

Holding my breath. My lungs about to burst. I was losing 
strength, getting dizzy. 

Would I make it? Or would I die right here, deep under the ocean, 
Joe the Stingray’s dinner? 

Panic swept over me like an ocean tide. I searched through the 
fogged mask for my diving partner. Where was she when I needed 
her? 

Finally, I spotted her swimming up at the surface, near the boat. 

Help me! Save me! No air! I tried to tell her, waving my arms like 


a maniac. 

Finally she noticed me. She swam toward me and dragged my 
dazed and limp body to the surface. 

I ripped off my mask and sucked in mouthfuls of air. 

“What’s your problem, Aqua Man?” she cried. “Did a jellyfish 
sting you?” 

My diving partner is very brave. She laughs in the face of danger. 

I struggled to catch my breath. “No air. Someone—cut off—tank 


2) 


Then everything went black. 


My diving partner shoved my head back under the water. I opened my 
eyes and came up sputtering. 

“Get real, Billy,” she said. “Can’t you snorkel without acting like a 
total jerk?” 

I sighed. She was no fun. 

My “diving partner” was really just my bratty sister, Sheena. I 
was only pretending to be William Deep, Jr., undersea explorer. 

But would it kill Sheena to go along with it just once? 

My name actually is William Deep, Jr., but everybody calls me 
Billy. ’'m twelve—I think I mentioned that already. 

Sheena is ten. She looks like me. We both have straight black 
hair, but mine is short and hers goes down to her shoulders. We’re 
both skinny, with knobby knees and elbows, and long, narrow feet. 
We both have dark blue eyes and thick, dark eyebrows. 

Other than that, we’re not alike at all. 

Sheena has no imagination. She was never afraid of monsters in 
her closet when she was little. She didn’t believe in Santa Claus or the 
tooth fairy, either. She loves to say, “There’s no such thing.” 

I dove underwater and pinched Sheena’s leg. Attack of the Giant 
Lobster Man! 

“Stop it!” she screamed. She kicked me in the shoulder. I came up 
for air. 

“Hey, you two,” my uncle said. “Be careful down there.” 

My uncle stood on the deck of his sea lab boat, the Cassandra. He 
peered down at Sheena and me snorkeling nearby. 

My uncle’s name is George Deep, but everybody calls him Dr. D. 
Even my dad, who is his brother, calls him Dr. D. Maybe that’s 
because he looks just the way a scientist should. 

Dr. D. is short, thin, wears glasses and a very serious, thoughtful 
expression. He has curly brown hair and a bald spot at the back of his 
head. Anyone who saw him would say, “I bet you’re a scientist.” 

Sheena and I were visiting Dr. D. on the Cassandra. Every year 
our parents let us spend our summer vacation with Dr. D. It sure beats 
hanging out at home. This summer, we were anchored just off a tiny 
island called Ilandra, in the Caribbean Sea. 

Dr. D. is a marine biologist. He specializes in tropical marine life. 
He studies the habits of tropical fish and looks for new kinds of ocean 
plants and fish that haven’t been discovered yet. 


The Cassandra is a big and sturdy boat. It is about fifty feet long. 
Dr. D. uses most of the space for labs and research rooms. Up on deck 
is a cockpit, where he steers the boat. He keeps a dinghy tied to the 
starboard, or right side of the deck, and a huge glass tank on the port, 
or left side. 

Sometimes Dr. D. catches very big fish and keeps them 
temporarily in the glass tank—usually just long enough to tag the fish 
for research, or care for them if they are sick or injured. 

The rest of the deck is open space, good for playing catch or 
sunbathing. 

Dr. D.’s research takes him all over the world. He isn’t married 
and doesn’t have any kids. He says he’s too busy staring at fish. 

But he likes kids. That’s why he invites me and Sheena to visit 
him every summer. 

“Stick close together, kids,” Dr. D. said. “And don’t swim off too 
far. Especially you, Billy.” 

He narrowed his eyes at me. That’s his “I mean it” look. He never 
narrows his eyes at Sheena. 

“There’ve been reports of some shark sightings in the area,” he 
said. 

“Sharks! Wow!” I cried. 

Dr. D. frowned at me. “Billy,” he said. “This is serious. Don’t leave 
the boat. And don’t go near the reef.” 

I knew he was going to say that. 

Clamshell Reef is a long, red coral reef just a few hundred yards 
away from where we were anchored. I’d been dying to explore it ever 
since we got there. 

“Don’t worry about me, Dr. D.,” I called up to him. “I won’t get 
into trouble.” 

Sheena muttered under her breath, “Yeah, right.” 

I reached out to give her another lobster pinch, but she dove 
under water. 

“Good,” said Dr. D. “Now don’t forget—if you see a shark fin, try 
not to splash around a lot. Movement will attract it. Just slowly, 
steadily return to the boat.” 

“We won’t forget,” said Sheena, who had come up behind me, 
splashing like crazy. 

I couldn’t help feeling just a little bit excited. Pd always wanted 
to see a real, live shark. 

Pd seen sharks at the aquarium, of course. But they were trapped 
in a glass tank, where they just swam around restlessly, perfectly 
harmless. 

Not very exciting. 


I wanted to spot a shark’s fin on the horizon, floating over the 
water, closer, closer, heading right for us.... 

In other words, I wanted adventure. 

The Cassandra was anchored out in the ocean, a few hundred 
yards away from Clamshell Reef. The reef surrounded the island. 
Between the reef and the island stretched a beautiful lagoon. 

Nothing was going to stop me from exploring that lagoon—no 
matter what Dr. D. said. 

“Come on, Billy,” Sheena called, adjusting her mask. “Let’s check 
out that school of fish.” 

She pointed to a patch of tiny ripples in the water near the bow of 
the boat. She slid the mouthpiece into her mouth and lowered her 
head into the water. I followed her to the ripples. 

Soon Sheena and I were surrounded by hundreds of tiny, neon- 
blue fish. 

Underwater, I always felt as if I were in a faraway world. 
Breathing through the snorkel, I could live down here with the fish 
and the dolphins, I thought. After a while, maybe I would grow 
flippers and a fin. 

The tiny blue fish began to swim away, and I swam with them. 
They were so great-looking! I didn’t want them to leave me behind. 

Suddenly, the fish all darted from view. I tried to follow, but they 
were too fast. 

They had vanished! 

Had something scared them away? 

I glanced around. Clumps of seaweed floated near the surface. 
Then I saw a flash of red. 

I floated closer, peering through the mask. A few yards ahead of 
me I saw bumpy red formations. Red coral. 

Oh, no, I thought. Clamshell Reef. Dr. D. told me not to swim this 
far. 

I began to turn around. I knew I should swim back to the boat. 

But I was tempted to stay and explore a little. After all, I was 
already there. 

The reef looked like a red sand castle, filled with underwater 
caves and tunnels. Small fish darted in and out of them. The fish were 
bright yellow and blue. 

Maybe I could swim over and explore one of those tunnels, I 
thought. How dangerous could it be? 

Suddenly, I felt something brush against my leg. It tickled and 
sent a tingle up my leg. 

A fish? 

I glanced around, but I didn’t see anything. 


Then I felt it again. 

A tingling against my leg. 

And then it clutched me. 

Again I turned to see what it was. Again I saw nothing. 

My heart began to race. I knew it was probably nothing 
dangerous. But I wished I could see it. 

I turned and started back for the boat, kicking hard. 

But something grabbed my right leg—and held on! 

I froze in fear. Then I frantically kicked my leg as hard as I could. 

Let go! Let go of me! 

I couldn’t see it—and I couldn’t pull free! 

The water churned and tossed as I kicked with all my strength. 

Overcome with terror, I lifted my head out of the water and 
choked out a weak cry: “Help!” 

But it was no use. 

Whatever it was, it kept pulling me down. Down. 

Down to the bottom of the sea. 


“Help!” I cried out again. “Sheena! Dr. D.!” 

I was dragged below the surface again. I felt the slimy tentacle 
tighten around my ankle. 

As I sank underwater, I turned—and saw it. 

It loomed huge and dark. 

A sea monster! 

Through the churning waters, it glared at me with one giant 
brown eye. The terrifying creature floated underwater like an 
enormous, dark green balloon. Its mouth opened in a silent cry, 
revealing two rows of jagged, sharp teeth. 

An enormous octopus! But it had at least twelve tentacles! 

Twelve long, slimy tentacles. One was wrapped around my ankle. 
Another one slid toward me. 

NO! 

My arms thrashed the water. 

I gulped in mouthfuls of air. 

I struggled to the surface—but the huge creature dragged me 
down again. 

I couldn’t believe it. As I sank, scenes from my life actually 
flashed before my eyes. 

I saw my parents, waving to me as I boarded the yellow school 
bus for my first day of school. 

Mom and Dad! I’ll never see them again! 

What a way to go, I thought. Killed by a sea monster! 

No one will believe it. 

Everything started to turn red. I felt dizzy, weak. 

But something was pulling me, pulling me up. 

Up to the surface. Away from the tentacled monster. 

I opened my eyes, choking and sputtering. 

I stared up at Dr. D! 

“Billy! Are you all right?” Dr. D. studied me with concern. 

I coughed and nodded. I kicked my right leg. The slimy tentacle 
was gone. 

The dark creature had vanished. 

“I heard you screaming and saw you thrashing about,” said Dr. D. 
“T swam over from the boat as fast as I could. What happened?” 

Dr. D. had a yellow life jacket over his shoulders. He slipped a 
rubber lifesaver ring over my head. I floated easily now, the life ring 


under my arms. 

I had lost my flippers in the struggle. My mask and snorkel 
dangled around my neck. 

Sheena swam over and floated beside me, treading water. 

“It grabbed my leg!” I cried breathlessly. “It tried to pull me 
under!” 

“What grabbed your leg, Billy?” asked Dr. D. “I don’t see anything 
around here—” 

“It was a sea monster,” I told him. “A huge one! I felt its slimy 
tentacle grabbing my leg.... Ouch!” 

Something pinched my toe. 

“Tt’s back!” I shrieked in horror. 

Sheena popped out of the water and shook her wet hair, laughing. 

“That was me, you dork!” she cried. 

“Billy, Billy,” Dr. D. murmured. “You and your wild imagination.” 
He shook his head. “You nearly scared me to death. Please—don’t ever 
do that again. Your leg probably got tangled in a piece of seaweed, 
that’s all.” 

“But—but—!” I sputtered. 

He dipped his hand in the water and pulled up a handful of slimy 
green strings. “There’s seaweed everywhere.” 

“But I saw it!” I shouted. “I saw its tentacles, its big, pointy 
teeth!” 

“There’s no such thing as sea monsters,” said Sheena. Miss Know- 
It-All. 

“Let’s discuss it on the boat,” my uncle said, dropping the clump 
of seaweed back in the water. 

“Come on. Swim back with me. And stay away from the reef. 
Swim around it.” 

He turned around and started swimming toward the Cassandra. I 
saw that the sea monster had pulled me into the lagoon. The reef lay 
between us and the boat. But there was a break in the reef we could 
swim through. 

I followed them, thinking angry thoughts. 

Why didn’t they believe me? 

I had seen the creature grab my leg. It wasn’t a stupid clump of 
seaweed. It wasn’t my imagination. 

I was determined to prove them wrong. I’d find that creature and 
show it to them myself—someday. But not today. 

Now I was ready to get back to the safety of the boat. 

I swam up to Sheena and called, “Race you to the boat.” 

“Last one there is a chocolate-covered jellyfish!” she cried. 


Sheena can’t refuse a race. She started speeding toward the boat, 
but I caught her by the arm. 

“Wait,” I said. “No fair. You’re wearing flippers. Take them off.” 

“Too bad!” she cried, and pulled away. “See you at the boat!” I 
watched her splash away, building a good lead. 

She’s not going to win, I decided. 

I stared at the reef up ahead. 

It would be faster just to swim over the reef. A shortcut. 

I turned and started to swim straight toward the red coral. 

“Billy! Get back here!” Dr. D. shouted. 

I pretended I didn’t hear him. 

The reef loomed ahead. I was almost there. 

I saw Sheena splashing ahead of me. I kicked extra-hard. I knew 
she’d never have the guts to swim over the reef. She’d swim around 
the end of it. I would cut through and beat her. 

But my arms suddenly began to ache. I wasn’t used to swimming 
so far. 

Maybe I can stop at the reef and rest my arms for a second, I 
thought. 

I reached the reef. I turned around. Sheena was swimming to the 
left, around the reef. I figured I had a few seconds to rest. 

I stepped onto the red coral reef— 

—and screamed in horror! 


My foot burned as if it were on fire. The throbbing pain shot up my 
leg. 

I screamed and dove into the water. 

When I surfaced, I heard Sheena yelling, “Dr. D.! Come quick!” 

My foot burned, even in the cold ocean water. 

Dr. D. came up beside me. “Billy, what’s the problem now?” he 
demanded. 

“I saw him do something really stupid,” Sheena said, smirking. 

If my foot hadn’t been burning up, I definitely would have 
punched out her lights. 

“My foot!” I moaned. “I stepped on the reef—and—and—” 

Dr. D. held on to the lifesaver ring around my waist. “Ow. That’s 
painful,” he said, reaching up to pat my shoulder. “But you'll be all 
right. The burning will stop in a little while.” 

He pointed to the reef. “All that bright red coral is fire coral.” 

“Huh? Fire coral?” I stared back at it. 

“Even I knew that!” Sheena said. 

“It’s covered with a mild poison,” my uncle continued. “When it 
touches your skin, it burns like fire.” 

Now he tells me, I thought. 

“Don’t you know anything?” Sheena asked sarcastically. 

She was asking for it. She really was. 

“You're lucky you only burned your foot,” Dr. D. said. “Coral can 
be very sharp. You could have cut your foot and gotten poison into 
your bloodstream. Then you’d really be in trouble.” 

“Wow! What kind of trouble?” Sheena asked. She seemed awfully 
eager to hear about all the terrible things that could have happened to 
me. 

Dr. D.’s expression turned serious. “The poison could paralyze 
you,” he said. 

“Oh great,” I said. 

“So keep away from the red coral from now on,” Dr. D. warned. 
“And stay away from the lagoon, too.” 

“But that’s where the sea monster lives!” I protested. “We have to 
go back there. I have to show it to you!” 

Sheena bobbed in the blue-green water. “No such thing, no such 
thing,” she chanted. Her favorite phrase. “No such thing—right, Dr. 
D.?” 


“Well, you never know,” Dr. D. replied thoughtfully. “We don’t 
know all of the creatures that live in the oceans, Sheena. It’s better to 
say that scientists have never seen one.” 

“So there, She-Ra,” I said. 

Sheena spit a stream of water at me. She hates it when I call her 
She-Ra. 

“Listen, kids—I’m serious about staying away from this area,” 
said Dr. D. “There may not be a sea monster in that lagoon, but there 
could be sharks, poisonous fish, electric eels. Any number of 
dangerous creatures. Don’t swim over there.” 

He paused and frowned at me, as if to make sure Pd been paying 
attention. 

“How’s your foot feeling, Billy?” he asked. 

“It’s a little better now,” I told him. 

“Good. Enough adventure for one morning. Let’s get back to the 
boat. It’s almost lunchtime.” 

We all started swimming back to the Cassandra. 

As I kicked, I felt something tickle my leg again. 

Seaweed? 

No. 

It brushed against my thigh like—fingers. 

“Cut it out, Sheena,” I shouted angrily. I spun around to splash 
water in her face. 

But she wasn’t there. She wasn’t anywhere near me. 

She was up ahead, swimming beside Dr. D. 

Sheena couldn’t possibly have tickled me. 

But something definitely did. 

I stared down at the water, suddenly gripped with terror. 

What was down there? 

Why was it teasing me like that? 

Was it preparing to grab me again and pull me down forever? 


Alexander DuBrow, Dr. D.’s assistant, helped us aboard the boat. 

“Hey, I heard shouting,” Alexander said. “Is everything okay?” 

“Everything is fine, Alexander,” said Dr. D. “Billy stepped on 
some fire coral, but he’s all right.” 

As I climbed up the ladder, Alexander grabbed my hands and 
pulled me aboard. 

“Wow, Billy,” he said. “Fire coral. I accidentally bumped into the 
fire coral my first day here. I saw stars. I really did, man. You sure 
you're okay?” 

I nodded and showed him my foot. “It feels better now. But that 
wasn’t the worst thing that happened. I was almost eaten by a sea 
monster!” 

“No such thing, no such thing,” Sheena chanted. 

“I really saw it,” I insisted. “They don’t believe me. But it was 
there. In the lagoon. It was big and green and—” 

Alexander smiled. “If you say so, Billy,” he said. He winked at 
Sheena. 

I wanted to punch out his lights, too. 

Big deal science student. What did he know? 

Alexander was in his early twenties. But, unlike Dr. D., he didn’t 
look like a scientist. 

He looked more like a football player. He was very tall, about six 
feet four inches, and muscular. He had thick, wavy blond hair and 
blue eyes that crinkled in the corners. He had broad shoulders, and 
big, powerful-looking hands. He spent a lot of time in the sun and had 
a smooth, dark tan. 

“I hope you're all hungry,” Alexander said. “I made chicken salad 
sandwiches for lunch.” 

“Oh. Great,” Sheena said, rolling her eyes. 

Alexander did most of the cooking. He thought he was good at it. 
But he wasn’t. 

I went below deck to my cabin to change out of my wet bathing 
suit. My cabin was really just a tiny sleeping cubby with a cupboard 
for my things. Sheena had one just like it. Dr. D. and Alexander had 
bigger cabins that they could actually walk around in. 

We ate in the galley, which was what Dr. D. called the boat’s 
kitchen. It had a built-in table and built-in seats, and a small area for 
cooking. 


When I entered the galley, Sheena was already sitting at the table. 
There was a big sandwich on a plate in front of her, and one waiting 
for me. 

Neither of us was too eager to try Alexander’s chicken salad. The 
night before, we had had Brussels sprouts casserole. For breakfast this 
morning, he served us whole wheat pancakes that sank to the bottom 
of my stomach like the Titanic going down! 

“You first,” I whispered to my sister. 

“Uh-uh,” Sheena said, shaking her head. “You try it. You’re 
older.” 

My stomach growled. I sighed. There was nothing to do but taste 
it. 

I sank my teeth into the sandwich and started chewing. 

Not bad, I thought at first. A little chicken, a little mayonnaise. It 
actually tasted like a regular chicken salad sandwich. 

Then, suddenly, my tongue started to burn. My whole mouth was 
on fire! 

I let out a cry and grabbed for the glass of iced tea in front of me. 
I downed the entire glass. 

“Fire coral!” I screamed. “You put fire coral in the chicken salad!” 

Alexander laughed. “Just a little chili pepper. For taste. You like 
it?” 

“I think I’d rather have cereal for lunch,” Sheena said, setting 
down her sandwich. “If you don’t mind.” 

“You can’t have cereal for every meal,” Alexander replied, 
frowning. “No wonder you’re so skinny, Sheena. You never eat 
anything but cereal. Where’s your spirit of adventure?” 

“I think I’ll have cereal, too,” I said sheepishly. “Just for a change 
of pace.” 

Dr. D. came into the galley. “What’s for lunch?” he asked. 

“Chicken salad sandwiches,” said Alexander. “I made them spicy.” 

“Very spicy,” I warned him. 

Dr. D. glanced at me and raised an eyebrow. “Oh, really?” he 
said. “You know, I’m not very hungry. I think I'll just have cereal for 
lunch.” 

“Maybe Billy and I could make dinner tonight,” Sheena offered. 
She poured cereal into a bowl and added milk. “It’s not fair for 
Alexander to cook all the time.” 

“That’s a nice idea, Sheena,” said Dr. D. “What do you two know 
how to make?” 

“I know how to make brownies from a mix,” I offered. 

“And I know how to make fudge,” said Sheena. 

“Hmm,” said Dr. D. “Maybe Pll cook tonight. How does grilled 


fish sound?” 
“Great!” I said. 


After lunch, Dr. D. went into his office to go over some notes. 
Alexander led Sheena and me into the main lab to show us around. 

The work lab was really cool. It had three big glass tanks along 
the wall filled with weird, amazing fish. 

The smallest tank held two bright yellow sea horses and an 
underwater trumpet. The underwater trumpet was a long, red-and- 
white fish shaped like a tube. There were also a lot of guppies 
swimming around in this tank. 

Another tank held some flame angelfish, which were orange-red 
like fire, and a harlequin tusk-fish, with orange-and-aqua tiger stripes 
for camouflage. 

The biggest tank held a long, black-and-yellow snakelike thing 
with a mouth full of teeth. 

“Ugh!” Sheena made a disgusted face as she stared at the long 
fish. “That one is really gross!” 

“That’s a black ribbon eel,” said Alexander. “He bites, but he’s not 
deadly. We call him Biff.” 

I snarled through the glass at Biff, but he ignored me. 

I wondered what it would be like to come face to face with Biff in 
the ocean. His teeth looked nasty, but he wasn’t nearly as big as the 
sea monster. I figured William Deep, Jr., world-famous undersea 
explorer, could handle it. 

I turned away from the fish tanks and stood by the control panel, 
staring at all the knobs and dials. 

“What does this do?” I asked. I pushed a button. A loud horn 
blared. We all jumped, startled. 

“It honks the horn,” Alexander said, laughing. 

“Dr. D. told Billy not to touch things without asking first,” said 
Sheena. “He’s told him a million times. He never listens.” 

“Shut up, She-Ra!” I said sharply. 

“You shut up.” 

“Hey—no problem,” said Alexander, raising both hands, 
motioning for us to chill out. “No harm done.” 

I turned back to the panel. Most of the dials were lit up, with 
little red indicators moving across their faces. I noticed one dial that 
was dark, its red indicator still. 

“What’s this for?” I asked, pointing to the dark dial. “It looks like 
you forgot to turn it on.” 

“Oh, that controls the Nansen bottle,” Alexander said. “It’s 
broken.” 


“What’s a Nansen bottle?” asked Sheena. 

“It collects samples of seawater from way down deep,” said 
Alexander. 

“Why don’t you fix it?” I asked. 

“We can’t afford to,” said Alexander. 

“Why not?” asked Sheena. “Doesn’t the university give you 
money?” 

We both knew that Dr. D.’s research was paid for by a university 
in Ohio. 

“They gave us money for our research,” Alexander explained. 
“But it’s almost gone. We’re waiting to see if they’ll give us more. In 
the meantime, we don’t have the money to fix things.” 

“What if the Cassandra breaks down or something?” I asked. 

“Then I guess we’ll have to put her in dry dock for a while,” said 
Alexander. “Or else find a new way to get more money.” 

“Wow,” said Sheena. “That would mean no more summer visits.” 

I hated to think of the Cassandra just sitting on a dock. Even 
worse was the thought of Dr. D. being stuck on land with no fish to 
study. 

Our uncle was miserable whenever he had to go ashore. He didn’t 
feel comfortable unless he was on a boat. I know, because one 
Christmas he came to our house to visit. 

Usually Dr. D. is fun to be with. But that Christmas visit was a 
nightmare. 

Dr. D. spent the whole time pacing through the house. He barked 
orders at us like a sea captain. 

“Billy, sit up straight!” he yelled at me. “Sheena, swab the decks!” 

He just wasn’t himself. 

Finally, on Christmas Eve, my dad couldn’t take it anymore. He 
told Dr. D. to shape up or ship out. 

Dr. D. ended up spending a good part of Christmas Day in the 
bathtub playing with my old toy boats. As long as he stayed in the 
water, he was back to normal. 

I never wanted to see Dr. D. stranded on land again. 

“Don’t worry, kids,” Alexander said. “Dr. D. has always found a 
way to get by.” 

I hoped Alexander was right. 

I studied another strange dial, marked Sonar Probes. 

“Hey, Alexander,” I said. “Will you show me how the sonar 
probes work?” 

“Sure,” said Alexander. “Just let me finish a few chores.” 

He walked over to the first fish tank. He scooped out a few 


guppies with a small net. 

“Who wants to feed Biff today?” 

“Not me,” said Sheena. “Yuck!” 

“No way!” I said as I stepped to a porthole and peered out. 

I thought I heard a motor outside. So far we had seen very few 
other boats. Not many people passed by Ilandra. 

A white boat chugged up to the side of the Cassandra. It was 
smaller but newer than our boat. A logo on the side said Marina Zoo. 

A man and a woman stood on the deck of the zoo boat. They 
were both neatly dressed in khaki pants and button-down shirts. The 
man had a short, neat haircut, and the woman’s brown hair was 
pulled back in a ponytail. She carried a black briefcase. 

The man waved to someone on the deck of the Cassandra. I 
figured he had to be waving at Dr. D. 

Now Sheena and Alexander stood beside me at the porthole, 
watching. 

“Who’s that?” Sheena asked. 

Alexander cleared his throat. “Pd better go see what this is 
about,” he said. 

He handed Sheena the net with the guppies in it. “Here,” he said. 
“Feed Biff. I’ll be back later.” 

He left the lab in a hurry. 

Sheena looked at the squirming guppies in the net and made a 
face. 

‘Tm not going to stay here and watch Biff eat these poor 
guppies.” She stuck the net in my hand and ran out of the cabin. 

I didn’t want to watch Biff eat the poor fish, either. But I didn’t 
know what else to do with them. 

I quickly dumped the guppies into Biff’s tank. The eel’s head shot 
forward. His teeth clamped down on a fish. The guppy disappeared. 
Biff grabbed for another one. 

He was a fast eater. 

I dropped the net on a table and walked out of the lab. 

I made my way down the narrow passageway, planning to go up 
on deck for some air. 

I wondered if Dr. D. would let me do some more snorkeling this 
afternoon. 

If he said yes, maybe I would swim toward the lagoon, see if I 
could find any sign of the sea monster. 

Was I scared? 

Yes. 

But I was also determined to prove to my sister and uncle that I 


wasn’t crazy. That I wasn’t making it up. 

I was passing Dr. D.’s office when I heard voices. I figured Dr. D. 
and Alexander must be in there with the two people from the zoo. 

I paused for just a second. I didn’t mean to eavesdrop, I swear. 
But the man from the zoo had a loud voice, and I couldn’t help but 
hear him. 


And what he said was the most amazing thing I had ever heard in 
my whole, entire life. 


“I don’t care how you do it, Dr. Deep,” the man bellowed. “But I 
want you to find that mermaid!” 


A mermaid! 

Was he serious? 

I couldn’t believe it. Did he really want my uncle to find a real, 
live mermaid? 

I knew Sheena would start chanting, “No such thing, no such 
thing.” But here was a grown man, a man who worked for a zoo, 
talking about a mermaid. It had to be real! 

My heart started to pound with excitement. I might be one of the 
first people on Earth ever to see a mermaid! I thought. 

And then I had an even better thought: What if I was the one to 
find her? 

Pd be famous! I’d be on TV and everything! 

William Deep, Jr., the famous sea explorer! 

Well, after I heard that, I couldn’t just walk away. I had to hear 
more. 

Holding my breath, I pressed my ear to the door and listened. 

“Mr. Showalter, Ms. Wickman, please understand,” I heard Dr. D. 
saying. “I’m a scientist, not a circus trainer. My work is serious. I can’t 
waste my time looking for fairy tale creatures.” 

“We’re quite serious, Dr. Deep,” said Ms. Wickman. “There is a 
mermaid in these waters. And if anyone can find her, you can.” 

I heard Alexander ask, “What makes you think there’s really a 
mermaid out there?” 

“A fisherman from a nearby island spotted her,” replied the man 
from the zoo. “He said he got pretty close to her—and he’s sure she’s 
real. He saw her near the reef—this reef, just off Ilandra.” 

The reef! Maybe she lives in the lagoon! 

I leaned closer to the door. I didn’t want to miss a word of this. 

“Some of these fishermen are very superstitious, Mr. Showalter,” 
my uncle scoffed. “For years there have been stories... but no real 
reason to believe them.” 

“We didn’t believe the man ourselves,” said the woman. “Not at 
first. But we asked some other fishermen in the area, and they claim 
to have seen the mermaid, too. And I think they’re telling the truth. 
Their descriptions of her match, down to the smallest detail.” 

I could hear my uncle’s desk chair creak. I imagined him leaning 
forward as he asked, “And, how, exactly, did they describe her?” 

“They said she looked like a young girl,” Mr. Showalter told him. 


“Except for the”’—he cleared his throat—“the fish tail. She’s small, 
delicate, with long, blond hair.” 

“They described her tail as shiny and bright green,” said the 
woman. “I know it sounds incredible, Dr. Deep. But when we spoke to 
the fishermen, we were convinced that they really saw a mermaid!” 

There was a pause. 

Was I missing something? I pressed my ear to the door. I heard 
my uncle ask, “And, why, exactly, do you want to capture this 
mermaid?” 

“Obviously, a real, live mermaid would be a spectacular 
attraction at a zoo like ours,” said the woman. “People from all over 
the world would flock to see her. The Marina Zoo would make 
millions of dollars.” 

“We are prepared to pay you very well for your trouble, Dr. 
Deep,” said Mr. Showalter. “I understand you are running out of 
money. What if the university refuses to give you more? It would be 
terrible if you had to stop your important work just because of that.” 

“The Marina Zoo can promise you one million dollars,” said the 
woman. “If you find the mermaid. I’m sure your lab could run for a 
long time on that much money.” 

A million dollars! I thought. How could Dr. D. turn down that 
kind of money? 

My heart pounded with excitement. I pushed against the door, 
straining to hear. 

What would my uncle’s answer be? 


Leaning hard against the door, I heard Dr. D. let out a long, low 
whistle. “That’s quite a lot of money, Ms. Wickman,” I heard him say. 

There was a long pause. Then he continued. “But even if 
mermaids existed, I wouldn’t feel right about capturing one for a zoo 
to put on display.” 

“I promise you we would take excellent care of her,” replied Mr. 
Showalter. “Our dolphins and whales are very well cared for. The 
mermaid, of course, would get extra-special treatment.” 

“And, remember, Dr. Deep,” said Ms. Wickman. “If you don’t find 
her, someone else will. And there’s no guarantee that they will treat 
the mermaid as well as we will.” 

“I suppose you're right,” I heard my uncle reply. “It would 
certainly be a big boost to my research if I found her.” 

“Then you'll do it?” asked Mr. Showalter eagerly. 

Say yes, Dr. D.! I thought. Say yes! 

I pressed my whole body against the door. “Yes,” my uncle 
answered. “If there really is a mermaid, I’ll find her.” 

Excellent! I thought. 

“Very good,” said Ms. Wickman. 

“Excellent decision,” Mr. Showalter added enthusiastically. “I 
knew we had come to the right man for the job.” 

“We’ll be back in a couple of days to see how the search is going. 
I hope you’ll have some good news by then,” Ms. Wickman said. 

“That’s not much time,” I heard Alexander remark. 

“We know,” Ms. Wickman replied. “But, obviously, the sooner 
you find her, the better.” 

“And, please,” Mr. Showalter said, “please keep this a secret. No 
one must know about the mermaid. Pm sure you can imagine what 
would happen if—” 

CRASSSSSSSH! 

I lost my balance. I fell against the door. 

To my shock, it swung open—and I tumbled into the room. 


I landed in a heap in the center of the cabin floor. 

Dr. D., Mr. Showalter, Ms. Wickman, and Alexander all gaped at 
me with their mouths open. I guess they hadn’t expected me to drop 
in. 

“Uh... hi, everyone,” I murmured. I felt my face burning, and 
knew that I was blushing. “Nice day for a mermaid hunt.” 

Mr. Showalter jumped to his feet angrily. He glared at my uncle. 
“This was supposed to be a secret!” 

Alexander strode across the room and helped me to my feet. 
“Don’t worry about Billy,” he said. He put a protective arm around 
me. “You can trust him.” 

“I’m very embarrassed,” Dr. D. told his visitors. “This is my 
nephew, Billy Deep. He and his sister are visiting me for a few weeks.” 

“Can they keep our secret?” asked Ms. Wickman. 

Dr. D. turned his gaze on Alexander. Alexander nodded. 

“Yes, ’m sure they can,” said Dr. D. “Billy won’t say anything to 
anyone. Right, Billy?” 

He narrowed his eyes at me. I really do hate it when he does that. 
But this time I couldn’t blame him. 

I shook my head. “No. I won’t tell anyone. I swear.” 

“Just to be on the safe side, Billy,” said Dr. D., “don’t mention the 
mermaid to Sheena. She’s too young to have to keep a big secret like 
this.” 

“I promise,” I replied solemnly. I raised my right hand as if 
swearing an oath. “I won’t breathe a word to Sheena.” 

This was so cool! 

I knew the biggest secret in the world—and Sheena wouldn’t have 
a clue! 

The man and woman from the zoo exchanged glances. I could see 
they were still worried. 

Alexander said, “You really can trust Billy. He’s very serious for 
someone his age.” 

You bet I’m serious, I thought. 

I’m William Deep, Jr., world-famous mermaid catcher. 

Mr. Showalter and Ms. Wickman seemed to relax a little. 

“Good,” said Ms. Wickman. She shook hands with Dr. D., 
Alexander, and me. 

Mr. Showalter gathered up some papers and put them into the 


briefcase. 

“We’ll see you in a few days, then,” said Ms. Wickman. “Good 
luck.” 

I won’t need luck, I thought, watching them roar away on their 
boat a few minutes later. 

I won’t need luck because I have skill. And daring. 

My head spun with all kinds of exciting thoughts. 

Would I let Sheena be on TV with me after I single-handedly 
captured the mermaid? 

Probably not. 


That night I sneaked off the boat and slipped into the dark water. I 
swam noiselessly toward the lagoon. 

I glanced back at the Cassandra. It floated quietly. All the 
portholes were dark. 

Good, I thought. No one is awake to notice that I’m gone. No one 
knows I’m out here. No one knows I’m swimming in the sea at night, 
all alone. 

Swimming steadily, easily, under the silvery moonlight, I made 
my way around the reef and into the dark lagoon. 

I slowed my stroke just past the reef. 

My eyes darted eagerly around the lagoon. The waves lapped 
gently under me. The water sparkled as if a million tiny diamonds 
floated on the surface. 

Where was the mermaid? 

I knew she was there. I knew I would find her here. 

From deep below me, I heard a low rumble. 

I listened hard. The sound, faint at first, grew louder. 

The waves tossed as the sound became a steady roar. 

It rumbled like an earthquake. An earthquake on the ocean floor. 

The waves tumbled and tossed. I struggled to stay on top of them. 

What was happening? 

Suddenly, from the middle of the lagoon, a huge wave swelled. It 
rose higher, like a gigantic geyser. 

Higher. Over my head. As tall as a building! 

A tidal wave? 

No. 

The wave broke. 

The dark creature pushed up underneath it. 

Water slid off its grotesque body. Its single eye stared out darkly 
at me. Its tentacles writhed and stretched. 

I screamed. 


The monster blinked its muddy brown eye at me. 

I tried to turn and swim away. 

But it was too fast. 

The tentacles whipped out—and grabbed me, tightening, 
tightening around my waist. 

Then a slimy, cold tentacle wrapped around my neck and started 
to squeeze. 


“J—I can’t breathe!” I managed to choke out. 

I tugged at the tentacle twining around my throat. 

“Help me—somebody!” 

I opened my eyes—and stared up at the ceiling. 

I was lying in bed. 

In my cabin. 

The sheet was wrapped tightly around me. 

I took a deep breath and waited for my heart to stop thudding. A 
dream. 

Only a dream. 

I rubbed my eyes, lifted myself, and peered out the porthole. The 
sun was just rising over the horizon. The sky was morning red. The 
water a hazy purple. 

Squinting past the reef, I saw the lagoon. Perfectly still. Not a sea 
monster in sight. 

I wiped the sweat from my forehead with my pajama sleeve. 

No need to be afraid, I told myself. It was just a dream. A bad 
dream. 

I shook my head, trying to forget about the sea monster. 

I couldn’t let it scare me. I couldn’t let it stop me from finding 
that mermaid. 

Was anyone up? Had I yelled out loud in my sleep? 

I listened carefully. I could hear only the creaking of the boat, the 
splash of waves against its side. 

The pink morning sunlight cheered me. The dark water looked 
inviting. 

I slipped into my bathing suit and crept out of my cabin as quietly 
as I could. I didn’t want anyone to hear me. 

In the galley I saw a half-empty pot of coffee sitting on the 
warmer. That meant Dr. D. was already up. 

I tiptoed down the passageway and listened. I could hear him 
puttering around in the main lab. 

I grabbed my snorkel, flippers, and mask and went up on deck. 
Nobody up there. 

The coast was clear. 

Silently, I climbed down the ladder, slipped into the water, and 
snorkeled toward the lagoon. 

I know it was crazy to sneak away like that. But you can’t 


imagine how excited I was. Even in my wildest daydreams as William 
Deep, Jr., undersea explorer, I never thought I would see a real, live 
mermaid! 

As I snorkeled toward the lagoon, I tried to imagine what she 
would look like. 

Mr. Showalter had said she looked like a young girl with long, 
blond hair and a green fish tail. 

Weird, I thought. 

Half-human, half-fish. 

I tried to imagine my own legs replaced by a fish tail. 

Pd be the greatest swimmer on Earth if I had a fish tail, I thought. 
I could win the Olympics without even practicing. 

I wonder if she’s pretty? I thought. And I wonder if she can talk! I 
hope she can. She can tell me all kinds of secrets of the oceans. 

I wonder how she breathes underwater? 

I wonder if she thinks like a human or like a fish? 

So many questions. 

This is going to be the greatest adventure of my life, I thought. 
After I’m famous, Ill write a book about my undersea adventures. Tl 
call it Courage of the Deep, by William Deep, Jr. Maybe someone will 
even turn it into a movie. 

I raised my head and saw that I was nearing the reef. I 
concentrated on keeping away from it. I didn’t want to touch that fire 
coral again. 

I couldn’t wait to explore the lagoon. I was so excited, I forgot all 
about the terrifying dream I had had the night before. 

I kicked my legs carefully, watching out for red coral. 

I was nearly past the reef when I felt something brush my leg. 

“Oh!” I cried out and swallowed a mouthful of salty water. 

Sputtering and choking, I felt something wrap around my ankle. 

As it grabbed at me, it scratched my ankle. 

This time I knew for sure it wasn’t seaweed. 

Seaweed doesn’t have claws! 


10 


Ignoring the panic that nearly froze me, I kicked and thrashed with all 
my strength. 

“Stop it! Stop kicking me!” a voice screamed. 

The mermaid? 

“Hey—!” I cried out angrily as Sheena’s head appeared beside me. 

She pulled up her snorkeling mask. “I didn’t scratch you that 
hard!” she snapped. “You don’t have to go crazy!” 

“What are you doing here?” I cried. 

“What are you doing here?” she demanded nastily. “You know Dr. 
D. told us not to swim here.” 

“Then you shouldn’t be here—should you?” I shouted. 

“I knew you were up to something, so I followed you,” Sheena 
replied, adjusting her mask. 

‘Tm not up to anything,” I lied. “I’m just snorkeling.” 

“Sure, Billy. You’re just snorkeling at six-thirty in the morning 
exactly where you’re not supposed to—and where you burned your 
foot on that fire coral yesterday. You’re either up to something, or 
you’re totally crazy!” She squinted at me, waiting for a response. 

What a choice! I was either up to something, or crazy. Which 
should I admit to? 

If I admitted I was up to something, I’d have to tell her about the 
mermaid—and I couldn’t do that. 

“Okay,” I said with a casual shrug. “I guess I’m crazy.” 

“Well, big news,” she muttered sarcastically. “Come on back to 
the boat, Billy,” said Sheena. “Dr. D. will be looking for us.” 

“You go back. PII be there in a little while.” 

“Billy,” said Sheena. “Dr. D. is going to be very mad. He’s 
probably ready to hop in the dinghy and search for us right now.” 

I was about to give up and go with her. Then, out of the corner of 
my eye, I saw a big splash on the other side of the reef. 

The mermaid! I thought. That’s got to be her! If I don’t go look for 
her now, I might miss her! 

I turned away from Sheena and started swimming very fast, 
straight for the reef. 

I could hear Sheena screaming, “Billy! Come back! Billy!” 

I thought I heard an extra note of panic in her voice, but I ignored 
it. Just Sheena trying to scare me again, I thought. 

“Billy!” she screamed again. “Billy!” I kept on swimming. No way 


I was going to stop now. But as it turned out, I should have listened to 
her. 


11 


Swimming fast, I raised my head, searching for a good place to swim 
safely over the fire coral. 

I saw another splash. Across the lagoon. Near the shore. 

That’s got to be the mermaid! I thought excitedly. 

I stared hard, trying to catch a glimpse of her. 

I thought I saw some kind of fin. 

I made my way past the reef into the deep, still waters of the 
lagoon. I strained to see the mermaid, but my mask had fogged. 

Rats! I thought. What a time for my mask to start leaking! 

I came up for air and pulled off the mask. I hoped I wouldn’t lose 
sight of the mermaid because of this. 

I wiped the water from my eyes and, leaving the mask wrapped 
around my wrist, stared toward the lagoon. 

That’s when I saw it. A few hundred yards away. 

Not the green fish tail of a mermaid. 

The fin I saw was a gray-white triangle sticking straight up in the 
water. 

The fin of a hammerhead shark. 

As I stared in horror, the fin turned in the water, and then ripped 
toward me, moving steady and straight as a torpedo. 


12 


Where was Sheena? 

Was she still behind me? 

I glanced back. I could see her in the distance, splashing back to 
the boat. 

I was forced to forget about Sheena as the gray fin swiftly moved 
closer. 

I thrashed my arms in the water, trying to swim away. 

When the shark swam right past me, I stopped thrashing. 

Would it go away? Would it leave me alone? 

My heart in my throat, I started swimming in the other direction, 
toward the reef. Away from the shark. 

I kept my eyes on that fin. 

It began to turn. The shark’s fin streamed toward me in a wide 
arc. 

“Ohhh.” I let out a terrified groan as I realized it was circling me. 

Now I didn’t know which way to go. The shark swam between me 
and the boat. If I could turn around and climb on to the reef, maybe I 
would be safe. 

The huge fin slid closer. 

I plunged toward the reef. I knew I had to keep distance between 
me and the shark. 

Suddenly, the fin shot up in front of me—between me and the 
reef. 

The shark kept circling, closing in, swimming faster and faster, 
making the circle smaller as he swam. 

I was trapped. But I couldn’t stay still. I couldn’t just float there, 
waiting for the shark to eat me. 

I had to fight. I kicked my legs in a panic as I swam toward the 
reef. 

I was nearer to the reef now. But the shark’s circles grew smaller, 
smaller. 

I breathed in quick, shallow gasps. I couldn’t think clearly. I was 
too terrified. The same two words echoed in my brain: The shark. The 
shark. 

Over and over again. The shark. The shark. 

The shark swam around me in a tight circle. His tail swished, 
sending up waves of water over me. 

The shark. The shark. 


I stared at the monster in wide-eyed horror. He swam so close, I 
could see him clearly. He was big—at least ten feet long. His head was 
wide and hideous, long like the head of a hammer, with an eye on 
each end. 

I heard my voice quivering, “No... no... 

Something cold brushed my leg. 

The shark. The shark. 

My stomach lurched. I threw my head back and let out a howl of 
sheer terror. 

“Aaaaaiiii!” 

Pain jolted down my spine. 

The shark had bumped me with its snout. My body rose out of the 
water, then hit the surface with a smack. 

I froze. 

The shark was hungry. 

It wanted to fight. 

It circled me again, then zoomed straight for me. 

Its jaws opened. I saw rows and rows of sharp teeth. 

I screamed out a hoarse, “NO!” I thrashed, panicked. I kicked 
with all my strength. 

The razor teeth brushed by, just missing my leg. 

The reef. I had to get to the reef. It was my only chance. 

I dove for the coral. The shark plunged toward me. I dodged it 
once more. 

I grabbed the red coral. Pain shot through my hand. The fire 
coral. 

I didn’t care. 

The top of the reef sat just above the surface of the water. I tried 
to pull myself up. My whole body stung. 

I had almost made it. Soon I'd be safe. 

With a mighty kick, I hoisted myself onto the reef—and was 
yanked back into the water. 

My stomach slammed against the side of the reef. I felt a sharp 
stab of pain in my leg. 

I tried to pull my leg away. I couldn't. 

It was caught in the jaws of the shark. 

My mind screamed with terror. 

The shark. The shark. 

It’s got me! 


2) 


13 


My entire body burned with pain. I slipped heavily into the water. 

The shark knew he had me. I had no strength left to fight. 

Then something splashed nearby. 

The shark released my leg and jerked toward the splash. 

I had no time to catch my breath. The shark circled back. It 
charged at me. 

The gaping jaws moved in for the kill. 

I shut my eyes and let out a shrill scream of terror. 

A second passed. Then another. 

Nothing happened. 

I heard a loud thump. 

I opened my eyes. 

Something had come between me and the shark, a few feet in 
front of me. 

I stared. The water churned white. A long, shiny green fish tail 
rose out of the water and splashed back down. 

Another fish was fighting the shark! 

The shark rolled over, then attacked. The green fish tail smacked 
the shark hard. The shark went under. 

I couldn’t see what was happening. The water rocked higher, 
tossing up frothy, white waves. 

All around me the water bubbled and churned, white with foam. 
Over the crash of the water, I heard shrill animal squeals. 

Sharks don’t squeal, do they? I thought. What is making that 
sound? 

The shark surfaced, its toothy jaws gaping. It snapped them at 
something, once, twice. Snapping at air. 

The long, green fish tail rose out of the water and smacked the 
shark hard. A direct hit on its broad hammerhead. 

The shark shut its jaws and sank below the surface. 

Then I heard a loud bump! The water stopped churning. 

A second later, the huge gray fin surfaced a few yards away, 
speeding off in the other direction. 

The shark was swimming away! 

I stared at the green fish tail as it arced over the dark, swelling 
water. 

As the waters calmed, I heard a low, musical sound. It was 
beautiful and slightly sad. Whistling and humming at the same time. 


It sounded something like a whale. But this creature was much 
smaller than a whale. 

The green tail swung around. Then the creature lifted its head. 

A head with long, blond hair. 

The mermaid! 


14 


Bobbing in the water, I forgot my burning pain as I gaped at her. 

To my amazement, the mermaid looked just as the zoo people 
had said she would. 

Her head and shoulders were smaller than mine, but her flashing 
green tail stretched out, long and powerful. Her wide, sea-green eyes 
sparkled. Her skin gave off a pale pink glow. 

I stared at her, unable to speak. 

She’s real! I thought. And she’s so beautiful! 

At last I found my voice. “You—you saved me,” I stammered. 
“You saved my life. Thank you!” 

She shyly lowered her eyes and cooed at me through shell-pink 
lips. What was she trying to say? 

“What can I do in return?” I asked her. “I’ll do anything I can.” 

She smiled, and uttered that haunting low hum. 

She was trying to talk to me. I wished I could understand her. 

She reached for my hand and examined it, frowning over the red 
burns from the fire coral. Her hand felt cool. She passed it over the 
palm of my hand, and the pain from the burns began to fade away. 

“Wow!” I exclaimed. I must have sounded pretty stupid, but I 
didn’t know what else to say. Her touch was like magic. When she 
held my hand, I could float without treading water. Just as she did. 

Was this another dream? 

I closed my eyes and opened them again. 

I was still floating in the sea, staring at a blond-haired mermaid. 

No. Not a dream. 

She smiled again and shook her head, making those low singing 
sounds. 

I could hardly believe that only a few minutes before rd been 
frantically fighting off a hungry shark. 

I raised my head and searched the waters. The shark had 
vanished. The water had calmed, shimmering like gold now under the 
morning sunlight. And there I was, floating in the sea off a deserted 
island with a real mermaid. 

Sheena will never believe this, I thought. Not in a million years. 

Suddenly, the mermaid flipped her tail and disappeared under the 
water. 

Startled, I searched around for her. She had left without a trace— 
not a ripple, not a bubble. 


Where did she go? I wondered. Is she gone, just like that? Will I 
never see her again? 

I rubbed my eyes and looked for her again. No sign of her. A few 
fish darted past me. 

She had disappeared so instantly, I began to think I had dreamed 
her up after all. 

Just then, I felt a tiny pinch on my foot. 

“Ouch!” I yelled, quickly pulling away. I began to panic. The 
shark was back! 

Then, behind me, I heard a small splash and a whistlelike giggle. I 
turned around. 

The mermaid smiled mischievously at me. She snapped her 
fingers in a pinching motion. 

“It was you!” I cried, laughing with relief. “You’re worse than my 
little sister!” 

She whistled again and slapped her tail against the surface of the 
water. 

Suddenly, a dark shadow fell across her face. I raised my eyes to 
see what it was. 

Too late. 

A heavy net dropped over us. Startled, I thrashed my arms and 
legs. But that only tangled them more in the rope. 

The net tightened over both of us. We were thrown together. 

We struggled helplessly as the net jerked us up. 

The mermaid’s eyes widened and she squealed in terror. 

“EEEEEE!” she cried. 

We were being pulled up out of the water. 

“EEEEEEE!” The mermaid’s frightened wail rose like a siren, 
drowning out my feeble cries for help. 


15 


“Billy—I don’t believe it!” 

I gazed up through the holes in the net and recognized Dr. D. and 
Sheena. They struggled to pull us aboard the dinghy. 

Sheena stared down at me and the mermaid in amazement. Dr. 
D.’s eyes were wide, and his mouth hung open. 

“You’ve found her, Billy!” he said. “You’ve actually found the 
mermaid!” 

“Just get me out of this net!” I cried. Somehow, I didn’t feel so 
great about capturing the mermaid anymore. 

“The zoo people were right,” Dr. D. muttered to himself. “It’s 
unbelievable. It’s astounding. It’s historic....” 

We landed in a heap on the floor of the dinghy. The mermaid 
squirmed beside me in the net, making sharp, angry clicking noises. 

Dr. D. watched her closely. He touched her tail. 

The mermaid flapped it hard against the bottom of the boat. 

“Is there any way this could be a hoax?” he wondered aloud. 

“Billy—is this one of your dumb tricks?” Sheena demanded 
suspiciously. 

“It’s not a trick,” I said. “Now will you get me out of this net? The 
ropes are digging into my skin.” 

They ignored me. 

Sheena gently reached one finger through the net and touched the 
scales on the mermaid’s tail. “I can’t believe it,” she murmured. “She’s 
really real!” 

“Of course she’s real!” I cried. “We’re both real, and we’re both 
very uncomfortable!” 

“Well, it’s hard to believe anything you say,” Sheena snapped. 
“After all, you’ve been talking about sea monsters ever since we got 
here.” 

“I did see a sea monster!” I cried. 

“Quiet, kids,” said Dr. D. “Let’s get our discovery back to the sea 
lab.” 

He started the dinghy’s motor and we roared back to the big boat. 

Alexander stood on deck, waiting for us. “It’s really true!” he 
cried excitedly. “It’s really a mermaid!” 

Sheena tied the dinghy to the side of the Cassandra while Dr. D. 
and Alexander hoisted me and the mermaid aboard. 

Dr. D. opened the net and helped me out. The mermaid flopped 


her tail and got herself even more tangled in the net. 

Alexander shook my hand. “I’m proud of you, Billy. How did you 
do it? This is amazing.” He gave me a vigorous pat on the back. “Do 
you realize this is the greatest ocean find of the century? Maybe of all 
time?” 

“Thanks,” I said. “But I didn’t do anything. I didn’t find her—she 
found me.” 

The mermaid flopped violently on deck. Her squeals became 
higher-pitched, more frantic. 

Alexander’s face fell. “We’ve got to do something for her,” he said 
urgently. 

“Dr. D., you’ve got to let her go,” I said. “She needs to be in the 
water.” 

“PI fill the big tank with seawater, Dr. D.,” said Alexander. He 
hurried off to fill the tank. 

“We can’t let her go just yet, Billy,” said Dr. D. “Not without 
examining her first.” His eyes were shining with excitement. But he 
saw how upset I was. “We won’t hurt her, Billy. She’ll be all right.” 

His eyes dropped to my leg, and he frowned. He kneeled down to 
look at it. 

“Youre bleeding, Billy,” he said. “Are you okay?” 

“Tm fine,” I said. “But the mermaid isn’t.” 

He ignored me. 

“How did this happen?” asked Dr. D. 

“A shark grabbed my leg,” I told him. “Just as he was about to 
clamp down, the mermaid came. She saved my life. You should have 
seen her fighting that shark.” 

Dr. D. turned to the mermaid as if seeing her for the first time. 

“Wow,” said Sheena. “She fought off a shark? All by herself?” 

The mermaid’s long green tail pounded angrily on the deck of the 
boat. 

“EEEEE! EEEEEE!” she cried shrilly. She almost sounded as if she 
were screaming. 

“Forget about my leg,” I shouted. “You’ve got to let the mermaid 
go!” 

Dr. D. stood up, shaking his head. “Billy, I’m a scientist. This 
mermaid is an extremely important discovery. If I let her go, Pd be 
letting down the entire scientific community. I’d be letting down the 
entire world!” 

“You just want the million dollars,” I muttered. 

I knew it was cruel, but I couldn’t stop myself. I hated seeing the 
mermaid so unhappy. 

Dr. D. looked hurt. 


“That’s not fair, Billy,” he said. “I think you know me better than 
that.” 

I avoided his gaze. Lowering my head, I pretended to examine the 
cut on my leg. It wasn’t very deep. Alexander had given me some 
gauze. I pressed it against the cut. 

“I only want the money to continue my research,” Dr. D. went on. 
“T would never use this mermaid to get rich.” 

That was true. I knew Dr. D. didn’t care about the money for 
himself. All he wanted was to keep on studying fish. 

“Just think about it, Billy. You’ve found a mermaid! A creature 
we all thought didn’t exist! We can’t just let her go. We’ve got to find 
out a little bit about her,” he said excitedly. 

I said nothing. 

“We won’t hurt her, Billy. I promise.” 

Alexander returned. “The tank is ready, Dr. D.” 

“Thanks.” Dr. D. followed him to the other side of the boat. 

I glanced at Sheena to see whose side she was on. Did she want to 
keep the mermaid? Or let her go? 

But Sheena just stood there, watching. Her face was tense. I could 
tell she wasn’t sure which of us was right. 

But when I looked at the mermaid, I knew I was right. 

She had finally stopped squirming and flipping her tail. Now she 
lay still on the deck, the net draped over her. She was breathing hard 
and staring out at the ocean with watery, sad eyes. 

I wished ld never tried to find her in the first place. Now all I 
wanted was to find some way to help her get back to her home. 

Dr. D. and Alexander came back. They lifted the mermaid inside 
the net. Alexander lifted her tail, and Dr. D. held her head. 

“Don’t squirm, little mermaid,” Dr. D. said in a soothing voice. 
“Keep still.” 

The mermaid seemed to understand. She didn’t flop around. But 
her eyes rolled wildly, and she uttered low moans. 

Dr. D. and Alexander carried her to the giant glass tank. It stood 
on the deck now, full of fresh seawater. They gently dropped her into 
the tank, pulling the net away as she slid into the water. Then they 
put a screen top over the tank and clamped it shut. 

The mermaid churned the water with her tail. Then, gradually, 
her tail stopped moving. She grew still. 

Her body slumped lifelessly to the bottom of the tank. 

She didn’t move or breathe. 

“Noooo!” An angry cry escaped my lips. “She’s dead! She’s dead! 
We killed her!” 
